,Job Title,Salary Range,Job Description,Rating,Company Name,Location,Headquarters,Size,Founded,Type of ownership,Industry,Sector,Revenue,Competitors
0,Applied Machine Learning Engineer,-1,"Redesign Health is a proud Equal Opportunity Employer we recruit, train, compensate and promote our team members based on qualifications. We know how important it is not only to include, but to actively seek out a diversity of opinions and voices.

We want to hear from you regardless of your race, religion, national origin, sex, gender identity, sexual orientation, disability, age, veteran status, or any other applicable legally protected characteristics.

About Anomaly


Anomaly is a healthcare technology company with a bold mission: to bring precision payments to healthcare.

Healthcare billing is complex, prone to errors, waste, abuse, and fraudat a cost of over $300 billion annually. Precision payments means the right amount is paid the first time, so the focus is on members, not on payment paperwork. Cutting-edge AI/ML technology immediately catches anomalous claims, enabling payments to flow with precision. Anomaly's team of technical, clinical, and operational experts is working with innovative payers and employers to implement this vision. Our team includes the former CEO of UnitedHealthcare Employer & Individual, head of engineering of Foursquare and Redesign Health, and formers from Optum, Apple, Google and other leading tech and healthcare companies.

Anomaly, currently in stealth mode, was incubated by Redesign Health.

About Redesign Health


Redesign Health is a healthcare innovation platform. The Redesign team brings together entrepreneurs, industry experts, and investors to fund and launch companies that transform the healthcare system and empower people to live their healthiest lives. Their first companies include Lively, Ever/Body, Vault Health, Springtide, HealthQuarters, Calibrate, and stealth ventures in payment integrity, sleep therapy, elder care, and complex care. Redesign is capitalized with permanent capital from world-class institutional investors and entrepreneurs.

About the Applied Machine Learning Engineer Role


As our Applied Machine Learning Engineer, you will collaborate with other data scientists, as well as members of the platform engineering team in order to execute cutting-edge machine learning techniques to find fraud, waste, and abuse in healthcare data. Your goal is to train and test models on millions of data-points, and help build-out a state-of-the-art human-in-the-loop ML infrastructure.

In this role, you will report directly to the Head of Data Science at our New York City headquarters. This role will remote until it is safe to return to the office. You will collaborate with other data scientists, as well as members of the platform engineering team. You will also engage in daily interactions with domain experts on the payment integrity team.

What you'll do:
Write production-level machine learning models
Executing cutting-edge machine learning techniques to find fraud, waste, and abuse in healthcare data.
Making infrastructural choices in order to ensure that the trained models scale well across millions of health insurance claims
Collaborate with the team to build internal tools to support our company mission
Working with domain experts in the health insurance field to incorporate their knowledge into trained models.
Building interactive internal tools to obtain expert feedback for the purposes of model validation.
Have strong impact on innovative engineering projects
Running unsupervised anomaly detection on millions of heterogeneous health-insurance features using PySpark.
Shining a bright light on black-box models to make all anomalous signals easily interpretable.
Interacting with domain experts and encoding their experience into simple heuristics. Pushing these heuristics to production for the purposes of weak supervision.
Training large-scale, weakly-supervised ML models using tools like Snorkel. Making sure these models are interpretable.
Tweaking models using expert feedback. Building dashboards to solicit that feedback using human-in-the-loop training techniques.
Experimenting with transformer model applications using the Pytorch / Tensorflow libraries.
What you'll need:


Background
Standard knowledge of Python data-science stack
5+ years in software engineering experience
Hacker mindset
Experience building out production-ready machine learning solutions
Skills
Communicates Effectively: Attentively listens to others. Adjusts to fit the audience and the message. Provides timely and helpful information to others across the organization. Developing and delivering multi-mode communications that convey a clear understanding of the unique needs of different audiences.
Manages Ambiguity: Deals comfortably with the uncertainty of change. Effectively handles risk. Can decide and act without having the total picture. Is calm, and productive, even when things are up in the air.
Courage: Readily tackles tough assignments. Faces difficult issues and supports others who do the same. Provides direct and actionable feedback.
Instills Trust: Follows through on commitments. Is seen as direct and truthful. Keeps confidences. Practices what he/she preaches. Shows consistency between words and actions. Gaining the confidence and trust of others through honesty, integrity, and authenticity
Action Oriented: Readily takes action on challenges, without unnecessary planning. Identifies and seizes new opportunities. Displays a can-do attitude in good and bad times. Steps up to handle tough issues.
Nice To Have
Exposure to PySpark, PyTorch, Snorkel
Experience working in a fast-paced, innovative environment
What Redesign is all about


Redesign's mission is to transform the healthcare system and empower people to live their healthiest lives by elevating patient experiences, increasing information transparency, and democratizing access to high quality healthcare.

Our vision is to connect extraordinary people and ideas with capital and resources to create better healthcare solutions.

At Redesign, we value achieving results thoughtfully, quickly, and compassionately. To give a sense of what our team is all about, these are the values that guide our work:
Solve for impact: Healthcare is complex and opaque, but we're positioned to meet the challenge. If not us, then who?
Patients first: We are all consumers of healthcare. We create real solutions for real needs.
Outcome over egos: Our work is bigger than us. What we're building together is greater than the sum of the parts.
Bias for action: We move fast, but we're deliberate. We don't delay success or failure.
Continuous learning: We seek feedback early and often. Iteration and insight allow us to connect the dots and are key to our process.
Practice good intent: We take our work seriously, but we're never too busy to be kind.
Why work with us?
Competitive salary and equity compensation
Comprehensive health & wellness benefits and perks
Lunch & Learn sessions hosted by internal and external industry experts featuring topics ranging from ""Qualities of a Strong Consumer Brand"" to ""Combating Unconscious Bias""
Variety of functional, social, and community focused groups and meetups across the Redesign ecosystem and portfolio
Annual learning stipend
16-week parental leave
Fully stocked kitchen with plenty of coffee and tea, cold brew and iced tea on tap, a Bevi machine, and a variety of snacks
Dog friendly office",5.0,"Redesign Health
5.0","New York, NY",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2018,Company - Private,Venture Capital & Private Equity,Finance,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
1,"Software Engineer, Machine Learning",-1,"Engineering at Postmates

We're building groundbreaking tech solutions that power our revolutionary logistics platform to help connect millions of customers with their favorite merchants every day. We're tackling some of the most complex technical challenges in the modern logistics space to unlock opportunities that positively impact the local businesses and communities we serve.

WHAT WE DO


Postmates relies heavily on our engineering team to realize this vision. Building a software platform that is reliable, scales, and stays agile under demanding product needs is a serious technical challenge. Postmates is a three-part balancing act connecting customers, merchants, and couriers in real-time. If any piece is out of whack, the whole system suffers. Working with the Postmates engineering team offers an opportunity with explosive growth, cutting-edge technology, a highly visible charter, and a cool user-focused product vision.

In this role, you'll have the opportunity to work on various challenging machine learning and optimization problems in real-time and in scale, including:
Modeling and forecasting demand and supply to enable more intelligent matching, optimize the overall marketplace efficiency, and provide valuable insights to our merchants and Postmates
Large scale Machine Learning algorithms and infrastructure that powers our Search Ranking models and Personalized Recommendation Engine
Predicting the Postmates Delivery Time (PDT) and improving the efficiency (batching, chaining, etc) and reliability of the dispatching algorithm
Determining the optimal pricing strategies to help our Postmates maximize their revenue
Identifying suspicious transactions and malicious users for risk control
Natural Language Processing to understand text content on Postmates platform, including named entity resolution and recognization of reviews, descriptions and interactions between users on our marketplace
YOUR RESPONSIBILITIES
Build end-to-end ML systems of designing, training, testing and deploying Machine Learning models
Write production-level codes to train your ML models into working pipelines and services to serve production online traffic
Have the ability to apply machine learning to solve complex business problems and optimize critical business metrics, and work closely with Product Managers and Data analysts to frame Machine Learning problems within the business context
Analyze experimental and observational data, communicate findings, and facilitate launch decisions
Participate in code reviews to ensure code quality and distribute knowledge
OUR REQUIREMENTS
A Bachelor's/Master's degree (or higher) in a technical field (Computer Science, Statistics, Economics, Operations Research, Math, Physics, Engineering, etc.) or equivalent work experience required.
Minimum of 3+ years of professional experience in Data Science or Applied Machine Learning required
Solid engineering and coding skills with the ability to write high-performance production quality code
Good understanding of common families of machine learning models, feature engineering, feature selection and other practical machine learning issues, such as overfitting
Strong communication skills. Explaining complex technical concepts to product managers, data analysts, and other engineers shouldn't be a problem for you.
OUR PREFERRED QUALIFICATIONS
Industry experience building and productionizing innovative end-to-end Machine Learning systems
Experience in Java, C++, Go, Python, Scala and other equivalent languages
Experience with MapReduce, Spark, Hive, HBase, Airflow, Google BigQuery, BigTable, and Dataflow
Experience with ML frameworks like Tensorflow, PyTorch, Spark MLlib, XGBoost, and Scikit-Learn
A bit about us

Postmates is changing delivery for good. While you may know us as the clever brand loved by celebrities and millennials, we are so much more. We are industry-first leaders in the modern logistics space, creating groundbreaking tech products that positively impact millions of customers, merchants and gig-economy workers as well as the underserved in the communities where we work. How will you help us change delivery for good?

Benefits

Postmates has your back. In our impact-first work environment, we value huge company vision. As you strive to build the future with us, we'll support you with a competitive rates and equity plan, along with access to our 401k plan and robust benefits including: health benefits, flexible paid time off, parental benefits, and food perks.

Postmates is proud to be an equal employment opportunity and affirmative action employer. Qualified applicants at Postmates are considered without regards to race, color, religion, national origin, age, sex, marital status, ancestry, physical or mental disability, veteran status, gender identity, or sexual orientation.",3.4,"Postmates
3.4",United States,-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2011,Company - Private,Express Delivery Services,Transportation & Logistics,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
2,Data Acquisition Engineer (SCADA/Web Backend),-1,"GameChange Solar is one of the fastest growing, most dynamic companies in the rapidly growing solar industry. We have top quality solar racking and tracker products that generate the most amount of energy, are the fastest to install, and the most cost effective.

The Data Acquisition Engineer will work in development to improve our framework for data acquisition and control of our fleet of 100's of MW of solar trackers. They will also develop tools for data processing and visualization to provide for new features for our products. This is an exciting opportunity for an engineer with experience in web design and SCADA who has solid communication skills.We offer a solid base with significant bonus upside for exceptional performance.

Roles and responsibilities include but will not be limited to:

· Develop a system for local SCADA interfacing

· Configure software suites to meet our system needs

· Develop custom applications to perform data acquisition and reporting

· Create user-friendly HMIs

· Work with engineering team to design and develop our back end for data acquisition and control

· Use machine learning techniques to improve system performance

Skills and Education:

· Experience with networks and SCADA

· Experience with backend web design

· Python, Google VM, Linux, Javascript/css/html Node, React, LabView

· Experience with Modbus, TCP, SSH, SFTP

· Knowledge of NEC, NERC, CIP, industry protocols (IEC-61850, DNP, Modbus, OPC), Ethernet systems, protocol analyzers, and industry SCADA practices

· Experience with SCADA integration software such as Kepware, Aggregate, Zenon

· Bachelor's Degree in Electrical Engineering with preferred emphasis in software, integration and automation, and industrial controls

· 2+ years experience in SCADA, industrial controls, or backend web design

· Strong Communication skills: Mastery of written and spoken English required

Salary DOE

Business Casual attire when in office setting.

PPE and GCS attire for onsite visits.

Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k)
Dental insurance
Health insurance
Paid time off
Retirement plan
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Supplemental Pay:
Bonus pay
Experience:
SCADA: 2 years (Preferred)
Networks: 2 years (Required)
Backend Web Design: 2 years (Preferred)
Education:
Bachelor's (Preferred)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Application Question:
List a brief description of what we make
Company's website:
gamechangesolar.com
Benefit Conditions:
Waiting period may apply
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",2.5,"GameChange Solar
2.5","Norwalk, CT",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2012,Company - Private,Energy,"Oil, Gas, Energy & Utilities",Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
3,Software Engineer (Backend/Node) for Health Startup (remote/US-based),-1,"Software Engineer (Backend/Node.js) for Growing Health Startup (remote / US-based)*
About Us:

Mental Health Match is fast-growing marketplace that simplifies the search for mental health care. Our unique platform and matching algorithm instantly match people to the therapists and counselors who best meet their needs, including budget/insurance, cultural fit, and expertise.

We are a mission-driven social enterprise with proven traction. Launched last year, over 1,000 therapists have joined the platform, and we have matched over 25,000 people to the mental health professionals who can best help them.

This backend role will work closely with our CTO to build, architect, and deploy new systems to fuel our next phase of our growth. They will work closely with our full team to make decisions about the product and help create a foundation to grow our technical team. The ideal candidate will be excited about getting a full 360 degree view of the product, market, and business they are a part of.

Your primary duties:
Your primary duties will involve the full range of development, deployment, and data management of a Node.js backend application.
You will also support infrastructure projects including implementing CI, improving automated testing, and preparing data for consumption by various machine learning methods.
These responsibilities include:
Help architect, build, and maintain our back-end API using Nodejs, JavaScript, Postgres, and various third-party integrations, including collaboration in database design.
Implement and maintain test suites
Collaborate on data architecture, product strategy and feature development, including adoption of new technologies.
Assist with managing, supporting and troubleshooting the infrastructure required to run these projects and ancillary technologies.
Help build and improve a robust set of systems and technologies required to run a startup with a small team.
Qualifications:
Node.js (3+ years, full-time work experience)
Javascript (3+years full-time work experience
Relational Databases: (3+ years full-time work experience)
This is a fully-remote position available to only permanent residents of the US (citizens or green card holders) who are currently living in the US. We cannot offer sponsorships such as H-1Bs.

Compensation

This is a full-time position. Compensation is a competitive salary plus equity options, subsidized health, dental, and vision insurance, and up to 5 weeks of annual vacation. We have a flexible work culture that supports the wellbeing of our employees and healthy work-life balance.

To apply:

Please send a resume and links to relevant projects you are proud of.

Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
Dental insurance
Flexible schedule
Health insurance
Paid time off
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Experience:
Node.JS: 3 years (Required)
Relational Databases: 5 years (Required)
Javascript: 5 years (Required)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Work Location:
Fully Remote
Visa Sponsorship Potentially Available:
No: Not providing sponsorship for this job
This Company Describes Its Culture as:
Innovative -- innovative and risk-taking
Team-oriented -- cooperative and collaborative
People-oriented -- supportive and fairness-focused
Company's website:
www.mentalhealthmatch.com
Company's Facebook page:
www.facebook.com/MentalHealthMatch/
Benefit Conditions:
Waiting period may apply
COVID-19 Precaution(s):
Remote interview process
Virtual meetings",-1,"Mental Health Match, Inc.","Portland, OR",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
4,Sr. Software Engineer | Front End (optional remote),$77k-$150k (Glassdoor Est.),"Were looking for a Senior Software Engineer interested in building industrial-strength applications with maintainable code and clean user experiences.

Our team is responsible for the large-scale web app serving as the primary interface for our companys product. We build data-dense visualizations and deep-dive investigation interfaces for a full range of security & performance users, from entry-level to expert.

We embrace strongly-typed TypeScript and functional paradigms. We tackle tech debt in a timely manner. We give peer code reviews to keep our quality bar high (and we use tools like Prettier and ESLint to automate the pedantic bits).

We offer an engaging and innovative environment in which people are encouraged and supported to collaborate on industry-leading technology and create a world-class engineering team, while they develop and enrich their individual growth. And were doing it with creativity, intellectual curiosity, and a sense of humor.

We believe in actively investing in a diverse engineering organization. We are seeking highly talented software engineers from all backgrounds, who bring in their own perspectives, influences, and experiences. Are you as passionate as we are about positive culture and amazing technology? If so, we cant wait to chat with you.

Duties & Responsibilities
Be a part of a growing team that builds the UI for the ExtraHop product family
Expand as desired into other areas of engineering we encourage and support full-stack flexibility
Collaborate with UX, PM, QA, and other engineering teams to define requirements, design interfaces, and develop architecture
Participate in agile development methodologies
Demonstrate traits in line with our company values (have a sense of humor, be nice to each other, think about customers first, build cool stuff)
Required Skills & Experience
Working in a front end language (such as JavaScript, TypeScript, Reason, and Elm)
Working with a front-end framework (such as React, Angular, Vue, and Svelte)
Working in at least one large Single Page Application
Practical understanding of data structures and algorithms
Ability to lead and mentor other team members
Desired Skills & Experience
Familiarity with strong static types and functional paradigms
Familiarity with back-end languages (such as Python, Golang, Rust, C and SQL)
Creating data visualizations using web tools (such as Canvas, SVG, D3, and three.js)
Build tools (such as Webpack, Docker, Makefile, npm, and lerna)
Testing frameworks (such as Jest, Jasmine, and Behave)
Cloud platforms (such as AWS, Azure, and GCP)
Benefits & Perks
Market competitive total compensation package
100% insurance cost covered for employee (80% for family)
401k and company stock options
Generous PTO honor system
Volunteer Time Off
9 company paid holidays
Tuition reimbursement program for continuing education
Internal R&D Hackathons twice a year
About ExtraHop

ExtraHop is an enterprise cyber analytics and performance monitoring company helping the worlds leading organizations understand and secure their entire environment from core to edge to cloud. Our breakthrough approach to analytics and machine learning helps our customers investigate threats, ensure the delivery of critical applications, and secure their investment in the cloud, resulting in 95% faster threat detection and reducing unplanned downtime by 86% while providing the best possible customer experience.

ExtraHop is recognized by leading organizations for both its innovation in the market and its commitment to building a world-class team. Weve been named to Wealthfronts Career-Launching Companies list for the last four years, and JMP Securities put ExtraHop on its 2019 Elite 80 List as one of the most strategically positioned private companies in the cybersecurity industry. Credit Suisse recognized ExtraHop as a member of its inaugural Disruptive Technology Recognition Program, and SC Media named ExtraHop a 2019 Industry Innovator for enterprise network traffic analysis.

ExtraHop is an Equal Opportunity Employer. Qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, age, disability, military status, or national origin or any other characteristic protected under federal, state, or applicable local law
#LI-BKW",3.8,"ExtraHop Networks, Inc.
3.8","Boston, MA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2007,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
5,Azure Solutions Engineer,-1,"Our Culture:

Stoneridge Software began with an idea: How can Microsoft implementations be done better? After considering the idea and continually seeing the need for a business partner who could successfully deliver software implementations, Eric Newell, Becky Newell, and Cody Marshall founded Stoneridge Software. As a Microsoft Gold Partner, we have developed a proven process for project delivery and a laser focus on long-term support to empower our clients success. We know how to work hard but we also know how important it is to balance work with family and the rest of our lives. Stoneridge Software has cultivated an atmosphere of trust, community, and support that includes a flexible working environment, unlimited vacation, paid parental leave, continuous learning and development, and even beer on-tap. These initiatives, and many more have resulted in numerous Best Workplace awards and happy team members. We focus on allowing our team members to be authentically themselves whether that is creative, serious, or nerdy. Does this sound like a team you would like to be a part of?

What we are Looking for:

Stoneridge Software is seeking a sharp and highly motivated individual to join our growing Microsoft Dynamics Small & Medium Business team serving our Dynamics NAV, Dynamics GP, and Dynamics 365 Business Central clients needs related to Azure, O365, Active Directory and Networking as a Technical Consultant.

This person would be responsible for leading our clients through configuration, migration, and setup, specifically with deployment & support of ERP installations hosted on Azure. Our ideal candidate will have deep technical knowledge in Azure, O365 and the Dynamics Platform which will be used in performing their tasks.

A Day in the Life:
Provide input and advice regarding hosting capabilities and functions to client organizations currently leveraging Microsoft Dynamics GP, Dynamics NAV and Dynamics 365 Business Central and Microsoft SQL Server.
Provide lead role in the Dynamics NAV and Dynamics GP transition to hosted solutions and on-going support & maintenance.
Serve as point person for maintenance (proactive) and support (reactive) for hosted clients on Azure.
Field and resolve client support cases related to Azure and O365.
Participate in company initiatives (functional and technical analysis, documentation, and development, etc.).
Build positive client relationships while developing an understanding of customers businesses.
Partner with Account Management and Client Services Professionals to recommend/outline hosting offerings and recommendations for clients interested in transitioning from an on-prem to hosted solution.
Preferred Qualifications
Azure virtual machines, storage and backups
Azure site recovery
Azure SQL, ADFS and SharePoint
O365 Exchange (online & on prem.)
O365 SharePoint (online & on prem.)
O365 SharePoint development
O365 Teams
O365 PowerApps & Flow
Microsoft Azure Solution Architect Certification
Proven communication skills: oral and written
Ability to exercise independent judgement required in setting priorities of tasks among multiple assigned projects
Ability to respond to software problems remotely effectively and promptly
Excellent troubleshooting skills and ability to investigate error messages and determine resolution
Basic ERP functionality related to Sales Order processing, Purchase Order processing, Inventory & Bill of Material Manufacturing & Project Accounting a plus!
Microsoft Dynamics Certifications a plus!
Required Qualifications
Experience working with Transact SQL, Database Backup / Recovery
Experience working with some combinations of the following software applications / programs:
GP 2013, 2015, 2016, 2018
NAV 2009, 2013, 2015, 2016, 2018
Dynamics 365 Business Central (on-prem & SaaS)
Azure
Office 365
SQL Server Reporting Services
Performance monitoring and tuning
Cloud migrations
Travel Required: Incumbent is expected to meet with client teams across the United States and will be asked to attend industry events from time to time.

Benefits

Stoneridge Software is happy to provide the following benefits:
Health Insurance
HSA Contribution
Medical and Dependent Care FSA
Dental and Vision Insurance
Long-Term Disability
Life Insurance
Employee Assistance Program
Unlimited Vacation
Paid Paternity & Maternity Leave
401(k) Contribution
Cell Phone and Internet Reimbursement
Flexible work environment
Casual dress
Stoneridge Software is committed to creating a diverse environment and is proud to be an equal opportunity employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, gender, gender identity or expression, sexual orientation, national origin, genetics, disability, age, veteran status and all the other fascinating characteristics that make us unique.

Powered by JazzHR",4.4,"Stoneridge Software
4.4","Fargo, ND",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2012,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
6,Advanced Software Engineer,$42k-$90k (Glassdoor Est.),"You are a Software Engineer with solid understanding of algorithms and data structures, compiler design, and object oriented programming. You are looking for difficult challenges, the possibility of great innovations, and abundant opportunities for technical research, continuous learning, and skill development.

We are Peddinghaus Corporation’s Advanced Software Development department, a highly collaborative team that creates result-oriented software and strives to enable our customers’ to safely achieve optimal productivity. Peddinghaus Corporation is the leading equipment manufacturer for structural steel fabricators.

Our software interfaces between structural engineering and our customers’ machines that process structural steel beams and columns before they are assembled on construction sites into stadiums, skyscrapers, hospitals, bridges, and other structures. Our software comprises a wide range of technological opportunities, including a core 3D geometry engine, compiler-like post processors to generate CNC code, NP complete algorithms, SQL databases, file parsers with data mapping, interfaces to structural design software, and graphic user interfaces. We utilize C# and both Windows Forms and ASP.NET MVC.

We like you to join us at our Chicago, IL office near Union Station, or at our Bradley, IL headquarters.
Your key characteristics: *
Fascinated by the opportunity to advance software development for an equipment manufacturer for structural steel fabricators.
Communication skills for collaboration with other engineering disciplines.
Strong interpersonal, analytical, problem solving, and organizational skills.
Bachelor’s or postgraduate degree in CS/CE/EE or related field.
3 years’ or otherwise commensurate experience in analytical software design and development.
Thorough understanding of algorithms and data structures, compiler design, and OOP principles.
Deep knowledge of C#, Windows Forms, ASP.NET MVC, and Microsoft Visual Studio.
Leverage software development methods and technologies including SDLC concepts.
Familiarity with relational databases and SQL.
Technical skills or areas of understanding include*:
Programming language design
Discrete structures
Combinatorial mathematics
Approximation algorithms
Parallel numerical algorithms
NP complete problems
Formal Software Development Methods
Formal Models of Computation
Computational Complexity
If you are an experienced Software Engineer fascinated by the opportunity to advance software development for an equipment manufacturer for structural steel fabricators, if you are eager to solve challenging problems with impacts in the physical world, if you thrive on cross-disciplinary collaboration, then apply for this position.

Work location options*:

Our Chicago, IL software development office is across the river from Union Station next to the Chicago Riverwalk. The loop is only a couple of blocks away and most of Chicago’s amenities are within walking distance.

Our Bradley, IL headquarters are about an hour’s drive south of Chicago. Bradley and its surrounding communities offer a variety of suburban and rural living within easy commuting distance. After COVID-19 restrictions have been lifted it is expected that all corporate amenities will be available again, especially our gym with indoor tennis and basketball court, as well as, our gourmet cafeteria. In Bradley you are close to C-Level leaders, Engineering, Manufacturing, Sales, Service, and our Software Support team.

Because of Covid-19, we are currently working 2 days in the office, 3 days from our home offices. The Chicago and Bradley offices are accessible 24/7.
Peddinghaus participates in E-Verify.*
Job Type: Full-time

COVID-19 considerations:
Preferred are in-person interviews with proper COVID-19 precautions. Initial remote interviews are an option, too.

Experience:
Compiler Construction: 3 years (Preferred)
Object-Oriented Programming: 3 years (Required)
Algorithms and Data Structures: 3 years (Required)
Education:
Bachelor's (Required)
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",3.1,"Peddinghaus Corporation
3.1","Chicago, IL",-1,201 to 500 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Industrial Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
7,Nextracker - Data Scientist/Machine Learning Engineer,$79k-$128k (Glassdoor Est.),"*CURRENT EMPLOYEES :
Please click here to be redirected to the internal career site.
Job Description
At Nextracker, we are leading in the energy transition, providing the most comprehensive portfolio of intelligent solar tracker and control software solutions for solar power plants, as well as strategic services to capture the full value of solar power plants for our customers. Our talented worldwide teams are transforming PV plant performance every day with smart technology, data monitoring and analysis services.


As a company driving the clean energy transition, sustainability is not just a word. It's a core part of our business and our operations. Our sustainability efforts are based on five cornerstones: People, Community, Environment, Innovation, and Integrity. We are creative, collaborative and passionate problem-solvers from diverse backgrounds, driven by our shared mission to provide smart solar and software solutions for our customers and to mitigate climate change for future generations. Make your mark with Nextracker.

NEXTracker is seeking a ML Engineer/ Data Scientist.He or She will work within the NEXTracker Asset Management and Support team and be responsible for gleaning insights from data collected from the world’s largest installed base of solar array single-axis trackers. The position will be located in our Fremont, CA office.

We are looking for someone who demonstrates:
Intense collaboration
Passionate customer focus
Thoughtful, fast, disciplined execution
Tenacious commitment to continuous improvement
Relentless drive to win
Here is a glimpse of what you’ll do:
Design and develop large scale distributed ML pipelines on cloud.
Take end to end ownership of Machine Learning systems - from data pipelines and training, to real-time prediction engines.
Thrive in a fast-paced environment with a quick cadence of research, experimentation, and product launches.
Create visualizations and presentations for a wide range of technical and non-technical audiences.
Develop tools to create daily monitoring reports on product health and product performance.
Here is some of what you’ll need (required):
MS or PhD degree in a quantitative discipline (e.g., statistics, computer science, mathematics).
3+ years of relevant work experience in Machine Learning, building data science-driven solutions including data collection, feature selection, model training, post-deployment validation.
Excellent understanding of machine learning techniques and algorithms, including Supervised (Regression, Classification) and Unsupervised ML algorithms (clustering, anomaly detection), optimization, neural networks
Excellent applied statistics skills, such as distributions, statistical testing, regression analysis.
Excellent hands-on coding skills (preferably in Python) processing large-scale data set and using ML/statistical modeling tools such as Numpy, ScikitLearn
Intermediate MS Excel experience (Data Analysis, Pivot Tables, Formulas).
Experience in pattern recognition methodologies
Experience translating analysis results into business recommendations.
Excellent verbal and written communication skills
#LI-LD1
LD50

Here are a few of our preferred experiences:
Programming experience in SQL, NOSQL and PowerBI, Tableu is a plus.
MATLAB
Here are a few examples of what you’ll get for the great work you provide:
Full range of medical benefits, dental, vision
Life Insurance
Matching 401K
PTO
Tuition Reimbursement
Employee discounts at local retailers
Job Category
Design, Process & Technology Engineering

Relocation

Eligible for domestic relocation only
Is Sponsorship Available?
No

Flex does not accept unsolicited resumes from headhunters, recruitment agencies or fee based recruitment services. Flex is an Equal Opportunity Employer and employment selection decisions are based on merit, qualifications, and abilities. Flex does not discriminate in employment opportunities or practices based on: age, race, religion, color, sex, national origin, marital status, sexual orientation, gender identity, veteran status, disability, pregnancy status or any other status protected by law. Flex provides reasonable accommodation so that qualified applicants with a disability may participate in the selection process. Please advise us of any accommodations you request to express interest in a position by e-mailing: accessibility@flex.com. Please state your request for assistance in your message. Only reasonable accommodation requests related to applying for a specific position within Flex will be reviewed at the e-mail address. Flex will contact you if it is determined that your background is a match to the required skills required for this position. Thank you for considering a career with Flex.

The information we collect:

We may collect personal information that you choose to submit to us through the Website or otherwise provide to us. This may include your contact details; information provided in online questionnaires, feedback forms, or applications for employment; and information you provide such as CV/Resume. Your details will be provided to the entity you are applying for a job with. We will use your information for legitimate business purposes such as responding to comments or queries or answering questions; progressing applications for employment; allowing you to choose to share web content with others or; where you represent one of our customers or suppliers, administering the business relationship with that customer or supplier. We will process your data in accordance with our Recruitment Privacy Notice.

If you have any queries about the processing of your data, please contact:

Global Data Privacy Officer:

Email Address: chiefprivacyofficer@flex.com",3.8,"Flex
3.8","Fremont, CA",-1,10000+ Employees,1969,Company - Public,Electrical & Electronic Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$10+ billion (USD),-1
8,Senior Principal Engineer,-1,"We are seeking a Senior Principal Engineer to join our product development team. In this role, you will be a technical leader on our Lexio team. Lexio is an innovative product that combines data analysis, natural language generation, and an intuitive user experience to reimagine Business Intelligence. As a Senior Principal Engineer, you will have technical ownership over significant parts of the Lexio codebase. You will be challenged with a diverse set of projects including greenfield product development and system-level platform improvements.

While technical work will be your primary focus, you are a problem solver at your core. You are a collaborator who is energized by working with the entire spectrum of the Lexio team; engineering, product, design, customer success, and go-to-market. You are driven to build something great and resilient to the fact that customer and user needs often change. You take delight in:
Using creativity and innovation to make products better for the end-user every day
Working on unique technical problems in the emerging field of data storytelling
Working in small teams to efficiently design and build solutions to novel problems
Expressing your perspective even when it may not be a popular one
Mentoring people and believing that a great product comes from great team collaboration
Working with company leadership to define and guide engineering goals
Tackling the highest priority and riskiest projects
Qualifications
10+ years of professional software development experience
Proven expertise with Python or equivalent
Experience with Unix / Linux systems (e.g. Ubuntu, CentOS, RedHat, etc.)
Familiarity with distributed and cloud computing, particularly AWS
Proven experience building highly scalable, fault-tolerant applications
Demonstrated ability to write clean, helpfully-commented and readable code
Proven ability to collaborate and influence cross-functionally
A drive to learn constantly with an analytical and problem-solving mindset
A passion for growing as an engineer and helping others grow
Experience with owning a technical roadmap, defining developer standards, and promoting best practices across the engineering organization
A knack for debugging unfamiliar problems
Proven experience dealing with ambiguity
Bonus
Experience with statistics and/or machine learning
Experience building modern front-apps (e.g. React/Redux, Angular, Vue)
About the Engineering Team @ Narrative Science

The Engineering team at Narrative Science specializes in delivering high-value cloud-based solutions to customers. Specifically, we are responsible for building and innovating on an insightful and personalized data storytelling platform. We work a lot with data pipelines, analytics, natural language generation (NLG), continuous deployment tooling, and cloud architecture.

Culture @ Narrative Science

Narrative Science believes that data storytelling can empower everyone to understand and take action from their data. Our mission is to build software that leverages artificial intelligence to automatically turn data into easy-to-understand reports, transforms statistics into stories, and converts numbers into knowledge.

Our core virtues (mission-driven, impactful, team first, innovative) are ingrained in everything we do, from how we develop our technology to how we interact with customers to how we hire people. Since 2020, we have embraced a remote approach and are on a journey to ingrain that in our culture. All while being immersed in our culture of learning, collaboration, innovation, and customer impact.

At Narrative Science, we embrace the diverse backgrounds, experiences, and perspectives of our future employees, colleagues, customers, partners, and other stakeholders. We provide equal employment opportunities (EEO) to all employees and applicants for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, age, disability, marital status, citizenship, genetic information, or any other characteristic protected by law.",4.1,"Narrative Science
4.1",United States,-1,51 to 200 Employees,2010,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
9,Senior Staff Software Engineer - Machine Learning Acceleration,$101k-$193k (Glassdoor Est.),"Description

We are looking for a self-driven and experienced C++ software engineer to be part of the Xilinx Vitis AI Software team. The Vitis AI Software team develops core software for deploying Machine Learning applications on Xilinx Deep Learning processors.

Being a member of the Vitis AI Software team requires passion and motivation to solve challenging and technical problems with robust algorithms and features. Our code is optimized for high throughput and low-latency – core requirements for Machine Learning inference.

You will be part of a global team that works on the end-to-end Xilinx Vitis AI software stack. Our software...
starts with user Machine Learning models from popular frameworks such as Tensorflow and TVM
compiles them to target various FPGA Deep Learning accelerators
deploys them for execution on FPGA devices
The flexibility of Xilinx FPGA allows many Deep Learning accelerator designs to be deployed on the same FPGA device. And since FPGAs are programmable, Vitis AI also allows users to optimize the user’s entire end-to-end system. The FPGA can deploy not only Deep Learning accelerators on Edge and in the Cloud – it can also be combined with other modules such as Vision or Post-processing – accelerating the user’s whole application on one chip.

Because of that, you will get a unique chance to work with possibly the largest portfolio of Deep Learning accelerator Hardware, Compiler and Software designs in the industry. It is also the most flexible portfolio of Deep Learning accelerators. Xilinx FPGA makes it easy to optimize each accelerator for a specific user application. It is also easy to experiment with state-of-the-art techniques (such as quantization or pruning).

As such, Vitis-AI software is not custom code tuned for one Machine Learning application. You will join us in our exciting effort to design and implement a simple, robust and general Software Stack to efficiently deploy all current and future FPGA accelerators.

As a Sr Staff Software Engineer, you will be a core member in our global team of RTL, Compiler, Software and Application Engineers. We work together from our offices in San Jose HQ, Beijing, and Hyderabad. Because of that, good communication and teamwork are essential. This listing is for a position in our San Jose headquarters.

In this team, members are involved in all aspects of Deep Learning accelerator development: design, prototyping, implementation, testing, and productization. The team is dynamic and offers each member personal opportunity to grow their knowledge and skills in complex problem solving, product development and software engineering.

Learn more about Xilinx and Vitis AI by visiting us at https://github.com/Xilinx/Vitis-AI

MSEE/MSCS with a minimum of 8 years of relevant work experience in software industry
Strong software development and debug skills
Must be able to demonstrate strong analytical and problem solving ability.
Must be able to excel in a team environment with good interpersonal and communication skills.
Fluency in C++, data structures, algorithms, parallel programming and operating systems
Experience with Machine Learning models and applications is preferred
]]>",3.8,"Xilinx
3.8","San Jose, CA",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1984,Company - Public,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
10,Solutions Engineer (US Remote),-1,"Company Description

Kinetica helps many of the world’s largest companies solve some of the world’s most complex problems, including Citibank, GSK, OVO, Softbank, and Telkomsel, among others. The Kinetica Streaming Data Warehouse combines historical and streaming data analysis with powerful location intelligence and AI in a single platform, all easily accessible via API and SQL, for instant results. Organizations across automotive, energy, telecommunications, retail, healthcare, financial services, and beyond can load and analyze their entire collection of data simultaneously, delivering instant insight. Kinetica has a rich partner ecosystem, including Dell, HP, IBM, NVIDIA, and Oracle, and is privately held, backed by leading global venture capital firms Canvas Ventures, Citi Ventures, GreatPoint Ventures, and Meritech Capital Partners.

For more information and to try Kinetica, visit kinetica.com or follow us on LinkedIn and Twitter.

Job Description

Solutions Engineers are responsible for articulating and demonstrating how Kinetica can solve the hardest analytics problems. Interfacing directly with customers they are the ambassadors for the company and the technology. The team is composed of data engineers, data scientists, and entrepreneurs. You will work closely with all aspects of product, delivery, and sales to play a pivotal role in winning new customers, growing existing accounts, and driving company growth. You will be a trusted advisor, product expert, and visionary to a variety of users across all verticals.

We are seeking a hands-on customer-facing and hands-on technical pre-sales engineer to lead the charge on the front lines of an exciting and disruptive, proven technology. Partner with Enterprise customers to help them power their businesses using data by designing, developing, and deploying Big Data, AI & Analytics solutions on the world's fastest GPU accelerated OLAP database.

Responsibilities:
Engage with sales prospects where you prepare and present Kinetica’s technology along with addressing any technical questions that come up during the sales cycle
Support the technical needs of existing customers including discovering additional use cases for Kinetica’s technology
Work closely with the product management and engineering team to align customer requirements to future versions and products
Have a deep understanding of Kinetica’s technology and a willingness to learn new technologies when needed
Qualifications
Technical Degree (i.e. Computer Science, Computer Engineering, Information Technology)
2+ years of pre-sales experience
Strong programming skills in any of the following languages: Java, Python, or C++
Experience with Linux and SQL skills are a mandatory requirement.
Have an understanding of Big Data, Data Warehouse, Data structures, Algorithms, and designing highly available systems. Ability to design & articulate enterprise architecture
Knowledgeable of and has a strong concept on databases, data warehousing, OLAP, data architecture, and data engineering
Has an exposure to or experience working with MPP database and big data system (Hadoop)
Knowledge of enterprise systems and protocols is a plus. Ex: LDAP, SSO, SSL, BI applications.
Experience with Machine Learning, Neural Networks is a plus
Knowledge in Geospatial formulas and techniques is a plus
Experience working in a start-up an environment
Travel (post-covid)
The ideal candidate could live within Midwest, Southeast, or the Northeast
Soft Skills:
Great communication skills (verbal and written)
High-energy self-starter with a passion for data, attention to detail, and ability to work in a fast-paced environment with limited direction
Additional Information

All your information will be kept confidential according to EEO guidelines.",3.5,"Kinetica DB
3.5","Chicago, IL",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2016,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
11,Senior Engineer - Industry 4.0,$54k-$107k (Glassdoor Est.),"Friday, October 30, 2020


Watlow Profile: The world’s leading companies start with Watlow for their thermal solutions. Watlow®, a privately-owned company, is the industry leader in the design, manufacture and integration of complete thermal systems including electric heaters, temperature sensors, temperature controllers, power controllers and supporting software. At Watlow, we are constantly driven to do more to help our customers. We take on big technical challenges. We are committed to projects that help our fellow human beings and we strive to learn more. From single components to high performance systems, we bring our thermal expertise to numerous applications, including semiconductor processing, energy processes, diesel, foodservice equipment, life sciences and others.

Overview of Role

The Sr. Engineer will be responsible for applying expertise in data science and analytics to improve the customer’s thermal system performance, focused on integration into Industry 4.0 technologies. The Sr. Engineer will actively collaborate with customers and Watlow’s internal subject matter experts while expanding Watlow’s technical expertise in successful deployment of advanced alarming algorithms. The role will be located in St. Louis, Missouri at Watlow’s Global headquarters and Advanced Technology Center.

Key Responsibilities:
Developing insights related to innovative new business initiatives
Collaboration with teams to support proper data collection
Meet with customers to determine what information is the most important to them
Develop analytical capabilities (e.g. models and processes) that drive better outcomes for both customers and the company
Mentor and coach more junior team members in developing data flow and analytic capabilities
Cleaning raw data and general pre-processing (generating features)
Developing solutions to visualize data and drive decisions to improve overall system performance
Build, test, and deploy predictive models and/or machine learning algorithms on large static and/or streaming data sets in IoT enabled devices
Identify customer value creation opportunities as outputs of the data analysis
Learn & stay current on Internet of Things (IOT) developments, news, opportunities, and challenges


Qualifications:

Must have:
Bachelor’s degree in computer science, computer engineering or a relevant technical degree
Minimum experience of 5 years’ experience in related data science, analytics, and model building roles
Additional success factors:
Experiences in Industry 4.0 transformation either as internal or customer facing
Experience in defining and implementing data acquisition for diagnostics/prognostics across all stages of the value chain
Natural curiosity and a strong passion for empirical research and problem solving
Strong written and verbal communications skills; comfortable communicating with senior levels of both business and technology leadership
Analytics Experience:
Understanding of data collection and model building processes
A strong understanding of data profiling and data cleansing techniques
Experience working with large complex data sets, real time/near real time analytics, and distributed big data platforms
Experience working with databases
Practical knowledge of analytical techniques and methodologies such as machine learning/supervised and unsupervised techniques, regression modeling, neural networks, data mining and optimization techniques
Experience with one or more of the following programming languages and their associated statistical analysis packages: Python (SciPy/sklearn), R, MatLab (statistics toolbox), or SAS
Connectivity/Data Flow Experience:
IOT Communication protocols knowledge
Familiarity with Cloud based HaaS/PaaS solutions such as AWS, MS Azure.
Proficiency with querying SQL Server databases
Creation of efficient IoT data system architectures and modeling of data flows to enable smart systems initiatives

Watlow is Equal Employment Opportunity Employer including Protected Veterans and
Individuals with Disabilities

Other details
Pay Type
Salary",3.4,"Watlow Electric Manufacturing
3.4","Saint Louis, MO",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1922,Company - Private,Metal & Mineral Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
12,Plastics Process Engineer,$42k-$76k (Glassdoor Est.),"Scope of the Role: *
This position is responsible for design and manufacture of profile extrusion tooling and the development of custom plastic extrusion processes with the objective of improving total quality, material usage and productivity. This position will work closely with the Pexco Engineer Manager, Manufacturing, QC, Materials, and Sales teams to provide leadership, support and training to achieve these common team objectives.
Duties and Responsibilities: *
Take ownership of new projects from start to finish. This includes communicating with internal stakeholders to develop quotation. Understanding of different plastic resins and processing is a must. Must be able to identify the feasibility of the project and research equipment necessary.

Design tooling and develop processes for mono and co-extrusion plastic profiles, tubes and secondary fabrication individually or with other process engineers.

Lead new tooling development process for the project assigned using hands-on approach to meet customer expectation with quality and on time delivery of samples

Coordinate the tooling needs for new products with Die Development, technicians, Engineer Manager and other involved in producing first article samples.

Oversee the tool making activities in the machine shop, ensuring that the tools produced by the machine shop can meet the design criteria and are up to the company’s high standard for design and workmanship.

Support other department and Pexco sites in their tooling needs. Actively seek ways to improvise process efficiencies by way of redevelopment in the shortest possible lead time and most effective design.

Troubleshoot process difficulties on daily basis and support production. Work with Engineer Manager to coordinate a timely response to the need for rebuilding tooling or handling other special tooling needs that cannot be planned for in advance.

Work on continual improvement projects to improve efficiencies and reduce scrap.
Other key elements: *
Follow and support plant and corporate safety policies and initiatives.
Plans, develops and coordinates tool development trials.
Maintain engineering database and documentation as required.
Perform other accountabilities as assigned.
Education, Experience, and Skills required: *
BS in Engineering, 3-5 years of plastics manufacturing experience a plus. Plastic Extrusion die design and process development is a must.

2 years minimum experience in a beginning supervisory position a plus

Ability to read and interpret technical drawings and specifications

Must be HANDS-ON and be willing to work on the floor.

Must working knowledge with a CAD system, CAD/CAM software and Microsoft office

Must have very good technical understanding of plastic extrusion process, terminology and extrusion tooling.

Understanding of plastic materials and ability to research materials.

Understand customer requirements and application.

Demonstrated experience managing multiple projects and attention to detail.

Task oriented, Strong analytical skills and well organized.

Strong interpersonal, excellent oral and written communication skills with the ability to effectively communicate with all levels of the Organization.

Aptitude to learn and be a strong team player.
Key Skills and Attributes: *
Must be HANDS-ON and be willing to work on the floor
Working knowledge of plastic extrusion process, terminology and extrusion tooling
Understand customer requirements and application
Demonstrated experience managing multiple projects and attention to detail
Task oriented, Strong analytical skills and well organized
Strong interpersonal, excellent oral and written communication skills with the ability to effectively communicate with all levels of the Organization
Aptitude to learn and be a strong team player
Job Type: Full-time

Pay: Up to $34.00 per hour

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Retirement plan
Tuition reimbursement
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Experience:
Plastics Extrusion: 3 years (Preferred)
Work authorization:
United States (Preferred)
Company's website:
www.pexco.com
Benefit Conditions:
Waiting period may apply
Work Remotely:
No",3.2,"Pexco, LLC
3.2","Athol, MA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1998,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Industrial Manufacturing,Manufacturing,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
13,Senior Flutter / Frontend Engineer,-1,"Our mission is to power the future of fan engagement.

Simplebet is a B2B product development company using machine learning and real-time technology to make every moment of every sporting event a betting opportunity.

Who You Are:

Do you prioritize user experience? Does the idea of reimagining the way fans interact with sports excite you? Do you strive to build high-quality, test-driven applications? Are you interested in building cross-platform experiences using Dart & Flutter?

We're looking for an engineer experienced in building modern front-end applications to join our Games Team. Direct experience building production apps with Flutter and/or Dart would be a big plus, but a demonstrative interest in Flutter and its community via blog posts, side projects, or open-source contributions is more than sufficient. In this role, you'll work within a cross-functional team to reimagine the future of live sports betting.
We'll trust you to:
Develop features from design through implementation and launch
Write clear, maintainable, portable, and highly functional code
Work with product and design to craft great mobile user experiences
Work with backend engineers on building complex server/client features
Take a data-driven approach to product features by assisting with prototyping and new feature validation
You'll need to have:
3+ years of experience authoring, testing, deploying, and managing high-scale production mobile apps
A strong desire to tackle hard problems
B.S. or B.A. in Computer Science, Math or equivalent experience
We'd love to see:
A passion for sports
Familiarity with and excitement for Flutter
Experience with Lean Product Development
Simplebet is an equal opportunity employer. We celebrate diversity and are committed to creating an inclusive environment for all employees. We do not discriminate based upon race, religion, color, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity, gender expression, age, status as a protected veteran, status as an individual with a disability, or other applicable legally protected characteristics.

We are committed to providing access, equal opportunity and reasonable accommodation for individuals with disabilities in employment, its services, programs, and activities. Please let us know if you require reasonable accommodation for the interview process, and we will make every effort to provide it.",2.2,"Simplebet
2.2",Remote,-1,51 to 200 Employees,2018,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
14,Scientific Computing Software Engineer,$53k-$112k (Glassdoor Est.),"Primary Work Address: 19700 Helix Drive, Ashburn, VA, 20147
Current HHMI Employees, click here to apply via your Workday account.
Janelia Research Campus is a pioneering research center in Ashburn, Virginia, where scientists pursue fundamental questions in neuroscience and imaging. The Howard Hughes Medical Institute (HHMI) launched Janelia in 2006, establishing an intellectually distinctive environment for scientists to do creative, collaborative, hands-on work. Our integrated teams of biologists, computational scientists, and tool-builders pursue a small number of scientific questions with potential for transformative impact. We share our methods, results, and tools with the scientific community. It is a uniquely innovative and collaborative atmosphere that reflects HHMI’s reputation for excellence.

Position Summary:

We are looking for a software engineer to work in the Scientific Computing Department on exciting projects that involve large data reconstruction and analysis. You will work with laboratories and team projects at HHMI Janelia to develop scalable software for imaging data produced at Janelia.

Initially, you will focus on tasks for reconstructing terabyte-sized electron microscopy acquisitions produced by the FlyEM team at Janelia. This includes the development of Java code for image registration, data handling and parallelization on the cluster and in the cloud using established open source libraries like ImgLib2, ImageJ, BigDataViewer, N5, Spark.

Based on these experiences you will have opportunities to take on new interesting projects with different teams and/or labs at HHMI Janelia that will also provide the opportunity for professional development, for example in the domain of machine learning. The Scientific Computing department at HHMI Janelia is an exciting environment where you will have the opportunity to collaborate with excellent software engineers and scientists and have access to the latest and most exciting data and computational resources.

Education:
M.S. or B.A in Computer Science or related field
Experience:
Experience with writing efficient code with Java or other JVM based languages
Familiarity with Python, other programming languages
Experience with libraries such as Spark, ImgLib2, ImageJ is a plus
Ideally, you have a record of contributing to open source projects, so we can discuss code
If you do not meet all of the above criteria but you are convinced that you can compensate this with enthusiasm, creativity, and practical experience, reach out to us and let's talk.

For more information on Scientific Computing at HHMI Janelia, visit here or email Stephan Preibisch at preibischs@janelia.hhmi.org

Physical Requirements:

Remaining in a normal seated or standing position for extended periods of time; reaching and grasping by extending hand(s) or arm(s); dexterity to manipulate objects with fingers, for example using a keyboard; communication skills using the spoken word; ability to see and hear within normal parameters; ability to move about workspace. The position requires mobility, including the ability to move materials weighing up to several pounds (such as a laptop computer or tablet).

Persons with disabilities may be able to perform the essential duties of this position with reasonable accommodation. Requests for reasonable accommodation will be evaluated on an individual basis.

Please Note:

This job description sets forth the job’s principal duties, responsibilities, and requirements; it should not be construed as an exhaustive statement, however. Unless they begin with the word “may,” the Essential Duties and Responsibilities described above are “essential functions” of the job, as defined by the Americans with Disabilities Act.

HHMI is an Equal Opportunity Employer",4.5,"Howard Hughes Medical Institute
4.5","Ashburn, VA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1953,Nonprofit Organization,Grantmaking Foundations,Non-Profit,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
15,Controls Engineer,-1,"Controls Engineer*
Innovar Systems Limited, a world leader in custom controls, automated test equipment and real-time information systems is looking to fill a Controls Engineer position.

Using the latest in cutting edge technologies, Innovar designs software, custom equipment and control systems to meet the specific requirements of a variety of customers. Engineers at Innovar are involved in all aspects of the engineering process from conceptual design, development, testing and deployment. They have opportunities to drive engineering decisions and execute those decisions to directly affect the success of projects.

Innovar engineers are considered top in their field, with the ability to work both independently and collaboratively with customers to achieve the highest levels of success.

With over 35 years of design and controls experience, Innovar has successfully deployed systems in nearly every manufacturing industry around the world including specialty metals, circuit breaker, automotive, food processing, pharmaceuticals and medical.
Job Description and Requirements: *
Ability to communicate with customers and colleagues to develop requirements.
Ability to transform requirements into working systems from a blank sheet of paper.
Ability to develop engineering documents, including bills of material, panel layouts and electrical schematics.
Experience with or willingness to learn all of the technologies listed below:
Allen-Bradley and Siemens PLCs
Embedded C Programming
HMI Development Software including Panelview and RSView
State Machine Software Development
Safety Devices
Ability to apply the latest technologies to solve process-specific problems
Willingness to travel within and outside of the US for field commissioning, startup and field service at customer facilities.
Qualifications: *
Bachelor’s Degree in Electrical or Automation Engineering
5 years plus of related automation and/or controls experience
Process Experience in Metals, Circuit Breaker, Automotive, Food, Pharma or related industry
Solid communication skills with ability to write a well-organized document
Innovative and self-motivated
Benefits*
Competitive Base Salary including overtime
Full premium paid health insurance with buy-up options
401K with profit sharing potentials
Paid holidays and vacation
Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $52,000.00 - $82,000.00 per year

Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Education:
Bachelor's (Preferred)
Experience:
C/C++: 1 year (Preferred)
AutoCAD: 1 year (Preferred)
MATLAB: 1 year (Preferred)
Work Location:
One location
Company's website:
https://www.innovarsystems.com/
Work Remotely:
No",4.0,"Innovar Systems, Ltd
4.0","North Jackson, OH",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Electrical & Electronic Manufacturing,Manufacturing,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
16,Multi Skilled Maintenance Engineer,$44k-$88k (Glassdoor Est.),"Employment Type: * Full-Time
Job Location: *North Randall, OH
Job Description: *
C&W Services are looking for talented Service Technicians - level I, II, and III. As one of our specialists you will learn new skills as you support the Operations Maintenance team in repairing and maintaining material handling equipment and pneumatic systems, and have the opportunity to install, maintain and repair automated packaging and distribution equipment. At C&W we are committed to improvement, and you will be encouraged to participate in on-going development opportunities to progress and enhance your career.
Benefits: *
Whether you’re a Service Technician I, II, or III, we offer a great range of benefits from day 1:

• Healthcare

• Weekly pay

• 401K Plan

• Paid Time off; 10 Vacation days per year, national holidays, and up to 48 PTO hours per year

• Career advancement opportunities

• On-going training in a cutting-edge facility

• Safety first culture
Essential Experience & Qualifications: *
• High school diploma or equivalent.

• 1+ years of experience in basic preventive/predictive maintenance, troubleshooting skills and repair methods of industrial machines.

• 1+ years of experience in Mechanical and/or Electrical basic components.

• 1 + years of experience with compressors and pneumatics.
Preferred Qualifications: *
• 1+ years of experience using power tools to include saws and drills with proper safety precautions.

• Experience with Microsoft Office suite and OS.

• Experience with basic metal and wood fabrication, including saws and drills.

• Basic understanding of a Computerized Maintenance Management System (CMMS).
Physical Requirements: *
• Vision (Near, Distance)

• Lift and move totes up to 49 pounds each

• Regular bending, lifting, stretching and reaching both below the waist and above the head

• Occasionally push and pull wheeled dollies loaded with products up to 100 pounds during site visits

• Engage in full manual dexterity in both hands and wrists

• Walking in the FC and around area with great frequency; facilities are over a quarter mile in length

• Ability to climb ladders and gangways safely and without limitation

• Ability to work in construction /distribution environments that may be noisy, unlit, unheated, not air-conditioned

• Continual standing and/or walking an average of 5 miles daily

• Able to access all areas of building (ascending and descending ladders, stairs, etc.)
Day to day responsibilities of these roles include, but are not limited to: *
· Promoting a safe working environment by following all safety procedures.

· Completing preventative maintenance routines with proper documentation.

· Provide feedback on tasks in the Preventive Maintenance programs (level II only)
Develop Preventive Maintenance programs (level III only)
· Use of appropriate tooling to troubleshoot simple AC/DC circuits

· Troubleshooting of material handling equipment (MHE), and repairs to miscellaneous Operational equipment as needed.

· Maintaining positive working relationships across all of the Operations facility.

· Tracking and storing department inventory.

· Train and mentor Service Technicians (level II and III only)
About C&W Services: *
A leader in facilities services with over 65 years of experience. C&W Services is one of the largest facility services companies in the USA & Canada with a 65-year history of helping clients drive down operating expenses, increase facility efficiency and up-time, enable strategic business decisions and create positive experiences for the people who work, shop, learn, live and play in the facilities we maintain. We’re building the best team in the industry – our people are the heart and vitality of C&W Services. In joining C&W Services, you’re joining a firm with a rich history, blue-chip client list, and the backing of sister company Cushman & Wakefield, one of the world’s largest property advisory firms and the reason for our success is simple: talented people.

Our success is due to a supportive and friendly culture that fosters collaboration. Find out more today: https://careers.cushmanwakefield.com/cwservices/global/en

Learn why C&W Services is an ideal place for veterans to continue their careers: https://cwservices.com/veterans/

C&W Services is an Equal Opportunity / Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, sexual orientation, gender identity, protected veteran status or any other characteristic protected by law.

Electromechanics, Electromechanical Assembly, Electrical Schematics, Industrial Electrical Equipment, Wiring, Conveyor Material Handling, Industrial Equipment, Component Repair, Component Troubleshooting, PLC, Mechanical Maintenance, Industrial Maintenance, Rigging, Troubleshooting, Wood Manufacturing, Power Tools, Electricity, Predictive Maintenance, Preventive Maintenance

Job Type: Full-time

Job Type: Full-time

Salary: $0.00 per year",3.7,"Cushman & Wakefield
3.7","North Randall, OH",-1,10000+ Employees,1917,Company - Public,Real Estate,Real Estate,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
17,Resident Services Engineer (RSE),$9-$19 Per Hour(Glassdoor Est.),"Resident Services Engineer

We are looking for a highly skilled Field Service Engineer in the Reno, NV, area. This Engineer will travel to one of our Key Customer's locations to install, maintain and support Packsize equipment as well as build and maintain customer relationships by effectively servicing the equipment. This individual must understand the needs of the customer, work proactively and efficiently to meet those needs, and provides 5-Star customer service by proactively visiting or calling the customer to ensure they are fully satisfied with the Packsize equipment, process flow, packaging designs, and service.

Primary Responsibilities

• 100% Travel

• Completes and successfully pass training courses

• Develops knowledge of Packaging Designs
• Learns and develops the customer support and technical skills necessary to perform high quality maintenance
• Performs preventive maintenance on machines, equipment and accessories

• Performs installation of new equipment and train Customer Personnel

• Learns and completes basic administration duties (assigned tasks, emails, etc.)
• Exposed to moving parts and electricity that require safety protocols
• Exposure to varied travel conditions either driving or flying

• Excellent work ethic and time management skills needed

• Must be accessible via telephone, and promptly return email and phone messages
• Travel by vehicle or airplane within assigned geography, overnight travel may be required

Essential Job Requirements

• Excellent Customer Service skills

• Basic Excel, Word skills

• Knowledge of Windows platforms

• Advanced mechanical skills

• Advanced troubleshooting skills to resolve equipment issues utilizing drawings, operational characteristics, and technical documentation

• Ability to learn troubleshooting and problem-solving procedures
• Able and willing to lift up to 50 lbs
• Ability to walk, climb, stand, carry materials, stoop, kneel, bend at waist
• Must be able to climb a ladder

• Exhibit mature, independent judgment with little or no direct supervision
• Effectively communicate through written and verbal reports to customer and direct supervision regarding worksite status

Associate degree or Vocational technical training is strongly desired, Bachelors in related area preferred

• Good mechanical and troubleshooting skills

• Clean driving record with a valid drivers license

Job Summary

Packsize is a disruptive, fast-growth pioneer in the On Demand Packaging space. We are ferociously focused on Sustainability, Saving Forests, and lowering the Carbon Footprint of our Client Partners. Imagine a world where every box shipped downstream in a supply chain is exactly the right size for the product inside it. We arm our customers with the technology to do exactly that. As leaders in the technology space, we serve as a critical ally to companies looking to right size their packaging.

Salary and Benefits

Packsize offers a competitive benefits package including paid time off, Medical, Dental, Vision, Short Term/Long Term Disability, Life, and 401(k) matching.

Packsize is an Equal Opportunity employer and is committed to diversity in its workforce. In compliance with applicable federal and state laws, Packsize policy of equal employment opportunity prohibits discrimination on the basis of race or ethnicity, religion, color, national origin, sex, age, sexual orientation, gender identity/expression, veterans status, status as a qualified person with a disability, or genetic information. Individuals from historically underrepresented groups, such as minorities, women, qualified persons with disabilities, and protected veterans are strongly encouraged to apply. Reasonable accommodations in the application process will be provided to qualified individuals with disabilities.

About Packsize

Founded in 2002 and headquartered in Salt Lake City, UT, Packsize is the worlds leading provider of lean packaging systems for businesses with complex corrugated packaging needs. Recognized by Inc. 5000, ranked by Deloittes Technology Fast 500, and listed by Forbes as One of Americas Most Promising Companies, Packsize delivers an alternative to the existing corrugated supply chain with On Demand Packaging®.",3.7,"Packsize
3.7","Reno, NV",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2002,Company - Private,Industrial Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
18,Principal Process Engineer / Environmental Compliance Manager,-1,"Alliance Finishing & Manufacturing (www.alliance-finishing.com) is Ventura County's leader in providing anodizing, electroplating and engineering services that help military, aerospace, healthcare and commercial manufacturers all over the world measurably improve equipment strength, reduce corrosion, and improve metal and plastic product aesthetics. We are Nadcap certified for chemical processing and our company has been in business for over 25 years. Our robust plating technology called “GreenPOP” resets the standard for what yields, adhesion and quality can be expected from plating on plastics and structural composites (www.alliance-finishing.com/plating-on-plastics).

THE ROLE:
*
The Principal Process Engineer / Environmental Compliance Manager at Alliance designs, optimizes, and troubleshoots our overall process activities to scale our proprietary chemical POP processes and ensures that the processes consistently produces the highest quality plating yields in a production environment. This position is ultimately responsible for process development engineering, maintaining and overseeing our company wide quality programs (e.g. Nadcap certification, audits), overseeing our process control laboratory and staff, and maintaining all aspects of environmental compliance, including maintaining both the documentation and management of properly controlling the generation, storage, and disposal of hazardous materials. You will also partner with company leadership to manage Nadcap compliance and Audits, and maintain all aspects of our Quality Program including maintenance of all quality documentation, industry/customer specifications and outside third party verification of quality control test panels. Successful candidates will enjoy making sure we’re staying up to date with all QA processes and procedures across the company. This will involve creating new shop travelers, being responsible for coordinating and obtaining monthly periodic test panels for outside lab verification, and maintaining all QA requirements for our Nadcap chemical processing certifications. In addition, when the General / Production Manager is unavailable, you will act as the Production Manager to ensure the overall successful operations of the plant.
*
RESPONSIBILITIES:

\* Maintaining the existing POP line for Ultem while facilitating the design of our new PEEK processing line to support customer expansion.

\* Environmental wastewater treatment and compliance (e.g. help implement, coordinate installation, train operator(s) to maintain and operate the zero discharge system).

\* Learn all aspects of our POP process in order to perform duties such as the design of new racks for incoming PEEK or other composite parts, manage all electrochemical plating issues related to current density (e.g. build current density robbers), fluid movement through anode baskets, basket design and placement for optimum throwing and even plating thickness across parts, and direct our chemist to support POP tank maintenance.

\* Be the main internal and external point of contact for Ultem and PEEK POP customers/ engineers/ operators and help design new processing capabilities in order to scale up new PEEK plating services. \* Partner with Lead POP Supervisor/Plater to lead weekly status update phone calls with customers and manage all weekly PO acceptances, ship dates, and be the primary customer support liaison for POP.

\* Take yield data generated from our Lead POP Plater and our Chemist related to our POP process and build custom excel reports for internal analysis as well as sharing this analysis with our customers for external consumption.

\* Lead and design engineering experiments to troubleshoot new composite plating techniques and or solve plating complications and drive process performance improvements including: optimization, cost reduction, training and coaching of plating personnel.

\* Manage the activities of about 10 chemical platers and inspectors working on the

production line.

\* Establish process controls to maintain robust process capabilities.

\* Manage all POP customers reporting to track our metrics related to quality, on time delivery, receipt of payment, and process chemistry.

\* Verify that the shop travelers reflect what the actual operators do based on materials that they are processing. If the shop travelers are not correct, amend them and if the operators are not performing the process correctly, train them to perform the process correctly.

\* Make sure that travelers (with input from Production Manager) are specific based upon the metal substrates they’re running (ferrous vs non-ferrous, copper, stainless steel, or other alloys such as Invar, etc.).

\* Ensure that all paperwork whether Nadcap or commercial is checked off and stamped correctly.

\* Verify with all inspectors that the inspection criteria as documented on the travelers and any quality control testing is being done correctly.

\* Organize operators and inspectors to ensure they are trained to use the necessary tools to perform their duties (e.g. calipers, copper sulfate testing for passivation, thickness testers, x-ray fluorescence machines, etc.)

\* Maintain or delegate all aspects of Company wide environmental compliance such as training wastewater operators and personnel handling hazardous waste, managing hazardous materials storage and disposal, and maintaining all record keeping documentation associated with waste storage and disposal (e.g. CUPA

inspections, manifest management, etc).

\* Perform monthly safety training to meet all local, state, and Federal requirements. This can be done via on the job training, or through MFASC management courses.

\* Maintain a safe work environment for personnel, plant equipment, and coordinate with maintenance staff to ensure the plant’s environmental integrity in terms of plant piping, and process equipment, and preventative maintenance of equipment or new equipment installations.
*
MINIMUM QUALIFICATIONS:

\* Must have a Bachelor’s degree or higher in Electrochemical, Chemical Engineering, or Materials Science or have sufficient work experience in lieu of degree.

\* Minimum 9 years of Leadership experience in a metal finishing environment. Familiar with ISO/AS9100 Quality systems, NADCAP shop travellers, MIL-spec plating and various aerospace and commercial aircraft quality/process control systems.

\* Familiarity with plating on military and high-end commercial parts, Ultem, PEEK and or ABS-PC plastics.

\* Ability to autonomously drive and prioritize multiple projects with limited direction.

\* Proven track-record of developing and deploying creative and practical process solutions for high-volume manufacturing.

\* Willingness to take responsibility and ownership to aggressively focus on problems either individually or part of a larger team.

\* Proven ability to analyze and make meaningful inferences from sometimes incomplete data.

\* Comfort working with a wide variety of different functions including R&D, Process Integration, and Operations to effectively accomplish tasks in a timely manner.

\* Excellent verbal and written communication skills.

\* Capability to adapt to the company's changing needs and priorities and be a self-motivated team player.

\* Demonstrated project management skills, including the ability to deliver projects on schedule, within budget, and meeting the predefined quality requirements. A big plus would be familiarity with third party registered accreditation like ISO 9000 or NADCAP.
*
PREFERRED QUALIFICATIONS:

\* Bilingual in Spanish and English preferred
*
BENEFITS:

\* Competitive Salary (Salaried position)

\* Vacation Pay

\* Sick Pay (3 days)

\* Holiday Pay

\* Medical/Dental Benefits

\* 401k Plan
*
EQUAL OPPORTUNITY EMPLOYER -- Alliance Finishing & Manufacturing does not discriminate on the basis of age, sex, sexual orientation, religion, national origin, marital status or disability status in its employment actions, decisions, policies and practices.
Job Type: Full-time
Pay: $75,000.00 - $90,000.00 per year

Experience:
chemical plating, anodizing or electroplating: 9 years (Required)
optimally utilizing manufacturing labor and plating line: 9 years (Required)
Education:
Bachelor's (Required)
Location:
Oxnard, CA (Required)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)",-1,Alliance Finishing & Manufacturing – 1721 Ives Avenue,"Oxnard, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
19,"Software Engineer, Cloud Engineering (optional remote)",$58k-$117k (Glassdoor Est.),"Do you want to work on a large-scale, in-production, secure cloud service platform, using state-of-the-art cloud-native technologies and microservices architecture? Are you looking to make an impact? Do you love seeing your work implemented and hearing how your contributions have made a difference?

ExtraHop gives security and networking teams visibility into how their applications are performing, how long requests are taking, and when errors are occurring. We've built network monitoring capabilities that can process 100 Gbps of data. Our remote analysis service processes over one terabyte per hour.

ExtraHop offers an exciting, high energy, and versatile environment in which people are encouraged and supported to collaborate on industry-leading technology and create a world-class engineering team, while they develop and enrich their individual growth. And we're doing it with creativity, intellectual curiosity, and a sense of humor (it's required here, seriously).

We have a global and diverse user base—we believe in actively investing in a diverse engineering organization. We are seeking highly talented software engineers from all backgrounds, who offer dynamic perspectives, influences, and experiences. Are you as passionate as we are about positive culture and amazing technology? If you are, we can't wait to chat with you.


What does cloud infrastructure at ExtraHop look like?

ExtraHop’s SaaS infrastructure is primarily built on AWS, but also includes GCP and Azure. The technologies that the team uses include Kubernetes, Terraform, and Python to provision and manage customer resources on a greenfield product. We were among the premium technology partners who worked with AWS on their traffic mirroring solution to build our SaaS platform. Our goal is to build a stable platform for customer-facing services while encouraging healthy work-life balance via automated remediation and fault-tolerant designs.


Requirements
2 - 4 years of experience in software engineering
Excellent engineering chops
Solid knowledge of Go, Python, or an equivalent programming language
Self-starter with a strong problem-solving track record and ability to grow and learn
Excellent communicator and collaborator who can iterate quickly
Strong knowledge of AWS technologies (RDS / S3 / SQS / EC2)
Desired skills
Experience around container and related technologies (Kubernetes / Docker / HashiCorp - Packer, Vault, and Terraform).
Experience with building and scaling distributed, highly available systems
Experience with cloud services on GCP or Azure

About ExtraHop

ExtraHop is an enterprise cyber analytics and performance monitoring company helping the world’s leading organizations understand and secure their entire environment from the core to edge to the cloud. Our breakthrough approach to analytics and machine learning helps our customers investigate threats, ensure the delivery of critical applications, and secure their investment in the cloud, resulting in 95% faster threat detection and reducing unplanned downtime by 86% while providing the best possible customer experience.

ExtraHop is recognized by leading organizations for both its innovation in the market and its commitment to building a world-class team. We’ve been named to Wealthfront’s Career-Launching Companies list for the last four years, and JMP Securities put ExtraHop on its 2018 Super 70 List as one of the most strategically positioned private companies in the cybersecurity industry. Credit Suisse recognized ExtraHop as a member of its inaugural Disruptive Technology Recognition Program, and SC Media named ExtraHop a 2019 Industry Innovator for enterprise network traffic analysis.

With well over $150 million in bookings in 2019, and 10x growth in security, the opportunity with ExtraHop has never been greater. Are you ready to rise above the noise?

ExtraHop is an Equal Opportunity Employer. Qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, age, disability, military status, or national origin or any other characteristic protected under federal, state, or applicable local law

#LI-SF1",3.8,"ExtraHop Networks, Inc.
3.8","Seattle, WA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2007,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
20,Sr. Full Stack Engineer,$75k-$128k (Glassdoor Est.),"About Alteryx

Alteryx develops software for data preparation and analysis, including a number of server solutions for model deployment, collaborative work on data, and scheduling of automatic data processing. We're revolutionizing data analytics by providing a complete end to end, self-service platform that allows users to get from business questions to business answers at incredible speeds. Why work for just any analytics company?

At Alteryx, we are explorers, dreamers and innovators. We're on a journey to build the best analytics platform in the world, but we can't do it without people like you leading the way. We want Alteryx to be recognized as much for our dynamic work culture as for our products.

About Alteryx Innovation Labs

The Innovation Labs office, Alteryx's first office presence in Boston, was started earlier this year by the acquisition of MIT-spinout Feature Labs. This rapidly growing team combines the excitement of being part of a fast-paced, innovative startup with the resources, market penetration, and wisdom of a data analytics market leader. Our goal is to turbo-charge machine learning and data science efforts on the Alteryx platform, and to enable anyone to solve dynamic problems. We are working on high-impact, high-visibility projects, and we’re looking for collaborative and knowledge-hungry teammates who want to join us as we work to democratize machine learning.

Overview

As a Senior Full stack Engineer, you will work within the Innovation Labs engineering teams to build features and components end-to-end in order to help us build and deliver a new web-based data science product. In this role, you will have the opportunity to problem solve, drive projects to success, communicate with stakeholders, and learn from both success and failures as part of a dynamic, friendly and ambitious team with technical influence throughout Alteryx and beyond.

Responsibilities
Be a senior member on the engineering team to build a large and complex (in a fun way!) application using React/Redux with Scala/Python backend
Work closely with UI/UX team to provide feedback on designs and transform them into functioning user-facing products
Work closely with Product and Engineering leadership on the technical and product roadmap
Consume and inform the design of machine learning and data science APIs that powers the application
Incorporate user feedback to improve the product
Author new features, from conception and design to implementation and testing
Requirements
5+ years of experience in front-end web development, ideally with several years of React
3+ years of experience in a modern backend language (Python, NodeJS, Go, Scala, etc.)
Experience building and deploying applications in a dockerized-based environment, ideally on AWS.
Experience writing clear and effective documentation
Experience with automated testing and tools like Jest, Cypress, CircleCI, Github Actions, Selenium, etc.
Drive to build quality features and components end-to-end
Bonus
Demonstrated (in your portfolio) eye for design and solving real-world user problems end-to-end, if you have examples to show that’s awesome
Experience with data visualization
Experience with API design
Contributions to open-source frameworks and/or libraries.
Benefits & Perks
100% company-paid medical, dental, and vision for associates
Health plans that cover your family and pets
Company matched 401(k)
Associate stock purchase plan
Paid time off: 3 weeks’ vacation, 5 sick days, 9 holidays, 3 floating holidays, and 20 hours volunteer time
100% paid parental leave
Tuition reimbursement
Wellness programs with up to $300 fitness reimbursement annually
Collaborative offices stocked with healthy snacks and drinks
Office events, catered lunches, and happy hours
#LI-JE1",3.6,"Alteryx
3.6","Boston, MA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1997,Company - Public,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
21,Intern - Data Scientist - Product Management - Summer,$63k-$104k (Glassdoor Est.),"Lumen’s internship program is a 10 week, fast-paced and exciting opportunity to gain professional experience within your field of study and career interest. Interns within the Product Management Department will be part of an accelerated learning experience, to challenge skills learned in the classroom and develop new skills while working on active Lumen work projects. Interns within the Product Management group will be part of an accelerated learning experience, to challenge skills learned in the classroom and develop new skills while working on active Lumen work projects. Product Management leads the product strategy, financial targets, product requirements and go-to-market strategy for a product portfolio.The internship will take place in Tempe, AZ. In addition, interns will connect to our company culture through community outreach projects, engage with our employee resource groups and be able to develop their professional skills and business acumen through frequent exposure to senior leadership, cutting-edge technology, groundbreaking projects, and a network of mentors and fellow interns. Come Intern with us and create the beginnings of a career right for YOU!

Job Description

We are seeking problem solvers unafraid of big challenges, who have a passion for transforming data into valuable, actionable insights and are looking to help build something from the ground up and make an impact.

• Make data visually appealing and simple to both navigate and comprehend for end-users.
• Work cross functionally with Product Finance, Strategic Pricing, Financial Intelligence and IT team to build/implement analytic dashboards, models and intelligent automation.
• To discover, collect, cleanse, and enrich the data needed for analysis and modeling.
• Responsible for building advanced analytics models while utilizing structured and unstructured information.
• Identify key business levers, establish cause & effect, and communicate key findings to facilitate data driven decision-making.

Qualifications
Minimum Cumulative GPA: 3.0 or higher (preferred)
Enrolled at a 4-year accredited college or university, in a rising junior, rising senior, or masters level status at time of internship.
Graduating between August 2021 – May 2023
Education/Degree: In pursuit of a bachelor’s level degree in business, accounting or finance in a senior level status at the start of the internship. Master’s Degree preferred.
Strong sense of urgency and ability to meet deadlines
Ability to demonstrate ownership and accountability
Ability to collaborate and have agility while making effective decisions
Strong written and verbal communication skills
Flexible and adapts well to change
Professional appearance and attitude
Experience & Skills : PowerBI, Clickhouse, Tableau, Jupyter, Python, Perl, R, M, Javascript/JSON, SQL
Intern is responsible for their travel to/from work location
Must be available to work 30 – 40 hours, during the specified 10-week timeframe
US work authorization is required

Requisition #: 232796

EEO Statement
We are committed to providing equal employment opportunities to all persons regardless of race, color, ancestry, citizenship, national origin, religion, veteran status, disability, genetic characteristic or information, age, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity, marital status, family status, pregnancy, or other legally protected status (collectively, “protected statuses”). We do not tolerate unlawful discrimination in any employment decisions, including recruiting, hiring, compensation, promotion, benefits, discipline, termination, job assignments or training.

Disclaimer
The above job definition information has been designed to indicate the general nature and level of work performed by employees within this classification. It is not designed to contain or be interpreted as a comprehensive inventory of all duties, responsibilities, and qualifications required of employees assigned to this job. Job duties and responsibilities are subject to change based on changing business needs and conditions.",3.2,"Lumen
3.2","Tempe, AZ",-1,10000+ Employees,1930,Company - Public,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),-1
22,Multi-skilled maintenance engineer,$43k-$86k (Glassdoor Est.),"C&W Services is the industry leader in Integrated Maintenance Solutions providing service to more than 600 companies worldwide and a sister company of Cushman & Wakefield.
Location: *Salt Lake City
Job Description*
As a Maintenance Technician, you will learn new skills as you support the Operations Maintenance team in repairing and maintaining material handling equipment and pneumatic systems throughout the building. You will have the opportunity to install, maintain and repair automated packaging and distribution equipment. We are committed to improvement; you will be encouraged to participate in career development opportunities as presented to progress your career. Responsibilities include, but are not limited to: Promote a safe working environment by following all safety procedures.

Complete preventative maintenance routines with proper documentation. Use of appropriate tooling to troubleshoot simple AC/DC circuits, basic troubleshooting of material handling equipment (MHE), and repairs to miscellaneous Operational equipment as needed. Maintain a positive working relationships across all of the Operations facility. Track and store department inventory. Move up to 49lbs as well as stand and walk during shifts lasting up to 12 hours, with or without reasonable accommodation.

Basic Qualifications: High school diploma or equivalent. 1+ years of experience in basic preventive/predictive maintenance, troubleshooting skills and repair methods of industrial machines. 1+ years of experience in Mechanical and/or Electrical basic components. 1 + years of experience with compressors and pneumatics.

Preferred Qualifications: 1+ years of experience using power tools to include saws and drills with proper safety precautions. Experience with Microsoft Office suite and OS. Experience with basic metal and wood fabrication, including saws and drills. Basic understanding of a Computerized Maintenance Management System (CMMS).

If you have these skills too, we would love to talk to you: Electomechanics, Electromechanical Assembly, Electrical Schematics, Industrial Electrical Equipment, Wiring, Conveyor Material Handling, Industrial Equipment, Component Repair, Component Troubleshooting, PLC, Mechanical Maintenance, Industrial Maintenance, Rigging, Troubleshooting, Wood Manufacturing, Power Tools, Electricity, Predictive Maintenance, Preventive Maintenance

Job Ref: CWPO21

C&W Services is an Equal Opportunity / Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, sexual orientation, gender identity, protected veteran status or any other characteristic protected by law.

About: C&W Services

Why Work At This Company: Competitive Pay, Great benefits that start FIRST DAY and Growth opportunities!

About C&W Services

A leader in facilities services with over 65 years of experience. C&W Services is one of the largest facility services companies in the USA & Canada with a 65-year history of helping clients drive down operating expenses, increase facility efficiency and up-time, enable strategic business decisions and create positive experiences for the people who work, shop, learn, live and play in the facilities we maintain. We’re building the best team in the industry – our people are the heart and vitality of C&W Services. In joining C&W Services, you’re joining a firm with a rich history, blue-chip client list, and the backing of sister company Cushman & Wakefield, one of the world’s largest property advisory firms and the reason for our success is simple: talented people.

Our success is due to a supportive and friendly culture that fosters collaboration.

Why C&W Services?

• Weekly Pay

• Comprehensive Benefits that start on day 1

• Advance opportunities

• Training to work in a cutting-edge facility

• A safety first culture

Visit our website at: https://careers.cushmanwakefield.com/cwservices/global/en

Learn why C&W Services is an ideal place for veterans to continue their careers: https://cwservices.com/veterans/

We are an equal opportunity employer and all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability status, protected veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by law.

Job Type: Full-time

Experience:
Mechanical and/or Electrical basic components: 1 year (Preferred)
compressors and pneumatics.: 1 year (Preferred)
basic preventive/predictive maintenance: 1 year (Required)
Education:
High school or equivalent (Required)
Schedule:
12 hour shift
Company's website:
https://careers.cushmanwakefield.com/cwservices/global/en",3.7,"Cushman & Wakefield
3.7","Ogden, UT",-1,10000+ Employees,1917,Company - Public,Real Estate,Real Estate,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
23,Continuous Improvement Engineer/Team Lead,$59k-$96k (Glassdoor Est.),"Avalign produces innovative, high-performance, and cost-effective medical devices with a particular focus on high growth and ingenuity. Our team is growing quickly and proud of the fact that our custom-made devices continue to make a huge difference in the lives of medical professionals and their patients. Our employees are actively involved in the design, engineering and manufacture of technologically advanced medical devices that ensure that we meet our customer’s quality specifications for each product we produce.

We are looking for a Continunous Improvement Engineer/Team Lead to join our Mentor location for the 1st Shift schedules. You will be accountable for plant-level responsibilities including general accounting, payables, order entry, billing, cost accounting, bill of materials, business analysis, financial reporting and analysis, sales management, and computer operations. You will also liaison with corporate financial staff, as required. If you are interested, please apply in person or via email to hr.mentor@avalign.com.

Job Purpose

To work cooperatively within manufacturing, engineering and quality to train , direct and improve process for ongoing continuous improvement

Duties and Responsibilities
Works toward continuous improvement via process improvements scrap reductions, efficiency improvements using Lean Six sigma methodologies.
Audit product and process for compliance to standard regulations and goals
Evaluate efficiency, utilization, the usage of labor and
May use analysis methods of the quality tools box
A3- 5 Whys pareto analysis histogram CPK PPK C charts P charts
Conducts time studies
Audit process per establish procedures
Working in process launch meeting to ensure processes are followed
Works with operators in process launch- 5 S , tool sheet
3 pan systems and PM programs
Works to maintain lean initiative and TPS system on the shop floor.
Performs CPK analysis Maintains product and company reputation by complying with government regulations.
Completes projects by training and guiding technicians.
Contributes to team effort by accomplishing related results as needed.
Does training and orientation
Planning, assigning, and directing work
Reporting on efficiency, utilization and quality metrics by person and production area
Ensuring safety, delivery, quality and cost are maintained
Compiling improvement plans, where needed
Coordinating shop activities
Other duties may be assigned as needed
Education

Bachelor Degree in science or Engineering preferred or equivalent combination of education and experience.

Green belt certification preferred

Qualifications

Analysis, Design Skills, Presenting Technical Information, Machining Knowledge, Conceptual Skills, Quality Focus, General Consulting Skills, Control Engineering, Production Planning, Job Knowledge, Organization, Production Flow.

Blueprint Reading

GD&Tand metrology.

Competencies

Analytical - Synthesizes complex or diverse information; Collects and researches data; Uses intuition and experience to complement data; Designs work flows and procedures.

Knowledge of blueprints GD& T

Design - Generates creative solutions; Translates concepts and information into images; Uses feedback to modify designs; Applies design principles; Demonstrates attention to detail.

Problem Solving - Identifies and resolves problems in a timely manner; Gathers and analyzes information skillfully; Develops alternative solutions; Works well in group problem solving situations; Uses reason even when dealing with emotional topics.

Project Management - Develops project plans; Coordinates projects; Communicates changes and progress; Completes projects on time and budget; Manages project team activities.

Technical Skills - Assesses own strengths and weaknesses; Pursues training and development opportunities; Strives to continuously build knowledge and skills; Shares expertise with others.

Interpersonal Skills - Focuses on solving conflict, not blaming; Maintains confidentiality; Listens to others without interrupting; Keeps emotions under control; Remains open to others' ideas and tries new things.

Oral Communication - Speaks clearly and persuasively in positive or negative situations; Listens and gets clarification; Responds well to questions; Demonstrates group presentation skills; Participates in meetings.

Written Communication - Writes clearly and informatively; Edits work for spelling and grammar; Varies writing style to meet needs; Presents numerical data effectively; Able to read and interpret written information.

Teamwork - Balances team and individual responsibilities; Exhibits objectivity and openness to others' views; Gives and welcomes feedback; Contributes to building a positive team spirit; Puts success of team above own interests; Able to build morale and group commitments to goals and objectives; Supports everyone's efforts to succeed.

Change Management - Develops workable implementation plans; Communicates changes effectively; Builds commitment and overcomes resistance; Prepares and supports those affected by change; Monitors transition and evaluates results.

Leadership - Exhibits confidence in self and others; Inspires and motivates others to perform well; Effectively influences actions and opinions of others; Accepts feedback from others; Gives appropriate recognition to others.

Quality Management - Looks for ways to improve and promote quality; Demonstrates accuracy and thoroughness.

Cost Consciousness - Works within approved budget; Develops and implements cost saving measures; Contributes to profits and revenue ; Conserves organizational resources.

Diversity - Demonstrates knowledge of EEO policy; Shows respect and sensitivity for cultural differences; Educates others on the value of diversity; Promotes a harassment-free environment; Builds a diverse workforce.

Ethics - Treats people with respect; Keeps commitments; Inspires the trust of others; Works with integrity and ethically; Upholds organizational values.

Organizational Support - Follows policies and procedures; Completes administrative tasks correctly and on time; Supports organization's goals and values; Benefits organization through outside activities; Supports affirmative action and respects diversity.

Strategic Thinking - Develops strategies to achieve organizational goals; Understands organization's strengths & weaknesses; Identifies external threats and opportunities; Adapts strategy to changing conditions.

Judgement - Displays willingness to make decisions; Exhibits sound and accurate judgment; Supports and explains reasoning for decisions; Includes appropriate people in decision-making process; Makes timely decisions.

Motivation - Sets and achieves challenging goals; Demonstrates persistence and overcomes obstacles; Measures self against standard of excellence; Takes calculated risks to accomplish goals.

Planning/Organizing - Prioritizes and plans work activities; Uses time efficiently; Plans for additional resources; Sets goals and objectives; Organizes or schedules other people and their tasks; Develops realistic action plans.

Professionalism - Approaches others in a tactful manner; Reacts well under pressure; Treats others with respect and consideration regardless of their status or position; Accepts responsibility for own actions; Follows through on commitments.

Quality - Demonstrates accuracy and thoroughness; Looks for ways to improve and promote quality; Applies feedback to improve performance; Monitors own work to ensure quality.

Quantity - Meets productivity standards; Completes work in timely manner; Strives to increase productivity; Works quickly.

Safety and Security - Observes safety and security procedures; Determines appropriate action beyond guidelines; Reports potentially unsafe conditions; Uses equipment and materials properly.

Adaptability - Adapts to changes in the work environment; Manages competing demands; Changes approach or method to best fit the situation; Able to deal with frequent change, delays, or unexpected events.

Attendance/Punctuality - Is consistently at work and on time; Ensures work responsibilities are covered when absent; Arrives at meetings and appointments on time.

Dependability - Follows instructions, responds to management direction; Takes responsibility for own actions; Keeps commitments; Commits to long hours of work when necessary to reach goals.; Completes tasks on time or notifies appropriate person with an alternate plan.

Initiative - Volunteers readily; Undertakes self-development activities; Seeks increased responsibilities; Takes independent actions and calculated risks; Looks for and takes advantage of opportunities; Asks for and offers help when needed.

Innovation - Displays original thinking and creativity; Meets challenges with resourcefulness; Generates suggestions for improving work; Develops innovative approaches and ideas; Presents ideas and information in a manner that gets others' attention

Working Conditions

The work environment characteristics described here are representative of those an employee encounters while performing the essential functions of this job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.

Physical Requirements

The physical demands described here are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of this job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.

The employee is frequently required to sit for long hours while working on a brightly lit computer screen.

What You Won’t Do:
Feel stuck – we offer great opportunities to advance and learn
Get bored – we make custom products, so no day is the same
Feel like a number – we’re a close-knit bunch and always have each other’s backs
Who You Are:
A self-starter who thrives in a fast-paced environment
A quick learner who is always ready to gain depth of knowledge in manufacturing processes
A reliable worker who knows the importance of showing up when it counts
Accept assignments with open, cooperative, positive and team-oriented attitudes
Able to plan and execute plans across teams
Effective communicator, both written and verbal
What You’ll Enjoy:
Competitive wage and benefits package
Vacation, make-up time, and immediate eligibility for paid holidays
Medical, dental, and vision insurance
Life and AD&D insurance, disability insurance
Great 401k with company match
Temperature controlled environment
We are an equal opportunity employer and value diversity at our company. We do not discriminate on the basis of race, religion, color, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, age, marital status, veteran status, or disability status.",2.6,"Avalign Integrated Medical Solutions
2.6","Mentor, OH",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2005,Company - Private,Health Care Products Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
24,SAR/DSP Engineer,-1,"SAR/DSP Engineer

NSBU | Melbourne, FL, United States

Why Join Rincon Research Corporation (RRC)?

At Rincon Research Corporation, our primary business is innovating, developing, and fielding digital signal processing (DSP) products and services for the United States Defense and Intelligence Communities in support of national security.

Rincon Research Corporation seeks a candidate that has a detailed software and computer skillset but is interested in advanced signal processing applications.

Come join the team that is creating cutting edge signal processing, geolocation, and communication systems for the future!

What are the primary responsibilities in the SAR/DSP Engineer position?

Candidate will be responsible for developing within a heterogeneous software environment containing code in Python, MATLAB, C/C++ and Java. A strong CS background is needed and experience in cloud computing and machine learning are very desirable. Good communication skills, with ability to interact with remote co-workers and customers are required. Looking for people able to find creative and cutting-edge solutions for customer issues.

What required background will make you successful?
Degree in Computer Science, Electrical Engineering, or other equivalent field of discipline
Master’s degree and 5+ years applied and relevant experience or Bachelor’s degree and 7+ years’ experience
Demonstrated capability in scientific programming of high-level language such as C/C++on Unix/Linux platforms
Working knowledge of high level interpreted languages such as PYTHON and/or MATLAB
Experience with interfacing extensive C/C++ libraries within interpreted languages
Ability to obtain and maintain TS/SCI security clearance
US CITIZENSHIP REQUIRED
Where is the position located?

This position is located at our Melbourne, FL office.

What benefits does RRC offer?
100% employer-paid premiums for family medical and dental insurance, employee life insurance, short-term and long-term disability (STD & LTD)
Flexible reimbursement spending accounts for medical expense and dependent care
Immediate participation and vesting in the company’s Employee Stock Ownership Plan (ESOP) and 401(k) Plan
Employer contributions to RRC’s ESOP
Employer matching contributions to the company’s 401( k) Plan
Employer discretionary contributions to the company’s 401(k) Plan
Rincon Research Corporation is an equal opportunity employer and considers qualified applicants for employment without regard to race, color, creed, religion, national origin, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity and expression, age, disability, veteran status, or any other protected factor.",4.1,"Rincon Research Corporation
4.1","Melbourne, FL",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1983,Company - Private,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
25,CNC Applications Engineer,$34k-$59k (Glassdoor Est.),"Overview


At Ellison Technologies we are a provider of advanced machining solutions to North American metal-cutting manufacturers and their global affiliates. As a 62 year old company we are committed to the survival and growth of the American manufacturing industry. Independent offices provide us a local market focus and the flexibility to advocate the needs of each of our valued customers.

Our priority is to introduce technologies that strengthen our customers’ ability to compete in the markets they serve. Whether the solution involves a stand alone machine, multi-process equipment, or an integrated manufacturing system with robotic automation, our goal remains the same; to optimize throughput and quality at the lowest per-part manufacturing cost.

In brief, this role will provide you the opportunity to showcase your ability to consult with our myriad clients in the Southern Ohio market and help guide them to take their products from raw stock to a finished good in the most efficient and accurate manner while meeting the aforementioned goals.

Please review our Glassdoor page and our Ellison ""About Us"" page to learn more

Responsibilities


Although not all-inclusive, below should provide a sense of what the opportunity entails:

Coordinate various manufacturing supportive services for internal and external customers.

Tasks may include but are not limited to the following:

• Creating Process Cycle Time Estimates• Provide Training Classes and Support on-site and at the customer • Support the Sales Team During Throughout Sales Process• Manage Customer Relationships• Provide Machine Demonstrations at ET and for Trade Shows• Assist In Fixture/Tooling Design• Complete Turnkey System Execution Including Documentation• Manage Turnkey System Projects• Document Activities

Accountable for Customer Satisfaction. Prepare reports for management and project requirements. Maintain proper records of customer issues and requests for support. Interface and assist parts, service, applications, and sales department as needed with the goal of exceeding customer expectations. Participate with enthusiasm on other related duties as assigned.

Qualifications


We are looking for that rare candidate that is truly energized by teaching and working directly with clients.

You’ll have experience with process cycle times, process capabilities and of course a strong understanding of controls such as Fanuc, Siemens, Heidenhain, Mitsubishi and/or similar. What's more, you'll have created myriad parts with Mastercam, GibbsCAM, ESPRIT or similar.

Minimum qualification include 5 years programming and working on CNC machines.

Our Mission: Equip manufacturers to compete and win, both locally and globally!

“The Ellison Way principles continue to drive our company forward. The Ellison Way principle of Adaptation will ensure that Ellison will evolve to further grow market share, strengthen our relationships with our key partners and our customers. The major focus moving forward must be on the development of Ellison’s most valuable resource – its people.""Graham Hooper (CEO)

""Ellison Technologies is an Equal Opportunity employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex including sexual orientation and gender identity, national origin, disability, protected Veteran Status, or any other characteristic protected by applicable federal, state, or local law.”

#ZR *PM18",4.4,"ELLISON TECHNOLOGIES, INC.
4.4","Hamilton, OH",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1955,Company - Private,Industrial Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
26,Optical Metrology Engineer - Wafer & Alignment Sensors Team,$89k-$140k (Glassdoor Est.),"Introduction

ASML US brings together the most creative minds in science and technology to develop lithography machines that are key to producing faster, cheaper, more energy-efficient microchips. We design, develop, integrate, market and service these advanced machines, which enable our customers - the world’s leading chipmakers - to reduce the size and increase the functionality of their microchips, which in turn leads to smaller, more powerful consumer electronics. Our headquarters are in Veldhoven, the Netherlands, and we have 18 office locations around the United States including main offices in Chandler, Arizona, San Jose and San Diego, California, Wilton, Connecticut, and Hillsboro, Oregon.

Job Mission

ASML in Wilton CT is seeking an Optical Engineer/Physicist in the Wafer Alignment Sensor Department US to work with a multi-discipline engineering team to define and develop optical/photonic sensor systems and/or test equipment used within ASML’s photolithography and/or metrology equipment. These systems typically include light sources, detectors, optical/electro-optical components, fiber optics, electronics and signal processing SW. Understanding the components in their relation to the sensor system function and understanding the interaction with the rest of the metrology or lithography system is of fundamental importance.

The Wafer Alignment Sensor Department in Wilton CT is seeking a well-rounded engineer with direct experience in optical engineering. The optical modules developed for ASML’s products will include sources, detectors, geometric/diffractive optics and electro-optic components. This position will require skills in optical systems engineering: specific to the optical lithography or semi-conductor industry.

This position requires access to controlled technology, as defined in the Export Administration Regulations (15 C.F.R. § 730, et seq.). Qualified candidates must be legally authorized to access such controlled technology prior to beginning work. Business demands may require ASML to proceed with applicants who are immediately eligible to access controlled technology.

Job Description

The main focus of this position will be:

Leading the design team in test equipment development to find solutions to difficult technical problems in an efficient manner.
Decomposition of top-level system requirements into lower level module, sub-module, or component level design specifications for product or test equipment towards the engineering team.
Deriving specifications for module, sub-module, or test equipment consistent with our manufacturing practices.
Development of alignment methods for complex optical sensors and systems.
Development of tooling and test equipment to support optical sensor alignment methods.
Develop clear understanding of optical tests needed for qualifying optical sub-modules.
Preparation of leading system engineer documentation (Element Performance Specifications, Element Design Specifications, Test Performance Specification; Test Analysis Reports) through review, release and change control.
Support preparation of design reviews for the development team.
Write engineering procedure and train technicians to efficiently transfer the build/ alignment & test process to manufacturing.
Supporting systems in the factory and in the field, by being able to relate observed sensor anomalies to potential system defects.
Clearly communicating progress and status of ongoing technical activities to senior management.
Understanding how the performance of the sensor system affects the performance of ASMLs equipment.
Some travel ( ~ 20%) to Europe, Asia, and within the US can be expected.
Education

Minimum BS in Optical Engineering, or Physics, or equivalent experience.

Experience

Candidate must:

Be experienced with diverse optical metrology setups such as interferometers, Shack – Hartmann sensor, polarimetry/ellipsometry & optical alignment.
Be experienced in optical design/ analysis software like: CodeV and/or Zemax; FRED; MATLAB.
Have competencies in: optical design theory, lasers, polarization, detectors, electro-optical devices and opto-mechanical constructions.
Have strong written and oral communicative skills and a commitment to achieving results on time.
Demonstrated “team player” with a quality orientation and interpersonal skills.
Be able to interface with multidisciplinary groups and work effectively in a team and be willing to take on responsibility, follow through and keep multiple simultaneous assignments on schedule.
Be able to quickly acquire technical knowledge from documentation and on-the-job training and be capable of thoroughly investigating technical issues (analytically and hands-on in a lab).
Be willing to own the integrated systems performance, and support the entire product life-cycle (development through sustaining engineering), strive to deliver the right design solution for the right cost at the right time.
Personal skills
Can observe and respond to people and situations and interact with others encountered in the course of work.
Can learn and apply new information or skills.
Must be able to read and interpret data, information, and documents.
Strong customer focus and commitment to customer satisfaction through prioritization, quality, efficiency and professionalism.
Ability to complete assignments with attention to detail and high degree of accuracy.
Proven ability to perform effectively in a demanding environment with changing workloads and deadlines.
Result driven-demonstrate ownership and accountability.
Identifies bottlenecks and drives improvements.
Work independently or as part of a team and follow through on assignments with minimal supervision.
Demonstrate open, clear, concise and professional communication.
Ability to establish and maintain cooperative working relationships with manager, co-workers and customer.
Work according to a strict set of procedures within the provided timelines.
Other information

Role within Office

Responsibilities:

Routinely required to sit; walk; talk; hear; use hands to keyboard, finger, handle, and feel; stoop, kneel, crouch, twist, reach, and stretch. Occasionally required to move around the campus.
Occasionally lift and/or move up to 20 pounds.
May require travel dependent on business needs.
Specific vision abilities required by this job include close vision, color vision, peripheral vision, depth perception, and ability to adjust focus.

EOE AA M/F/Veteran/Disability

Internal Reference: #LI-KG1",3.9,"ASML
3.9","Wilton, CT",-1,10000+ Employees,1984,Company - Public,Electrical & Electronic Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$5 to $10 billion (USD),-1
27,Data Scientist,$101k-$165k (Glassdoor Est.),"Join our team dedicated to developing and executing innovative solutions in support of customer mission success.

Job Description:

Novetta is seeking a Data Scientist who wants to develop innovative solutions for customers and internal product teams. We look to rapidly prototype solutions and deploy the most promising of them. We identify and leverage the latest techniques (fast.ai is a team favorite) so that our customers can stay one step ahead. On every project you'll learn something new (and likely teach us something as well). If that sounds appealing to you - we'd love to chat.

Responsibilities include:
Develop solutions spanning multiple subject areas, from NLP to Image and Video.
Maintain awareness of state-of-the-art machine learning and techniques, methods and platforms, including commercial and open source.
Implement, configure and test machine learning and deep learning libraries and platforms (e.g. fast.ai, TensorFlow, Keras, XGBoost, LightGBM).
Test solutions on AWS using services such as SageMaker, EC2, and Snowball Edge.
Write blog posts and presentations that clearly communicate complex machine learning concepts to both technical and non-technical audiences.
Contribute to visually-appealing, web-enabled prototype applications that illustrate relevant machine learning capabilities.
Basic Qualifications:
Experience with Python
Experience with machine learning or statistics
Ability to work both independently and collaboratively.
High levels of curiosity, creativity, and problem-solving capabilities.
Strong written and verbal communication skills.
Comfortable navigating the command line.
Desired Skills:
Research experience in Machine Learning specific to Natural Language Processing, Computer Vision, or deep learning.
Experience with managing data and creating algorithms using AWS.
Experience with R, Java, or other programming languages.
Security Clearance:
Must be eligible to obtain and maintain a TS/SCI with Poly clearance

Novetta, from complexity to clarity.

Novetta delivers highly scalable advanced analytics and secure technology solutions to address challenges of national and global significance. Focused on mission success, Novetta pioneers disruptive technologies in machine learning, data analytics, full-spectrum cyber, cloud engineering, open source analytics, and multi-INT fusion for Defense, Intelligence Community, and Federal Law Enforcement customers. Novetta is headquartered in McLean, VA with over 1,000 employees across the U.S.

Our culture is shaped by a commitment to our core values:

Integrity • We hold ourselves accountable to the highest standards of integrity and ethics.

Customer Success • We strive daily to exceed expectations and achieve customer mission success.

Employee Focus • We invest in our employees' professional development and training, respecting individuality and fostering a culture of diversity and inclusion.

Innovation • We know that discovering new and innovative ways to solve problems is critical to our success and makes us a great company.

Excellence in Execution • We take pride in flawless execution as we build a company that is best in class.


Earn a REFERRAL BONUS for the qualified people you know.
For more details or to submit a referral, visit bit.ly/NovettaReferrals.

Novetta is an equal opportunity/affirmative action employer.
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to sex, gender identity, sexual orientation, race, color, religion, national origin, disability, protected veteran status, age, or any other characteristic protected by law.",4.6,"Novetta
4.6","Herndon, VA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2012,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
28,Data Scientist,$60k-$99k (Glassdoor Est.),"Job Description


Oversight is a leading provider of cloud-based artificial intelligence solutions automating and analyzing financial payment transactions to identify fraud, non-compliant purchases, and wasteful spending. Oversight analyzes over $2 trillion in expenditures annually at Fortune 5000 companies and government agencies worldwide.

In this position as a Data Scientist, you will be working with a team of skilled and motivated data scientists and machine learning engineers designing and building AI solutions to expand our product line.

Responsibilities


Our team is at the fore front of building, operating and supporting business systems with machine learning at their core.

As a Data Scientist you will be incorporating machine learning into our products in order to transform how companies find and manage spend risk throughout their organization. You will collaborate with cross functional teams on complex data science problems and be responsible for solution design, data preparation, model building, and model management.

Ultimately, we’re looking for people who are excited by machine learning, data and technology, love to solve problems, constantly challenge themselves to provide the best user experience, can work well alone, have a wide range of skills and are able and willing to constantly learn.

Skills


Technical Skills/Requirements
3+ years real world experience in a data science or equivalent role
Extensive experience designing and maintaining a machine Learning pipeline – ETL, feature engineering, modeling, predicting, explaining, deploying and ongoing diagnostics
Excellent pattern recognition and predictive modeling skills
Experience communicating complex models and designing
Strong experience with data processing and data analytics
Experience analyzing a wide variety of structured and unstructured data
Strong communication and data presentation skills
Experience in both R&D and commercial software product development environment is a plus
Technologies
Expertise in python, scikit-learn, and pandas
Experience with Deep learning frameworks (FastAI , Keras, PyTorch etc.) preferred
SQL
Linux
Interested and qualified candidates should submit a resume with salary requirements to recruiter@oversightsystems.com.

About Oversight

Oversight is the world’s leading provider of AI-based spend management and risk mitigation solutions for large enterprises. Based in Atlanta, GA, Oversight works with many of the world’s most innovative companies and government agencies to digitally transform their spend audit and financial control processes.

Oversight’s AI-powered platform works across our customers’ financial systems to continuously monitor and analyze all spend transactions for fraud, waste, and misuse. With a consolidated, consistent view of risk across their enterprise, customers can prevent financial loss and optimize spend while strengthening the controls that improve compliance. Learn More.

Oversight is an equal opportunity employer.

Job Applicant Privacy Notice",4.7,"Oversight Systems
4.7","Atlanta, GA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2003,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
29,"Enterprise Solution Engineer, East",$69k-$144k (Glassdoor Est.),"Position Overview

Solution Engineers (SEs) at MemSQL are solving some of the most cutting-edge technical challenges in today's data-driven world. When customers evaluate MemSQL, SEs are their trusted technical experts who evaluate, identify, and demonstrate how MemSQL can solve their mission-critical business needs. As key contributors to our sales organization, Solution Engineers add tremendous value to the customer journey and directly impact company growth and revenue.

In this role, you will be responsible for identifying the technical requirements necessary to deliver business value for our Fortune 1,000 customers. Working in partnership with Enterprise Account Executives, you will help to acquire new customers and expand existing accounts. You will do this by leveraging your technical skill set and business acumen to understand complex solutions and create high-quality demos that resonate with our customers.

Role and Responsibilities
Partner with Account Executives to close new business (logos) and expand existing accounts
Design, develop, and deploy Proofs of Concept (POCs) with prospective customers
Drive the technical evaluation stage of the sales cycle, acting as the technical lead/subject matter expert (query tuning, load testing, etc.)
Partner with internal teams (Product, Engineering, etc.) to share feedback on customer needs and requests
Required Skills and Experience
Experience successfully selling infrastructure software, preferably a database, distributed system, or similar product
Firm understanding of database fundamentals, including both analytic and transactional processing
Expertise executing POCs, with experience designing and deploying complex technologies into existing customer environments
In-Depth understanding of databases, including various competitive products (Oracle, SAP, MySQL, Teradata, etc.)
Proficient programming skills in Python, PHP, or other programming language
Ability to travel within the region and internationally
Bachelor's Degree in Computer Science or other technical field
MemSQL is The Database of Now, powering modern applications and analytical systems with a cloud-native, massively scalable architecture. MemSQL delivers maximum ingest, accelerated transaction processing and blisteringly fast query performance, including AI integration and machine learning models, all at the highest concurrency. Global enterprises use the MemSQL distributed database to easily ingest, process, analyze and act on data, to thrive in today's insight-driven economy. MemSQL is optimized to run on any public cloud or on-premises with commodity hardware.

Headquartered in San Francisco, CA with offices globally, MemSQL has raised nearly $100M from top investors including GV, Accel Partners and Khosla Ventures, among others. MemSQL is trusted by customers including Uber, Akamai, Dell EMC, Samsung, Comcast, Kellogg, and more.

Consistent with our commitment to diversity & inclusion, we value individuals with the ability to work on diverse teams and with a diverse range of people.

To all recruitment agencies: MemSQL does not accept agency resumes. Please do not forward resumes to MemSQL employees. MemSQL is not responsible for any fees related to unsolicited resumes and will not pay fees to any third-party agency or company that does not have a signed agreement with the Company.",4.6,"SingleStore
4.6","New York, NY",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2011,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
30,Software Engineer,$76k-$134k (Glassdoor Est.),"McLean 2 (19052), United States of America, McLean, Virginia

Software Engineer

Do you love building and pioneering in the technology space? Do you enjoy solving complex business problems in a fast-paced, collaborative, inclusive, and iterative delivery environment? At Capital One, you'll be part of a big group of makers, breakers, doers and disruptors, who love to solve real problems and meet real customer needs.

We are seeking Software Engineers who are passionate about marrying data with emerging technologies to join our team. As a Capital One Software Engineer, you’ll have the opportunity to be on the forefront of driving a major transformation within Capital One. Learn more about #lifeatcapitalone and our commitment to diversity & inclusion by jumping to slides 25-40 on our Corporate Social Responsibility Report.

What You’ll Do:

Collaborate with and across Agile teams to design, develop, test, implement, and support technical solutions in full-stack development tools and technologies

Work with a team of developers with deep experience in machine learning, distributed microservices, and full stack systems

Share your passion for staying on top of tech trends, experimenting with and learning new technologies, participating in internal & external technology communities, and mentoring other members of the engineering community

Collaborate with digital product managers, and deliver robust cloud-based solutions that drive powerful experiences to help millions of Americans achieve financial empowerment

Work with cloud native stack, build on AWS, use technologies like Kubernetes and Serverless

Basic Qualifications:

Bachelor’s Degree

At least 2 years of experience in software engineering

Preferred Qualifications:

Master's Degree

2+ years of experience in Agile practices

1+ years of experience with AWS, GCP, Microsoft Azure, or another public cloud service

4+ years of experience in at least one of the following: Java, Scala, Python, Go, Javascript/TypeScript, Angular/React.js, or Node.js

2+ years of experience working with big data technologies (e.g. Hadoop, Spark, Presto)

2+ years of experience working on streaming data applications (e.g. Kafka, Kinesis, Flink, or Spark Streaming)

4+ years of experience in open source frameworks

At this time, Capital One will not sponsor a new applicant for employment authorization for this position.",4.0,"Capital One
4.0","McLean, VA",-1,10000+ Employees,1994,Company - Public,Banks & Credit Unions,Finance,$10+ billion (USD),-1
31,Machine Learning Engineer,-1,"*Title: Machine Learning Engineer*
*Location: Remote*
*Part Time (10-20 hrs./week. Work hours are flexible)*

*Minimum Qualifications: *

* Bachelor's Degree in Computer Science or related discipline.
* Mid/Senior level accepted
* Machine learning engineers who have the experience in voice recognition, language translation, computer vision and face recognition (OR)
* Mobile Developer with language and navigation experience (OR)
* Developer with facial/object recognition experience

Job Types: Part-time, Contract

Experience:
* Machine learning: 4 years (Required)

Education:
* Bachelor's (Required)

Work authorization:
* United States (Required)

Work Remotely:
* Yes",3.7,"GBTI Solutions, Inc.
3.7","McLean, VA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Federal Agencies,Government,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1
32,"Machine Learning Compiler Engineer, Staff",$132k-$221k (Glassdoor Est.),"Company:
Qualcomm Technologies, Inc.
Job Area:
Engineering Group, Engineering Group > Systems Engineering
Job Overview:


Qualcomm is a company of inventors that unlocked 5G ushering in an age of rapid acceleration in connectivity and new possibilities that will transform industries, create jobs, and enrich lives. But this is just the beginning. It takes inventive minds with diverse skills, backgrounds, and cultures to transform 5Gs potential into world-changing technologies and products. This is the Invention Age - and this is where you come in.

Qualcomm is a company of inventors that unlocked 5G - ushering in an age of rapid acceleration in connectivity and new possibilities that will transform industries, create jobs, and enrich lives. But this is just the beginning. It takes inventive minds with diverse skills, backgrounds, and cultures to transform 5Gs potential into world-changing technologies and products. This is the Invention Age - and this is where you come in. We are investing in several supporting technologies including 4G, 5G, Edge Computing, and Deep Learning.

The Qualcomm CR&D team is developing hardware and software for Machine Learning solutions spanning the data center, edge, infrastructure, automotive markets and beyond. We are seeking ambitious, bright and innovative engineers with experience in compiler technology, vectorization and optimization, and machine learning toolchains.

Job activities span the whole product life cycle from early R&D to commercial deployment. The environment is fast-paced and requires cross-functional interaction on a daily basis so good communication, planning and execution skills are a must.

We are looking to staff engineers at multiple levels in systems & software, integration and test. Details of one of the roles we are looking to staff are listed below.

Responsibilities:
Research, design, develop, enhance, and implement the different components of machine learning compiler based on performance and code-size needs of the customer workloads and benchmarks.
Analyze software requirements, determine the feasibility of design within the given constraints, consult with architecture and HW engineers, and implement software solutions best suited for Qualcomm's SOCs.
Analyze and identify system level integration issues, interface with the software development, integration and test teams.
Minimum Qualifications
Bachelor's degree in Engineering, Information Systems, Computer Science, or related field.
5+ years Systems Engineering or related work experience.
Preferred Qualifications
LLVM or any industrial strength compiler development experience is a plus.
Knowledge of the structure and function of the compiler internals.
Hands on experience writing SIMD and/or multi-threaded high-performance code
Hands-on experience implementing DSP Kernels a plus
Hands-on Experience in C/C++, Python development (3+ years)
Hands-on Experience with Object Orientated Design, TDD development solutions such as GoogleTest etc. (2+ years)
Experience with Source Code and Configuration management tools, git knowledge is required
Willingness to work in a cohesive software development environment with ability to work on low level implementation (code & test) and interfacing with hardware and simulators
Experience in machine learning frameworks and neural network architectures + ML compiler workload synthesis, a plus
Prior working experience of hardware accelerators and hardware software co-design
Experience in using C++ 14/17 (advanced features)
Experience at both the firmware (RTOS) and system level (Linux) in SOC
Experience of profiling software and optimization techniques
Passion to drive to develop leading-edge \""deep learning\"" framework and algorithms working on mobile and embedded platforms.
Applicants: If you are an individual with a disability and need an accommodation during the application/hiring process, please call Qualcomm’s toll-free number found here for assistance. Qualcomm will provide reasonable accommodations, upon request, to support individuals with disabilities to be able participate in the hiring process. Qualcomm is also committed to making our workplace accessible for individuals with disabilities. Qualcomm is an equal opportunity employer and supports workforce diversity.

To all Staffing and Recruiting Agencies: Our Careers Site is only for individuals seeking a job at Qualcomm. Staffing and recruiting agencies and individuals being represented by an agency are not authorized to use this site or to submit profiles, applications or resumes, and any such submissions will be considered unsolicited. Qualcomm does not accept unsolicited resumes or applications from agencies. Please do not forward resumes to our jobs alias, Qualcomm employees or any other company location. Qualcomm is not responsible for any fees related to unsolicited resumes/applications.

EEO Employer: Qualcomm is an equal opportunity employer; all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, Veteran status, or any other protected classification.",4.0,"Qualcomm
4.0","San Jose, CA",-1,10000+ Employees,1985,Company - Public,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),-1
33,Senior Software Engineer – Natural Language Processing,-1,"Senior Software Engineer – Natural Language Processing*
SkySync is a dynamic, fast-paced, venture-backed software innovator based in the Ann Arbor tech cluster, with remote Syncopaths in all US time zones. Our quirky and unique workforce excels at managing our customers’ content migration, synchronization, and orchestration challenges like no other in our space. We are poised for rapid growth and need a Software Engineer to contribute to building a large-scale machine learning natural language processing (NLP) system and developing our understanding of the data we encounter. This role will be a cross between an ML/NLP researcher and a software engineer, and good candidates will have prior experience doing both. We are looking for someone from the southeastern Michigan area and preference will be given to candidates within this geographic location.
You’ll be doing a lot of this: *
Rapidly iterating over different techniques in a solution space, and effectively analyzing the performance of models on various tasks
Contributing to several large-scale production machine learning and natural language processing efforts
Developing and building guidelines for evaluation datasets
Understanding the decision-making process, workflows, and business and information needs of business unit heads and service manager/owners
Translating business needs into analytics/reporting requirements to support executive decisions and workflows with required information
Visualizing information and developing engaging reports on the results of experiments
Advising product teams on new products, features or updates through evidence-based recommendations
Supporting user experience specialists and information architects to enhance information visualization through the development of dashboards and user interfaces
Distributing best practices to analytics and product teams and provides consultations for their data-based experimentations
Other duties as assigned
So you should have this: *
Up-to-date knowledge of machine learning, natural language processing (NLP), and data analytics tools and techniques
Strong knowledge of Python, and related machine learning tools (e.g. TensorFlow, PyTorch)
Strong experience with Docker, AWS
Familiarity with current SOTA NLP models like BERT
4+ years of work experience with Python and machine learning
Willingness and ability to learn new technologies on the job
Demonstrated ability to communicate complex results to technical and non-technical audiences
Demonstrated ability to work with minimal supervision
Experience building and deploying predictive models, web scraping, and scalable data pipelines
Master’s degree or PhD in computer science, electrical engineering, computer engineering, statistics, or related fields preferred
Ability to think critically while solving problems in a rapidly changing product
Nice to have: *
Publications from ML/NLP venues such as ACL, NAACL, EMNLP, NeurIPS, ICML, ICLR
_This position is a great fit for you if you like_* keeping up with the cutting edge of machine learning and NLP and helping build a position and product from the ground up. Knowing how to engage with new challenges daily and handle competing priorities is a must.
_This position is not a great fit for you if you like_* established processes for every situation or a static set of duties and responsibilities.
Qualities Needed for Success*
Excellent listening, writing, and professional communication skills are a must. You should be able to demonstrate proficiency in most of the duties and responsibilities listed above. In our fast-paced world, a great attitude combined with enthusiasm is key to individual success along with embodying our entrepreneurial spirit.

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $93,523.00 - $147,886.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Flexible spending account
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Vision insurance
Schedule:
8 hour shift
Supplemental Pay:
Bonus pay
Experience:
Software Engineering: 3 years (Preferred)
Natural language processing: 1 year (Preferred)
Work Location:
Fully Remote
Relocation Assistance Provided:
No
Company's website:
Skysync.com
Benefit Conditions:
Only full-time employees eligible",5.0,"SkySync
5.0","Ann Arbor, MI",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2011,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
34,Data Scientist II,$56k-$98k (Glassdoor Est.),"Nolij Consulting LLC is a certified Women-Owned Small Business (WOSB) that provides information technology services in test and evaluation (T&E), enterprise architecture (EA), electronic health record (EHR) modernization, infrastructure operations and maintenance (O&M), data analytics and visualization, and agile transformation. Our mission is to understand the challenges and goals of our clients, address them with innovative solutions, and work together to achieve project success. Were eager to hear from candidates like you that can join and contribute to our team.

Nolij Consulting has an opening for a Data Scientist II to join our team based in Vienna, VA.

Responsibilities:
Must be able to design, modify, develop, write and implement software programming applications.
Must be able to support and/or install software applications/operating systems.
Must be able to participate in the testing process through test reviews and analysis, test witnessing and certification of software.
Must be able to design, plan, and coordinate work teams.
Must be able to provides technical support to project team members.
Must be familiar with a variety of the field concepts, practices, and procedures.
Must be able to rely on experience and judgment to plan and accomplish goals.
Must be able to perform a variety of tasks.
Must be able to lead and direct the work of others.
Must exhibit a wide degree of creativity and latitude.
Must typically be able to report to a head of a unit/department
Requirements:
Required a bachelor's degree in science or a related area.
Required 6-8 years of experience in the field.
Note: Since this position is for a Federal Project, a candidate must possess US Citizenship to obtain Clearance.
Do you like the idea of being a driver on a team of distinction? If so, we want to hear from you. To apply, go to https://www.nolijconsulting.com/careers/

Nolij is an EEO/Affirmative Action employer and encourages all qualified applicants to apply.",4.1,"Nolij Consulting
4.1","Vienna, VA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2012,Company - Public,Consulting,Business Services,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1
35,Advanced Software Engineer,$42k-$90k (Glassdoor Est.),"You are a Software Engineer with solid understanding of algorithms and data structures, compiler design, and object oriented programming. You are looking for difficult challenges, the possibility of great innovations, and abundant opportunities for technical research, continuous learning, and skill development.

We are Peddinghaus Corporation’s Advanced Software Development department, a highly collaborative team that creates result-oriented software and strives to enable our customers’ to safely achieve optimal productivity. Peddinghaus Corporation is the leading equipment manufacturer for structural steel fabricators.

Our software interfaces between structural engineering and our customers’ machines that process structural steel beams and columns before they are assembled on construction sites into stadiums, skyscrapers, hospitals, bridges, and other structures. Our software comprises a wide range of technological opportunities, including a core 3D geometry engine, compiler-like post processors to generate CNC code, NP complete algorithms, SQL databases, file parsers with data mapping, interfaces to structural design software, and graphic user interfaces. We utilize C# and both Windows Forms and ASP.NET MVC.

We like you to join us at our Chicago, IL office near Union Station, or at our Bradley, IL headquarters.
Your key characteristics: *
Fascinated by the opportunity to advance software development for an equipment manufacturer for structural steel fabricators.
Communication skills for collaboration with other engineering disciplines.
Strong interpersonal, analytical, problem solving, and organizational skills.
Bachelor’s or postgraduate degree in CS/CE/EE or related field.
3 years’ or otherwise commensurate experience in analytical software design and development.
Thorough understanding of algorithms and data structures, compiler design, and OOP principles.
Deep knowledge of C#, Windows Forms, ASP.NET MVC, and Microsoft Visual Studio.
Leverage software development methods and technologies including SDLC concepts.
Familiarity with relational databases and SQL.
Technical skills or areas of understanding include*:
Programming language design
Discrete structures
Combinatorial mathematics
Approximation algorithms
Parallel numerical algorithms
NP complete problems
Formal Software Development Methods
Formal Models of Computation
Computational Complexity
If you are an experienced Software Engineer fascinated by the opportunity to advance software development for an equipment manufacturer for structural steel fabricators, if you are eager to solve challenging problems with impacts in the physical world, if you thrive on cross-disciplinary collaboration, then apply for this position.

Work location options*:

Our Chicago, IL software development office is across the river from Union Station next to the Chicago Riverwalk. The loop is only a couple of blocks away and most of Chicago’s amenities are within walking distance.

Our Bradley, IL headquarters are about an hour’s drive south of Chicago. Bradley and its surrounding communities offer a variety of suburban and rural living within easy commuting distance. After COVID-19 restrictions have been lifted it is expected that all corporate amenities will be available again, especially our gym with indoor tennis and basketball court, as well as, our gourmet cafeteria. In Bradley you are close to C-Level leaders, Engineering, Manufacturing, Sales, Service, and our Software Support team.

Because of Covid-19, we are currently working 2 days in the office, 3 days from our home offices. The Chicago and Bradley offices are accessible 24/7.
Peddinghaus participates in E-Verify.*
Job Type: Full-time

COVID-19 considerations:
Preferred are in-person interviews with proper COVID-19 precautions. Initial remote interviews are an option, too.

Experience:
Compiler Construction: 3 years (Preferred)
Object-Oriented Programming: 3 years (Required)
Algorithms and Data Structures: 3 years (Required)
Education:
Bachelor's (Required)
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",3.1,"Peddinghaus Corporation
3.1","Chicago, IL",-1,201 to 500 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Industrial Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
36,Sr. Software Engineer,-1,"What if you could use your talent to have a positive impact on healthcare through the technical solutions you build? As a nonprofit, Utah Health Information Network, UHIN for short is a health information technology (HIT) company that is making a difference by bringing technically relevant solutions to the market. We offer affordable tools that allow providers, payers, and patients to safely exchange information electronically. We are looking for a skilled and energetic Engineers (All levels) to play an integral role on our team. If you’re passionate about building beautiful, intuitive and fluid designs, read on to see if you have what it takes to join the team!
Position Summary*
We are looking for a hardworking, motivated, deadline driven individual to join our team and help change healthcare. The Senior Software Engineer’s responsibilities include ensuring that the design, application, and maintenance of software meets UHIN’s quality standards. You should be a team player that has the ability to bring ideas to the table while supporting the overall goals of the engineering department. As a Senior Software engineer you will be expected to work through projects on your own, or together as a mentor to more junior engineers.

Applicants should have solid understanding of the full stack to the level that they can teach it. Expertise writing semantic, modular front-end code using HTML5, SASS, CSS3, and W3C coding practices a must. Experience with PHP, Laravel, Lumen, Bootstrap, Node.js and Vue.JS is a plus. Interested? Read on to learn more!
Primary Expectations/Responsibilities*
Forward Thinker: Promote design thinking, advocate design principles and best practices
Code: An expert full stack engineer in your field (PHP, C#, .NET Core, Java, and JavaScript frameworks such as Vue.js, Node.js, Angular.js or similar)
Integrate: Knowledge of integrating APIs on the frontend, backend, or third-party
Be a Scribe: Documenting skills using tools like Confluence, Swagger, and Readme.io
Shoot for the cloud: Develop software architecture that is cloud ready and redundant
Make it fast: Implementing and testing software for design, functionality, and performance
Mentor: As a Senior Software Engineer there will be times when you are expected to mentor and teach more junior engineers
Other duties / Soft Skills
Be a team player
Must be analytical, detail oriented and able to translate functional requirements into your design
Design and develop applications using agile/SCRUM/Product development processes
Adhere to good development practices: documentation, code standards, code/design reviews, optimization and maintainability
Want to know more about the projects we're working on? Come interview and find out all the cool software you could help us build!
Required Qualifications: *
· 6+ Years in the software design and development

· Bachelor’s Degree in Computer Science, related technical field or equivalent practical experience

· Development experience in PHP, JavaScript, C#, .NET Core, Node.js or Java

· Experience designing with client rich technologies such as Vue.js, AngularJS, React or similar

· Development experience designing object-oriented programming languages

· Significant experience working with on a scrum team and collaborating across product teams

· Significant experience developing user-centric software

· Experience engineering software systems of medium-to-large scope and complexity

· Experience teaching and mentoring other members of the team
Preferred Qualifications: *
· Knowledge of CSS frameworks (Bootstrap, Tailwind, Bulma etc.)

· Working knowledge of healthcare (HIPAA Regulations, PHI, X12, HL7, FHIR etc.)

· Working knowledge of modern PHP frameworks (Laravel, Symphony, etc.)

· Enterprise cloud experience (GCP, AWS, Azure etc.)

· Experience working with Product Development teams

· An understanding of the principles of accessibility and can build products that are accessible to users in healthcare
Comments*
This position may be exposed to PHI on a regular basis; however, only accesses the minimum necessary for completing tasks. In doing so, this position must comply with all UHIN Policies and Procedures with specific regard for PHI Privacy and Security sections and maintain confidentiality with regard to the information being processed, stored or accessed by the network.
Tools and Equipment Used*
Personal computer including; email, internet, word processing, spreadsheet and data base software; phone; copy machine; fax machine and other office machinery.
Physical Demands*
The physical demands described here are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of this job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.

While performing the duties of this job, the employee is frequently required to sit and talk or hear, use hands to finger, handle, feel or operate objects, tools, or controls; and reach with hands and arms. The employee is occasionally required to walk.

The employee must occasionally lift and/or move up to 25 pounds. Specific vision abilities required by this job include close vision and the ability to adjust focus.

The work environment is generally quiet.
Other*
The duties listed above are intended only as illustrations of the various types of work that may be performed. The omission of specific statements of duties does not exclude them from the position if the work is similar, related or a logical assignment to the position.

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $93,000.00 - $123,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Employee assistance program
Flexible schedule
Flexible spending account
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Vision insurance
Schedule:
8 hour shift
Day shift
Monday to Friday
Supplemental Pay:
Bonus pay
COVID-19 considerations:
Our employees will continue to work remote till June 2021 when we will reevaluate the COVID situation.

Experience:
Software Design and Development: 6 years (Required)
Education:
Bachelor's (Required)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Work Location:
One location
This Job Is Ideal for Someone Who Is:
Dependable -- more reliable than spontaneous
People-oriented -- enjoys interacting with people and working on group projects
Achievement-oriented -- enjoys taking on challenges, even if they might fail
Innovative -- prefers working in unconventional ways or on tasks that require creativity
Company's website:
https://uhin.org
Benefit Conditions:
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",5.0,"UHIN
5.0","Salt Lake City, UT",-1,1 to 50 Employees,1993,Nonprofit Organization,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
37,Sr. Data Scientist,$60k-$103k (Glassdoor Est.),"SENIOR DATA SCIENTIST- Temporary Assignment (Remote)

Description:

The senior data scientist will be part of Rubicon’s Data Science team and will be responsible for designing, prototyping, deploying and testing machine learning, computer vision based and deep learning models. This role will also support the translation of big data into internal and external dashboards& reports to drive company and partner performance. This role will play an integral part in building Rubicon’s competitive advantage through leveraging data for unique customer and vendor insights.

Key Responsibilities:
Design, implement, test, prototype, and deploy ML (machine learning), Computer Vision, DP (deep learning), and AI (artificial intelligence) applications from unstructured and structured data assets
Dive into large, complex real-world datasets and produce innovative analysis and predictive models
Conduct statistical analysis of big data to develop insights from the measured performance metrics, and contribute to root cause analysis and resolution of identified performance gaps
Propose and prioritize changes to reporting and create additional metrics and processes based on program changes and customer requirements
Support efforts to ensure data integrity across all platforms and departments
Contribute to idea generation for additional process improvements and automation
Provide guidance to data scientist team in developing new and improved analytics systems, all the way from prototyping to production
Work closely with the rest of the Rubicon team to create ad-hoc reports to support timely business decisions and project work
Preferred Experience/Qualifications:
Bachelors or Master’s degree in Data Science, Mathematics, Computer Sciences, Engineering or a related field; 3 years of experience with model building as a data scientist.
Solid programming skills with Python
Knowledge and in-depth understanding of machine learning and related open source libraries such as Scikit-Learn; data manipulation libraries such as Numpy, Pandas; and deep learning libraries such as TensorFlow
Proficient with Python related computer vision and image processing libraries such as OpenCV
Proficient SQL skills; ideally with experience in Microsoft SQL server, MYSQL, PostgreSQL, Microsoft Access, R, SPSS and PowerBI (or any business intelligence tools)
A basic understanding of AWS cloud service products such as Lamda, Elastic Search, EC2, S3 etc. is a plus
Ability to work effectively with IT and internal customers to mine the right data sources efficiently and accurately
Proven statistical skills and an ability to use hard data and metrics to back up assumptions, develop business cases, and complete root cause analyses
A clear passion for learning new business analysis techniques independently and continuously
Understanding of BI best practices/methodologies, relational database management concepts, dimensional data modeling, data warehouse concepts and reporting techniques
Ability to work directly with end users to ensure results meet their needs
Strong interpersonal skills, capable of writing recommendations and interacting with company personnel on complex topics
Ability to present clear, concise reporting on concurrent projects and issues
Effective verbal and written communication skills


About Rubicon Global

Rubicon Global is a technology company that provides waste, recycling, and smart city solutions to businesses and governments worldwide. It develops and deploys a full suite of cloud-based solutions to help its customers and network of independent waste haulers work towards more sustainable waste and recycling practices, uncover cost savings, and improve operations through data analytics. Using its proprietary technology platform, Rubicon helps its partners find economic value in their waste streams and confidently execute on their sustainability goals, always with an eye towards those solutions that have long-term economic viability. The company has over 1,000,000 service locations worldwide, is headquartered in Atlanta, GA, and has core teams in New York City and San Francisco. Rubicon is a Certified B Corporation and was named a Great Place to Work™ in 2018. Learn more atwww.RubiconGlobal.com.

Rubicon Global is a Certified B Corp and an Equal Employment Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We also maintain a Drug-Free Workplace.",3.9,"Rubicon
3.9","Atlanta, GA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2008,Company - Private,Building & Personnel Services,Business Services,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
38,Senior UI/System Software Engineer,-1,"The Company

We are a fast-paced startup building the next generation surgical robot platform. We’re a diverse team dedicated to creating non-invasive solutions that provide clinical value for both patients and doctors. Working here means joining an experienced startup team that is excited and passionate about creating world class products. Founded by a serial entrepreneur with 2 successful exits, the team includes former engineers from top medical robotics companies. We are a well-funded startup and expect talented, motivated, ambitious and interesting co-workers.
General description: *
Looking for a highly motivated candidate skilled in UI development for medical devices.
Requirements*
• Proven experience in C# Desktop Application Development (.NET Framework 4.5 and

higher), TPL

• Object Oriented Programming experience - design and development,

• Experience with Real Time Systems a plus

• Experience with State Machine based software design a plus.

• Experience with Graphics Rendering (DirectX, OpenGL, etc) a plus.

• B.S. or higher in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, or equivalent

• 5-10 years of relevant job experience
Experience*
• Developed graphical UIs for desktop applications using C#,

• UI and component development using WPF MVVM with Caliburn Micro framework

• 3D viewports layout and navigation.

• Helix Toolkit familiarity (desired)

• Familiar with Git based VCS and CD/CI pipeline

• Accustomed to collaborative software development mode - design and code reviews.
Personal Attributes*
• Great team player, focused on problem solving and productivity

• Open to receiving and giving feedback - efficient communicator

• Always thinking about how to make things more efficient

• Strong work ethic and detail-oriented

• Love learning and being challenged

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $100,000.00 - $175,000.00 per year

Benefits:
Dental insurance
Health insurance
Paid time off
Referral program
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
COVID-19 considerations:
Company will provide and request masks in the office.

Education:
Bachelor's (Required)
Experience:
C#: 3 years (Required)
graphic rendering: 2 years (Preferred)
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",-1,Stealth Mode Startup,"Redwood City, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
39,Data Scientists with TS/SCI,-1,"Veteran Owned Firm Seeking Data Scientists with TS/SCI to support a client in Springfield, VA

My name is Stephen Hrutka, and I am the owner of a Veteran-owned firm in Washington, DC focused on Supply Chain, Strategic Sourcing, and Technical/Cleared Recruiting.

HRUCKUS helps other Veteran Owned businesses recruit for positions across the SBA, HHS, DARPA, and other cutting-edge R&D related defense agencies.

We are looking to hire (2) data scientists to support NGA in Springfield, VA. The role is remote to start, no idea when traditional onsite will begin.

Please see below for the position description. If you’re interested, I'd be glad to provide more details about the role and further discuss your qualifications.

Thanks,

Stephen M Hrutka
Principal Consultant
www.hruckus.com

Position Tasks:
Develop Python or R code to read/categorize large amounts of unstructured data
Develop code to evaluate Intelligence Information Reports (IIRs) for metadata accuracy
Develop code that recognizes and extracts entities from IIRs w/ 90% accuracy
Visualize data derived from structuring of unstructured/semi-structured data
Brief results of code development to leadership to include methods, limitations, and assumptions
Position Deliverables:
Monthly reports
Code modules using Natural Language Processing to analyze multiple unstructured data files and database the information derived
Code modules using Entity Recognition to analyze multiple unstructured data files and identify all people, groups, and categories of objects
Code modules using Latent Semantic Indexing to analyze multiple unstructured data files and database the information derived
Develop code that can be stand-alone or incorporated into existing applications
Visualizations of large data sets, bringing forward unobscured data, and enabling personnel to understand the data quickly
Position Requirements:
Government Security Clearance
Minimum of (3) years of experience related to the following areas: parametric and non-parametric statistical methods; visualizing statistical effects in complex datasets; performing statistical data analysis in Python and/or R; providing and explaining clear analytical results in well-written reports
Ability to write and execute queries in SQL
Ability to visualize data with aid of data visualization tools such as Tableau
Bachelor’s degree in computer science or related field
Ability to work in distributed systems and to develop creative solutions to data problems
Experience with database tools
Preferred Qualifications:
Statistical Modeling: 10 years
Natural Language Processing: 5 years
Python and R: 3 years
Latent Semantic Indexing: 5 years
SQL: 3 years
Tableau: 1 year
Entity Recognition: 5 years",5.0,"HRUCKUS
5.0","Springfield, VA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2013,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1
40,Nextracker - Data Scientist/Machine Learning Engineer,$79k-$128k (Glassdoor Est.),"*CURRENT EMPLOYEES :
Please click here to be redirected to the internal career site.
Job Description
At Nextracker, we are leading in the energy transition, providing the most comprehensive portfolio of intelligent solar tracker and control software solutions for solar power plants, as well as strategic services to capture the full value of solar power plants for our customers. Our talented worldwide teams are transforming PV plant performance every day with smart technology, data monitoring and analysis services.


As a company driving the clean energy transition, sustainability is not just a word. It's a core part of our business and our operations. Our sustainability efforts are based on five cornerstones: People, Community, Environment, Innovation, and Integrity. We are creative, collaborative and passionate problem-solvers from diverse backgrounds, driven by our shared mission to provide smart solar and software solutions for our customers and to mitigate climate change for future generations. Make your mark with Nextracker.

NEXTracker is seeking a ML Engineer/ Data Scientist.He or She will work within the NEXTracker Asset Management and Support team and be responsible for gleaning insights from data collected from the world’s largest installed base of solar array single-axis trackers. The position will be located in our Fremont, CA office.

We are looking for someone who demonstrates:
Intense collaboration
Passionate customer focus
Thoughtful, fast, disciplined execution
Tenacious commitment to continuous improvement
Relentless drive to win
Here is a glimpse of what you’ll do:
Design and develop large scale distributed ML pipelines on cloud.
Take end to end ownership of Machine Learning systems - from data pipelines and training, to real-time prediction engines.
Thrive in a fast-paced environment with a quick cadence of research, experimentation, and product launches.
Create visualizations and presentations for a wide range of technical and non-technical audiences.
Develop tools to create daily monitoring reports on product health and product performance.
Here is some of what you’ll need (required):
MS or PhD degree in a quantitative discipline (e.g., statistics, computer science, mathematics).
3+ years of relevant work experience in Machine Learning, building data science-driven solutions including data collection, feature selection, model training, post-deployment validation.
Excellent understanding of machine learning techniques and algorithms, including Supervised (Regression, Classification) and Unsupervised ML algorithms (clustering, anomaly detection), optimization, neural networks
Excellent applied statistics skills, such as distributions, statistical testing, regression analysis.
Excellent hands-on coding skills (preferably in Python) processing large-scale data set and using ML/statistical modeling tools such as Numpy, ScikitLearn
Intermediate MS Excel experience (Data Analysis, Pivot Tables, Formulas).
Experience in pattern recognition methodologies
Experience translating analysis results into business recommendations.
Excellent verbal and written communication skills
#LI-LD1
LD50

Here are a few of our preferred experiences:
Programming experience in SQL, NOSQL and PowerBI, Tableu is a plus.
MATLAB
Here are a few examples of what you’ll get for the great work you provide:
Full range of medical benefits, dental, vision
Life Insurance
Matching 401K
PTO
Tuition Reimbursement
Employee discounts at local retailers
Job Category
Design, Process & Technology Engineering

Relocation

Eligible for domestic relocation only
Is Sponsorship Available?
No

Flex does not accept unsolicited resumes from headhunters, recruitment agencies or fee based recruitment services. Flex is an Equal Opportunity Employer and employment selection decisions are based on merit, qualifications, and abilities. Flex does not discriminate in employment opportunities or practices based on: age, race, religion, color, sex, national origin, marital status, sexual orientation, gender identity, veteran status, disability, pregnancy status or any other status protected by law. Flex provides reasonable accommodation so that qualified applicants with a disability may participate in the selection process. Please advise us of any accommodations you request to express interest in a position by e-mailing: accessibility@flex.com. Please state your request for assistance in your message. Only reasonable accommodation requests related to applying for a specific position within Flex will be reviewed at the e-mail address. Flex will contact you if it is determined that your background is a match to the required skills required for this position. Thank you for considering a career with Flex.

The information we collect:

We may collect personal information that you choose to submit to us through the Website or otherwise provide to us. This may include your contact details; information provided in online questionnaires, feedback forms, or applications for employment; and information you provide such as CV/Resume. Your details will be provided to the entity you are applying for a job with. We will use your information for legitimate business purposes such as responding to comments or queries or answering questions; progressing applications for employment; allowing you to choose to share web content with others or; where you represent one of our customers or suppliers, administering the business relationship with that customer or supplier. We will process your data in accordance with our Recruitment Privacy Notice.

If you have any queries about the processing of your data, please contact:

Global Data Privacy Officer:

Email Address: chiefprivacyofficer@flex.com",3.8,"Flex
3.8","Fremont, CA",-1,10000+ Employees,1969,Company - Public,Electrical & Electronic Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$10+ billion (USD),-1
41,Radar Expert - Software Engineer,$51k-$107k (Glassdoor Est.),"At Torc, we have always believed that autonomous vehicle technology will transform how we travel, ship goods, and do business.

A leader in autonomous driving since 2007, Torc has spent over a decade commercializing their autonomous solutions with experienced partners. Now a part of the Daimler family , we are developing automated trucks to transform transportation.

Join us and take your career to new heights with a company that helped pioneer autonomous technology. You'll work with an experienced team of people who are committed to creating safer roads, and your contributions will have an impact on the future of transportation.

About the Team

The Active Sensing and Information Fusion team is responsible for developing perception algorithms to detect and identify objects for Torc's autonomous driving systems, allowing the system to understand and react to the environment around the vehicle in real-time. Our algorithms utilize 3D point cloud data from LiDAR and objects detected in radar returns. The team also implements the sensor fusion algorithms that combine this data and provide probabilistic state estimation.

We work closely with other engineering teams in behavior and motion planning to create innovative solutions for our Level 4 autonomous system.

About the Role:

We are looking for a Radar expert. In this role you will be responsible to various software development and engineer activities supporting the delivery of autonomy algorithm software to the overall system solution; Perform software development activities to include, but not limited to, software architecture, design, coding, unit testing, integration, deployment and maintenance. Clearly communicate daily status on assigned activities and follow company policies and procedures. Have a background either through education and/or employment in developing, implementing, and testing autonomy algorithms with the areas of behaviors processing, path planning, active sensing, information fusion, machine learning or vision processing. We work closely with other engineering teams to create innovative solutions for our Level 4 autonomous system.

Our Perception teams are responsible for developing perception algorithms to detect and perceive objects for Torc's autonomous driving systems, allowing the system to understand and react to the environment around the vehicle in real-time. Perception team members create software to utilize algorithms that use sensor data from LiDAR, RADAR, and cameras to detect, classify, segment, and detect, segment, classify, and track obstacles in the vehicle's surrounding environment. Perception software utilizes 3D point cloud data from LiDAR and objects detected in radar returns to create a situational awareness for our behaviors and path planning teams to make vehicle decisions to navigate safety.

Required Competencies :

Responsible for executing full software development lifecycle activities using C++ skills in Linux development environment using Lean-Agile methodologies

Responsible to complete software assignments including but not limited to software design, implementation, unit testing, vehicle testing and deployed software maintenance.

Assist in root cause analysis of issues found in vehicle testing

Support team in identifying daily assignments and reporting progress at daily stand ups.

Support software and system level test plans and verification strategies to support ongoing feature development and bug fixes.

Responsible to ensure software updates do not regress the software performance by utilizing simulation software and scenarios.

Update simulation software and scenarios for new features or situations encountered in testing software

Passion for autonomy development and testing

Drive delivery of practical application of autonomy algorithms to meet program goals and milestones

Support high risk/high reward prototyping to advance technology incorporation into deployed system

Exhibit Torc Values: Hungry, Humble, PeopleSmartCommunicate well in a team environment being able to clearly articulate progress, design expectations and support needed to help the team accomplish goals.

Continuous learning mind-set

Minimum Technical Skills and Qualifications

Industry Experience in Robotics/Autonomy algorithms, architecture, and design in area of perception software

Expert knowledge of sensor data algorithms and driver development from RADAR

Strong in C++ programming skills

Proficient with ROS (Robot Operating System)

Strong Antennae theory, DSP, Radar feature extraction, Radar Statistical methods, and Radar classification

Proficient understanding of probability, statistics, probabilistic modeling, and linear algebra

Proficient knowledge of vehicle kinematics and dynamics

Good spatial comprehension and computational skills

High level understanding of Bayes probability theory

Proficient knowledge of Kalman filters, sensor fusion and dynamic state estimation

Proficient knowledge and application in graph theory and search algorithms

Proficient knowledge working in multiple coordinate frames

Strong verbal and written communication skills to clearly communicate technical design and approach with peers and more junior team members

Minimum Education and Experience Requirements:

Bachelor's degree, or foreign degree equivalent, in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, Robotics Engineer, Mechanical Engineering, or engineering equivalent.

Minimum 6 years' experience relevant industry experience in robotics, autonomy software engineering; Minimum 3 years' experience with relevant Master level degree; Relevant PhD Degree

Perks of being a Torc'r

Torc cares about our team members and we strive to provide benefits and resources to support their health, work/life balance, and their future. Additionally, we are always open to suggestions to accommodate individual employee needs. Torc offers:

Full coverage of monthly medical premiums for full-time employees

Medical/dental/vision/ AD+D and Life Insurance

401K plan with employer matching

Annual learning and development stipend

Leadership development training

Collaborative, energetic, and team-focused work environment

Flexibility in schedule and generous paid vacation

PI124953113",4.7,"Torc Robotics
4.7","Blacksburg, VA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2005,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
42,Deep learning Software Engineer,$91k-$145k (Glassdoor Est.),"Job Description

If you are looking to make a huge impact for Intel across Discrete GPUs for AI, software products including oneAPI and win worldwide AI software ecosystem on our Data Center targeted Discrete GPUs, then read ahead .This is a leadership engineering role in AI within Ecosystem Engineering team in IAGS. The role spans working with customers across multiple internal and external stakeholders and customers As Deep Learning software engineer, you will be involved from early enabling activities to actually undertaking performance tuning and optimization of deep learning models based on TensorFlow and Pytorch for successful deployment by our customers. Additionally, you will be expected to influence Intel Discrete GPU hardware capabilities for AI as well as AI software stack for oneAPI. This is a high impact role working with customers and driving their success, while making Intel a world leader in AI by influencing our discrete GPU and software products.

We are in startup-up environment, you should love ambiguity, be able to juggle multiple-tasks and able to make forward, demonstrable progress that delivers impact. You will have an opportunity to collaborate with Engineering Leaders across Intel and be able influence technical leaders.

An ideal candidate would exhibit behavioral skills that indicate:

Excellent verbal and written skills are required. Ability to develop high-quality externally publishable collaterals is a plus.
Ability to work in a dynamic environment and ability to think on your feet is required

Qualifications

You must possess the below minimum qualifications to be initially considered for this position. Preferred qualifications are in addition to the minimum requirements and are considered a plus factor in identifying top candidates.

Minimum Qualifications:

Bachelor’s with 9 + years or Master’s with 6+ years or Ph.D with 4+ years in Electrical Engineering or Computer Science or Computer Engineering or Physics or Mathematics or a related relevant Engineering discipline
5+ years or more experience working in Machine Learning or AI in one of the following roles: Developing, architecture, implementing or performance bench marking AI workloads
2 years or more experience in one or more of the following areas: Python, Tensor Flow, Caffe, Pytorch, MXNet
2+ years' experience in deploying/optimizing distributed training on CPU/GPU clusters

Preferred Qualifications

2+ years of knowledge/experience in Artificial Intelligence solutions applied to segments such as HPC, Cloud, Visual Computing and/or Enterprise.
Prior experience in deployment strategies , performance optimization, multi node, multi GPU scaling big plus
Prior experience in Cloud deployment strategies, Cloud Developer Environments and having any cloud certification is a definite plus.
Knowledge of Intel MKL libraries like MKL-DNN highly desired
Develop custom data models and algorithms to apply to available data sets, test it and then deploy on big data also help for artificial intelligence is a plus
Good presentation skills at conferences, industry events, labs, and customer workshops are a plus.
Experience or training in one or more of the parallel programming methodologies: SYCL, C++, OpenMP*, MPI, Intel Threading Building Blocks, OpenCL, CUDA is highly desired
Soft skills needed to work with customers and/or prior engagement with customers is a big plus!

Inside this Business Group

Intel Architecture, Graphics, and Software (IAGS) brings Intel's technical strategy to life. We have embraced the new reality of competing at a product and solution level—not just a transistor one. We take pride in reshaping the status quo and thinking exponentially to achieve what's never been done before. We've also built a culture of continuous learning and persistent leadership that provides opportunities to practice until perfection and filter ambitious ideas into execution.

Other Locations

US, California, Santa Clara

Posting Statement

All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, religious creed, sex, national origin, ancestry, age, physical or mental disability, medical condition, genetic information, military and veteran status, marital status, pregnancy, gender, gender expression, gender identity, sexual orientation, or any other characteristic protected by local law, regulation, or ordinance....",4.1,"Intel
4.1","Hillsboro, OR",-1,10000+ Employees,1968,Company - Public,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),-1
43,Senior Staff Software Engineer - Machine Learning Acceleration,$101k-$193k (Glassdoor Est.),"Description

We are looking for a self-driven and experienced C++ software engineer to be part of the Xilinx Vitis AI Software team. The Vitis AI Software team develops core software for deploying Machine Learning applications on Xilinx Deep Learning processors.

Being a member of the Vitis AI Software team requires passion and motivation to solve challenging and technical problems with robust algorithms and features. Our code is optimized for high throughput and low-latency – core requirements for Machine Learning inference.

You will be part of a global team that works on the end-to-end Xilinx Vitis AI software stack. Our software...
starts with user Machine Learning models from popular frameworks such as Tensorflow and TVM
compiles them to target various FPGA Deep Learning accelerators
deploys them for execution on FPGA devices
The flexibility of Xilinx FPGA allows many Deep Learning accelerator designs to be deployed on the same FPGA device. And since FPGAs are programmable, Vitis AI also allows users to optimize the user’s entire end-to-end system. The FPGA can deploy not only Deep Learning accelerators on Edge and in the Cloud – it can also be combined with other modules such as Vision or Post-processing – accelerating the user’s whole application on one chip.

Because of that, you will get a unique chance to work with possibly the largest portfolio of Deep Learning accelerator Hardware, Compiler and Software designs in the industry. It is also the most flexible portfolio of Deep Learning accelerators. Xilinx FPGA makes it easy to optimize each accelerator for a specific user application. It is also easy to experiment with state-of-the-art techniques (such as quantization or pruning).

As such, Vitis-AI software is not custom code tuned for one Machine Learning application. You will join us in our exciting effort to design and implement a simple, robust and general Software Stack to efficiently deploy all current and future FPGA accelerators.

As a Sr Staff Software Engineer, you will be a core member in our global team of RTL, Compiler, Software and Application Engineers. We work together from our offices in San Jose HQ, Beijing, and Hyderabad. Because of that, good communication and teamwork are essential. This listing is for a position in our San Jose headquarters.

In this team, members are involved in all aspects of Deep Learning accelerator development: design, prototyping, implementation, testing, and productization. The team is dynamic and offers each member personal opportunity to grow their knowledge and skills in complex problem solving, product development and software engineering.

Learn more about Xilinx and Vitis AI by visiting us at https://github.com/Xilinx/Vitis-AI

MSEE/MSCS with a minimum of 8 years of relevant work experience in software industry
Strong software development and debug skills
Must be able to demonstrate strong analytical and problem solving ability.
Must be able to excel in a team environment with good interpersonal and communication skills.
Fluency in C++, data structures, algorithms, parallel programming and operating systems
Experience with Machine Learning models and applications is preferred
]]>",3.8,"Xilinx
3.8","San Jose, CA",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1984,Company - Public,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
44,"Artificial Intelligence - Semantics Engineer, Lead",$132k-$224k (Glassdoor Est.),"Why choose between doing meaningful work and having a fulfilling life? At MITRE, you can have both. That's because MITRE people are committed to tackling our nation's toughest challenges—and we're committed to the long-term well-being of our employees. MITRE is different from most technology companies. We are a not-for-profit corporation chartered to work for the public interest, with no commercial conflicts to influence what we do. The R&D centers we operate for the government create lasting impact in fields as diverse as cybersecurity, healthcare, aviation, defense, and enterprise transformation. We're making a difference every day—working for a safer, healthier, and more secure nation and world. Our workplace reflects our values. We offer competitive benefits, exceptional professional development opportunities, and a culture of innovation that embraces diversity, inclusion, flexibility, collaboration, and career growth. If this sounds like the choice you want to make, then choose MITRE—and make a difference with us.

Use Artificial Intelligence to solve problems for a safer world! At MITRE we work across the whole of government on big problems that challenge our nation’s stability. We use our strengths to build coalitions of collaboration that strengthen government and create positive change for citizens. You can be a part of this! Our work programs need technical leaders who have a passion for applying AI to solve hard problems.
MITRE’s Artificial Intelligence and Autonomous Systems Department is seeking top individuals with a passion for artificial intelligence, experience and proficiency with ontology and information semantics, as well as one or more of the following technical areas: knowledge-based reasoning, cognitive science, multi-agent systems, automated planning, and machine learning.

Our ideal candidate is experienced in developing solutions for the representation, management, exchange, and exploitation of meaningful data, by using information semantics, ontological engineering, reasoning and inference, text mining, and data mining. Requirements include proficiency with ontology design and development, extensive experience with knowledge-management systems and applications using ontologies, and familiarity with implementations conformant to established standards (including W3C Recommendations) for ontology and information semantics. Additionally, they have solid experience in other AI capabilities.

At MITRE, you will have the opportunity to work on a wide range of challenges while leading and/or working with interdisciplinary teams to design, develop, and field AI solutions that improve the effectiveness of our sponsors’ programs. You will have opportunities to shape the technical and programmatic direction of programs by analyzing existing and anticipated problems and evaluating potential solutions. Your experience will allow you to assess the adequacy and maturity of current research programs, influence research directions, and identify emerging areas where research and development are needed to strengthen the nation’s growing AI capabilities.

Day-to-day responsibilities:

• Lead and/or contribute to the design, development, and/or implementation of technical solutions requiring knowledge representation, ontology engineering, knowledge management, Semantic Web technologies, and related technical disciplines.
• Analyze, evaluate, and present Information Semantics and other AI solutions applied to sponsor requirements and needs.
• Understand and maintain up-to-date knowledge of advances in Information Semantics and other AI capabilities in industry and academia.
• Develop, propose, and execute original research in the field of Information Semantics.
• Develop and propose new research directions in Information Semantics and other AI-enabled solutions in support of MITRE’s internal research program and sponsors’ research programs.

Basic Qualifications:
• Bachelor’s degree in Information Semantics (or related filed) in one or more of the following fields: Computational Linguistics; Computer Science/AI with concentrations in Knowledge Representation, Semantics, and/or Automated Reasoning; Philosophy of Language, Formal Logic, or Formal Ontology, with practical applications.
• 8 + years of experience with defining, developing, and deploying solutions in Information Semantics and other AI capabilities.
• Must be a US citizen able to obtain and maintain a US government clearance.

Required Qualifications:
• Ability to articulate challenges specific to Information Semantics, identify gaps in knowledge representation and implementation, discuss the critical issues, and develop and evaluate practical solutions.
• Documented success creating enterprise strategies for organizations using ontology-related technologies and knowledge/logic-based applications.
• Hands on information technology program/project management and software development experience related to building ontologies and knowledge representation systems and applications that use ontologies
• Experience with knowledge representation languages such as OWL and programming languages such as, Java and Python.
• Experience in related AI-relevant fields, such as natural language processing, text and data mining, data and object modeling, enterprise modeling, and automated reasoning.
• Excellent communication skills (both written and verbal).
• Ability to work both independently and with a team.
• Ability to develop and foster relationships with MITRE sponsors (clients).
• Familiarity with the state-of-the-art in the field.
• Proven ability to work independently to learn new technologies, techniques, processes, languages, platforms, and systems.

Preferred Qualifications:
• Master’s or PhD degree in artificial intelligence or related discipline w/ experience in defining, developing, and deploying AI solutions
• Experience in a cybersecurity domain.
• Preference given to qualified candidates with active DoD Secret clearance.

MITRE is proud to be an equal opportunity employer. MITRE recruits, employs, trains, compensates, and promotes regardless of race, religion, color, national origin, gender, gender expression, sexual identity, disability, age, veteran status, and other protected status.

MITRE intends to maintain a website that is fully accessible to all individuals. If you are unable to search or apply for jobs and would like to request a reasonable accommodation for any part of MITRE’s employment process, please contact MITRE’s Recruiting Help Line at 703-983-8226 or email at recruitinghelp@mitre.org.

Copyright © 1997-2020, The MITRE Corporation. All rights reserved. MITRE is a registered trademark of The MITRE Corporation. Material on this site may be copied and distributed with permission only.",3.4,"MITRE
3.4","McLean, VA",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1958,Nonprofit Organization,Federal Agencies,Government,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
45,Senior Principal Engineer,-1,"We are seeking a Senior Principal Engineer to join our product development team. In this role, you will be a technical leader on our Lexio team. Lexio is an innovative product that combines data analysis, natural language generation, and an intuitive user experience to reimagine Business Intelligence. As a Senior Principal Engineer, you will have technical ownership over significant parts of the Lexio codebase. You will be challenged with a diverse set of projects including greenfield product development and system-level platform improvements.

While technical work will be your primary focus, you are a problem solver at your core. You are a collaborator who is energized by working with the entire spectrum of the Lexio team; engineering, product, design, customer success, and go-to-market. You are driven to build something great and resilient to the fact that customer and user needs often change. You take delight in:
Using creativity and innovation to make products better for the end-user every day
Working on unique technical problems in the emerging field of data storytelling
Working in small teams to efficiently design and build solutions to novel problems
Expressing your perspective even when it may not be a popular one
Mentoring people and believing that a great product comes from great team collaboration
Working with company leadership to define and guide engineering goals
Tackling the highest priority and riskiest projects
Qualifications
10+ years of professional software development experience
Proven expertise with Python or equivalent
Experience with Unix / Linux systems (e.g. Ubuntu, CentOS, RedHat, etc.)
Familiarity with distributed and cloud computing, particularly AWS
Proven experience building highly scalable, fault-tolerant applications
Demonstrated ability to write clean, helpfully-commented and readable code
Proven ability to collaborate and influence cross-functionally
A drive to learn constantly with an analytical and problem-solving mindset
A passion for growing as an engineer and helping others grow
Experience with owning a technical roadmap, defining developer standards, and promoting best practices across the engineering organization
A knack for debugging unfamiliar problems
Proven experience dealing with ambiguity
Bonus
Experience with statistics and/or machine learning
Experience building modern front-apps (e.g. React/Redux, Angular, Vue)
About the Engineering Team @ Narrative Science

The Engineering team at Narrative Science specializes in delivering high-value cloud-based solutions to customers. Specifically, we are responsible for building and innovating on an insightful and personalized data storytelling platform. We work a lot with data pipelines, analytics, natural language generation (NLG), continuous deployment tooling, and cloud architecture.

Culture @ Narrative Science

Narrative Science believes that data storytelling can empower everyone to understand and take action from their data. Our mission is to build software that leverages artificial intelligence to automatically turn data into easy-to-understand reports, transforms statistics into stories, and converts numbers into knowledge.

Our core virtues (mission-driven, impactful, team first, innovative) are ingrained in everything we do, from how we develop our technology to how we interact with customers to how we hire people. Since 2020, we have embraced a remote approach and are on a journey to ingrain that in our culture. All while being immersed in our culture of learning, collaboration, innovation, and customer impact.

At Narrative Science, we embrace the diverse backgrounds, experiences, and perspectives of our future employees, colleagues, customers, partners, and other stakeholders. We provide equal employment opportunities (EEO) to all employees and applicants for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, age, disability, marital status, citizenship, genetic information, or any other characteristic protected by law.",4.1,"Narrative Science
4.1",United States,-1,51 to 200 Employees,2010,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
46,Sr. Software Engineer (Python),-1,"SENIOR SOFTWARE ENGINEER - Python/Node.js*
_(Top Secret - TS/SCI Clearance Required!)_
BigBear, Inc.* is an industry-leading provider of big data computing and analytics solutions. We help people make sense of their data using our cloud-based platform and big data processing algorithms. Each day, we crunch massive volumes of structured and unstructured data into usable and actionable information for our customers. We currently have offices in Reston, VA., Charlottesville, VA., and San Diego, CA.
REQUIRED: *
5+ years of professional software development experience (MINIMUM)*
Solid experience with Python/ Django, Node JS, or Flask.
Solid experience with PostgreSQL.
Solid experience in Linux environment.
Solid experience with data modeling, business logic, and RESTful APIs.
Experience with NGINX and SSL.
US Citizenship and TS/SCI US Security Clearance.
BS/MS in Computer Science or related field or equivalent military experience.
BONUS SKILLS: *
Experience working in an Agile/Scrum development process.
Experience with deployment automation in Amazon Web Services.
Experience with Django Framework.
Experience with geospatial toolkits including GDAL and PostGIS
Experience with high volume data flow.
Solid experience with Amazon Web Services (EC2, S3, SQS, RDS).
TECHNOLOGY WE USE: *
• ElasticSearch
• PostgreSQL
• Python - Django
• Java
• AWS
• Docker
• Git
• Angular, React
• Jenkins
Our Company: *
BigBear, Inc.* is a software development company with locations in San Diego, Washington DC, Charlottesville, and Reston, VA. Our mission is to enable big data computing and analytics for our customers at a low cost. We leverage capabilities such as machine learning, crowdsourcing, geospatial image processing, and Extract-Transform-Load (ETL) data processing using our on-premise cloud computing technology stack. Our solutions provide a unique offering of products, custom-built software, and services focused within Big Data Analytics, Geospatial Information Systems (GIS), Visualization and Cloud Computing to our Department of Defense, and Commercial customers. We currently have exciting and challenging career opportunities for talented, motivated individuals who want to be part of a fast-growing company.
Our Team: *
We like to play with new toys and technologies. We like to break things to see if we can put them back together again in a better way. Our tails wag when we hear the words Big Data, Geospatial or Machine Learning. Each team member provides a unique set of advanced technical skills and trade that contributes to our overall success.
Perks/Benefits: *
· 100% employer-paid for Medical, Dental, and Vision insurance (PPO)
· A competitive salary based on experience
· Flexible Spending Account (FSA) - optional
· 401(k) with dollar-for-dollar match up to 6%
· A warm, cozy office with actual chairs and tables
· Life and Disability Insurance 100% paid for by the company
· Education Assistance
· 529 College Savings Plan - optional
· Healthy Rewards Program
· Pre-paid Legal & Identity Theft Protection - optional
· Gym Reimbursement
· Pet Insurance - optional
· A shiny magical machine that does wonderful things
· Flexible Hours
· Unlimited Coffee, Drinks and Snacks
· 6 WEEKS of Paid Time Off (PTO) on top of 11 Paid Holidays!
BigBear is an Equal Employment Opportunity Employer/Veterans/Disabled *
Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $110,000.00 - $145,000.00 per year

Education:
Bachelor's (Preferred)
Location:
Washington, DC 20032 (Required)
Security Clearance Required:
Top Secret (Required)
Work Location:
One location
Benefits:
Health insurance
Dental insurance
Vision insurance
Retirement plan
Paid time off
Parental leave
Professional development assistance
Tuition reimbursement
Schedule::
Monday to Friday",4.4,"BigBear, Inc.
4.4","Washington, DC",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2008,Company - Public,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
47,Data Scientist active TS/SCI,$83k-$136k (Glassdoor Est.),"We are currently seeking an innovative, experienced, and highly-skilled Data Scientist to join our growing Advanced Analytics team in Ft. Belvoir, VA. In this role, you will create and develop custom solutions for our users in a collaborative, fast-paced, state-of-the art environment. To be successful in this role, you will be thorough, creative, and exceptionally well-skilled in all phases of the development lifecycle, with a passion for continued learning and collaboration.
*This position is located in Ft. Belvoir, VA and requires an active TS/SCI clearance*

The Data Scientist will:
Demonstrate the ability to frame and scale data problems to analyze, visualize, and find data solutions.
Manipulate common data formats, including comma-delimited, text files, and JSON.
Transform data and analysis into informative visualizations and interactive dashboards using open-source and commercially available tools.
Derive insights and analytic narratives from data and visualizations for effective storytelling and clear communication in response to client research questions.
Establish data science pipelines.
Develop, train, test, deploy, and sustain AI and machine learning models.
Leverage data patterns and other development methods to optimize code and reduce computational cost.
Develop front-end interfaces to facilitate usage of developed AI/ML solutions
Work in a fast-paced, solutions-oriented environment focused on client deliverables, analysis, and reporting.

Active TS/SCI clearance
Bachelor’s degree in data science, mathematics, statistics, economics, computer science, engineering, or a related business or quantitative discipline strongly preferred. Master's degree in these disciplines preferred.
Experience working with Scala, Python, Java
5-10+ years of related experience required
Advanced data science experience required
Significant experience with databases
Experience and familiarity with Agile-Scrum software development
Experience gathering and decomposing requirements
Proven record of solution development and deployment
Familiarity with web based application development
Experience with testing, use case, and user stories
Outstanding communication skills, written and verbal
Highly-organized and able to manage multiple projects simultaneously
Team-player mentality with a positive attitude
Keen attention to detail and solid analytical skills
Able to articulate complex, abstract concepts concisely and effectively
#LI-SH1

LMI is an Equal Opportunity Employer-all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, or national origin.",4.3,"LMI
4.3","Fort Belvoir, VA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1961,Nonprofit Organization,Consulting,Business Services,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
48,"SR. RESEARCH ENGINEER - SPACE AVIONICS - AUSTIN, TEXAS",$75k-$107k (Glassdoor Est.),"Job Summary:


Join our Austin Space Science and Engineering team! Provide support to engineering design teams in selecting, evaluating and documenting compliance to specification of electrical, electronic, electromechanical and electro-optical parts. Make recommendations regarding appropriate components, researching and suggesting alternatives, and documenting decisions, with minimal direction. You will be responsible for procurement management of all EEE parts. Collaborate with electrical design engineers to help them select appropriate parts given project requirements, schedule and cost limitations. Conduct presentations to customers and clearly communicate with design team member. Must develop an understanding of component lead times, design fluidity, and how that impacts project deliverables in order to manage procurements related to EEE parts. Applications will include military and space products.


Education/Experience:


Requires a BS degree in Electrical Engineering or closely related engineering degree with 5-8 years of engineering experience; 3 of which must be as a Parts Engineer. Working knowledge of NASA EEE-INST-002 preferred. Working knowledge of EEE parts TORs a benefit. EEE parts Procurement management experience is required. Must have at least a 3.0 GPA. Strong communication skills are required. Knowledge of electronic components and basic electronics design is preferred. Must be able to collaborate in a team environment and have initiative to handle projects autonomously. Background in statistical process control a plus. Background in electronics component manufacturering a plus. Must be willing to travel. A valid/clear driver's license is required.


Special Requirements:


Work assignment is in Austin, Texas. Must be a U.S. citizen or Permanent Resident due to ITAR work in section.

Job Locations: Austin, Texas | Boulder, Colorado


For more information about this division, visit the Space Science & Engineering home page.

An Equal Employment Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer
Race/Color/Religion/Sex/Sexual Orientation/Gender Identity/National Origin/Disabled/Veteran
Committed to Diversity in the Workplace
If you need assistance, please Contact Us",4.0,"Southwest Research Institute
4.0","Boulder, CO",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1947,Nonprofit Organization,Research & Development,Business Services,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
49,Sr Medical Imaging Engineer,-1,"The Company

We are a fast-paced startup building the next generation surgical robot platform. We’re a diverse team dedicated to creating non-invasive solutions that provide clinical value for both patients and doctors. Working here means joining an experienced startup team that is excited and passionate about creating world class products. Founded by a serial entrepreneur with 2 successful exits, the team includes former engineers from top medical robotics companies. We are a well-funded startup and expect talented, motivated, ambitious and interesting co-workers.
Role and Responsibilities*
Work with marketing and users to define and iterate requirements
Research, prototype, iterate algorithmic solutions to medical imaging segmentation, registration and reconstruction problems for surgical planning and navigation
Contribute high quality code to create a medical product that is safe and effective
Support testing and documentation
Job / Skill Requirements
MS/PhD degree in Computer Science, Electrical Engineering, Biomedical Engineering, Radiology or other related programs
Solid foundation on mathematics and analytical skills
Deep understanding of and hands-on experience in state-of-the-art (medical) image analysis algorithms
Deep understanding of and hands-on experience in Machine Learning and Deep Learning
Experience in one or more areas: volumetric image segmentation, semantic image segmentation, medical image registration, image reconstruction, graph cut, level-set, or computer vision
Strong development skills using C++, C# and/or Python (and the desire to learn new techniques and tools)
Object Oriented Programming understanding and experience
Experience with lung anatomy and pulmonary clinical application is a plus
Experience or knowledge with estimation, navigation and sensor fusion is a plus
Familiarity with tools such as ITK, VTK, OpenCV, Deep Learning frameworks
3+ years of experience in relevant algorithm development
8+ years of overall relevant experience
Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $139,000.00 - $164,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
Dental insurance
Health insurance
Referral program
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
COVID-19 considerations:
Company will prepare masks for all employees and require to wear masks in the office.

Education:
Master's (Required)
Experience:
C/C++: 3 years (Required)
Python: 2 years (Required)
Deep learning: 2 years (Required)
Medical imaging: 1 year (Preferred)
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",-1,Stealth Mode Startup,"Redwood City, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
50,Software Engineer,$47k-$102k (Glassdoor Est.),"Software Engineer

General Position Summary:
The Developer DBA will principally be responsible to create database objects that are used for custom applications that conform to properly normalized data models. Document the data model with database diagrams that properly identify all entity relationships. Support database efficiency and availability through database maintenance and monitoring. Responsible for creating and maintaining custom SSRS reports integrated into applications, and Power BI reports online. Additional SQL Server responsibilities will be to support, install, maintain and, troubleshoot enterprise databases and the applications that utilize SQL Server.

Job Scope/Complexity:
Responsible for full life-cycle of medium to large sized complex projects; strong technical skills; strong ability to understand complex business processes. Develops solutions based on extensive technical knowledge, skills and experience; influences client towards innovative/integrated solutions.

Job Responsibilities:
Evaluate, recommend and implement new architectural and user interface elements in the .Net development environment; document, train and assist developers in supporting existing code base; evaluate new code version and deployment strategies.

ANALYSIS AND REQUIREMENTS GATHERING

Define complex business/clinical/education problems by meeting with clients to observe and understand current processes and the issues related to those processes. Provide written documentation of findings to share with the client and other IT colleagues.
Gather complex system requirements by meeting with clients and researching existing technology to understand the business requirements and possible solutions for new applications.

DESIGN AND DEVELOPMENT

Develop detailed tasks/schedule estimates for complex projects in order to ensure product is delivered in a timely fashion according to software lifecycle standards.
Write functional/technical specifications from the complex system requirements, putting them into functional and technical descriptions for use by programmers and business analysts to develop technical solutions.
Develop/change data input, files/database structures, data transformation, algorithms, and data output by using appropriate computer language/tools to provide technical solutions for complex application development tasks.
Create database objects for custom applications including tables, stored procedures, views, functions, triggers, T-SQL queries and RDLs.
Provide thought leadership in designing and developing innovative integrated solutions.

TESTING AND DOCUMENTATION

Create and document complex test scenarios using the appropriate testing tools to validate and verify application functionality.
Test all changes by using the appropriate complex test scenarios to ensure all delivered solutions work as expected and errors are handling in a meaningful way.
Author and maintain documentation by writing audience-appropriate materials to serve as technical references.
Effectively communicate the complexities of various technologies to other members of a development team using database diagrams that provide complete database entity relationships.

IMPLEMENTATION AND MAINTENANCE

Implement changes by adhering to the change management policies and procedures for any given project to communicate to all parties the nature, significance, and risk factors of the solution.
Monitor changes and resolve complex problems by responding as they occur, by reviewing all processing and output of the newly implemented solution, and by proactively ensuring the solution works successfully in order to satisfy the customer requirements and to provide a smooth transition to the new solution.
Provide support by investigating and resolving issues, including complex issues to ensure prompt, effective service.

Specific systems, applications, projects on which the position will be responsible to develop or maintain:

Faculty Information System, Course System, Trend Analysis and Budgeting System, Patient Viewpoint

Impact of application to organization:

The Faculty Information system serves the purpose of collecting and sharing information about faculty and their Curriculum Vitae. This directly impacts the Schools faculty and administrators by allowing them to review faculty participation and contributions to teaching and research.
The Course system is used by faculty and students to provide course details and assist with the student enrollment and course evaluation processes. This system has a significant impact to the schools business model.
The Trend Analysis and Budgeting System is used by the Schools administrators to plan and forecast future year budgets and expenditure levels. This system is critical for financial planning.
The Patient Viewpoint system is used to help assess the quality of life as patients undergo treatment. This is a collaborative work with another JHU division to assist with patient care.

Examples of clients supported and degree of client interaction:

Clients supported include faculty, students and staff. Although interaction with most clients is through a liaison, either a project manager or team leader, some interaction with clients regarding clarification of business logic or application requirements is necessary.

Scale/size of area (# of users, # of servers, # of machines, # of systems supported, transaction volume, # of schools/areas that use system, multiple environments, geography, # of interfaces/integration with other systems):
There are 35 monitored production servers and 10 non production servers with approximately 400 supported databases. Collectively these databases serve the needs of virtually all faculty, students and staff at the School. The custom applications impact a very large percentage of the faculty, student and staff populations.

Degree of supervision - how work is assigned, carried out, and reviewed:

Low degree of supervision but work is team-based and tasks are initiated/managed by the Business Analyst and Project Manager.
Work location: 615 N. Wolfe Street and work from home 1-2 days a week.

Minimum qualifications (mandatory):

Bachelor's degree (or foreign equivalent) preferably in Computer Science, Computer Information Systems, Information Technology, Electronic Engineering or related field.
Five years of related work experience
Additional education may substitute for required experience and additional related experience may substitute for required education, to the extent permitted by the JHU equivalency formula.

Preferred Qualifications:
Knowledge in the assigned application as well as the platform on which it runs.

Special Knowledge, Skills, and Abilities:

Experience with computer systems and Web applications: Microsoft SQL Server database development, T SQL scripting, SSRS report writing, Power BI, ASP.Net applications using C# and VB.Net, .Net Frameworks. All development supports a Web application environment.
Must possess all requisite knowledge, skills, and abilities as posted in the supplemental section.
SQL Server 2012 to SQL Server 2019 development and administration
Power BI Report create and publish online reports
SQL Reporting services, create and publish RDL into production systems
T-SQL Programming of both DDL and DML objects
Must demonstrate strong critical thinking and analytical reasoning skills.
Ability to work on multiple priorities effectively.
Ability to prioritize conflicting demands.
Ability to execute assigned project tasks within established schedule.
Ability to work collaboratively in a team environment.
Ability to communicate effectively in the service of users and colleagues.
Writes and communicates clearly and concisely.
Possesses sound documentation skills.
Ability to maintain confidentiality.
Must demonstrate exemplary customer service skills.

Classified Title: Software Engineer
Role/Level/Range: ATP/04/PE
Starting Salary Range: $69,140 - $95,005 per year
Employee group: Full Time
Schedule: M-F, 8:30 am - 5:00 pm
Exempt Status: Exempt
Location: 05-MD:School of Public Health
Department name: 10003508-JHSPH IT Advanced Technology Services
Personnel area: School of Public Health

The successful candidate(s) for this position will be subject to a pre-employment background check.

If you are interested in applying for employment with The Johns Hopkins University and require special assistance or accommodation during any part of the pre-employment process, please contact the HR Business Services Office at jhurecruitment@jhu.edu. For TTY users, call via Maryland Relay or dial 711.

The following additional provisions may apply depending on which campus you will work. Your recruiter will advise accordingly.

During the Influenza (""the flu"") season, as a condition of employment, The Johns Hopkins Institutions require all employees who provide ongoing services to patients or work in patient care or clinical care areas to have an annual influenza vaccination or possess an approved medical or religious exception. Failure to meet this requirement may result in termination of employment.

The pre-employment physical for positions in clinical areas, laboratories, working with research subjects, or involving community contact requires documentation of immune status against Rubella (German measles), Rubeola (Measles), Mumps, Varicella (chickenpox), Hepatitis B and documentation of having received the Tdap (Tetanus, diphtheria, pertussis) vaccination. This may include documentation of having two (2) MMR vaccines; two (2) Varicella vaccines; or antibody status to these diseases from laboratory testing. Blood tests for immunities to these diseases are ordinarily included in the pre-employment physical exam except for those employees who provide results of blood tests or immunization documentation from their own health care providers. Any vaccinations required for these diseases will be given at no cost in our Occupational Health office.

Equal Opportunity Employer
Note: Job Postings are updated daily and remain online until filled.

EEO is the Law
Learn more:
https://www1.eeoc.gov/employers/upload/eeoc_self_print_poster.pdf

To apply, visit https://jobs.jhu.edu/job/Baltimore-Software-Engineer-MD-21205/673651000/

Copyright 2017 Jobelephant.com Inc. All rights reserved.

Posted by the FREE value-added recruitment advertising agency

jeid-1a2806c4be96754f90abc8aaf8d19e5e",4.2,"Johns Hopkins University
4.2","Baltimore, MD",-1,10000+ Employees,1876,College / University,Colleges & Universities,Education,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
51,Machine Learning Software Engineer – Training Frameworks,$90k-$151k (Glassdoor Est.),"Company:
Qualcomm Technologies, Inc.
Job Area:
Engineering Group, Engineering Group > Machine Learning Engineering
Job Overview:


Qualcomm is a company of inventors that unlocked 5G ushering in an age of rapid acceleration in connectivity and new possibilities that will transform industries, create jobs, and enrich lives. But this is just the beginning. It takes inventive minds with diverse skills, backgrounds, and cultures to transform 5Gs potential into world-changing technologies and products. This is the Invention Age - and this is where you come in.

AI is moving from cloud to the edge devices. QUALCOMM, as the world's leading mobile computing platform provider, is committed to enable the wide deployment of intelligent solutions on all possible devices. Be a part of our Deep Learning research project in Corporate R&D, where you will be involved and participate in building best-in-class solutions and tools needed to enable state-of-the-art technologies for next generation mobile/embedded machine learning platforms for smart phones, autonomous vehicles, robotics and IOT devices. In this role, you will work in a dynamic research environment, be part of a multi-disciplinary team of researchers and software developers, collaborate with internal teams, work with popular neural network frameworks, and understand the architecture of Qualcomms SOC compute and ML HW accelerators. You will design, develop & test software for machine learning frameworks that optimize models, training frameworks for distributed/federated learning, that enable models to run and learn efficiently run on edge devices. The successful applicant should have a strong software background, passion to work on neural network frameworks/libraries, and ability to lead teams in developing leading-edge software frameworks.

Minimum Qualifications
Bachelor's, Computer Engineering and/or Computer Science and/or Electrical Engineering
8+ years of Software Engineering experience.
Extensive programming experience using C/C++ & Python.
Hands-on experience with machine learning libraries such as TensorFlow, PyTorch.
Preferred Qualifications
Strong object oriented design and development skills.
Knowledge of neural networks, with hands-on experience using ML frameworks such as TensorFlow or PyTorch
Experience with enhancements to Training Frameworks and/or backends.
Experience developing CUDA kernels.
Knowledge of Convolutional Neural Networks (CNNs), RNN/LSTMs
Familiarity with any of the deep learning compiler frameworks TVM, Glow or XLA
Experience leading teams in developing software from inception to delivery
Experience with TDD development solutions like GoogleTest etc.
Experience with Source Code and Configuration management tools, such as Git
Strong debugging and analysis skills, for root causing complex issues
Experience developing embedded software, preferably on-device ML
Previous experience working in an Agile environment, and collaborating with multi-disciplinary teams
Applicants: If you are an individual with a disability and need an accommodation during the application/hiring process, please call Qualcomm’s toll-free number found here for assistance. Qualcomm will provide reasonable accommodations, upon request, to support individuals with disabilities to be able participate in the hiring process. Qualcomm is also committed to making our workplace accessible for individuals with disabilities. Qualcomm is an equal opportunity employer and supports workforce diversity.

To all Staffing and Recruiting Agencies: Our Careers Site is only for individuals seeking a job at Qualcomm. Staffing and recruiting agencies and individuals being represented by an agency are not authorized to use this site or to submit profiles, applications or resumes, and any such submissions will be considered unsolicited. Qualcomm does not accept unsolicited resumes or applications from agencies. Please do not forward resumes to our jobs alias, Qualcomm employees or any other company location. Qualcomm is not responsible for any fees related to unsolicited resumes/applications.

EEO Employer: Qualcomm is an equal opportunity employer; all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, Veteran status, or any other protected classification.",4.0,"Qualcomm Incorporated
4.0","San Diego, CA",-1,10000+ Employees,1985,Company - Public,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),-1
52,Outside Sales Engineer,-1,"Action Machinery is a leading distributor providing metalworking equipment and machine tools for manufacturers in the Rocky Mountain Region for 38 years. We are currently looking for an enthusiastic individual to join our team in the role of outside sales engineer.

Responsibilities:

Business development and account management

Grow sales to assigned accounts

Convert prospects into customers through business development

Specify and quote equipment based upon application and budget

Build and maintain key relationships at all levels in prospect and customer accounts

Work with builder representatives to develop opportunities and close sales

Required Skills/Experience:

3 years of CNC machine or other technical sales experience a plus

Bachelor’s degree in Engineering or Business with a strong mechanical aptitude (preferred)

Willing to train a recent Technical Graduate with aptitude to learn sales

Ability to gather information from customers, conduct needs analyses and recommend solutions

Great organization and prioritization skills

Strong work ethic and problem-solving skills

The ability to absorb product knowledge

Strong verbal and written communication skills

Valid driver's license and reliable transportation

Strong drive to achieve, integrity, and willingness to go above and beyond for customers

Compensation:

Base salary plus commission. Benefits include 401k, profit sharing, health insurance, paid holidays, and PTO. This is a career opportunity in which compensation has no limits and grows with experience.

Training and support is provided by a knowledgeable and experienced staff. If you are driven to achieve and are looking for the right team to enable you to reach your potential, please send us your resume for consideration.

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $75,000.00 - $150,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Retirement plan
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Supplemental Pay:
Commission pay
Paid Training:
Yes
This Job Is Ideal for Someone Who Is:
Dependable -- more reliable than spontaneous
People-oriented -- enjoys interacting with people and working on group projects
Adaptable/flexible -- enjoys doing work that requires frequent shifts in direction
Detail-oriented -- would rather focus on the details of work than the bigger picture
Achievement-oriented -- enjoys taking on challenges, even if they might fail
Autonomous/Independent -- enjoys working with little direction
Innovative -- prefers working in unconventional ways or on tasks that require creativity
Company's website:
https://www.action-machinery.com/
Benefit Conditions:
Waiting period may apply",-1,"Action Machinery Int'l, Inc.","Englewood, CO",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
53,Senior Data Scientist,$103k-$174k (Glassdoor Est.),"Crossix is a health-focused technology company dedicated to advancing healthcare marketing with analytics and innovative planning, targeting, measurement, and optimization solutions. Positioned at the center of big data, innovative technology, and multichannel media, Crossix, a Veeva Company, provides our clients with insights to help make strategic business decisions and drive improved patient outcomes. Crossix knows that our employees are integral to our success, which is why we have created an inclusive culture where everyone can thrive. Crossix is headquartered in midtown Manhattan with opportunities to work in our NYC office and other locations around the country. Along with competitive salaries and benefits, we invest in opportunities for professional development and career growth, and provide other amenities like a beautiful rooftop, team bonding activities, etc.

Crossix is seeking intellectually curious, resourceful, and collaborative Senior Data Scientists to join the Veeva Data Cloud team. This is an excellent opportunity to help us build the technology and data science products that power Veeva Data Cloud and be at the forefront of innovation in the healthcare technology space.

The team is guided by its core values as it works to solve the most challenging problems in healthcare data and analytics:

Singular Focus
Speed
Humility
Ownership
Challenge
What You'll Do
Apply machine learning, data mining, and statistical analysis techniques to large health data sets to build new products and methodologies
Own responsibilities related to project and people leadership, including leading data scientists and analysts
Collaborate closely with a team of data scientists, product managers, and executives to discover and deliver product offerings from prototype to massive scale
Explore and find meaning in high volumes of data to evaluate data quality and extract actionable insights that will help drive business decisions; execute data querying, data cleansing, and experiment design
Rapidly build prototype product solutions, communicate findings, and iterate
Draw from prior experience and technical expertise to identify product improvements and inform testing plans; break overall objectives down into underlying problems that can be prioritized and solved
Work with product and engineering teams to improve and implement methods and features
Master core parts of the Crossix technology platform. Technologies include Spark, SQL, Python, R, AWS, and proprietary data mining software
What You've Done
7+ years of hands-on data science experience, demonstrating increasing responsibility and impact over time, including experience leading projects
Advanced and in-depth knowledge and professional experience in machine learning and statistics
Highly proficient in Python and SQL; experience working with AWS preferred
Strong organizational, management and leadership skills
Strong communication skills and agility to work across internal teams
Who You Are
Have a desire and preference for working in a fast-paced, entrepreneurial environment
Enjoy having clear ownership of a goal even if the path to get there is not entirely clear
Have a curiosity to figure out new problems
Are humble and truly think about the success of the group before your own contribution
Are comfortable challenging existing norms, thinking and teammates, always doing so respectfully
Perks & Benefits
Flexible PTO
Allocations for continuous learning & development
Health & wellness programs
If this role and our exciting company culture seem appealing to you, please apply! We want to continue to grow our diverse team of hardworking and humble people who are passionate about their work. We hope that’s you!",3.3,"Crossix Solutions
3.3","New York, NY",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2005,Company - Public,Advertising & Marketing,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
54,Machine Learning Software Engineer – Model Optimization,$87k-$147k (Glassdoor Est.),"Company:
Qualcomm Technologies, Inc.
Job Area:
Engineering Group, Engineering Group > Machine Learning Engineering
Job Overview:


Qualcomm is a company of inventors that unlocked 5G ushering in an age of rapid acceleration in connectivity and new possibilities that will transform industries, create jobs, and enrich lives. But this is just the beginning. It takes inventive minds with diverse skills, backgrounds, and cultures to transform 5Gs potential into world-changing technologies and products. This is the Invention Age - and this is where you come in.

Artificial Intelligence is changing the world for the benefits of human beings and societies. QUALCOMM, as the world's leading mobile computing platform provider, is committed to deliver power-efficient cognitive computing technologies for enabling the wide deployment of intelligent solutions on all possible devices. Be a part of the R&D and Software team, you will be involved and participate in various development phases of the state-of-the-art technologies for next generation machine learning system. In this role you will design, develop & test software for machine learning frameworks that optimize models to run efficiently on edge devices. The candidate is expected to have strong interest and deep passion on making leading-edge \""deep learning\"" framework and algorithms working on mobile/embedded platforms for the benefit of end users.

Minimum Qualifications
Bachelor's, Computer Engineering and/or Computer Science and/or Electrical Engineering
Programming experience using C/C++ & Python.
Preferred Qualifications
Strong object oriented design and development skills.
Experience at both the firmware (RTOS) and system level (Linux) in SOC
Knowledge of neural networks, with hands-on experience using ML frameworks such as TensorFlow or PyTorch
Experience with enhancements to Training Frameworks and/or backends.
Experience developing CUDA kernels.
Knowledge of Convolutional Neural Networks (CNNs), RNN/LSTMs
Familiarity with any of the deep learning compiler frameworks TVM, Glow or XLA
Experience leading teams in developing software from inception to delivery
Experience with TDD development solutions like GoogleTest etc.
Experience with Source Code and Configuration management tools, such as Git
Strong debugging and analysis skills, for root causing complex issues
Experience of profiling software and optimization techniques
Good understanding of multi-dimensional data movements and processing
Experience developing embedded software, preferably on-device ML
Previous experience working in an Agile environment, and collaborating with multi-disciplinary teams
Applicants: If you are an individual with a disability and need an accommodation during the application/hiring process, please call Qualcomm’s toll-free number found here for assistance. Qualcomm will provide reasonable accommodations, upon request, to support individuals with disabilities to be able participate in the hiring process. Qualcomm is also committed to making our workplace accessible for individuals with disabilities. Qualcomm is an equal opportunity employer and supports workforce diversity.

To all Staffing and Recruiting Agencies: Our Careers Site is only for individuals seeking a job at Qualcomm. Staffing and recruiting agencies and individuals being represented by an agency are not authorized to use this site or to submit profiles, applications or resumes, and any such submissions will be considered unsolicited. Qualcomm does not accept unsolicited resumes or applications from agencies. Please do not forward resumes to our jobs alias, Qualcomm employees or any other company location. Qualcomm is not responsible for any fees related to unsolicited resumes/applications.

EEO Employer: Qualcomm is an equal opportunity employer; all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, Veteran status, or any other protected classification.",4.0,"Qualcomm Incorporated
4.0","San Diego, CA",-1,10000+ Employees,1985,Company - Public,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),-1
55,Solutions Engineer (US Remote),-1,"Company Description

Kinetica helps many of the world’s largest companies solve some of the world’s most complex problems, including Citibank, GSK, OVO, Softbank, and Telkomsel, among others. The Kinetica Streaming Data Warehouse combines historical and streaming data analysis with powerful location intelligence and AI in a single platform, all easily accessible via API and SQL, for instant results. Organizations across automotive, energy, telecommunications, retail, healthcare, financial services, and beyond can load and analyze their entire collection of data simultaneously, delivering instant insight. Kinetica has a rich partner ecosystem, including Dell, HP, IBM, NVIDIA, and Oracle, and is privately held, backed by leading global venture capital firms Canvas Ventures, Citi Ventures, GreatPoint Ventures, and Meritech Capital Partners.

For more information and to try Kinetica, visit kinetica.com or follow us on LinkedIn and Twitter.

Job Description

Solutions Engineers are responsible for articulating and demonstrating how Kinetica can solve the hardest analytics problems. Interfacing directly with customers they are the ambassadors for the company and the technology. The team is composed of data engineers, data scientists, and entrepreneurs. You will work closely with all aspects of product, delivery, and sales to play a pivotal role in winning new customers, growing existing accounts, and driving company growth. You will be a trusted advisor, product expert, and visionary to a variety of users across all verticals.

We are seeking a hands-on customer-facing and hands-on technical pre-sales engineer to lead the charge on the front lines of an exciting and disruptive, proven technology. Partner with Enterprise customers to help them power their businesses using data by designing, developing, and deploying Big Data, AI & Analytics solutions on the world's fastest GPU accelerated OLAP database.

Responsibilities:
Engage with sales prospects where you prepare and present Kinetica’s technology along with addressing any technical questions that come up during the sales cycle
Support the technical needs of existing customers including discovering additional use cases for Kinetica’s technology
Work closely with the product management and engineering team to align customer requirements to future versions and products
Have a deep understanding of Kinetica’s technology and a willingness to learn new technologies when needed
Qualifications
Technical Degree (i.e. Computer Science, Computer Engineering, Information Technology)
2+ years of pre-sales experience
Strong programming skills in any of the following languages: Java, Python, or C++
Experience with Linux and SQL skills are a mandatory requirement.
Have an understanding of Big Data, Data Warehouse, Data structures, Algorithms, and designing highly available systems. Ability to design & articulate enterprise architecture
Knowledgeable of and has a strong concept on databases, data warehousing, OLAP, data architecture, and data engineering
Has an exposure to or experience working with MPP database and big data system (Hadoop)
Knowledge of enterprise systems and protocols is a plus. Ex: LDAP, SSO, SSL, BI applications.
Experience with Machine Learning, Neural Networks is a plus
Knowledge in Geospatial formulas and techniques is a plus
Experience working in a start-up an environment
Travel (post-covid)
The ideal candidate could live within Midwest, Southeast, or the Northeast
Soft Skills:
Great communication skills (verbal and written)
High-energy self-starter with a passion for data, attention to detail, and ability to work in a fast-paced environment with limited direction
Additional Information

All your information will be kept confidential according to EEO guidelines.",3.5,"Kinetica DB
3.5","Chicago, IL",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2016,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
56,Engineer,$48k-$115k (Glassdoor Est.),"Are you interested in learning the mechanical and physical principles of machines? We have 57 different mechanical jobs for you to chose from. Pick what best fits you and your future plans

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $1,733.00 - $2,263.00 per month

Benefits:
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Employee assistance program
Flexible schedule
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Parental leave
Professional development assistance
Referral program
Relocation assistance
Retirement plan
Tuition reimbursement
Vision insurance
Schedule:
10 hour shift
8 hour shift
Monday to Friday
Supplemental Pay:
Signing bonus
Work Remotely:
No",3.9,"U.S. Army
3.9","Plymouth, MN",-1,10000+ Employees,1775,Government,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
57,Lead EH&S Engineer,$62k-$117k (Glassdoor Est.),"_Essential Duties and Responsibilities_*
Lead the development, implementation, and continuous refinement of SEL’s environmental, health, and safety (EH&S) programs to comply with federal, state, and local regulations.
Provide leadership and guidance to EH&S personnel.
Develop and participate in active hazard control and accident prevention programs. Investigate, prepare and review reports to identify root causes and recommend corrective actions.
Lead equipment safety design by working closely with manufacturing design engineering.
Perform EH&S review/approval as part of the Management of Change (MOC) process.
Conducts internal audits and compliance inspections and identifies actions necessary to meet regulatory and ISO 45001 standard requirements.
Develop training programs which encourage a safe and healthy work environment, and counsel all levels of management and employee owners on safety management programs and practices.
Prepare and communicate EH&S information to SEL employees.
Maintain current knowledge of current applicable regulations and pending legislation
Perform other duties as assigned
_Required Qualifications_*
Bachelor’s Degree in a EH&S related field or Engineering
Minimum of 10 years of EH&S related experience, including at least 5 years in a manufacturing environment.
Professional certification as a Certified Safety Professional (CSP), Certified Industrial Hygienist (CIH), or equivalent
Subject matter expert level knowledge in the following programs: General safety, machine guarding, lock out tag out, electrical safety, and chemical handling and storage
Proficient with Microsoft Office 365 applications
Superior organizational skills and high attention to detail
Excellent writing, grammar, and communication skills
Ability to work both independently and cooperatively within a team environment
Ability to multitask and adapt to changing priorities
Ability to learn and communicate technical/scientific information
Negative drug test result(s)
Background check results satisfactory to SEL
_Preferred Qualifications_*
2-3 years of EH&S experience in electronics manufacturing environment
ISO 45001 and/or 14001 internal auditor experience
Experience in radiation safety, robotics, confined space, and industrial hygiene
_Physical Requirements_*
Stand and walk for extended periods
_Location Information_*
Pullman, WA*- SEL’s corporate office is located in Eastern Washington where you'll enjoy an unmatched quality of life. Enjoy the smaller town life: country space, freedom from traffic, easy access to recreational activities in nearby mountains, rivers, and forests, as well as great schools and universities.
_An Award Winning Company_*
Schweitzer Engineering Laboratories, Inc. (SEL) has earned a reputation for quality, reliability, integrity, and service. This has enabled us to expand within both the electric utility and industrial markets in many different industries, markets, and geographies around the world.
_Communication with Applicants_*
SEL sends an initial e-mail response to all applicants at time of résumé or CV submittal. If you do not receive this communication, please check your SPAM filter and make sure your system is not blocking e-mails from SEL. It is important that you ensure your receipt of this e-mail as SEL may communicate future position updates via e-mail.

SEL is an Equal Opportunity Employer: M/F/Vets/Disabled.

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: Up to $1.00 per hour

Benefits:
401(k)
Dental insurance
Employee assistance program
Flexible spending account
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Parental leave
Retirement plan
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Company's website:
selinc.com
Work Remotely:
No",4.1,"Schweitzer Engineering Laboratories
4.1","Lewiston, ID",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1984,Company - Private,Electrical & Electronic Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
58,Data Scientist,-1,"About us

Boxy Charm was founded in 2013 and continues to be a leader in the beauty subscription box industry experiencing immense growth of more than 100% year over year. We work with some of the hottest brands including Butter London, Dr. Brandt, Elemis, GlamGlow, Smashbox, Tarte, Too Faced and many more.

Today, Boxy Charm has a community of more than 2.4 million followers across its social media platforms, 10 million monthly visitors online and is the #1 searched beauty box brand on YouTube. In 2018, Inc magazine named it as one of the fastest growing companies in the nation. Boxy Charm is headquartered in South Florida and has an office in Toronto, Canada.

About you

Boxy Charm is seeking a Data Scientist who will use a range of data science and machine learning methodologies to build solutions for a variety of business initiatives. Additionally, the ideal candidate will be able to solve complex problems and apply those solutions within a cutting-edge cloud-based technology platform.

The role will be filled with a solution-oriented candidate that thrives on working in a highly dynamic and engaging environment.

What you will be doing
Work closely with different business units and translate high level business problems into actionable deliverables for the Data & Algorithms team
Work with a wide variety of data ranging between social media and email to customer transactions and logistics
Develop a variety of machine learning models including customer recommendations, customer propensity, forecasting, and marketing performance.
Collaborate closely with the Software Development and DevOps teams to ensure continued delivery of high-quality data through our data processing pipeline
Partner with various business stakeholders and implement solutions that improve their business process
Conduct big data analysis using SQL, Python, Snowflake, Spark and other technologies
Break down complex projects and problems into actionable tasks that be delivered quickly and iteratively and provide value to the business stakeholders
Key Understandings
Customer lifetime value, regression analysis, cohorts, retention, customer lifecycle, customer segmentation, machine learning, large-scale data analysis, classification and propensity modeling
What you will bring to the table
Bachelor's degree or higher in Computer Science, Math, Statistics or a related field
3+ years of experience programming in languages such as Python, Java, Scala, Ruby, R
3+ years of experience working with SQL and relational databases
3+ years of experience with machine learning, statistical modeling, and data mining techniques
Experience with one or more machine learning algorithms such as neural networks, regression, clustering etc.
Working experience with machine learning technologies such as TensorFlow, Keras, ScikitLearn, H20.ai, MXNet, Caffe, Gluon etc. is highly desirable
Experience working in an Agile (SCRUM, XP etc.) development environment
Experience with AWS or other cloud environments is desirable
Knowledge of Big Data and NoSQL systems such as Snowflake, Hadoop, Spark, MongoDB, etc. is a plus",3.1,"Boxy Charm
3.1",United States,-1,51 to 200 Employees,2013,Company - Private,Beauty & Personal Accessories Stores,Retail,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
59,"CNC Programmer/Manufacturing Engineer - Machining, Mastercam, 5 axis",-1,"Job Description*
Fairlane was established over 50 years ago and manufactures a comprehensive line of workholding and machine components in Fraser, MI. Our machine shop consists of late model CNC production bar lathes, swiss lathes, mills, a 5-axis mill, assembly servo and hydraulic presses and other manual equipment.

We are currently seeking an applications expert to join company leadership in the position of CNC programming and machine process engineering. This position will be involved and lead various growth focused projects with new new products and new manufacturing capabilities.

The successful candidate will be an expert machinist able to program 3D and multi-axis tool paths in Mastercam. They will be able to conceptualize advanced concepts for program organization and develop strategies to accomplish company goals. A strong background in workholding and fixturing for machining centers will be critical. Proficiency with Solidworks CAD software is a big bonus.

While this individual will support CNC programming and machine setup/fixturing strategies throughout the shop floor, they will be the primary person responsible for all aspects of 5-axis milling on a new Doosan DVF-5000 w/ pallet changer.

This mill is supporting a new area of business dedicated to designing and manufacturing robot gripper fingers and other robotic end of arm tooling. Visit GripShape.com to learn more. Join a stable and growing business as we continue to serve customers in the market of industrial components and automation.

Full time is preferred, but we are open to a contract position for the right individual.

Full time employee benefits package including medical, dental, life, paid vacation, 401K with company match and bonus program. If you would like to learn more about this position, please respond with your resume. Thank you!

jgordon@ fairlaneproducts.com

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $80,000.00 - $100,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Disability insurance
Flexible spending account
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Vision insurance
Schedule:
10 hour shift
Experience:
CNC Programming: 8 years (Required)
Work Remotely:
No",-1,Fairlane Products,"Fraser, MI",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
60,Machine Learning Engineer,-1,"Responsibilities *
Develop features and models to improve the capabilities of systems that use machine learning.
Scale up models, build training datasets and tune parameters to improve system performance.
Build software that improves your rate of experimentation and helps you make better decisions about what to try next.
Build analysis tools and simulations to understand the performance of complex systems. - Conduct original research to solve hard problems applying machine learning in new areas - Work with the team to deploy models for a mission critical application.
Come up with Machine Learning roadmap and be responsible for its execution.
Improve current models
Integrate Machine Learning projects with Knightscope Security Operations Center (KSOC).
Provide technical guidance in Machine Learning experiments and projects.
Take end-to-end ownership of Machine Learning systems.
Identify new opportunities to apply Machine Learning to different parts of the Knightscope offering.
Stay up-to-date with new technology innovation. Introduce what would be beneficial for the Company to continue to be the market leader in security.
Qualifications *
PhD/MS/BS in Computer Science.
5+ years professional work experience with Machine Learning.
Deep understanding of the mathematical foundations of Machine Learning algorithms.
Demonstrated expertise of working hands-on in analyzing and modeling large data sets.
Ability to quickly prototype new ideas and use creative approaches to solve complex problems
Experience with cloud (Amazon AWS, MS Azure, etc.) as well as embedded environments (NVIDIA Jetson, Raspberry Pi, etc.).
Hands-on experience with deep learning frameworks: TensorFlow, Keras, Pytorch, Caffe, etc.
Experience with Machine learning libraries such as scikit-learn, numpy, scipy, pandas, PIL, OpenCL.
Python experience.
Ability to collaborate closely with cross functional teams
Excellent written and oral communication skills.
Self-motivated and self-starter
Bonus Points*
Experience in a startup environment
Location*
Remote Work-from-Home (in the U.S.) Flexibility Available
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex or national origin.

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $130,000.00 - $150,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
Dental insurance
Flexible schedule
Flexible spending account
Health insurance
Paid time off
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Experience:
Machine Learning: 5 years (Required)
Education:
Bachelor's (Preferred)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Application Question:
Do you require visa sponsorship to work in the U.S.?
Work Location:
One location
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",-1,"Knightscope, Inc.","Mountain View, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
61,Senior Software Engineer,-1,"Senior Software Engineer*
Are you obsessed with software and robotics? Looking to work with an awesome team in a modern, successful software company? Geisel Software, based in Worcester, Massachusetts, is a premier software developer that is working with and creating today's hottest software technologies. We are looking for a motivated individual to join our team, learn new technology, and help us build some great software!

Geisel Software develops web, mobile and embedded software, with a focus on robotics, medical devices, and machine learning. We seek a talented individual who is not afraid to work hard, learn something new and get lots of stuff done. We have a helpful staff, but it is also important that you can work independently and solve problems with little outside direction. Your problem-solving skills will be put to the test, whether that means tracking down the answer on Google, or building your own new solution.
Here's what we work with regularly*
Robotic Simulation with ROS, RVIZ, and Unreal Engine
Embedded Development in C/C++ (Arm or x86)
TensorFlow and OpenCV
LAMP - Linux, Apache, MySQL and PHP
iPhone/Android application development
Web Frontend (AngularJS, JavaScript, jQuery, Bootstrap, etc.)
Scripting Languages (Python, BASH, or other)
Web Technologies - HTML5, CSS3, XML, JSON
Linux - As a user at least, but also administration and kernel development
Web Frameworks - Django, Codeigniter
Agile and Waterfall design methodologies
Embedded platforms (Raspberry Pi, BeagleBone, OMAP, etc.)
Here’s what we require*
You're passionate about software development -- it's what you do even in your free time.
10+ years of experience with (C++) and (Python, or other modern scripting languages).
Must be a US Person.
Good software foundational skills: clean, well-documented code; collaborative style; solid algorithms understanding; CS theory; mastery of more than one language.
An aptitude for learning new platforms and technologies on the fly. We’re constantly working on new projects that will push you and keep you always learning new technologies.
Able to take ownership of a project and independently architect, execute and troubleshoot it through completion and customer delivery.
Actively pursuing new knowledge and technologies. If you’re a web frontend guru, are you building your backend skills? If you’re an embedded developer, are you developing apps for Android or iOS?
Already comfortable on Linux. You can be a Windows/Mac pro, but you'll be doing at least 50% of your development on Linux. You should be comfortable with that.
Willing to commute to Worcester, MA (Note: Ability to temporarily work remotely during this trying time of COVID-19).
Looking for full-time employment.
What you’ll get*
An opportunity to work with the latest technologies across a variety of platforms.
A fun, exciting work environment focused on the results, not the politics.
An experienced team and mentor who can help you grow in your craft and career.
A position with a growing company, offering competitive benefits and salary.
Apply now*
E-mail us at *jobs*@*geisel.software* and *include your resume and a brief cover letter* explaining why you think you'd be a great fit at Geisel Software. We'd love to hear about what you've done with technologies we're using, or other projects you've worked on. What do you think you’re really good at and why? What have you done outside your current job to improve your craft? Why do you think you’d be a great fit?

Job Type: Full-time

Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Application Question:
Will you now, or in the future, require sponsorship for employment visa status (e.g. H-1B visa status)?
Work Location:
One location
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",5.0,"Geisel Software
5.0","Worcester, MA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Unknown,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
62,Senior Machine Learning Engineer,Employer Provided Salary:$125k-$150k,"SkySync is a dynamic, fast-paced, venture-backed software innovator based in the Ann Arbor tech cluster, with remote Syncopaths in all US time zones. Our quirky and unique workforce excels at managing our customers’ content migration, synchronization, and orchestration challenges like no other in our space. We are poised for rapid growth and need a Machine Learning Engineer to contribute to building a large-scale machine learning, natural language processing (NLP) system and developing our understanding of the data we encounter. This role will be a cross between an ML/NLP researcher and a software engineer, and good candidates will have prior experience doing both. We are looking for someone from the southeastern Michigan area and preference will be given to candidates within this geographic location.

You’ll be doing a lot of this:
Rapidly iterating over different techniques in a solution space, and effectively analyzing the performance of models on various tasks
Contributing to several large-scale production machine learning and natural language processing efforts
Developing and building guidelines for evaluation datasets
Understanding the decision-making process, workflows, and business and information needs of business unit heads and service manager/owners
Translating business needs into analytics/reporting requirements to support executive decisions and workflows with required information
Visualizing information and developing engaging reports on the results of experiments
Advising product teams on new products, features or updates through evidence-based recommendations
Supporting user experience specialists and information architects to enhance information visualization through the development of dashboards and user interfaces
Distributing best practices to analytics and product teams and provides consultations for their data-based experimentations
Other duties as assigned
So you should have this:
Up-to-date knowledge of machine learning, natural language processing (NLP), and data analytics tools and techniques
Strong knowledge of Python, and related machine learning tools (e.g. TensorFlow, PyTorch)
Strong experience with Docker, AWS
Familiarity with current SOTA NLP models like BERT
4+ years of work experience with Python and machine learning
Willingness and ability to learn new technologies on the job
Demonstrated ability to communicate complex results to technical and non-technical audiences
Demonstrated ability to work with minimal supervision
Experience building and deploying predictive models, web scraping, and scalable data pipelines
Master’s degree or PhD in computer science, electrical engineering, computer engineering, statistics, or related fields preferred
Ability to think critically while solving problems in a rapidly changing product
Nice to have:
Publications from ML/NLP venues such as ACL, NAACL, EMNLP, NeurIPS, ICML, ICLR

This position is a great fit for you if you like keeping up with the cutting edge of machine learning and NLP and helping build a position and product from the ground up. Knowing how to engage with new challenges daily and handle competing priorities is a must.
This position is not a great fit for you if you like established processes for every situation or a static set of duties and responsibilities.

Qualities Needed for Success
Excellent listening, writing, and professional communication skills are a must. You should be able to demonstrate proficiency in most of the duties and responsibilities listed above. In our fast-paced world, a great attitude combined with enthusiasm is key to individual success along with embodying our entrepreneurial spirit.",5.0,"SkySync
5.0","Ann Arbor, MI",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2011,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
63,Distinguished Machine Learning Engineer,$166k-$280k (Glassdoor Est.),"About ForgeRock:

In today's highly connected digital world, understanding, managing and securing the identity of individuals and things is essential to safety and success of both businesses and their customers. Billions of people connect from anywhere, use a wide variety of devices and expect a seamless yet secure experience.

The ForgeRock mission is to provide the most simple and comprehensive Identity and Access Management Platform to help our customers deepen their relationships with their consumers and improve the productivity and connectivity of their employees and partners. Our identity solution enables great digital experiences and is embedded with a rich set of security, privacy and consent features. We deliver our platform through both cloud services and on-premises software.

Our customers are some of the biggest companies, organizations, and even countries in the world. On any given day, it's likely that the ForgeRock Identity Platform helped keep your data safe, gave you access to stuff, and supported trusted relationships between you, companies and the devices you were using.

ForgeRock is headquartered in San Francisco, but we are a global company with offices in the following cities: Vancouver, WA; Austin, TX; Munich, Germany; London & Bristol, UK; Grenoble & Paris, FR; Oslo, NO; Singapore and Sydney, Australia. Please read more about us at forgerock.com or follow ForgeRock on Twitter at http://www.twitter.com/forgerock.

The Role:

We are looking for a highly motivated,Principal Machine Learning Engineer to build out the next generation Identity platform. This role requires someone to develop the technology and platform for data processing, feature engineering and analysis to propel company transformation into a data insight driven organization. Work with peers in cloud engineering, SRE to drive data driven insight through the enterprise. Work on complex, high scale machine learning models in production and develop cutting edge algorithms that are deployed directly to customers in real-time. If you are self-driven, passionate about learning, work well in a collaborative environment and have effective communication skills, then we'd love to hear from you!

Responsibilities:
Provide architectural leadership; conduct regular reviews of project work and peer review.
Help in development and scaling of data pipelines, feature pipelines and data lakes to support large scale processing of millions of data events.
Develop an industry view of analytics and design-driven problem solving. Use academic and competitor research to understand recent advances and best practices and inform our approach to developing solutions.
Required Skills and Qualifications:
Masters or PhD degree in computer science, mathematics, statistics, physics, or related quantitative field
Ten years of progressive experience in a data engineering or quantitative role.
Business acumen to work with business partners and understand their domains, processes, and issues to identify strategies to optimize and innovate
Ability to leverage data visualizations to highlight insights to business partners and make a business case for a recommended action or innovation opportunity
Proficient in the language of statistics with an advanced understanding of mathematical statistics, including combinatorics, probability, common discrete and continuous distributions, univariate and multivariate distributions, conditional probability, random variables, expectation, variance, convergence, estimation (bias, MSE, consistency, sufficiency, maximum likelihood, moments, etc.), hypothesis testing, and confidence intervals.
Ability to collaborate effectively with Data Scientists, product management, engineering, UI/UX
Theoretical and practical understanding of a range of machine learning techniques including unsupervised learning (e.g. clustering, outlier detection, PCA, ICA, NNMF, SVD, etc.), supervised learning (e.g., regression techniques, naive bayes, support vector machines, LDA, decision trees, neural networks, etc.), reinforcement learning (e.g., Q-learning, neural networks, etc.), and meta-methods (e.g., boosting, bagging)
Written communication skills to engage partners, document methodology and results, and publish research
Organizational and project management skills for overall project planning and task management
Solid understanding of (1) data structures, (2) sequential algorithms, (3) distributed algorithms, (4) runtime and space complexity
Knowledge of information technology integration and deployment patterns to design and implement solutions
Advanced proficiency in one of the programming languages like Java, Scala or Python.
Advanced proficiency in data processing frameworks like Pandas.
Advanced proficiency in TensorFlow, Keras, Cloud based ML frameworks, external ML libraries and NLP libraries.
Nice to haves:
Project and/or program management experience.
Experience in representing company in International ML conferences.
Proficiency in cloud and ML deployment strategies.
Docker, Kubernetes and VM experience
Life at ForgeRock:

We believe in and facilitate a flexible, collaborative work environment. We've grown enormously, but remain true to the innovative, can-do startup values that got us here. Most important of all, we keep hiring talented, smart, fun, and genuinely nice people because that's who we want to succeed with every day. Below are just a few of the great things we have to offer at ForgeRock:
A great team of smart, fun and genuinely nice individuals.
Awesome company culture focused around providing a flexible and collaborative work environment
Regular office bonding events, from lunches and happy hours to group offsites and hack-days
Well-stocked fridges, whether you're hungry or thirsty
Competitive benefits and perks
We're Mac-friendly!
Generous employee referral bonus program
Amazing offices across the globe San Francisco HQ; Vancouver, WA; Austin, TX; Munich, Germany; London & Bristol, UK; Grenoble & Paris, FR; Oslo, NO; Singapore, Australia & counting!
ForgeRock is the collective sum of all our individual experiences, backgrounds and influences and we pride ourselves in growing and learning together. We are committed to building an inclusive and diverse environment where everyone's individuality is respected and everyone has an Identity. In recruiting for new colleagues, we welcome the unique contributions you can bring and encourage you to be your best self.

We are an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex including sexual orientation and gender identity, national origin, disability, protected Veteran Status, or any other characteristic protected by applicable federal, state, or local law.",4.2,"ForgeRock
4.2","Austin, TX",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2010,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
64,Artificial Intelligence/Machine Learning Data Scientist,$68k-$114k (Glassdoor Est.),"Why choose between doing meaningful work and having a fulfilling life? At MITRE, you can have both. That's because MITRE people are committed to tackling our nation's toughest challenges—and we're committed to the long-term well-being of our employees. MITRE is different from most technology companies. We are a not-for-profit corporation chartered to work for the public interest, with no commercial conflicts to influence what we do. The R&D centers we operate for the government create lasting impact in fields as diverse as cybersecurity, healthcare, aviation, defense, and enterprise transformation. We're making a difference every day—working for a safer, healthier, and more secure nation and world. Our workplace reflects our values. We offer competitive benefits, exceptional professional development opportunities, and a culture of innovation that embraces diversity, inclusion, flexibility, collaboration, and career growth. If this sounds like the choice you want to make, then choose MITRE—and make a difference with us.

The Aviation Safety & Analysis department is individuals with interest in applying their data science skills to deep and challenging problems in the aviation domain. We have a treasure trove of data including time series, text and sensor data and challenging problems to solve. We are seeking skills in machine learning, deep learning, text mining, big data and software/application development.

If Sklearn, pyTorch, Keras,TensorFlow, LSTM, LDA, anomaly detection, entity extraction, summarization mean something to you, we want to talk to you. You are not required to have skills in all of these but should have hands-on skill in at least one area and the ability to dive deep in the data, and learn the necessary skills to get the job done.

The candidate will work with the FAA and international customers, leveraging one of the largest repositories of aviation data to improve the capabilities, safety, and efficiency of the aviation system.

The candidate will be responsible for supporting a team of more senior AI/ML staff and Data Scientists in the following tasks:
Leveraging AI/ML techniques and solutions to identify complex patterns for predicting safety hazards
Increasing the efficiency and quality of the vulnerability discovery process by tightly integrating automated processes, AI/ML techniques and human SME/analyst expertise
Develop and prototype AI algorithms and software tools.
Enhance and maintain current analysis tools, including automation of current processes using AI/ML algorithms.
Conduct quantitative data analysis using a variety of datasets, including developing retrieval, processing, fusion, analysis, and visualization of various datasets
Develop techniques that make use of both digital flight data, text-based safety reporting, and a variety of other aviation data sets both in a silo and in a fused environment to identify potential safety vulnerabilities
Basic Qualifications:
Bachelor’s Degree in Computer Science, Mathematics, Statistics, Physics, Electrical Engineering, Computer Engineering or related fields
Hands-on Software Development Skills (Python-Preferred)
Experience or educational courses/projects in Machine Learning, and/or Text Mining Algorithms.
Ability to work closely with Domain experts to develop tools/algorithms needed to answer research questions in their studies
Excellent Communication Skills (with the abilty to explain developed tools and ML algorithms to a non-technical audience)
Ability to formulate operational problems in aviation domain as technical problems that allows for reuse of leading research in the area.
Proven ability to work independently to learn new technologies, techniques, processes, languages, platforms, systems
Strong analytic, inferencing, critical thinking, and creative problem-solving skills
Self-starter with ability to work both independently and with a team

Preferred Qualifications:
1 to 2 years of relevant experience
Experience with Deep Learning Frameworks such as Keras, Tensorflow, PyTorch,Mxnet etc. Ability to apply these frameworks to real problems in the ‘time -series’ domain
Experience with interpretability of deep learning models
Big Data Skills (Hadoop, Spark, recent deep learning platforms)
Visualizations/Web Development Skills (e.g. Tableau, MEAN stack - MongoDB, ExpressJS, AngularJS, NodeJS).
Practical experience with statistical analysis
Experience with text mining tools and techniques including in areas of summarization , search (e.g. ELK Stack) , entity extraction, training set generation (e.g. Snorkel) and anomaly detection
Expert software development skills lifecycle including developing and maintain good production quality code
MITRE is proud to be an equal opportunity employer. MITRE recruits, employs, trains, compensates, and promotes regardless of race, religion, color, national origin, gender, gender expression, sexual identity, disability, age, veteran status, and other protected status.

MITRE intends to maintain a website that is fully accessible to all individuals. If you are unable to search or apply for jobs and would like to request a reasonable accommodation for any part of MITRE’s employment process, please contact MITRE’s Recruiting Help Line at 703-983-8226 or email at recruitinghelp@mitre.org.

Copyright © 1997-2020, The MITRE Corporation. All rights reserved. MITRE is a registered trademark of The MITRE Corporation. Material on this site may be copied and distributed with permission only.",3.4,"MITRE
3.4","McLean, VA",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1958,Nonprofit Organization,Federal Agencies,Government,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
65,Software Engineer,$45k-$95k (Glassdoor Est.),"Position Overview:

This position is ideal for a data-focused engineer with a strong SQL, Spark, Python and ETL experience who is looking to work with massive amounts of data in a cutting-edge, cloud-based environment. You will be responsible for building new and innovative data solutions using technologies and tools from Apache and AWS, including Redshift, Spark, S3, and Airflow. These solutions allow the business to use data in impactful and meaningful ways to drive strategy and decision making.

Responsibilities:
Create data integration pipelines to extract, cleanse, and integrate data, from a variety of sources and formats, to support data analytics, data science, machine learning, and BI reporting
Design and develop scalable and re-usable solutions that support both real-time and/or batch-based data processing
Own the data expertise and data quality for the integration pipelines
Fulfill ad-hoc requests from business partners for data residing in AWS Redshift, and/or S3
Interact with business partners to lead technical solution discussions
Experience with Agile/Scrum methodology framework for product development
Required Skills:
2+ years of programming experience with Python or C#
Experience building Spark-based data pipelines using near/real-time data
2+ years of working experience with Amazon Web Services, specifically Redshift, S3, and EC2
Strong ANSI SQL, NoSQL and SparkSQL query language skills
Comfortable working in an entrepreneurial, start-up like environment
Strong problem-solving skills; collaborator and data advocate
Excellent written and oral communication skills & customer service skills
Bachelor's or Master's Degree in Computer Science, Engineering, Math, or other related discipline; or equivalent work experience
Desired Skills:
Minimum 2 years demonstrated, hands-on experience with the AWS ecosystem of tools and technologies
Experience with SSIS or equivalent ETL tool
Ability to build ETL pipelines from scratch, using streaming, near real-time, and micro-batch data
Experience with complex multi-server environments & high availability environments
Experience with system monitoring, log management, and error notification
Experience in Ad-Tech industry a plus
Applicants and employees for this position will not be sponsored for work authorization.
Apply now

Name

Email

Job Title

Resume

Cover Letter

Submit",3.7,"AdTheorent
3.7","Jacksonville, FL",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2011,Company - Private,Advertising & Marketing,Business Services,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
66,ENGINEER - RESEARCH ENGINEER - SIGINT SOLUTIONS,$58k-$84k (Glassdoor Est.),"Who We Are:


The SIGINT Solutions Department's mission is to support US Government, military, Intelligence Agencies, and US Allies in Research, Development, Design, Integration, Test, and Deployment of Signals Intelligence (SIGINT) and Specialized Communications Solutions.


Objectives of this Role:

Work with multidisciplinary team of engineers, software developers, and technicians in the execution of complex research and development, design and programs in support of national security.

Daily and Monthly Responsibilities:


Design, develop, integrate, test and deploy new signal processing capabilities in the areas of energy detection, channelization, signal recognition, signal demodulation/decoding & encoding/modulating, RF geolocation and electronic warfare and support programs
Work with a team of engineers, software development staff and technicians to create innovative solutions that include antenna arrays, RF processing hardware, and extensive software processing capabilities including application of machine learning techniques.
Collaborate with client technical representatives and SwRI senior engineering and software staff.
Work at SwRI laboratories and support short-term travel to government facilities/military bases or other customer facilities for system installations and to provide technical support within and outside the United States
Prepare technical documents and support proposal preparation as required.

Requirements:


Requires an Bachelors with a 3.00 GPA in Electrical Engineering or Computer Engineering
0-5 years with telecommunications and communications signal processing with understanding of radar system concepts and waveforms
Proficiency with Matlab, Linux and C/C++
Must be familiar with telecommunications and communications signal processing with understanding of radar system concepts and waveforms desired.
Experience with software defined radios and SDR frameworks like GNU radio and/or Redhawk/OSSIE is beneficial
Familiarity with GPU technology and the CUDA development environment and application of AI/ML to signal processing application is beneficial
A valid/clear driver's license is required


Special Requirements:


Applicant selected will be subject to a government security investigation and must meet eligibility requirements for access to classified information. Applicant must be a U.S. citizen.

Job Locations: San Antonio, Texas


For more information about this division, visit the Defense & Intelligence Solutions home page.

An Equal Employment Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer
Race/Color/Religion/Sex/Sexual Orientation/Gender Identity/National Origin/Disabled/Veteran
Committed to Diversity in the Workplace
If you need assistance, please Contact Us",4.0,"Southwest Research Institute
4.0","San Antonio, TX",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1947,Nonprofit Organization,Research & Development,Business Services,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
67,"RESEARCH ENGINEER - EARTH, OCEANS, & SPACE",$57k-$85k (Glassdoor Est.),"Who We Are:


With a focus on engineering and science flight projects, our staff explores new scientific challenges and develops innovative flight instruments to study problems in the areas of earth science, astrophysics, and heliophysics.


Objectives of this Role:

Design and analyze mass efficient structures and electronic packaging for extreme environment situations, materials quality, and mechanical integrity
Support various design reviews throughout product life cycle, including defending design and analytical work to customer, third party, and non-advocate reviewers

Daily and Monthly Responsibilities:


Supervise and coordinate fabrication of payload mechanical systems and subsystems. Develop and supervise environmental screening tests, development tests, and experiments
Produce high quality engineering documentation including drawings, specifications, test plans, procedures, and reports
Perform structural and thermal analyses of flight hardware
Field support may require travel to customer's facilities, NASA field centers, military bases, and overseas.

Requirements:


Requires an Bachelors with a 3.0 GPA in Mechanical Engineering or Aerospace Engineering
2 years of experience using computer aided design (CAD) software and standard office productivity software
Ability to productively interface with team members, suppliers and clients is a must. Experience with CREO (PRO/Engineer), structural analysis (e.g. ANSYS, NASTRAN), thermal analysis (e.g. Thermal Desktop), environmental testing methodology, mechanism design, material selection and characterization, electromechanical design, and/or space mission concept design
Experience with Thermal Analysis
A valid/clear driver's license is required


Special Requirements:


Work assignment is in Durham, New Hampshire. Applicant selected will be subject to a government security investigation and must meet eligibility requirements for access to classified information. Applicant must be a U.S. citizen.

Job Locations: Durham, New Hampshire


For more information about this division, visit the Space Science & Engineering home page.

An Equal Employment Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer
Race/Color/Religion/Sex/Sexual Orientation/Gender Identity/National Origin/Disabled/Veteran
Committed to Diversity in the Workplace
If you need assistance, please Contact Us",4.0,"Southwest Research Institute
4.0","New Durham, NH",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1947,Nonprofit Organization,Research & Development,Business Services,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
68,Software Engineer,$66k-$110k (Employer Est.),"COMPANY SUMMARY

Since 1992, Kingland's managed solutions have helped data-intensive, highly-regulated clients connect and protect their businesses. Kingland develops and manages enterprise-class software solutions using its Kingland Platform and teams of data and technology experts. Clients in the banking and capital markets, public accounting, insurance, and retail industries look to Kingland to create solutions to manage data, risk, compliance, customer insight and more. The Kingland Platform is a highly secure, cloud-optimized software platform that includes enterprise data management, text analytics, artificial intelligence and machine learning, and workflow and compliance management capabilities.

Kingland is unique. While we are based in Iowa, our clients are not. We are an Iowa company with a significant global reach. We provide our employees with the opportunity to ""live locally and work globally"", combining the Iowa quality of life that we all love, with exciting opportunities to travel the world and work on large projects for large clients.

Kingland is growing. Were looking for individuals who like to tackle big challenges, want to work on mission-critical solutions, as well as desire to make a difference in the world and be rewarded for their efforts. Explore all the ways that quality of work meets quality of life at Kingland, and launch yourself on an exciting new adventure.

POSITION SUMMARY

Java. Spring. Angular. Python. PostgreSQL. AI tech. AWS. These are just a few of the technologies you'll use as a Kingland Software Engineer. Work with clients to better understand their complex and challenging problems. Design solutions using relational and columnar data stores, microservices and cloud architectures, text analytics, and more. Your work will help reinvent the way companies manage risk, compliance, and data.

If you're curious about how technology should work and enjoy solving problems, this is the right space for you. Use your creativity, share your point of view with clients and colleagues, and have enough grit to see the project to its end. It's like a puzzle. You know there are multiple ways to solve it. Every tool will be at your disposal. And you'll be able to test your ideas with experienced professionals in the organization.

MAJOR RESPONSIBILITIES AND DUTIES
Develop highly secure, performant and maintainable code based on software designs for Kingland Platform solutions
Leverage automated build and deploy processes to create and execute integration tests
Identify, fix and communicate defects throughout the software engineering process
Collaborate with teammates and clients, from requirements review and design to implementation, testing, deployment and triage
Grow into a role with responsibilities for creating innovative software designs and accompanying prototypes for Kingland Platform solution requirements, enabling further implementation
POSITION REQUIREMENTS
Bachelors degree and requisite experience in Computer Science, Software Engineering or Computer Engineering is required
BENEFITS
Included in the Kingland Career Development Program a guided program consisting of targeted learning opportunities and mentorship to assist you in career growth, personal development and opportunity for promotion and advancement at Kingland Systems.
Generous vacation and paid holidays
401(k) company match
8 hours of paid volunteer time annually
3 weeks paid parental leave after the birth or adoption of a child
Wellness reimbursement for gym memberships, equipment, and apparel
Access to free on-site fitness center in Clear Lake location
Company match of up to $1,000 annually for charitable donations
Free on-site covered parking
Access to company dining facility in Clear Lake location",3.8,"Kingland Systems
3.8","Clear Lake, IA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1992,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
69,Machine Learning Compiler Engineer,$87k-$147k (Glassdoor Est.),"Company:
Qualcomm Technologies, Inc.
Job Area:
Engineering Group, Engineering Group > Machine Learning Engineering
Job Overview:


Qualcomm is a company of inventors that unlocked 5G ushering in an age of rapid acceleration in connectivity and new possibilities that will transform industries, create jobs, and enrich lives. But this is just the beginning. It takes inventive minds with diverse skills, backgrounds, and cultures to transform 5Gs potential into world-changing technologies and products. This is the Invention Age - and this is where you come in.

Qualcomm is a company of inventors that unlocked 5G - ushering in an age of rapid acceleration in connectivity and new possibilities that will transform industries, create jobs, and enrich lives. But this is just the beginning. It takes inventive minds with diverse skills, backgrounds, and cultures to transform 5G’s potential into world-changing technologies and products. This is the Invention Age - and this is where you come in. Qualcomm is utilizing its traditional strengths in digital wireless technologies to play a central role in the evolution of automotive infotainment and autonomous driving. We are investing in several supporting technologies including 4G, 5G, ADAS, and Deep Learning.

The Qualcomm CR&D team is developing hardware and software solutions for the Qualcomm ADAS system. We are seeking ambitious, bright and innovative engineers with experience in software system design, autonomy, device functional safety concepts and implementations.

Job activities span the whole product life cycle from early R&D to commercial deployment. The environment is fast-paced and requires cross-functional interaction on a daily basis so good communication, planning and execution skills are a must.

We are looking to staff engineers at multiple levels in systems & software, integration and test. Details of one of the roles we are looking to staff are listed below.

Specific Responsibilities
Research, design, develop, enhance, and implement the different components of machine learning compiler based on performance and code-size needs of the customer workloads and benchmarks.
Analyze software requirements, determine the feasibility of design within the given constraints, consult with architecture and HW engineers, and implement software solutions best suited for Qualcomm's SOCs.
Analyze and identify system level integration issues, interface with the software development, integration and test teams.
We are looking for engineers with the following skills:
LLVM or any industrial strength compiler development experience is a plus.
Knowledge of the structure and function of the compiler internals.
Hands-on experience with DSP Kernels a plus
Hands-on Experience in C/C++, Python development (3+ years)
Hands-on Experience with Object Orientated Design, TDD development solutions such as GoogleTest etc. (2+ years)
Experience with Source Code and Configuration management tools, git knowledge is required
Willingness to work in a cohesive software development environment with ability to work on low level implementation (code & test) and interfacing with hardware and simulators
Experience in machine learning frameworks and neural network architectures + ML compiler workload synthesis, a plus
Prior working experience of hardware accelerators and hardware software co-design
Experience in using C++ 14/17 (advanced features)
Experience at both the firmware (RTOS) and system level (Linux) in SOC
Experience of profiling software and optimization techniques
Passion to drive to develop leading-edge \""deep learning\"" framework and algorithms working on mobile and embedded platforms.
Applicants: If you are an individual with a disability and need an accommodation during the application/hiring process, please call Qualcomm’s toll-free number found here for assistance. Qualcomm will provide reasonable accommodations, upon request, to support individuals with disabilities to be able participate in the hiring process. Qualcomm is also committed to making our workplace accessible for individuals with disabilities. Qualcomm is an equal opportunity employer and supports workforce diversity.

To all Staffing and Recruiting Agencies: Our Careers Site is only for individuals seeking a job at Qualcomm. Staffing and recruiting agencies and individuals being represented by an agency are not authorized to use this site or to submit profiles, applications or resumes, and any such submissions will be considered unsolicited. Qualcomm does not accept unsolicited resumes or applications from agencies. Please do not forward resumes to our jobs alias, Qualcomm employees or any other company location. Qualcomm is not responsible for any fees related to unsolicited resumes/applications.

EEO Employer: Qualcomm is an equal opportunity employer; all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, Veteran status, or any other protected classification.",4.0,"Qualcomm Incorporated
4.0","San Diego, CA",-1,10000+ Employees,1985,Company - Public,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),-1
70,Sr. Data Scientist,$99k-$159k (Glassdoor Est.),"Search by Keyword
More Options

Search by Location

Clear

Loading...

Department

All

State

All

×

Send me alerts every days
alert frequency in every certain days
Create Alert

form.emailsubscribe-form {
display: none;
}
×

Send me alerts every days
alert frequency in every certain days

Share this Job

AddThis
Email
Facebook
Twitter
LinkedIn
Pinterest

Apply now »



Sr. Data Scientist

Date:

Sep 18, 2020

Location:

Danvers, MA, US

#job-location.job-location-inline {
display: inline;
}

Abiomed is a pioneer and global leader in healthcare technology and innovation, with a mission of Recovering Hearts & Saving Lives. With corporate headquarters in Danvers, Massachusetts, offices in Aachen & Berlin, Germany and Tokyo, Japan, Abiomed’s 1,400 employees form one of the fastest growing medical device companies in the world. We attract and retain exceptional talent with our collaborative culture, passion for our work, and a strong commitment to employee professional development.

Patients First | Innovation | Winning Culture | Heart Recovery

The Abiomed Applied Research group is a team of scientists and engineers building a new generation of Impella “Smart Pump” devices. We are currently hiring a Data Scientist to contribute to the design and implementation of advanced analytics and innovative machine learning algorithms that guide treatment decisions and improve patient outcomes. These algorithms will play a central role in the pursuit of Abiomed’s mission of recovering hearts and saving lives. We are looking for a creative self-starter who thrives in a continuously-growing data environment and enjoys a fast-paced, dynamic research group. If this sounds like you, please read on:

Responsibilities
Responsible for end-to-end development of analytics queries and machine learning algorithms
Design new statistical and physiological features for time-series data
Evaluate algorithm performance in offline (in silico) and live (in vitro, in vivo) environments
Collaborate with software teams to implement algorithms in cloud or on embedded hardware
Maintain concise descriptions of algorithm design specifications and performance evaluations
Perform variability analyses for model optimization
Quantitatively and qualitatively evaluate new ML/AI techniques and integrate into algorithm design
Communicate algorithm designs and performance results to cross-functional stakeholders
Attend scientific conferences and act as a data science ambassador for the organization
Required Education & Experience
Advanced Degree in Computer Science, Data Science, or directly-related discipline required; PhD strongly preferred
5+ years Data Science experience involving the development of time-series and real-time data analysis
Advanced analytics (e.g. descriptive, diagnostic, predictive, prescriptive) and
Data visualization
Machine learning techniques (e.g. classification, regression, clustering, sequence generation, forecasting, reinforcement learning, Markov modeling, or Bayesian statistics)
Python proficiency.
Experience w/one or more development package (Sklearn, Keras/Tensorflow, PyTorch, or Theano)
Expertise with advanced SQL queries (integrating multiple disparate data sources)
Distributed computing tools (e.g., Hadoop or Spark)
Willingness to travel 5-10% of the time (meet customers to gather user needs and assess product performance, attend scientific conferences)
Preferred: APIs & cloud computing platforms experience (e.g., Microsoft Azure or AWS)
Preferred: Embedded software experience (C/C++ or equivalent)
Preferred: Medical devices and / or electronic health record data experience
General Requirements
Superb communication and collaboration skills – comfortable operating within and outside a core team and presenting progress to company leadership
Demonstrated excellence of analytical thinking in one or more technical fields
Self-motivated and good team player
Willing to learn and explore new technologies
Abiomed is an Equal Opportunity Employer committed to a diverse workforce. Abiomed will not discriminate against any worker or job applicant on the basis of race, color, religion, gender, gender identity, national origin, ancestry, age, sexual orientation, gender identity, marital or civil partnership status, pregnancy, gender reassignment, non-job related mental or physical disability, genetic information, veteran status, military service, application for military service, or membership in any other category protected under law.

Nearest Major Market: Boston

Apply now »

Find similar jobs:
Engineering & R&D

Apply now »



Sr. Data Scientist

Date:

Sep 18, 2020

Location:

Danvers, MA, US

#job-location.job-location-inline {
display: inline;
}

Abiomed is a pioneer and global leader in healthcare technology and innovation, with a mission of Recovering Hearts & Saving Lives. With corporate headquarters in Danvers, Massachusetts, offices in Aachen & Berlin, Germany and Tokyo, Japan, Abiomed’s 1,400 employees form one of the fastest growing medical device companies in the world. We attract and retain exceptional talent with our collaborative culture, passion for our work, and a strong commitment to employee professional development.

Patients First | Innovation | Winning Culture | Heart Recovery

The Abiomed Applied Research group is a team of scientists and engineers building a new generation of Impella “Smart Pump” devices. We are currently hiring a Data Scientist to contribute to the design and implementation of advanced analytics and innovative machine learning algorithms that guide treatment decisions and improve patient outcomes. These algorithms will play a central role in the pursuit of Abiomed’s mission of recovering hearts and saving lives. We are looking for a creative self-starter who thrives in a continuously-growing data environment and enjoys a fast-paced, dynamic research group. If this sounds like you, please read on:

Responsibilities
Responsible for end-to-end development of analytics queries and machine learning algorithms
Design new statistical and physiological features for time-series data
Evaluate algorithm performance in offline (in silico) and live (in vitro, in vivo) environments
Collaborate with software teams to implement algorithms in cloud or on embedded hardware
Maintain concise descriptions of algorithm design specifications and performance evaluations
Perform variability analyses for model optimization
Quantitatively and qualitatively evaluate new ML/AI techniques and integrate into algorithm design
Communicate algorithm designs and performance results to cross-functional stakeholders
Attend scientific conferences and act as a data science ambassador for the organization
Required Education & Experience
Advanced Degree in Computer Science, Data Science, or directly-related discipline required; PhD strongly preferred
5+ years Data Science experience involving the development of time-series and real-time data analysis
Advanced analytics (e.g. descriptive, diagnostic, predictive, prescriptive) and
Data visualization
Machine learning techniques (e.g. classification, regression, clustering, sequence generation, forecasting, reinforcement learning, Markov modeling, or Bayesian statistics)
Python proficiency.
Experience w/one or more development package (Sklearn, Keras/Tensorflow, PyTorch, or Theano)
Expertise with advanced SQL queries (integrating multiple disparate data sources)
Distributed computing tools (e.g., Hadoop or Spark)
Willingness to travel 5-10% of the time (meet customers to gather user needs and assess product performance, attend scientific conferences)
Preferred: APIs & cloud computing platforms experience (e.g., Microsoft Azure or AWS)
Preferred: Embedded software experience (C/C++ or equivalent)
Preferred: Medical devices and / or electronic health record data experience
General Requirements
Superb communication and collaboration skills – comfortable operating within and outside a core team and presenting progress to company leadership
Demonstrated excellence of analytical thinking in one or more technical fields
Self-motivated and good team player
Willing to learn and explore new technologies
Abiomed is an Equal Opportunity Employer committed to a diverse workforce. Abiomed will not discriminate against any worker or job applicant on the basis of race, color, religion, gender, gender identity, national origin, ancestry, age, sexual orientation, gender identity, marital or civil partnership status, pregnancy, gender reassignment, non-job related mental or physical disability, genetic information, veteran status, military service, application for military service, or membership in any other category protected under law.

Nearest Major Market: Boston

Apply now »",3.7,"ABIOMED
3.7","Danvers, MA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1981,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
71,Data Scientist,$94k-$154k (Glassdoor Est.),"Tinder brings people together. With tens of millions of users and a presence in every country on earth, our reach is expansive and rapidly growing. Tinder’s Analytics Team is looking for a Data Scientist with expertise in Analytics.

Our analytics team takes ownership of the decisions being made from our data – we develop a deep understanding of both the business and its data and establish close working relationships with all teams - including Product, Marketing, Engineering, and Finance – so that we can provide recommendations and make proposals regarding prioritization of initiatives, product launches, A/B tests, and company performance.

As a data scientist in this role, you will be a partner to the Analytics team, providing support for A/B test design and analysis as well as data-driven insights through ad-hoc analyses, presentations, and automated reports and dashboards. This role will require extensive experience with SQL, data wrangling, statistics, and A/B testing as well as the ability to work in cross-functional teams to drive actionable insights. Experience with user growth and acquisition across consumer products is a plus.

Responsibilities:

Master and own the analytical understanding of customer behavior and business performance
Build models to better understand the value and churn behavior of our users
Find the “story” in the data and communicate insights and opportunities with executive and other internal teams
Perform ongoing ad-hoc analyses to evaluate the efficiency of our marketing spend, building reporting infrastructure, and assisting in making budgeting recommendations to optimize growth
Integrate captured event data with other sources of customer data, such as surveys, ad publishers and app store data
Support reporting and business intelligence needs of the entire Marketing team

Skills Required:

3+ years of relevant experience
Ability to think objectively and interpret meaningful themes from quantitative and qualitative data
Ability to build constructive and effective relationships with a broad and diverse group of business partners
Ability to execute on complex analytics projects where you have to determine salient questions in a complex ecosystem and present action-oriented conclusions
Proficiency with SQL required
Scripting skills, preferably in Python. Strong Python/NumPy/PANDAS skills a plus
Knowledge of statistics, specifically experimental design and analysis
Proficiency in Microsoft Excel and Microsoft PowerPoint
Familiarity with common KPIs, metrics, and growth experiments
As part of our team, you’ll enjoy:

· The hustle of a startup with the impact of a global business
· Tremendous opportunity to seek some of the industry’s most exciting problems
· Working with an outstanding team of creative, fun and highly motivated people
· Comprehensive health coverage, competitive salary, and 401(k) match

At Tinder, we don’t just accept difference — we celebrate it, we support it, and we thrive on it for the benefit of our employees, our products, and our community. Tinder is proud to be an equal opportunity workplace.",3.8,"Tinder
3.8","Los Angeles, CA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2012,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
72,Senior Engineer - Industry 4.0,$54k-$107k (Glassdoor Est.),"Friday, October 30, 2020


Watlow Profile: The world’s leading companies start with Watlow for their thermal solutions. Watlow®, a privately-owned company, is the industry leader in the design, manufacture and integration of complete thermal systems including electric heaters, temperature sensors, temperature controllers, power controllers and supporting software. At Watlow, we are constantly driven to do more to help our customers. We take on big technical challenges. We are committed to projects that help our fellow human beings and we strive to learn more. From single components to high performance systems, we bring our thermal expertise to numerous applications, including semiconductor processing, energy processes, diesel, foodservice equipment, life sciences and others.

Overview of Role

The Sr. Engineer will be responsible for applying expertise in data science and analytics to improve the customer’s thermal system performance, focused on integration into Industry 4.0 technologies. The Sr. Engineer will actively collaborate with customers and Watlow’s internal subject matter experts while expanding Watlow’s technical expertise in successful deployment of advanced alarming algorithms. The role will be located in St. Louis, Missouri at Watlow’s Global headquarters and Advanced Technology Center.

Key Responsibilities:
Developing insights related to innovative new business initiatives
Collaboration with teams to support proper data collection
Meet with customers to determine what information is the most important to them
Develop analytical capabilities (e.g. models and processes) that drive better outcomes for both customers and the company
Mentor and coach more junior team members in developing data flow and analytic capabilities
Cleaning raw data and general pre-processing (generating features)
Developing solutions to visualize data and drive decisions to improve overall system performance
Build, test, and deploy predictive models and/or machine learning algorithms on large static and/or streaming data sets in IoT enabled devices
Identify customer value creation opportunities as outputs of the data analysis
Learn & stay current on Internet of Things (IOT) developments, news, opportunities, and challenges


Qualifications:

Must have:
Bachelor’s degree in computer science, computer engineering or a relevant technical degree
Minimum experience of 5 years’ experience in related data science, analytics, and model building roles
Additional success factors:
Experiences in Industry 4.0 transformation either as internal or customer facing
Experience in defining and implementing data acquisition for diagnostics/prognostics across all stages of the value chain
Natural curiosity and a strong passion for empirical research and problem solving
Strong written and verbal communications skills; comfortable communicating with senior levels of both business and technology leadership
Analytics Experience:
Understanding of data collection and model building processes
A strong understanding of data profiling and data cleansing techniques
Experience working with large complex data sets, real time/near real time analytics, and distributed big data platforms
Experience working with databases
Practical knowledge of analytical techniques and methodologies such as machine learning/supervised and unsupervised techniques, regression modeling, neural networks, data mining and optimization techniques
Experience with one or more of the following programming languages and their associated statistical analysis packages: Python (SciPy/sklearn), R, MatLab (statistics toolbox), or SAS
Connectivity/Data Flow Experience:
IOT Communication protocols knowledge
Familiarity with Cloud based HaaS/PaaS solutions such as AWS, MS Azure.
Proficiency with querying SQL Server databases
Creation of efficient IoT data system architectures and modeling of data flows to enable smart systems initiatives

Watlow is Equal Employment Opportunity Employer including Protected Veterans and
Individuals with Disabilities

Other details
Pay Type
Salary",3.4,"Watlow Electric Manufacturing
3.4","Saint Louis, MO",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1922,Company - Private,Metal & Mineral Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
73,Principal R&D Software Engineer,$77k-$153k (Glassdoor Est.),"Purpose and Passion • Comprehensive Benefits • Life-Work Integration • Community • Career Growth

At Boston Scientific, you will find a collaborative culture driven by a passion for innovation that keeps us connected on the most essential level. With determination, imagination and a deep caring for human life, we’re solving some of the most important healthcare industry challenges. Together, we’re one global team committed to making a difference in people’s lives around the world. This is a place where you can find a career with meaningful purpose—improving lives through your life’s work.

Headline: Pushing the boundaries of what's possible gives my work purpose.

About the role:

Our Research and Development team is all about building the future of the operating room and office for urology patients and clinicians. As a Principal R&D Software Engineer, you'll be at the heart of that mission, developing best-in-class capital systems and software as part of our comprehensive portfolio of solutions. In return for your unique combination of big-picture perspective, ability to execute rigorously, and strong desire to win in the marketplace you'll be a trusted leader collaborating with some of most dynamic minds in the business. All in an environment that encourages people to take measured risks, learn from mistakes, and push the boundaries of engineering.

Key responsibilities:
Leading software architecture, implementation, integration, and testing for complex, connected electronic medical equipment (“capital”) systems and systems-of-systems.
Establishing best-practices for medical device software development and recruitment within the growing business franchise.
Producing maintainable code and technical documentation.
Collaborating with cross-functional and cross-divisional experts in a wide range of fields to solve complex engineering and business challenges.
Translating highly technical results into easily understood recommendations that will influence senior stakeholders.
Managing third party designers, vendors, and contractors to deliver high quality engineering solutions at an accelerated pace.
What we’re looking for in you
10+ years software development in lead roles, preferably in medical devices or a regulated industry with a proven track record of deployment in commercial products.
B.S. in Computer Science or equivalent with appropriate experience (Computer Engineering, Electrical Engineering, Computer Science, etc.). Masters preferred.
Experience defining and implementing APIs and communication protocols for control and operation of instrumentation.
Multithreaded application development that includes testing and debugging C/C++ on Linux.
Experience working within an Agile software development environment.
Experience in modern Source Code Management (SCM) tools such as git or AccuRev.
Experience in Continuous Integration/Continuous Deployment (CI/CD) software practice in a regulated environment.
Experience working within a quality system, IEC and ISO standards relevant to medical device software lifecycle and risk management (i.e. IEC 62304).
Experience with filesystems, concurrency, multithreading, server architectures, and distributed systems (e.g. AWS, IoT).
Experience with network protocols (TCP, UDP, TLS/SSL, HTTP) and web services (e.g. REST).
Working knowledge of software security and data privacy best practices and risk management.
Passion for understanding and solving problems for end users, with an ability to translate into software requirements, design, and test specifications.
Passion for developing talent, mentoring, and building high-performance teams.
Track record of strong cross-functional collaboration, influence without authority, and project management enabling highly effective project teams.
Proven self-starter who runs towards critical issues, ambiguous requirements, or loosely defined challenges with a demonstrated ability to rally teams to achieve business results.
Comfortable debugging complex integrated systems spanning hardware, embedded and application software in medical devices.
Familiarity with deployment of AI models using platforms such as Amazon Sagemaker, Google Cloud AI Platform, or Azure Machine learning studio a plus.
Familiarity with application of data engineering, data science, and database management a plus.
Familiarity with computer vision toolkits (e.g. OpenCV) a plus.
Experience in algorithm development and deployment using hardware specific hardware platforms such as GPU-accelerated programming, FPGAs, or microcontrollers a plus.
Travel: 10%
About us

As a global medical technology leader for more than 35 years, our mission at Boston Scientific (NYSE: BSX) is to transform lives through innovative medical solutions that improve the health of patients. If you’re looking to truly make a difference to people both around the world and around the corner, there’s no better place to make it happen.

Boston Scientific is an Equal Opportunity Employer – Race, Color, Religion, Sex, Sexual Orientation, Gender Identity, National Origin, Disability, Veteran

Boston Scientific maintains a drug-free workplace. Pursuant to Va. Code § 2.2-4312 (2000), Boston Scientific is providing notification that the unlawful manufacture, sale, distribution, dispensation, possession, or use of a controlled substance or marijuana is prohibited in the workplace and that violations will result in disciplinary action up to and including termination.",4.4,"Boston Scientific
4.4","Marlborough, MA",-1,10000+ Employees,1979,Company - Public,Health Care Products Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$10+ billion (USD),-1
74,Associate Machine Learning Engineer,$78k-$136k (Glassdoor Est.),"Why choose between doing meaningful work and having a fulfilling life? At MITRE, you can have both. That's because MITRE people are committed to tackling our nation's toughest challenges—and we're committed to the long-term well-being of our employees. MITRE is different from most technology companies. We are a not-for-profit corporation chartered to work for the public interest, with no commercial conflicts to influence what we do. The R&D centers we operate for the government create lasting impact in fields as diverse as cybersecurity, healthcare, aviation, defense, and enterprise transformation. We're making a difference every day—working for a safer, healthier, and more secure nation and world. Our workplace reflects our values. We offer competitive benefits, exceptional professional development opportunities, and a culture of innovation that embraces diversity, inclusion, flexibility, collaboration, and career growth. If this sounds like the choice you want to make, then choose MITRE—and make a difference with us.

MITRE is seeking recent college graduates and M.S. recipients in technical disciplines who are strongly motivated to contribute directly to solving real defense and intelligence challenges by providing ""game-changing"" operational solutions for our government sponsors. These individuals will join a team that is developing state-of-the-art algorithms to automatically analyze and identify key attributes from a wide variety of data sources. As part of the Advanced ISR Solutions team, you will work closely with domain experts and have access to cutting edge hardware to analyze large datasets, create new analytical tools, and address problems of critical national importance. This is an excellent opportunity to be part of an ambitious team committed to strong collaboration and intellectual rigor.

Responsibilities include:
Keep current with computer vision and machine learning research to replicate and baseline new techniques published in academia
Run experiments comparing state-of-the-art methods with a strong focus on performance when these methods are applied to sponsor driven data and real-world conditions
Adapt research done in academia and industry to our sponsors’ uniquely challenging data sources and problems sets
Develop prototype software to demonstrate feasibility of the algorithm/approach to our sponsors
Code in MATLAB, Python, or other scripting languages for prototyping/testing algorithms and software tools in a team environment
Analyzing data from cutting-edge sensor systems including video, infrared, hyperspectral, and others
Brainstorming/problem solving with experienced technical staff to develop solutions for challenging problems and working with small teams to implement those solutions
Developing front-end interface software for web applications or mobile devices
Possess demonstrated ability to provide deliverables or parts of deliverables to customer
Minimum Qualifications:
Bachelor's Degree in Electrical, Computer or Systems Engineering or related field
1+ years of relevant experience
Required Qualifications:
Must be a U.S. citizen with the ability to possess/maintain a DoD clearance
Proficiency in use of Microsoft Office including Outlook, Excel, and Word
Must have demonstrated proficiency and strength in verbal, written, PC, presentation, and communications skills
Strong problem-solving skills and capable of working with scientists, analysts, and technical software developers
Strong software development skills, preferably with knowledge of machine learning and/or deep learning frameworks
Domain knowledge of machine learning and computer vision techniques for classification, detection, and key attribute extraction
Practical experience in statistics and knowledge of big data biases
Preferred Qualifications:
Advanced degree in technical field of study
Candidates that possess a current/active DoD clearance are preferred
MITRE is proud to be an equal opportunity employer. MITRE recruits, employs, trains, compensates, and promotes regardless of race, religion, color, national origin, gender, gender expression, sexual identity, disability, age, veteran status, and other protected status.

MITRE intends to maintain a website that is fully accessible to all individuals. If you are unable to search or apply for jobs and would like to request a reasonable accommodation for any part of MITRE’s employment process, please contact MITRE’s Recruiting Help Line at 703-983-8226 or email at recruitinghelp@mitre.org.

Copyright © 1997-2020, The MITRE Corporation. All rights reserved. MITRE is a registered trademark of The MITRE Corporation. Material on this site may be copied and distributed with permission only.",3.4,"MITRE
3.4","McLean, VA",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1958,Nonprofit Organization,Federal Agencies,Government,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
75,Senior Manufacturing System Analyst/Engineer,$45k-$85k (Glassdoor Est.),"Description
The Manufacturing Systems Analyst works with project teams to design and implement end-to-end solutions to meet our clients’ business goals, initiatives, and needs. This role will work closely with the cross functional competency leaders to help drive value into our client’s business model. The Senior MSS Analyst must have the capability to achieve a high level of technical expertise for all of the products and services offered. The MSS Analyst will be focused on the design and delivery of end-to-end solutions.
Our clients are beginning the transition from the 3rd Industrial Revolution and embarking on the journey to adopt the technologies, systems, and solutions required of the 4th Industrial Revolution. Therefore, our Manufacturing Systems Analyst must possess the drive to master the IIoT (Industrial Internet of Things), the data required and the analytics thereof to drive change.
Responsibilities
Define functional requirements and documentation analysis and develop detailed designs that meet operations requirements.
Develop Manufacturing Execution Systems / Manufacturing Operations Management (MES/MOM) system architectures design and documentation
Design and Develop MES/MOM applications including process graphics, trending, alarm event displays, scripting, user-defined attributes, user management, etc.
Design and develop reports using SQL Server Reporting Services, Wonderware Information Server, FactoryTalk VantagePoint, and other reporting tools.
Design and Develop system management utilities to backup, configuration synchronization, data loading and archiving, etc.
Design and Develop custom applications and interfaces to ERP business systems and manufacturing systems
Design and Develop solutions for clients related to System Predictability and Data Analytics.
Enhance existing MES/MOM systems at client sites to drive operational improvements
Analyze manufacturing needs and convert them into deliverable solutions
Requirements
At least 5 years of Manufacturing Systems development and commissioning experience
Application development experience with MES software stacks from vendors like AVEVA MES, Ignition, TrakSYS, FactoryTalk EMI, or GE Proficy is preferred.
Excellent communication, creative, critical thinking, problem-solving, planning, prioritization, project management, teamwork and organization skills
Strong skills with databases are required.
Must be legally eligible to work in the United States without sponsorship
Must possess a valid driver's license
Must be able to travel up to 25%, both locally and overnight
Preferred
Bachelors of Science Degree in Computer Science, Computer Engineering Technology and/or Electrical Engineering Technology or related field from an ABET accredited college or university.
Experience designing and deploying operations on cloud platforms (AWS, GCP, Azure).
Experience with use of DevOps and experience with all elements of the software development life cycle in on-Premisis and cloud-based environments.
Skills with one or more of the following programming languages: C++, C#, ASP, VB.NET, Java.
Application development in .NET and Web-based environments
OSI/PI or other factory historian experience
Experience with a variety of machine learning, AI and machine predictability solutions (such as Predix).
Physical Requirements
While performing the duties of this job, the employee is occasionally required to stand, walk, sit, use hands to finger, handle, or feel objects, tools or controls; reach with hands and arms; talk, and hear.
Specific vision abilities by the job include close vision, distance vision, color vision, peripheral vision, depth perception, and ability to adjust focus.
This position must also be able to perform industrial field work which may include hazardous locations, ladders, and stairs.

At Matrix Technologies, our core values define our culture and we live out those values in everything we do. We call this “The Matrix Way.” We strive for a culture that promotes teamwork and collaboration, engagement, and talent development. Our culture reflects what the modern workforce wants and inspires our employees to perform their best. We support our employee’s personal goals and interests with flexible work schedules and options for increased paid time off. This focus on the employee experience is why we have been named a Top Work Place by the Toledo Blade. To ensure we are providing our customers with the best solutions from the industry’s leading experts, we encourage our employees to grow professionally by offering technical and leadership training, tuition reimbursement, memberships to professional societies, and diverse experiences.
Since 1980, Matrix Technologies, Inc. and our professional team of engineering and automation experts have been the leading single source for any process, facility, or automation engineering need. We only hire the best which allows us to provide our customers with “A Better Process for Success”. Our talented staff and processes have also earned us a spot in the Control Engineering System Integrator Hall of Fame.
Matrix Technologies is a versatile, platform-independent, full-service resource for process design, automation and information system engineering. We have a commitment to our clients and it shows with 87% of our projects being repeat engagements from satisfied customers. Matrix Technologies has expertise in oil & gas, chemical, food & beverage, consumer packaged goods, pharmaceutical/biotech, aggregates, discrete manufacturing, automotive, glass, and metals.
Come see what “The Matrix Way” is all about!",4.0,"Matrix Technologies, Inc.
4.0","Maumee, OH",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1980,Company - Private,Architectural & Engineering Services,Business Services,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
76,Data Scientist,$89k-$153k (Glassdoor Est.),"The Data Scientist will be joining a team of extremely passionate data scientists, product managers, and engineerswho share a common interest in tackling some of the most difficult data science and machine learning problems today. With the data products you design, 7Park will arm influential decision-makers at financial and corporate giants with critical information they need to make smart, data-driven decisions. Our technologies and data power the insights for financial services and corporations.

The compensation package includes a competitive salary and incentive structure, generous benefits, and valuable business experiences, challenges, and excitement of contributing to the success of a fast-growing technology startup.

As Data Scientists at 7Park Data, we design and build data products that provide rich intelligence on real-time economic activity for our financial and corporate clients. To do that, we research and develop machine learning systems to extract decision-ready insight from massive volumes of structured and unstructured data.

Responsibilities:
Building, testing and maintaining all the components of 7Park Data’s product pipelines:
o Developing the transformation and enrichment logic that prepares messy, incomplete and inconsistent data for analysis

o Applying statistical modelling techniques to produce signals and packaging them in a client-consumable output
Work with 7Park Product and Commercial teams to understand business requirements, and their context, then translate them to a technical plan of action.
Evaluate new vendor data as part of our data acquisition process, form opinions on its future business value and the likelihood of success, and ultimately communicate findings to stakeholders at all levels of seniority
Collaborate with our Financial Research team to investigate hypotheses, produce commentaries and analyses on market trends, as well as refining new and existing products
Work with Product Managers at a strategic level to plan product roadmaps, recommend new products or enhancements, as well as estimating and prioritizing work. Ensure alignment of day-to-day activity with the overall product strategy
Develop systems to monitor the analytical quality of production models to discover anomalies, following through to investigation and resolution
Create technical documentation for both internal and external technical audiences, as well as contributing to client-facing content for non-technical audiences
Requirements:
3 – 5 years of relevant professional experience in an autonomous data analytics or data science role
Master’s degree or PhD in computer science, mathematics, statistics, physics, computational finance, or a similar quantitative field (or relevant work experience)
Knowledge of statistics, computer science and machine learning
Strong programming skills in Python (highly preferred), R, and/or Scala
Strong proficiency with Pandas and Scikit-Learn
Experience with building distributed data pipelines using PySpark
Experience with several of the following concepts: decision trees, random forests, gradient boosting; linear regression; logistic regression; dimensionality reduction using PCA and clustering
Comfortable with general SDLC concepts and processes
Results-driven attitude with a strong desire to build data products and achieve results that matter- for us and for our clients. We come to play and play to win.
Deeply held conviction for the power of data, with high analytical standards and surgical attention to detail
Fearlessness in the pursuit of process improvement, implementation, and change
Flexibility and willingness to adapt to the changing demands of a fast-paced startup environment
Solutions oriented approach and multi-dimensional problem solving
Highly self-motivated and results oriented, proven track record of exceeding goals
Commitment to success and willingness to put forth the effort to achieve it
Strong written and verbal English communication skills – ability to communicate complex ideas simply and accurately to technical and non-technical audiences",4.0,"7Park Data
4.0","New York, NY",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2012,Company - Private,Research & Development,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
77,Multi Skilled Maintenance Engineer,$42k-$85k (Glassdoor Est.),"Employment Type: * Full-Time
Job location: *Akron, OH
Job Description: *
C&W Services are looking for talented Service Technicians - level I, II, and III. As one of our specialists you will learn new skills as you support the Operations Maintenance team in repairing and maintaining material handling equipment and pneumatic systems, and have the opportunity to install, maintain and repair automated packaging and distribution equipment. At C&W we are committed to improvement, and you will be encouraged to participate in on-going development opportunities to progress and enhance your career.
Benefits: *
Whether you’re a Service Technician I, II, or III, we offer a great range of benefits from day 1:

• Healthcare

• Weekly pay

• 401K Plan

• Paid Time off; 10 Vacation days per year, national holidays, and up to 48 PTO hours per year

• Career advancement opportunities

• On-going training in a cutting-edge facility

• Safety first culture
Essential Experience & Qualifications: *
• High school diploma or equivalent.

• 1+ years of experience in basic preventive/predictive maintenance, troubleshooting skills and repair methods of industrial machines.

• 1+ years of experience in Mechanical and/or Electrical basic components.

• 1 + years of experience with compressors and pneumatics.
Preferred Qualifications: *
• 1+ years of experience using power tools to include saws and drills with proper safety precautions.

• Experience with Microsoft Office suite and OS.

• Experience with basic metal and wood fabrication, including saws and drills.

• Basic understanding of a Computerized Maintenance Management System (CMMS).
Physical Requirements: *
• Vision (Near, Distance)

• Lift and move totes up to 49 pounds each

• Regular bending, lifting, stretching and reaching both below the waist and above the head

• Occasionally push and pull wheeled dollies loaded with products up to 100 pounds during site visits

• Engage in full manual dexterity in both hands and wrists

• Walking in the FC and around area with great frequency; facilities are over a quarter mile in length

• Ability to climb ladders and gangways safely and without limitation

• Ability to work in construction /distribution environments that may be noisy, unlit, unheated, not air-conditioned

• Continual standing and/or walking an average of 5 miles daily

• Able to access all areas of building (ascending and descending ladders, stairs, etc.)
Day to day responsibilities of these roles include, but are not limited to: *
· Promoting a safe working environment by following all safety procedures.

· Completing preventative maintenance routines with proper documentation.

· Provide feedback on tasks in the Preventive Maintenance programs (level II only)
Develop Preventive Maintenance programs (level III only)
· Use of appropriate tooling to troubleshoot simple AC/DC circuits

· Troubleshooting of material handling equipment (MHE), and repairs to miscellaneous Operational equipment as needed.

· Maintaining positive working relationships across all of the Operations facility.

· Tracking and storing department inventory.

· Train and mentor Service Technicians (level II and III only)
About C&W Services: *
A leader in facilities services with over 65 years of experience. C&W Services is one of the largest facility services companies in the USA & Canada with a 65-year history of helping clients drive down operating expenses, increase facility efficiency and up-time, enable strategic business decisions and create positive experiences for the people who work, shop, learn, live and play in the facilities we maintain. We’re building the best team in the industry – our people are the heart and vitality of C&W Services. In joining C&W Services, you’re joining a firm with a rich history, blue-chip client list, and the backing of sister company Cushman & Wakefield, one of the world’s largest property advisory firms and the reason for our success is simple: talented people.

Our success is due to a supportive and friendly culture that fosters collaboration. Find out more today: https://careers.cushmanwakefield.com/cwservices/global/en

Learn why C&W Services is an ideal place for veterans to continue their careers: https://cwservices.com/veterans/

C&W Services is an Equal Opportunity / Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, sexual orientation, gender identity, protected veteran status or any other characteristic protected by law.

Electromechanics, Electromechanical Assembly, Electrical Schematics, Industrial Electrical Equipment, Wiring, Conveyor Material Handling, Industrial Equipment, Component Repair, Component Troubleshooting, PLC, Mechanical Maintenance, Industrial Maintenance, Rigging, Troubleshooting, Wood Manufacturing, Power Tools, Electricity, Predictive Maintenance, Preventive Maintenance

ID: C&WPA

Job Type: Full-time

Salary: $0.00 per year

Work Remotely:
No",3.7,"Cushman & Wakefield
3.7","Akron, OH",-1,10000+ Employees,1917,Company - Public,Real Estate,Real Estate,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
78,Plastics Process Engineer,$42k-$76k (Glassdoor Est.),"Scope of the Role: *
This position is responsible for design and manufacture of profile extrusion tooling and the development of custom plastic extrusion processes with the objective of improving total quality, material usage and productivity. This position will work closely with the Pexco Engineer Manager, Manufacturing, QC, Materials, and Sales teams to provide leadership, support and training to achieve these common team objectives.
Duties and Responsibilities: *
Take ownership of new projects from start to finish. This includes communicating with internal stakeholders to develop quotation. Understanding of different plastic resins and processing is a must. Must be able to identify the feasibility of the project and research equipment necessary.

Design tooling and develop processes for mono and co-extrusion plastic profiles, tubes and secondary fabrication individually or with other process engineers.

Lead new tooling development process for the project assigned using hands-on approach to meet customer expectation with quality and on time delivery of samples

Coordinate the tooling needs for new products with Die Development, technicians, Engineer Manager and other involved in producing first article samples.

Oversee the tool making activities in the machine shop, ensuring that the tools produced by the machine shop can meet the design criteria and are up to the company’s high standard for design and workmanship.

Support other department and Pexco sites in their tooling needs. Actively seek ways to improvise process efficiencies by way of redevelopment in the shortest possible lead time and most effective design.

Troubleshoot process difficulties on daily basis and support production. Work with Engineer Manager to coordinate a timely response to the need for rebuilding tooling or handling other special tooling needs that cannot be planned for in advance.

Work on continual improvement projects to improve efficiencies and reduce scrap.
Other key elements: *
Follow and support plant and corporate safety policies and initiatives.
Plans, develops and coordinates tool development trials.
Maintain engineering database and documentation as required.
Perform other accountabilities as assigned.
Education, Experience, and Skills required: *
BS in Engineering, 3-5 years of plastics manufacturing experience a plus. Plastic Extrusion die design and process development is a must.

2 years minimum experience in a beginning supervisory position a plus

Ability to read and interpret technical drawings and specifications

Must be HANDS-ON and be willing to work on the floor.

Must working knowledge with a CAD system, CAD/CAM software and Microsoft office

Must have very good technical understanding of plastic extrusion process, terminology and extrusion tooling.

Understanding of plastic materials and ability to research materials.

Understand customer requirements and application.

Demonstrated experience managing multiple projects and attention to detail.

Task oriented, Strong analytical skills and well organized.

Strong interpersonal, excellent oral and written communication skills with the ability to effectively communicate with all levels of the Organization.

Aptitude to learn and be a strong team player.
Key Skills and Attributes: *
Must be HANDS-ON and be willing to work on the floor
Working knowledge of plastic extrusion process, terminology and extrusion tooling
Understand customer requirements and application
Demonstrated experience managing multiple projects and attention to detail
Task oriented, Strong analytical skills and well organized
Strong interpersonal, excellent oral and written communication skills with the ability to effectively communicate with all levels of the Organization
Aptitude to learn and be a strong team player
Job Type: Full-time

Pay: Up to $34.00 per hour

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Retirement plan
Tuition reimbursement
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Experience:
Plastics Extrusion: 3 years (Preferred)
Work authorization:
United States (Preferred)
Company's website:
www.pexco.com
Benefit Conditions:
Waiting period may apply
Work Remotely:
No",3.2,"Pexco, LLC
3.2","Athol, MA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1998,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Industrial Manufacturing,Manufacturing,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
79,Civil Engineer,$44k-$87k (Glassdoor Est.),"We are looking to hire for the position of *Civil Engineer* for our client in the Canonsburg PA area. This position is contract with the possibility to go direct.

The ideal candidate will perform the civil/structural design of foundation and steel structures supporting the equipment used in hot and cold steel rolling mills, processing lines, casting, and steel making plants. He/she will work with the mechanical equipment general arrangements to verify equipment interfacing, and then complete any structural steel platforms and civil foundations required to support the equipment. He/she will interface with various other engineering disciplines, to include fluids, electrical and mechanical engineers.

The ideal candidate has:

• Civil/Structural Engineering degree required

• Calculations of live and dead loads on concrete and steel structures related to various mechanical machines and systems

• Proficient in AutoCAD 2D, SolidEdge 3D experience, a plus

• Must be self-motivated, accurate, maintain a tight schedule

• Excellent interpersonal communication skills

• Ability to travel to sit to obtain “as-built” information on retrofit projects and assist external design teams, if required

Candidate must be authorized to work in the United States without sponsorship.

Please apply to connect to one of our technical recruiters and to learn more about this great opportunity!

Job Types: Full-time, Contract

Benefits:
Dental insurance
Health insurance
Schedule:
8 hour shift
Experience:
AutoCAD 2D, SolidEdge 3D: 2 years (Preferred)
Education:
Bachelor's (Required)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Contract Length:
Varies
Contract Renewal:
Likely
Company's website:
www.partnersalliance.com
Company's Facebook page:
https://www.facebook.com/thepartnersalliance
Work Remotely:
No",3.9,"The Partners Alliance
3.9","Canonsburg, PA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,-1,Company - Public,Mining,Mining & Metals,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
80,Machine Learning Software Engineer – Qualcomm AI Research,$87k-$147k (Glassdoor Est.),"Company:
Qualcomm Technologies, Inc.
Job Area:
Engineering Group, Engineering Group > Machine Learning Engineering
Job Overview:


Qualcomm is a company of inventors that unlocked 5G ushering in an age of rapid acceleration in connectivity and new possibilities that will transform industries, create jobs, and enrich lives. But this is just the beginning. It takes inventive minds with diverse skills, backgrounds, and cultures to transform 5Gs potential into world-changing technologies and products. This is the Invention Age - and this is where you come in.

Artificial Intelligence is changing the world for the benefit of human beings and societies. AI is moving from cloud to the edge devices. QUALCOMM, as the world's leading mobile computing platform provider, is committed to enable the wide deployment of intelligent solutions on all possible devices. Be a part of our Deep Learning research project in Corporate R&D, where you will be involved and participate in building best-in-class solutions and tools needed to enable state-of-the-art technologies for next generation mobile/embedded machine learning platforms for smart phones, autonomous vehicles, robotics and IOT devices. In this role, you will work in a dynamic research environment, be part of a multi-disciplinary team of researchers and software developers, collaborate with internal teams, work with popular neural network frameworks, and understand the architecture of Qualcomm’s SOC compute and ML HW accelerators. You will design, develop & test software for machine learning tools and frameworks that enable making models smaller and run efficiently on all edge devices. The successful applicant should have a strong software background, and passion to work on neural network frameworks/libraries.

We are looking for motivated engineers at various levels who possess experience in some of the areas below:
Extensive programming in Python, C/C++
Object-oriented software design and development
Experience in debugging complex software issues
Knowledge of neural networks, with hands-on experience using ML frameworks such as TensorFlow or PyTorch
Knowledge of Convolutional Neural Networks (CNNs), RNN/LSTMs
Familiarity with any of the deep learning compiler frameworks TVM, Glow or XLA
Experience with compiler frameworks such as LLVM or GCC
Knowledge Qualcomm Hexagon DSP is a plus
Experience developing embedded software, preferably on-device ML
Experience with CI/CD tools like Jenkins, Docker, and Cloud technologies
Previous experience working on machine learning data pipelines
Previous experience working in an Agile environment, and collaborating with multi-disciplinary teams
Applicants: If you are an individual with a disability and need an accommodation during the application/hiring process, please call Qualcomm’s toll-free number found here for assistance. Qualcomm will provide reasonable accommodations, upon request, to support individuals with disabilities to be able participate in the hiring process. Qualcomm is also committed to making our workplace accessible for individuals with disabilities. Qualcomm is an equal opportunity employer and supports workforce diversity.

To all Staffing and Recruiting Agencies: Our Careers Site is only for individuals seeking a job at Qualcomm. Staffing and recruiting agencies and individuals being represented by an agency are not authorized to use this site or to submit profiles, applications or resumes, and any such submissions will be considered unsolicited. Qualcomm does not accept unsolicited resumes or applications from agencies. Please do not forward resumes to our jobs alias, Qualcomm employees or any other company location. Qualcomm is not responsible for any fees related to unsolicited resumes/applications.

EEO Employer: Qualcomm is an equal opportunity employer; all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, Veteran status, or any other protected classification.",4.0,"Qualcomm Incorporated
4.0","San Diego, CA",-1,10000+ Employees,1985,Company - Public,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),-1
81,Analytic Software Engineer - TS/SCI w/FSP Required,-1,"Job Description:
Join our team of talented engineers in the Fort Meade area supporting critical national security programs. As an analytic software engineer, youll work closely with mission SMEs to develop niche analytics for the Intelligence Community. These may be batch analytics that operate over large volumes of data at-rest, or they may be streaming analytics that operate over smaller volumes of data in-motion. When operational, your analytics will support Phoenixs core mission of Arming the Analyst.

This position will support multiple programs and is open to both mid-level and senior candidates. A typical day includes engineering activities across a mid-sized team, exploring mission data sets, working with mission SMEs to understand tradecraft, and developing analytics to support that tradecraft. All development will be conducted within an Agile process using standard Scrum practices (daily stands-ups, sprint planning, sprint demos/retrospectives).

*** Top Secret SCI Clearance with Full-Scope Polygraph Required ***

Technical Skills Required
5+ years of experience in Java software development
3+ years of experience with distributed technologies such as Hadoop, Spark and Kafka
3+ years of experience implementing RESTful web services
3+ years of experience processing XML and JSON data formats
3+ years of experience using Git, JUnit, Maven and Jenkins
3+years of experience developing software in a Linux environment
3+ years of experience supporting Defense or Intelligence programs
Technical Skill Preferred
Experience developing analytics with MapReduce, Spark or similar technologies
Experience with distributed databases such as Accumulo or HBase
Experience working in an Agile environment using Jira and Confluence
Basic understanding of Python or Scala
Basic Machine Learning algorithms & techniques
Benefits Offered:
Medical, Dental, Vision Insurance - 100% Company Paid Premiums
STD, LTD, and Life Insurance - 100% Company paid
401K Automatic 10% company contribution; no matching required
PTO - 4 weeks/year
Holidays - 10 paid/year
Birthdays off with pay
Company laptop built to your specification
Referral Bonuses Upfront AND Annually Recurring
Open Source Bonuses Contribute to our GitHub projects
Professional Development Paid training, Certifications and Enrichment
ABOUT PHOENIX OPERATIONS GROUP:
Phoenix Operations Group is an engineering services company that protects US Warfighters and supports US Intelligence efforts. As a small business operating in the Baltimore & DC areas, we rely on innovation to continually advance our employees' skills and provide game-changing solutions to our customers.

Phoenix specializes in inter-agency functionality that connects our federal, military and commercial clients with shared mission solutions. We do this with Big Data technologies, Machine Learning techniques, Cloud-Hosted platforms, and enterprise architectures.

Our team is geographically dispersed across the country. Thus, we rely on innovative techniques to advance our employees' skills and promote company culture:
We incentivize employees to participate in our Open-Source GitHub projects
We incentivize and support employees in writing whitepapers for the community
We invest in research and development (R&D) to expand our mission capabilities
We promote technical discussion across Slack, Google Meet and Social Media platforms
With these innovations, Phoenix provides a dynamic and inclusive environment for our employees. Please visit us at https://www.phoenix-opsgroup.com/ for more information.

Phoenix Operations Group is an Equal Opportunity Employer. Phoenix Operations Group does not discriminate on the basis of race, religion, color, sex, gender, gender identity, sexual orientation, age, non-disqualifying physical or mental disability, national origin, veteran status or any other basis covered by appropriate law. All employment is decided on the basis of qualifications, merit, and business need.",5.0,"Phoenix Operations Group
5.0","Annapolis Junction, MD",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2011,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1
82,Data Scientist,$100k-$167k (Glassdoor Est.),"Join our team dedicated to developing and executing innovative solutions in support of customer mission success.

Serves as a Data Scientist for cybersecurity in support of a major federal client. This organization provides services that analyze and produce enhanced cyber security and threat intelligence information to include threats and potential threats to the customer's personnel, information, and information systems; provides timely and relevant intelligence to assist with mitigating cyber threats confronting the Department; supports evaluation, implementation, and operations of tools/technologies used in advanced data analysis. The Data Scientist will support the customer's overall cyber threat analysis efforts. The Data Scientist is responsible for applying advanced analytics and data science techniques, including predictive modeling, anomaly detection, user profiling and segmentation, text analytics, big data analytics, and visualization in solving cybersecurity problems or helping others to automate their research and analysis.

Key Personality traits that will do well in this environment:
You're determined and inquisitive by nature. You can see the big picture and drill down to the details; you can ask creative questions of the data; and your curiosity drives you mad until you can put together a coherent story out of the puzzle pieces in front of you.
You can work independently, generate creative solutions to new problems, and take responsibility for projects from start to finish.
You enjoy collaboration and sharing information with other highly technical people.
You're a visual thinker, who quickly sees patterns and seeks the best ways to visualize them to tell a story with data.

Environment you will work in:
The intersection of cybersecurity and data. No better place to be.
Highly technical and fast paced environment.
Split of remote and on-site work / no travel.

Required background:
Bachelor's degree in computer science, information systems, cybersecurity, or other related technical discipline, plus 5 years of experience in technical data analysis with increasing responsibilities.
Alternatively, a Master's degree with 3 years of experience.
Active Secret clearance or ability to obtain a Secret clearance.

Required knowledge / skills:

Strong working knowledge of advanced analytic techniques, including statistical analysis and supervised / unsupervised machine learning algorithms.
Demonstrated expertise with data science software and tools, such as Python/Pandas/Scikit- learn, Rapidminer, or similar.
Experience with Microsoft Azure cloud platform and Azure machine learning tools.
Experience with data cleaning and preparation using real-world data sets.
Experience with visualization and dashboard techniques and tools, such as Power BI, Tableau, or similar.
Experience deploying and maintaining data science systems in production.
Knowledge of computer networking concepts and protocols (e.g., Transmission Control Protocol [TCP] and Internet Protocol [IP], Open System Interconnection Model [OSI], Domain Name System [DNS]), and network security principles.
Knowledge of cybersecurity and cyber defense principles (e.g. cyber threats and vulnerabilities, adversarial tactics, cyber attack stages).
Highly self-motivated and capable of completing ad hoc and time-sensitive assignments.
Strong analytical skills and the ability to effectively research, write, communicate and brief to
varying levels of audiences to include at the executive level.
Ability to manage analytic projects from start through completion, including problem definition,
data extract-transform-load, data exploration, algorithm selection, training and testing,
operational deployment, documentation, and maintenance.

Highly desired skills:
Master's degree in computer science, information systems, cybersecurity, or other related technical discipline.
Three years of experience in intelligence or technical analysis with a focus on cyber threat analysis and threat modeling, to include preparing and presenting results.
Experience in natural language processing.
Experience with structured and unstructured databases and tools, such as SQL, Oracle, MongoDB, or similar.
Experience in Splunk or similar log storage/retrieval systems.
Experience with command-line scripting languages such as PowerShell.
Experience with O365 / Azure cloud environment.
Previous experience working within cross functional and interdisciplinary project teams.
Proven experience effectively prioritizing workload to meet deadlines and work objectives
Active TS/SCI clearance.

Novetta, from complexity to clarity.

Novetta delivers highly scalable advanced analytics and secure technology solutions to address challenges of national and global significance. Focused on mission success, Novetta pioneers disruptive technologies in machine learning, data analytics, full-spectrum cyber, cloud engineering, open source analytics, and multi-INT fusion for Defense, Intelligence Community, and Federal Law Enforcement customers. Novetta is headquartered in McLean, VA with over 1,000 employees across the U.S.

Our culture is shaped by a commitment to our core values:

Integrity • We hold ourselves accountable to the highest standards of integrity and ethics.

Customer Success • We strive daily to exceed expectations and achieve customer mission success.

Employee Focus • We invest in our employees' professional development and training, respecting individuality and fostering a culture of diversity and inclusion.

Innovation • We know that discovering new and innovative ways to solve problems is critical to our success and makes us a great company.

Excellence in Execution • We take pride in flawless execution as we build a company that is best in class.

Earn a REFERRAL BONUS for the qualified people you know.

For more details, or to submit a referral: bit.ly/NovettaReferrals

Novetta is an equal opportunity/affirmative action employer.

All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to sex, gender identity, sexual orientation, race, color, religion, national origin, disability, protected veteran status, age, or any other characteristic protected by law.",4.6,"Novetta
4.6","Arlington, VA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2012,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
83,Senior Flutter / Frontend Engineer,-1,"Our mission is to power the future of fan engagement.

Simplebet is a B2B product development company using machine learning and real-time technology to make every moment of every sporting event a betting opportunity.

Who You Are:

Do you prioritize user experience? Does the idea of reimagining the way fans interact with sports excite you? Do you strive to build high-quality, test-driven applications? Are you interested in building cross-platform experiences using Dart & Flutter?

We're looking for an engineer experienced in building modern front-end applications to join our Games Team. Direct experience building production apps with Flutter and/or Dart would be a big plus, but a demonstrative interest in Flutter and its community via blog posts, side projects, or open-source contributions is more than sufficient. In this role, you'll work within a cross-functional team to reimagine the future of live sports betting.
We'll trust you to:
Develop features from design through implementation and launch
Write clear, maintainable, portable, and highly functional code
Work with product and design to craft great mobile user experiences
Work with backend engineers on building complex server/client features
Take a data-driven approach to product features by assisting with prototyping and new feature validation
You'll need to have:
3+ years of experience authoring, testing, deploying, and managing high-scale production mobile apps
A strong desire to tackle hard problems
B.S. or B.A. in Computer Science, Math or equivalent experience
We'd love to see:
A passion for sports
Familiarity with and excitement for Flutter
Experience with Lean Product Development
Simplebet is an equal opportunity employer. We celebrate diversity and are committed to creating an inclusive environment for all employees. We do not discriminate based upon race, religion, color, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity, gender expression, age, status as a protected veteran, status as an individual with a disability, or other applicable legally protected characteristics.

We are committed to providing access, equal opportunity and reasonable accommodation for individuals with disabilities in employment, its services, programs, and activities. Please let us know if you require reasonable accommodation for the interview process, and we will make every effort to provide it.",2.2,"Simplebet
2.2",Remote,-1,51 to 200 Employees,2018,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
84,SR. COMPUTER SCIENTIST - SR. RESEARCH ENGINEER - TRANSPORTATION SYSTEMS,$67k-$97k (Glassdoor Est.),"Who We Are:


The Intelligent Systems Division develops automated solutions for commercial and government clients in multiple domains including transportation (traffic management, connected automated vehicle), manufacturing robotics, medical prognostics and communication standards.


Objectives of this Role:

Serve as a software developer and researcher on a team developing software solutions in technology areas such as Intelligent Transportation Systems (ITS), Integrated Corridor Management Systems (ICMS), and Decision Support Systems (DSS)
Initiate advanced research and development programs

Daily and Monthly Responsibilities:


Utilize advanced data analytics techniques and enterprise data infrastructure skills in state-of-the-art software development environments
Perform in all phases of the development lifecycle, including requirements definition, software/systems design, implementation, testing, and integration
Interact with clients and conduct technical presentations.

Requirements:


Requires a Bachelors with a 3.00 GPA in Software Engineering, Computer Engineering or Computer Science or related
7 years of experience with an emphasis on software development and systems engineering and exposure to object-oriented programming (programming languages such as, but not limited to, C++, C#, Java)
Education and/or experience involving one or multiple of the following: .NET, C#, Java, JavaScript, C++, Python, WPF, Git, Microsoft SQL Server, Windows, Linux, Docker, Kubernetes, Redis, Elastic Stack, TypeScript, HTML, CSS, Angular, Kafka, AWS, Azure, GCP
Excellent interpersonal skills and the ability to work well individually and as a member of a project team are required
A valid/clear driver's license is required


Special Requirements:


Applicant selected will be subject to a government security investigation and must meet eligibility requirements for access to classified information. Applicant must be a U.S. citizen.

Job Locations: San Antonio, Texas


For more information about this division, visit the Intelligent Systems home page.

An Equal Employment Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer
Race/Color/Religion/Sex/Sexual Orientation/Gender Identity/National Origin/Disabled/Veteran
Committed to Diversity in the Workplace
If you need assistance, please Contact Us",4.0,"Southwest Research Institute
4.0","San Antonio, TX",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1947,Nonprofit Organization,Research & Development,Business Services,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
85,Controls Engineer,-1,"Controls Engineer*
Innovar Systems Limited, a world leader in custom controls, automated test equipment and real-time information systems is looking to fill a Controls Engineer position.

Using the latest in cutting edge technologies, Innovar designs software, custom equipment and control systems to meet the specific requirements of a variety of customers. Engineers at Innovar are involved in all aspects of the engineering process from conceptual design, development, testing and deployment. They have opportunities to drive engineering decisions and execute those decisions to directly affect the success of projects.

Innovar engineers are considered top in their field, with the ability to work both independently and collaboratively with customers to achieve the highest levels of success.

With over 35 years of design and controls experience, Innovar has successfully deployed systems in nearly every manufacturing industry around the world including specialty metals, circuit breaker, automotive, food processing, pharmaceuticals and medical.
Job Description and Requirements: *
Ability to communicate with customers and colleagues to develop requirements.
Ability to transform requirements into working systems from a blank sheet of paper.
Ability to develop engineering documents, including bills of material, panel layouts and electrical schematics.
Experience with or willingness to learn all of the technologies listed below:
Allen-Bradley and Siemens PLCs
Embedded C Programming
HMI Development Software including Panelview and RSView
State Machine Software Development
Safety Devices
Ability to apply the latest technologies to solve process-specific problems
Willingness to travel within and outside of the US for field commissioning, startup and field service at customer facilities.
Qualifications: *
Bachelor’s Degree in Electrical or Automation Engineering
5 years plus of related automation and/or controls experience
Process Experience in Metals, Circuit Breaker, Automotive, Food, Pharma or related industry
Solid communication skills with ability to write a well-organized document
Innovative and self-motivated
Benefits*
Competitive Base Salary including overtime
Full premium paid health insurance with buy-up options
401K with profit sharing potentials
Paid holidays and vacation
Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $52,000.00 - $82,000.00 per year

Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Education:
Bachelor's (Preferred)
Experience:
C/C++: 1 year (Preferred)
AutoCAD: 1 year (Preferred)
MATLAB: 1 year (Preferred)
Work Location:
One location
Company's website:
https://www.innovarsystems.com/
Work Remotely:
No",4.0,"Innovar Systems, Ltd
4.0","North Jackson, OH",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Electrical & Electronic Manufacturing,Manufacturing,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
86,ENGINEER - RESEARCH ENGINEER - MUSCULOSKELETAL BIOMECHANICS,$51k-$76k (Glassdoor Est.),"Job Summary:


Join our Mechanical Engineering team to conduct innovative research for a wide range of commercial and military biomechanics and human performance applications utilizing advanced computational and experimental techniques. Use advanced motion capture systems and other sensor data (e.g. force plate, EMG, IMU, etc.) in combination with biomechanical modeling and simulation to determine the performance of the human body during various activities including physical rehabilitation, physical athletic training, and other human performance applications. Interact and engage with commercial and government clients to develop solutions that fit their requirements. Write and present reports and technical papers and manage the technical and financial performance of projects. Participate in and eventually lead individual and collaborative research projects as well as develop, promote, and write proposals for research and development programs.


Education/Experience:


Requires a MS degree or PhD degree in Mechanical Engineering, Engineering Mechanics, or Biomedical Engineering or closely related engineering degree with 0-5 years of experience. Must have at least a 3.25 GPA. Must have experience in developing multi-body dynamics models of musculoskeletal systems, experience with commercial motion capture systems, force plates, wearable sensors, and EMG. Must have experience with commercial and open source biomechanical modeling software and programming languages such as OpenSim, AnyBody, Python, or Matlab. Must have the ability to work collaboratively n a multidisciplinary team environment as well as individually. Must have excellent problem-solving skills, be self-motivated, and be driven to solve challenging problems. Must have good organizational skills and attention to detail with an aptitude for continuous learning and leadership potential. Excellent verbal and written communication skills are required. Experience and interest in advanced data analysis methods, uncertainty analysis or probabilistic mechanics, experimental methods and data collection, machine vision, machine learning, and deep neural networks is desired. A valid/clear driver's license is required.


Special Requirements:


Job Locations: San Antonio, Texas


For more information about this division, visit the Mechanical Engineering home page.

An Equal Employment Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer
Race/Color/Religion/Sex/Sexual Orientation/Gender Identity/National Origin/Disabled/Veteran
Committed to Diversity in the Workplace
If you need assistance, please Contact Us",4.0,"Southwest Research Institute
4.0","San Antonio, TX",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1947,Nonprofit Organization,Research & Development,Business Services,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
87,Senior Data Scientist / Senior Machine Learning Engineer,$109k-$173k (Glassdoor Est.),"Label Insight - Voted one of Chicago's Top 50 Best Small Places to Work - Join us!

About the Engineering Team:


Our Engineering team is chock-full of smart, dedicated, and creative team members. Each one has a desire to experiment with new and unfamiliar technology to solve their cross-functional (XFN) team's business objectives. We're passionate about best practices and strive to follow standards laid out before us. The team is encouraged to get involved in the tech community by participating in open source projects, speaking at local meetups, and presenting at national and international conferences.

Who You Are:


You’re an innovator; you share our common interest in improving and scaling our existing architecture and systems. Your excellent communication skills are key when collaborating closely with Product, internal customers, other engineers and data scientists to determine the best way to build products that meet their needs. You’re hungry for growth and with our Data Science Ladder you can visualize your career path. We are quality driven and you must be too. We expect that you’ll get involved and stay informed with the latest trends in technology and experiment with how to apply those to help consumers make more educated and healthier decisions.

**Even if you don’t check all the criteria boxes, we encourage you to apply. We’re looking for people with diverse backgrounds, exceptional potential and a passion for their craft.

How You’ll Contribute:

A contributing member of an agile team made up of several engineers, data scientists and a product manager working together to design, build, implement and maintain complex machine learning and/or deep learning solutions / systems (image processing, data extraction, data classification, projections and suggestions, data optimization)
Work closely with operations and subject matter experts to optimize internal processes and/or build customer facing solutions
Work in and build solutions for a hybrid cloud environment in Amazon Web Services and Google Cloud Platform, using some of the leading cloud native technologies including serverless computing and containerization
Move rapidly towards strategic goals, our team pushes code over 50 times a day. This tends to come about as a quick minimal viable solution (MVP), and then rapid iteration towards a final solution
Take complex problems and concepts and simplify them for different technical and non technical audiences
Provide documentation and explanation on technical solutions and model architectures in a concise and professional manner
Collaborate with individuals from your team and other teams to provide the best solutions possible
What You’ll Need to Succeed:
Strong and proven background in critical thinking and problem solving
BS or MS degree in a quantitative discipline (e.g., statistics, operations research, bioinformatics, economics, computational biology, computer science, statistical engineering, mathematics, physics, electrical engineering or relevant experience in the industry).
5+ years of data transformation, statistical modeling and/or deep learning as a Data Scientist, Engineer, Machine Learning/Data Engineer, Architect, etc.
Experience with data storage tools and databases (e.g., AWS S3, AWS Redshift, Google Cloud Storage, Google Big Query, MySQL, PostgeSQL, Graph Databases, NoSQL, DyanmoDB).
Experience with machine learning and deep learning frameworks (e.g., TensorFlow, Keras, PyTorch, Pandas)
Experience with dataset creation, data cleansing, data augmentation and/or synthetic data generation
Experience working with version control software (Git preferred)
Experience with developing API services (Flask / Sanic preferred)
Strong Python programming experience
Demonstrated skills in selecting the right statistical tools given a data analysis problem
Demonstrated effective written and verbal communication skills.
Demonstrated willingness to teach others and learn new techniques.
Preferred qualifications:


Strong experience designing and maintaining deep learning solutions (e.g., Optical Character Recognition, Computer Vision, Natural Language Processing, Trend Analysis)
Experience with cloud computing, serverless computing and/or containerization (Docker, AWS Lambda, Google Cloud Functions, Google Cloud Platform, Amazon Web Services, Microsoft Azure, Heroku)
Applied experience with machine learning on large datasets
Contribution to research communities and/or efforts, including publishing papers at conferences such as NIPS, ICML, ACL, CVPR, etc.
Any experience with nutritional science and the product marketing domain would be highly advantageous
Experience mentoring junior data scientists
Experience working in an agile environment (Kanban, Scrum, Extreme) working closely with other engineers and product management
We Share a Common Purpose:


Label Insight’s purpose is to empower consumers with the knowledge to improve their lives through better product choices. Our purpose keeps our team focused and aligned as we drive growth for our grocery retailer and CPG customers through unparalleled transparency.

We Live Our Values:
Transparency: We share information freely and concisely as a team
Inclusion & Collaboration: We believe working together as our unique-selves better serves our customers and community
Iteration & Innovation: We speak up early, are honest about our limits, and leverage failure as an asset
Intellectual Honesty & Humility: We encourage open debate and favor the best ideas
Accountability: We own the successes and failures of our team
Quality Driven: We hold our work to the highest standards and embrace problems as opportunities
The Benefits & Perks of Joining Us:
Competitive salary and stock options
Flexible work hours
Flexible paid time-off on top of 12 business days for standard holidays (Label Insight is closed for 1 week during the winter holiday season)
Company subsidized health insurance, dental and vision benefits
Paid Maternity and Paternity Leave
401(k) Plan
Employer Paid Basic Life Insurance Policy and STD/LTD
Transportation/Commuter benefits
Employment Referral Bonus
Educational Assistance and Management Training Programs
Casual and collaborative, open-layout work space - dog-friendly office in Chicago
Catered team lunches - every other week
Cold brew and beer on tap
Regularly scheduled team gatherings
*At Label Insight we embrace diversity and are committed to building a team that represents a variety of backgrounds and qualifications. We’re proud to be an Equal Opportunity Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, gender, gender identity or expression, sexual orientation, national origin, genetics, disability, age, or veteran status.",4.4,"Label Insight
4.4","Saint Louis, MO",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2008,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
88,ML/Camera Engineer,$79k-$136k (Glassdoor Est.),"Company:
Qualcomm Technologies, Inc.
Job Area:
Engineering Group, Engineering Group > Camera Software Engineering
Job Overview:


Qualcomm is a company of inventors that unlocked 5G ushering in an age of rapid acceleration in connectivity and new possibilities that will transform industries, create jobs, and enrich lives. But this is just the beginning. It takes inventive minds with diverse skills, backgrounds, and cultures to transform 5Gs potential into world-changing technologies and products. This is the Invention Age - and this is where you come in.

We are looking for a talented, motivated and experienced embedded software Engineer with expertise in camera and ML technologies. This position in the IoT software team at Qualcomm will be primarily focused around the areas of camera, machine learning frameworks, deep neural networks, computer vision, and algorithm optimizations for embedded targets.

Minimum Qualifications:
• Bachelor's degree or equivalent in Electrical Engineering, Electronics, Computer Science, or related field.
• 2+ years Software Engineering, Hardware Engineering, Systems Engineering, or related work experience.
• 2+ years of relevant camera software experience.

Preferred Qualifications:
• 3-4 years industry experience and well-versed in Python and/or C/C++ programming (minimum qualification)
• Experience with object-oriented design, coding and testing software (minimum qualification)
• Experience with camera architecture, camera tuning, image stabilization and other camera algorithms, and/or camera APIs (minimum qualification)
• Proficiency with embedded system programming (minimum qualification)
• Good understanding of machine learning concepts, computer vision and machine learning frameworks (preferred qualification)
• Familiarity with open-source frameworks like gstreamer, pulseaudio, wayland/weston, etc (preferred qualification)
Applicants: If you are an individual with a disability and need an accommodation during the application/hiring process, please call Qualcomm’s toll-free number found here for assistance. Qualcomm will provide reasonable accommodations, upon request, to support individuals with disabilities to be able participate in the hiring process. Qualcomm is also committed to making our workplace accessible for individuals with disabilities. Qualcomm is an equal opportunity employer and supports workforce diversity.

To all Staffing and Recruiting Agencies: Our Careers Site is only for individuals seeking a job at Qualcomm. Staffing and recruiting agencies and individuals being represented by an agency are not authorized to use this site or to submit profiles, applications or resumes, and any such submissions will be considered unsolicited. Qualcomm does not accept unsolicited resumes or applications from agencies. Please do not forward resumes to our jobs alias, Qualcomm employees or any other company location. Qualcomm is not responsible for any fees related to unsolicited resumes/applications.

EEO Employer: Qualcomm is an equal opportunity employer; all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, Veteran status, or any other protected classification.",4.0,"Qualcomm Incorporated
4.0","San Diego, CA",-1,10000+ Employees,1985,Company - Public,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),-1
89,"Engineering Manager, Machine Learning",$155k-$254k (Glassdoor Est.),"Tinder connects people. With tens of millions of users and a presence in every country on earth, our reach is expansive—and rapidly growing. Your daily work here will cause millions of people to spark meaningful connections. We have a small, dedicated engineering team with one of the highest ratios of users to engineers in the industry, making every member of the team critical to our success. We're looking for someone that can help us explore a vast amount of data and derive knowledge from that data that can be used to improve our product.

About the Role
As the Engineering Manager, Machine Learning will have the opportunity to lead a team of Machine Learning Engineers that will develop machine learning models and systems for revenue applications.

Our mission is to monetize Tinder’s global user base through subscriptions and premium features. You'll have a unique opportunity to join a company with a global footprint while working on a team that’s small enough for you to feel the impact each day.
What You Will Do
Design and implement state-of-the-art machine learning algorithms in distributed machine learning frameworks such as Spark
Define and own the objectives and metrics for your team, and devise a development strategy and roadmap
Lead and mentor team members to reach their full potential
Work on exciting problems that directly impact our revenue
Recruit and build an extraordinary engineering team
What You Will Need
1+ year of experience managing engineering teams, or tech lead with 4+ years experience and interested in a manager role
Someone who is not afraid to make critical decisions and has a bias towards action
Ability to encourage and motivate the team to go above and beyond
Experience in designing and building highly scalable distributed ML models
PhD or MS in machine learning, computer science, statistics or other highly quantitative fields
Bonus points if you have
In-depth knowledge of deep neural networks, classification techniques, computer vision, natural language processing
Experience with big data frameworks: Spark and Hadoop.
Experience with AWS.
Proficiency in deep learning framework: Tensorflow, Keras, etc.
Team Challenges
Tinder has massive diversified users, and unlimited revenue products to offer. One of the key challenges is to determine which offer is the best fit for a user. We use machine learning and data driven approaches to understand our users and generate segmentations. We then target them differently based on their behaviors and preferences.
Some example machine learning models that we are working on are conversion prediction, churn prediction, LTV prediction, pricing optimization, etc.
As part of our team, you’ll enjoy:

· The hustle of a startup with the impact of a global business
· Tremendous opportunity to seek some of the industry’s most exciting problems
· Working with an outstanding team of creative, fun and highly motivated people
· Comprehensive health coverage, competitive salary, and 401(k) match

At Tinder, we don’t just accept difference — we celebrate it, we support it, and we thrive on it for the benefit of our employees, our products, and our community. Tinder is proud to be an equal opportunity workplace.",3.8,"Tinder
3.8","San Francisco, CA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2012,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
90,Atlassian Software Engineer,$66k-$110k (Employer Est.),"COMPANY SUMMARY

Since 1992, Kingland's managed solutions have helped data-intensive, highly-regulated clients connect and protect their businesses. Kingland develops and manages enterprise-class software solutions using its Kingland Platform and teams of data and technology experts. Clients in the banking and capital markets, public accounting, insurance, and retail industries look to Kingland to create solutions to manage data, risk, compliance, customer insight and more. The Kingland Platform is a highly secure, cloud-optimized software platform that includes enterprise data management, text analytics, artificial intelligence and machine learning, and workflow and compliance management capabilities.

Kingland is unique. While we are based in Iowa, our clients are not. We are an Iowa company with a significant global reach. We provide our employees with the opportunity to ""live locally and work globally"", combining the Iowa quality of life that we all love, with exciting opportunities to travel the world and work on large projects for large clients.

Kingland is growing. We’re looking for individuals who like to tackle big challenges, want to work on mission-critical solutions, as well as desire to make a difference in the world — and be rewarded for their efforts. Explore all the ways that quality of work meets quality of life at Kingland, and launch yourself on an exciting new adventure.

POSITION SUMMARY

Kingland is looking for an experienced JIRA/Confluence Engineer or Administrator to join our team as an Atlassian Software Engineer. The ideal candidate has an analytical mindset, a passion for continuous improvement, and drive to deliver quality solutions. As an Atlassian Software Engineer, your responsibilities will range from tier-1 internal support, Atlassian maintenance and upgrades, and front-end customization to solutions design, and comprehensive application and system administration.

MAJOR RESPONSIBLITIES AND DUTIES
Be a subject matter expert in all things Atlassian, including JIRA project, workflow, plugin, and integration configuration, Confluence administration, user and permissions administration
Help to ensure our teams are using the Atlassian products effectively for a rapidly growing organization
Evaluate software updates, plugins, add-ons, and changes to JIRA and Confluence
Write, build, or update scripts and workflows all while maintaining Atlassian best practices
Collaborate with multiple functional areas and leaders (Engineering, Project Management, DevSecOps, IT, HR, Accounting, Facilities, etc), external vendors, and the Process and Reporting teams, to gather requirements for new implementations and to create and deliver solutions
Drive multiple projects (sometimes simultaneously) from start to finish, making a profound impact on the productivity and efficiency of our business
Triage and resolve Atlassian administrative requests, enhancements, access, and performance issues
Supports business strategy by supporting and enabling tooling and process integration between Atlassian applications, as well as other target applications as needed
POSITION REQUIREMENTS
3+ years or equivalent of JIRA and Confluence Administration experience
Intermediate level Linux experience
Entry Level AWS experience desired
Bachelor’s degree or applicable background experience
BENEFITS
Included in the Kingland Career Development Program – a guided program consisting of targeted learning opportunities and mentorship to assist you in career growth, personal development and opportunity for promotion and advancement at Kingland Systems.
Generous vacation and paid holidays
401(k) company match
8 hours of paid volunteer time annually
3 weeks paid parental leave after the birth or adoption of a child
Wellness reimbursement for gym memberships, equipment, and apparel
Access to free on-site fitness center in Clear Lake location
Company match of up to $1,000 annually for charitable donations
Free on-site parking
Access to company dining facility in Clear Lake location",3.8,"Kingland Systems
3.8","Ames, IA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1992,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
91,Senior Active Sensing Software Engineer,$66k-$136k (Glassdoor Est.),"At Torc, we have always believed that autonomous vehicle technology will transform how we travel, ship goods, and do business.

A leader in autonomous driving since 2007, Torc has spent over a decade commercializing their autonomous solutions with experienced partners. Now a part of the Daimler family , we are developing automated trucks to transform transportation.

Join us and take your career to new heights with a company that helped pioneer autonomous technology. You'll work with an experienced team of people who are committed to creating safer roads, and your contributions will have an impact on the future of transportation.

About the Team

The Active Sensing and Information Fusion team is responsible for developing perception algorithms to detect and identify objects for Torc's autonomous driving systems, allowing the system to understand and react to the environment around the vehicle in real-time. Our algorithms utilize 3D point cloud data from LiDAR and objects detected in radar returns. The team also implements the sensor fusion algorithms that combine this data and provide probabilistic state estimation.

We work closely with other engineering teams in behavior and motion planning to create innovative solutions for our Level 4 autonomous system.

About the Role:

In this role you will be responsible to various software development and engineer activities supporting the delivery of autonomy algorithm software to the overall system solution; Perform software development activities to include, but not limited to, software architecture, design, coding, unit testing, integration, deployment and maintenance. Clearly communicate daily status on assigned activities and follow company policies and procedures. Have a background either through education and/or employment in developing, implementing, and testing autonomy algorithms with the areas of behaviors processing, path planning, active sensing, information fusion, machine learning or vision processing. We work closely with other engineering teams to create innovative solutions for our Level 4 autonomous system.

Our Perception teams are responsible for developing perception algorithms to detect and perceive objects for Torc's autonomous driving systems, allowing the system to understand and react to the environment around the vehicle in real-time. Perception team members create software to utilize algorithms that use sensor data from LiDAR, RADAR, and cameras to detect, classify, segment, and detect, segment, classify, and track obstacles in the vehicle's surrounding environment. Perception software utilizes 3D point cloud data from LiDAR and objects detected in radar returns to create a situational awareness for our behaviors and path planning teams to make vehicle decisions to navigate safety.

Responsibilities:

Responsible for executing full software development lifecycle activities using C++ skills in Linux development environment using Lean-Agile methodologies

Responsible to complete software assignments including but not limited to software design, implementation, unit testing, vehicle testing and deployed software maintenance.

Assist in root cause analysis of issues found in vehicle testing

Support team in identifying daily assignments and reporting progress at daily stand ups.

Support software and system level test plans and verification strategies to support ongoing feature development and bug fixes.

Responsible to ensure software updates do not regress the software performance by utilizing simulation software and scenarios.

Update simulation software and scenarios for new features or situations encountered in testing software

Passion for autonomy development and testing

Drive delivery of practical application of autonomy algorithms to meet program goals and milestonesSupport high risk/high reward prototyping to advance technology incorporation into deployed system

Continuous learning mind-set

Exhibit Torc Values: Hungry, Humble, PeopleSmart

Communicate well in a team environment being able to clearly articulate progress, design expectations and support needed to help the team accomplish goals.

Minimum Technical Skills and Qualifications

Industry Experience in Robotics/Autonomy algorithms, architecture, and design in area of perception software

Strong in C++ programming skills

Proficient with ROS (Robot Operating System)

Proficient understanding of probability, statistics, probabilistic modeling, and linear algebra

Proficient knowledge of vehicle kinematics and dynamics

Good spatial comprehension and computational skills

High level understanding of Bayes probability theory

Proficient knowledge of Kalman filters, sensor fusion and dynamic state estimation

Proficient knowledge and application in graph theory and search algorithms

Proficient knowledge working in multiple coordinate frames

Strong knowledge of sensor data algorithms and driver development from LiDAR, RADAR, and cameras to detect, classify, segment, and predict obstacles in the vehicle's surrounding environment

Strong verbal and written communication skills to clearly communicate technical design and approach with peers and more junior team members

Minimum Education and Experience Requirements:

Bachelor's degree, or foreign degree equivalent, in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, Robotics Engineer, Mechanical Engineering, or engineering equivalent.

Minimum 6 years' experience relevant industry experience in robotics, autonomy software engineering; Minimum 3 years' experience with relevant Master level degree; Relevant PhD Degree

Perks of being a Torc'r

Torc cares about our team members and we strive to provide benefits and resources to support their health, work/life balance, and their future. Additionally, we are always open to suggestions to accommodate individual employee needs. Torc offers:

Full coverage of monthly medical premiums for full-time employees

Medical/dental/vision/ AD+D and Life Insurance

401K plan with employer matching

Annual learning and development stipend

Leadership development training

Collaborative, energetic, and team-focused work environment

Flexibility in schedule and generous paid vacation

PI124953109",4.7,"Torc Robotics
4.7","Blacksburg, VA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2005,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
92,Senior Software Engineer,-1,"Senior Software Engineer

We are seeking a highly motivated, talented Senior Engineer to join our product development team. We expect that all engineers can work full stack to some degree, but most engineers at Narrative Science have a primary focus. For this role, we’re looking for an engineer who has experience with and a passion for analytics, statistics, or machine learning.

You are someone who is comfortable owning and leading new projects end to end, working closely with product teams, and have a strong focus on improving the overall customer experience. You enjoy helping and mentoring people and believe that a great product comes from great team collaboration. You take delight in debugging unfamiliar problems and push yourself and others to grow as engineers.

Our Team


This role will be on our Depth Team, which primarily focuses on taking user provided data and writing a comprehensive story about it. We do this by determining what questions Lexio can answer based on the data, determining which answers are most relevant to the user, how the story should be structured with our NLG platform, and finally, how we want to present that story to our users in an interactive and intuitive way.

As a Senior Engineer on the Depth Team you will be focused on how we present our story and what content we choose to surface to the user within the story. You will have direct ownership over a large part of our code base and will be working hand in hand with our product and development teams to improve the analysis and content in our stories. In this role, you will have a solid mix of greenfield projects and platform improvements, along with plenty of opportunities to prototype and build lasting features and enhancements.

Qualifications:
4+ years of professional software development experience
Proven expertise of Python or equivalent
Demonstrated ability to write clean, helpfully-commented and readable code
A drive to learn constantly with an analytical and problem-solving mindset
A desire to grow as both an software and data engineer
Experience with Data Science Stack such as Sklearn, TensorFlow, Keras, etc
Experience with developing with statistical computing languages, such as Python or R
Bonus:
Experience with Unix / Linux systems (e.g. Ubuntu, CentOS, RedHat, etc.)
Familiarity with cloud computing, particularly AWS
About the Engineering Team @ Narrative Science

The Engineering team at Narrative Science specializes in delivering high-value cloud-based solutions to customers. Specifically, we are responsible for building and innovating on an insightful and personalized data storytelling platform. We work a lot with data pipelines, analytics, natural language generation (NLG), continuous deployment tooling, and cloud architecture.

Culture @ Narrative Science

Narrative Science believes that data storytelling can empower everyone to understand and take action from their data. Our mission is to build software that leverages artificial intelligence to automatically turn data into easy-to-understand reports, transforms statistics into stories, and converts numbers into knowledge.

Our core virtues (mission-driven, impactful, team first, innovative) are ingrained in everything we do, from how we develop our technology to how we interact with customers to how we hire people. Since 2020, we have embraced a remote approach and are on a journey to ingrain that in our culture. All while being immersed in our culture of learning, collaboration, innovation, and customer impact.

At Narrative Science, we embrace the diverse backgrounds, experiences, and perspectives of our future employees, colleagues, customers, partners, and other stakeholders. We provide equal employment opportunities (EEO) to all employees and applicants for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, age, disability, marital status, citizenship, genetic information, or any other characteristic protected by law.",4.1,"Narrative Science
4.1",United States,-1,51 to 200 Employees,2010,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
93,Scientific Computing Software Engineer,$53k-$112k (Glassdoor Est.),"Primary Work Address: 19700 Helix Drive, Ashburn, VA, 20147
Current HHMI Employees, click here to apply via your Workday account.
Janelia Research Campus is a pioneering research center in Ashburn, Virginia, where scientists pursue fundamental questions in neuroscience and imaging. The Howard Hughes Medical Institute (HHMI) launched Janelia in 2006, establishing an intellectually distinctive environment for scientists to do creative, collaborative, hands-on work. Our integrated teams of biologists, computational scientists, and tool-builders pursue a small number of scientific questions with potential for transformative impact. We share our methods, results, and tools with the scientific community. It is a uniquely innovative and collaborative atmosphere that reflects HHMI’s reputation for excellence.

Position Summary:

We are looking for a software engineer to work in the Scientific Computing Department on exciting projects that involve large data reconstruction and analysis. You will work with laboratories and team projects at HHMI Janelia to develop scalable software for imaging data produced at Janelia.

Initially, you will focus on tasks for reconstructing terabyte-sized electron microscopy acquisitions produced by the FlyEM team at Janelia. This includes the development of Java code for image registration, data handling and parallelization on the cluster and in the cloud using established open source libraries like ImgLib2, ImageJ, BigDataViewer, N5, Spark.

Based on these experiences you will have opportunities to take on new interesting projects with different teams and/or labs at HHMI Janelia that will also provide the opportunity for professional development, for example in the domain of machine learning. The Scientific Computing department at HHMI Janelia is an exciting environment where you will have the opportunity to collaborate with excellent software engineers and scientists and have access to the latest and most exciting data and computational resources.

Education:
M.S. or B.A in Computer Science or related field
Experience:
Experience with writing efficient code with Java or other JVM based languages
Familiarity with Python, other programming languages
Experience with libraries such as Spark, ImgLib2, ImageJ is a plus
Ideally, you have a record of contributing to open source projects, so we can discuss code
If you do not meet all of the above criteria but you are convinced that you can compensate this with enthusiasm, creativity, and practical experience, reach out to us and let's talk.

For more information on Scientific Computing at HHMI Janelia, visit here or email Stephan Preibisch at preibischs@janelia.hhmi.org

Physical Requirements:

Remaining in a normal seated or standing position for extended periods of time; reaching and grasping by extending hand(s) or arm(s); dexterity to manipulate objects with fingers, for example using a keyboard; communication skills using the spoken word; ability to see and hear within normal parameters; ability to move about workspace. The position requires mobility, including the ability to move materials weighing up to several pounds (such as a laptop computer or tablet).

Persons with disabilities may be able to perform the essential duties of this position with reasonable accommodation. Requests for reasonable accommodation will be evaluated on an individual basis.

Please Note:

This job description sets forth the job’s principal duties, responsibilities, and requirements; it should not be construed as an exhaustive statement, however. Unless they begin with the word “may,” the Essential Duties and Responsibilities described above are “essential functions” of the job, as defined by the Americans with Disabilities Act.

HHMI is an Equal Opportunity Employer",4.5,"Howard Hughes Medical Institute
4.5","Ashburn, VA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1953,Nonprofit Organization,Grantmaking Foundations,Non-Profit,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
94,"Machine Learning Expert for Autonomy, Lead",$132k-$224k (Glassdoor Est.),"Why choose between doing meaningful work and having a fulfilling life? At MITRE, you can have both. That's because MITRE people are committed to tackling our nation's toughest challenges—and we're committed to the long-term well-being of our employees. MITRE is different from most technology companies. We are a not-for-profit corporation chartered to work for the public interest, with no commercial conflicts to influence what we do. The R&D centers we operate for the government create lasting impact in fields as diverse as cybersecurity, healthcare, aviation, defense, and enterprise transformation. We're making a difference every day—working for a safer, healthier, and more secure nation and world. Our workplace reflects our values. We offer competitive benefits, exceptional professional development opportunities, and a culture of innovation that embraces diversity, inclusion, flexibility, collaboration, and career growth. If this sounds like the choice you want to make, then choose MITRE—and make a difference with us.

MITRE’s Artificial Intelligence and Autonomous Systems Department has a need for a Lead Machine Learning Engineer. Our work programs need top individuals with a passion for artificial intelligence and autonomy, experience and proficiency with algorithmic design and development; specifically, in machine learning (including deep learning).

You will have opportunities to work on a wide range of problems, leading and working with teams possessing a broad range of skills. Your experience will allow you to influence research directions; evaluate the challenges and potential solutions for designing, developing, and fielding machine learning solutions; assess the adequacy and maturation of existing research programs and shape their technical and programmatic direction; and identify new areas where research and development are needed to strengthen the nation’s growing machine learning capabilities.

Day to day responsibilities:
Work on, or lead, a team to develop and implement ML and deep learning algorithms
Develop and use modern software engineering techniques to develop ML-related software
Maintain knowledge of advances of ML capabilities in industry and academia
Develop, propose and execute research in the field of ML
Develop and propose new research directions in ML-enabled systems in support of MITRE’s internal research program and sponsor’s research programs
Evaluate ML solutions and compare to sponsor requirements and needs.
Requirements:
Must be a US citizen able to obtain and maintain a US government clearance
MSc degree or higher in artificial intelligence or related discipline
8+ years of experience in defining, developing, and deploying ML solutions.
Ability to articulate ML-specific challenges, discuss critical issues, and identify gaps.
Excellent communication skills (both written and verbal) along with ability to foster relationship development with sponsors
Proven ability to work independently to learn new technologies, techniques, processes, languages, platforms, systems
Strong written and verbal communication skills
Ability to work both independently and with a team.
Experience with programming languages such as C++ and Python.
Familiarity with the state of the art in the field.
Preferred Qualifications:
PhD degree in artificial intelligence or related discipline w/ 7+ years of experience in defining, developing, and deploying ML solutions
Active DoD Secret clearance.
MITRE is proud to be an equal opportunity employer. MITRE recruits, employs, trains, compensates, and promotes regardless of race, religion, color, national origin, gender, gender expression, sexual identity, disability, age, veteran status, and other protected status.

MITRE intends to maintain a website that is fully accessible to all individuals. If you are unable to search or apply for jobs and would like to request a reasonable accommodation for any part of MITRE’s employment process, please contact MITRE’s Recruiting Help Line at 703-983-8226 or email at recruitinghelp@mitre.org.

Copyright © 1997-2020, The MITRE Corporation. All rights reserved. MITRE is a registered trademark of The MITRE Corporation. Material on this site may be copied and distributed with permission only.",3.4,"MITRE
3.4","McLean, VA",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1958,Nonprofit Organization,Federal Agencies,Government,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
95,Software Engineer - Machine Learning,$89k-$151k (Glassdoor Est.),"O'Reilly Media is looking for a machine learning engineer to inform the direction and execution of our internal personalization and user tracking system built to support our learning platform.

About the Team

O’Reilly Media’s Search and Personalization Platform Engineering team supports O’Reilly’s premier learning service by building out personalization systems built on data and machine learning to provide a unique and dynamic experience for all of our users. The O'Reilly Learning Platform is used by technologists, managers, and designers around the world to hone their skills and improve their craft. O'Reilly's personalization team is one of many small teams that are broadly distributed across the US, featuring diverse, tightly collaborative groups of developers, designers, and product managers constantly encouraging each other to deliver work that instills pride and fulfillment. We encourage learning, knowledge sharing, growth and collaboration in all aspects.

About the Job

At O’Reilly our engineers focus on building a diverse set of features designed in collaboration with product managers, UX and other teammates. Engineers work with product managers to refine direction and solve user problems, exchange code reviews with other team members, provide mentorship to junior engineers, and assist QA and Ops in troubleshooting product issues.

In this role you will be primarily building data processing systems and developing machine learning models to provide intelligent predictions that are used within the search and personalization team or other internal teams to drive improved learning outcomes across the platform. In addition to building models, you will also be responsible for building and maintaining web services that provide search and personalization services to our users. This can include building apis, managing search engines, as well as building any other systems required to meet our goals.

About You

We are interested in people who have experience building and supporting web applications with a diverse and engaged user base. We desire candidates who work comfortably in an agile environment and with collaborators who are distributed across multiple time zones. We value colleagues who are helpful, respectful, humble, and always willing to do what’s best for our users. We desire developers who treat automated tests as essential, and believe that code reviews are a crucial path of learning and of sharing knowledge. The women and men of our platform team have taken many traditional and nontraditional paths to the developer profession, and we welcome diverse teams that are bound together by a mutual love of learning.

Requirements
A bachelor's degree in a math focused discipline, or equivalent real world experience
Experience working with a modern data science / statistics platform such as scikit, R, SAS, matlab or similar.
Experience with how to design features for use in a linear model and/or a neural network to achieve specific predictive outcomes.
Previous experience working with an object oriented programming language such as Java or Scala.
The extreme desire to learn and solve problems you have never encountered before.
Preferred skills
Experience with big data systems like Hadoop, Spark, Beam, HBase, etc.
Strong data structure and algorithm knowledge
TensorFlow / DNNs and Language Models
Bonus skills
Finagle, GCP, Apache Beam
Docker + Kubernetes
About the Company

O’Reilly Media has been inspiring the future for more than 40 years!

We share the knowledge and teach the skills people need to change their world. For more than 40 years, O’Reilly has imparted the world-shaping ideas of innovators through books, articles, conferences, and our online learning platform.

When individuals, teams, and entire enterprises connect with the world's leading experts and content providers, anything is possible. Whether you're working to advance your career, be a better manager, or achieve the next breakthrough in technology or business, learning new skills is at the heart of it all.

With a range of formats including live online training courses, interactive tutorials, books, videos, and case studies, we equip all members of the workforce with the insight they need to stay ahead in an ever-changing economy.

Learning should not be measured in terms of usage, course completion, or certifications. Learning should be measured in terms of outcomes. We want to prepare people to solve challenging problems and inspire them with what’s possible for the future.

Something we’ve been doing for over 40 years.",3.5,"O'Reilly Media
3.5","Boston, MA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1978,Company - Private,Education Training Services,Education,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
96,Computational Science Engineer (CSE),-1,"As part of the team at Q you will work alongside a highly skilled group of scientists on cutting edge technology in the measurement, modeling, and analysis of complex processes that take place in human physiology.

Q draws upon engineering, computer science, biology, physics, and applied mathematics to develop multi-scale models of human physiology, in order to create innovative algorithms and tools that allows us to better characterize and understand human health and its pathologies. We offer the opportunity to learn and develop new skills in a dynamic, multidisciplinary environment, in order to build a world where each generation is healthier than the last.

Key Responsibilities

- Build and maintain a high performance optimization framework for systems with 100's of millions of variables

- Develop novel numerical modeling algorithms for multi-physics simulations

- Contribute to the development of intellectual property

- Maintain substantial knowledge of state-of-the-art principles and theories in the space of optimization and machine learning
Required Qualifications
PhD in Computer Science, Electrical Engineering or Applied Math
Hands on experience implementing advanced computational methods for electromagnetics, fluid dynamics, or mechanics
Strong background in numerical linear algebra
Strong background in electrodynamics
Experience working in C/C++ and Python
Excellent written and verbal communication skills
Relentless, self-motivated creative problem solver
Able to work effectively in high-pressure, fast-moving team environment
Bonus Qualifications
Experience in electromagnetic integral equation methods
Mathematical optimization (large scale convex / non-convex optimization, stochastic optimization, etc.)
Experience developing applications with MPI/OpenMP
CUDA programming experience
Benefits
Competitive salary and equity in a well-funded, early stage startup
Healthcare, vision, and dental coverage for you and your dependents
Hands-on experience with cutting edge biotech tools, techniques and data including Genomics, Transcriptomics, Epigenetics, Proteomics, Metabolomics, Microbiomics, Radiomics
We have Superconducting Magnets!
We are an equal opportunity employer and value diversity at our company. We do not discriminate on the basis of race, religion, color, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, age, marital status, veteran status, or disability status.",4.4,"Q Bio
4.4","Redwood City, CA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2015,Company - Private,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
97,Machine Learning Software Engineer – Compilers,$89k-$150k (Glassdoor Est.),"Company:
Qualcomm Technologies, Inc.
Job Area:
Engineering Group, Engineering Group > Machine Learning Engineering
Job Overview:


Qualcomm is a company of inventors that unlocked 5G ushering in an age of rapid acceleration in connectivity and new possibilities that will transform industries, create jobs, and enrich lives. But this is just the beginning. It takes inventive minds with diverse skills, backgrounds, and cultures to transform 5Gs potential into world-changing technologies and products. This is the Invention Age - and this is where you come in.

AI is moving from cloud to the edge devices. QUALCOMM, as the world's leading mobile computing platform provider, is committed to enable the wide deployment of intelligent solutions on all possible devices. Be a part of our Deep Learning research project in Corporate R&D, where you will be involved and participate in building best-in-class solutions and tools needed to enable state-of-the-art technologies for next generation mobile/embedded machine learning platforms for smart phones, autonomous vehicles, robotics and IOT devices. In this role, you will work in a dynamic research environment, be part of a multi-disciplinary team of researchers and software developers, collaborate with internal teams, work with popular neural network frameworks, and understand the architecture of Qualcomms SOC compute and ML HW accelerators. You will design, develop & test software for machine learning compilers, tools and frameworks that enable models to efficiently run on all edge devices. The successful applicant should have a strong software background, and passion to work on neural network frameworks/libraries.

Minimum Qualifications
Bachelor's, Computer Engineering and/or Computer Science and/or Electrical Engineering
5+ years of Software Engineering experience.
Extensive programming experience using C/C++ & Python.
Hands-on experience with code generation implementation/optimization leveraging compiler frameworks such as LLVM, GCC, or machine learning compilers such as TVM, Glow, XLA or TensorFlow.
Preferred Qualifications
Strong object oriented design and development skills.
Knowledge of neural networks, with hands-on experience using ML frameworks such as TensorFlow or PyTorch
Experience with TDD development solutions like GoogleTest etc.
Experience with Source Code and Configuration management tools, such as Git
Strong debugging and analysis skills, for root causing complex issues
Knowledge of Convolutional Neural Networks (CNNs), RNN/LSTMs
Familiarity with any of the deep learning compiler frameworks TVM, Glow or XLA
Experience with compiler frameworks such as LLVM or GCC
Knowledge Qualcomm Hexagon DSP is a plus
Experience developing embedded software, preferably on-device ML
Previous experience working in an Agile environment, and collaborating with multi-disciplinary teams
Applicants: If you are an individual with a disability and need an accommodation during the application/hiring process, please call Qualcomm’s toll-free number found here for assistance. Qualcomm will provide reasonable accommodations, upon request, to support individuals with disabilities to be able participate in the hiring process. Qualcomm is also committed to making our workplace accessible for individuals with disabilities. Qualcomm is an equal opportunity employer and supports workforce diversity.

To all Staffing and Recruiting Agencies: Our Careers Site is only for individuals seeking a job at Qualcomm. Staffing and recruiting agencies and individuals being represented by an agency are not authorized to use this site or to submit profiles, applications or resumes, and any such submissions will be considered unsolicited. Qualcomm does not accept unsolicited resumes or applications from agencies. Please do not forward resumes to our jobs alias, Qualcomm employees or any other company location. Qualcomm is not responsible for any fees related to unsolicited resumes/applications.

EEO Employer: Qualcomm is an equal opportunity employer; all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, Veteran status, or any other protected classification.",4.0,"Qualcomm
4.0","San Diego, CA",-1,10000+ Employees,1985,Company - Public,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),-1
98,Senior Mechanical Engineer,-1,"The Company

EME leverages its deep engineering expertise, proprietary software, and product design knowledge to provide full lifecycle solutions for power generators. In particular, the Company uprates, adapts and repurposes a wide variety of conventional and renewable generators and their auxiliaries, focused primarily on turbo, hydro, pumped storage, and wind. This adaption and repurposing significantly enhances an asset’s value by improving its ability to support the evolving power grid.
The Company is a leading independent provider of custom engineered generator solutions, including: *
*Analysis*
*Product development*
*Innovative design*
*Manufacturing *
*Field installation services *
As a well-known enabling partner for many of the largest engineering and service organizations in its markets, EME is trusted by major corporate and utility customers to design, build, install and retrofit their largest generation assets. With a 35+ year history, EME is recognized as a technical expert for custom design, maintenance and operation of utility scale generators, motors, and auxiliary components. Its management and employees are highly experienced across all business lines and have an average of 10+ years with the Company, with a solid track record of developing new engineering talent.
Job Title: *Senior Mechanical Engineer
Reports to: *Manager, Engineering Services
Primary Work Location: * Monroeville, PA Headquarters
Employee Classification: *Full time exempt
Core Work Hours: *8:00 am – 5:00 pm Monday through Friday
Travel: *Required approximately 10-25%
Eligibility for Flexible Work Arrangements: *
Eligible for work from home with manager approval
Position Summary*
The Senior Engineer is a key part of EME’s Engineering Services Team and is responsible for performing engineering analysis, designing new equipment, assessing the condition of existing equipment, supporting EME’s field crews and managing Engineering Services projects. Senior Engineers must be comfortable frequently interacting with customers and vendors, both in the office and the field, and directing the work of junior engineering staff.
Responsibilities *
Use classic and finite element methods for thermal and structural analysis.
Analyze vibration data to troubleshoot machine vibration. Perform field vibration testing and use field acquired data to calibrate classic and finite element vibration models, use these models to simulate repairs and modifications to correct vibration problems and design solutions.
Design of new and upgraded generator and motor components and their auxiliaries.
Failure analysis of rotating equipment.
Reverse engineering of existing components.
Creation of manufacturing drawings from solid models and specifications to support production.
Lead engineering projects by developing quality assurance documentation, project plans and by providing input to costing and schedules and resolving technical issues.
Interface with shop floor personnel and vendors to ensure products are manufactured in accordance with drawings and specifications.
Perform field inspections and testing to provide input to analyses and designs.
Other duties as assigned.
Required Skills and Abilities*
Must pass a preemployment drug screening and background check.
Must have reliable transportation.
Must have valid driver’s license.
Bachelors of Science in Mechanical Engineering from an ABET accredited program.
Licensed Professional Engineer.
Minimum five years’ experience in engineering design and analysis with specific experience in:
Structural analysis, classically and via finite element analysis
Vibration testing and analysis
Thermal and ventilation analysis
Existing equipment condition assessments
Creation of manufacturing drawings
New component design
Proficiency in:
Mathcad
Solidworks or similar solid modeling software package
ANSYS
Ability to create engineering drawings and written technical work instructions that machinists and craft laborers can follow.
Strong verbal and written communication skills.
Strong computer skills.
Physical Requirements*
Able to walk, push, pull, reach, grasp, twist, bend and climb including at heights of over six feet.
Capable of standing for length of shift.
Keen sight, peripheral vision and hearing.
Able to wear fall protection.
Performance Measurement Metrics*
Performance is measured three ways:
A post-project survey completed by the Project Manger and Product Area Manager measuring five key process indicators by asking the following five questions, each scored from 1 (never) to 5 (always):
Did the team member provide deliverables on time?
Was the team member’s work done correctly the first time?
Did the team member exhibit safety conscience behavior and follow protocols without prompting?
Did the team member follow company and QA policies without prompting?
Was the team member’s level of productivity commensurate with their role and experience?
A 360 review survey, done yearly, which measures performance with respect to EME’s values of Unyielding Integrity, Commitment to Engineering Excellence and Innovation, Passion for Knowledge through Teaching, Learning, and Collaboration, Bold Industry Leadership through Technical Expertise and Foster a Responsive, Open and Respectful Culture
And a scorecard. The scorecard includes 12 items (one of which is the 360 review survey score) collaboratively selected each year with your manager and customized to your role. Each line represents a specific measurable result.
Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k)
Dental insurance
Health insurance
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Education:
Bachelor's (Preferred)
Experience:
Mechanical Engineering: 5 years (Preferred)
Benefit Conditions:
Waiting period may apply
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",3.0,"EME Associates, Inc.
3.0","Pennsylvania, AL",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Public,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
99,Software Engineer - Data Science,$60k-$127k (Glassdoor Est.),"Join ClearEdge and be a part of the team of men and women that solve some of the DoD’s most complex technical challenges. Every day, ClearEdge empowers customers in Government and industry with innovative data driven solutions.
Check out our extremely competitive benefits package at clearedgeit.com/benefits which includes a 10k annual training/education benefit, tech bonuses, and state of the art technology lab. We also offer monthly TechConnect and DeepDive collaboration sessions with our entire technical staff, fully paid.

Your mission: Work with a dynamic team and key stakeholders to generate and execute challenging solutions to mission problems.
We are seeking Software Engineers of all levels with Data Science experience. The position requires a self-starter with excellent problem-solving skills. The right person will work closely with the customer to gather requirements for assisting in solving real world problems using data science techniques. The candidate should be experienced with exploratory data analysis, machine learning, network graph modeling, information insight, data mining, data driven analytics and statistical methods.
You will excel in this role if you are:
Results-oriented developer who can leverage your technical skills and techniques to successfully design, develop and deploy software solutions
Self-motivated and have a desire to build new skills
Are familiar with Agile frameworks and methodologies with a desire to be a certified SCRUM Master
Enjoy learning new technologies, are a forward thinker, and are interested in growing your career with a cutting-edge technology company
A day in the life consists of:
Working directly with clients, managers and technical staff to understand business needs, develop technical plans, and deliver data-driven analytical solutions that solve client problems
Creating and deploying predictive models from a wide variety of data sources and types using the latest mathematical and statistical methods
Performing enterprise level software development, integration, and implementation using advanced data science or big data technologies
Establishing and implementing end-to-end proof of concepts
Performing data mining, statistical analysis, predictive modeling and simulation, and forecasting for the development of solutions
Working across multi-functional teams to formulate, prototype, implement, and fine tune solutions
Educating product development and operations teams using documentation, presentations, and demonstrations
Establishing strong, collaborative working relationships with Government customers, technical staff, and peers
What we are expecting from you:
Experience in the design and development of data science software applications
Bachelor’s or Advanced degree in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, or other technical discipline
Experience with Exploratory Data Analysis including wrangling, grooming, transformation, and analysis
Experience applying statistical methods to solve data problems
Software development programming experience in languages such as Python, R, Java, Scala
Experience using IDE tools such as Jupyter to develop and demonstrate results
Experience with integrating and using Data Science libraries such as scikit-learn, MlLib, Pandas, python (Jupyter, scikit-learn, pandas, etc.), R, Java
Experience with supervised and unsupervised machine learning techniques
Experience with Agile development and Agile tools (i.e. Jira, Confluence)
Experience within the SIGINT mission environment and an understanding of customer data formats
Strong analysis and problem-solving experience
Nice to have:
Experience using large-scale distributed frameworks such as Hadoop, Spark, Tensorflow
Experience with GPU-based machine learning techniques


About us: Experienced advanced analytic development company providing new Cyber solutions to current and emerging missions.
Our Core Values of Honesty, Integrity, Loyalty, Fairness, Respect, Responsibility, and Accountability drive our mission and vision and are the heart of what we do each day. We combine our Core Values with the three key elements of people, technology, and integrity to repeatedly deliver stellar results within our primary competencies.
ClearEdge is also pleased to share that we have recently expanded our prime and subcontract presence into new Cyber markets!
If this position does not fit your skillset, please visit our Careers page to explore our current openings, or contact a ClearEdge recruiter at careers@clearedgeit.com. ClearEdge is an equal opportunity employer.",4.0,"ClearEdge
4.0","Annapolis Junction, MD",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2002,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$5 to $10 million (USD),-1
100,Machine Learning Engineer,$48k-$89k (Glassdoor Est.),"Olive is healthcare's first intelligent digital workforce and has been successfully deployed at numerous healthcare systems across the country. Olive helps streamline and automate the most high-volume, repetitive tasks so healthcare professionals can concentrate on their patients and solving healthcare's most challenging problems. Olive's promise to her customers is that she finds out where she can make an impact, onboards quickly, shows up to work everyday, does her job extremely well, and gets smarter over time.

The focus of the Machine Learning Engineering team is to develop models and logic to address customers' needs, package the codebase for testing, and deploy it to production environments. The ideal candidate understands machine learning as well as software development best practices— from collecting and preprocessing data for training, validating, and testing machine learning models to unit and integration testing, deployment, and maintenance. As a Machine Learning Engineer, you will be expected to have the ability to work collaboratively with customers and other engineers to demonstrate value in sprints.

Responsibilities:

Collaborate with team members to deliver ML and RPA solutions including but not limited to data analytics and analysis, ML model training, and RPA implementation
Identify machine learning architectures and models to solve complex data problems
Work with multiple stakeholders to deliver automated workflows in a timely fashion
Use software development programs and operating systems for development
Define new techniques and best practices for all areas of req and ML
Provide feedback to product and development teams to improve our in house tools
Document process, procedures, and training materials for staff and stakeholders
Attend daily stand-up and periodic team meetings

Bachelor Degree in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, Physics, Applied Mathematics, Systems Engineering, Electrical Engineering or other related degree or experience
Strong mathematical and data analysis skills
Solid understanding of data types and structures
Knowledge of remote connectivity applications: Citrix Receiver, Horizon VMWare Client, RDP
Version control such as GIT, Subversion, Team Foundation
Ability to understand large scale software & system architecture
Able to communicate technical issues with technical & non-technical stakeholders
Experience in one of the following programming languages: Python, R, SQL, and Javascript

Preferred Skills/Experience Nice to Have:

Experience with Python ML tools: Keras, Jupyter Notebooks, Pandas, scikit-learn, Flask, OpenCV, Tesseract, and Numpy
Experience with Agile tools, Jira, Trello, Pivotal Tracker
Understanding of Continuous integration, testing, deployment & release methodologies
Automation Anywhere, Blue Prism, Autolt experience
Understanding of Computer Vision
Proficiency with recent Windows Server operating systems
Healthcare IT and EHR knowledge

PI125021824",3.9,"Olive
3.9","Columbus, OH",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2012,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
101,Senior Data Engineer,$54k-$100k (Glassdoor Est.),"Job Description

JOB DESCRIPTION - SENIOR DATA ENGINEER

ClearOne Advantage is a fast-growing company that is aggressively hiring due to increased business. We are always improving our marketing, culture and technology to provide our employees with the best work atmosphere and our customers with excellent customer service. COA’s proprietary software is tailored to our industry and allows the client to receive the best service possible.

We are seeking a Senior Data Engineer who can develop and maintain COA’s data environment, including data warehousing, data ingestion, ETL/ELT, data exchange, data lineage, and data quality. This role will interact daily with our Data Analytics/Data Science, Finance, Operations, DBAs, Site Reliability, and DevOps teams. Ideal candidate will be smart, passionate about data and eager to continually grow.

If you are looking to work in a team environment, a place where you are more a name than a number, where you interact with leadership daily, then please send your resume for review!

Perks:

● For Baltimore candidates - great location, right on the water in the Canton Crossing Tower

● Casual work environment and remote flexibility

● Room for advancement


Job Requirements

JOB REQUIREMENTS

Job Duties:

● Design and implement data warehouse solutions (schema design, partitioning, data ingestion, security, encryption, scrubbing, optimization, etc.)

● Design and implement data exchange solutions with partners and other third parties (secure data integration, file integrity, data ingestion, data quality, file retention, etc.)

● Design and implement data streaming solutions (clickstream, phone, third party services) for real-time/near-time ingestion into the data warehouse

● Establish programmatic tasks and perform unit tests of code and solutions

● Interface and consume application APIs for batch data ingestion

● Work with Data Science group to design, implement, and optimize analytic solutions

● Work with other departments on reporting design and efficiency

● Follow corporate and team standards for design, security, efficiency, application logging, monitoring/alerting, and documentation

● Triage and fix production application issues

● Stay abreast of new technologies and practices to further enhance team capabilities and own skills

● Participate in on-call rotation to support new and existing products

Qualifications:

● 4+ years hands-on experience in Application Development

● 2+ years operating in an Agile environment

● 3+ years hands-on experience with Microsoft® SQL Server, including using indexes, stored procedures, views, and triggers

● 3+ years hands-on experience with ETL/ELT tools (Five Tran, Informatica, Switch, SSIS, etc.)

● 2+ years hands-on experience with Business Intelligence tools (Tableau, Looker, Microstrategy, Brio, etc.)

● 1+ years working with Snowflake, AWS Redshift, or other commercially scaled cloud data warehouse provider

● 1+ years working in Amazon Web Services (AWS) or other cloud environment

● Awareness of analytics tools (R, SPSS, SAS, etc.), machine learning (Jupyter, etc.), artificial intelligence

● Working knowledge of encryption protocols and data scrubbing methods

● Working knowledge of data streaming tools and methods for real-time/near-time data availability

● Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science or related field / equivalent experience

● Ability to thrive in a fast-paced, rapid growth environment

● Ability to solve problems and learn business rules and processes

● Ability to demonstrate strategic, data-driven thinking combined with efficient implementation

● Ability to communicate clearly and effectively to both technical peers and business customers

● Ability work on a team as well as complete projects and tasks individually

● Hands-on, self-starter with a positive attitude and strong work ethic

● Authorized to work on US. At this time, ClearOne cannot offer sponsorship.

Technical Skills:

● Required – Microsoft SQL Server 2016-2019, T-SQL, SSIS, SSRS, SSAS, Snowflake, Fivetran, Python, SFTP, Tableau, Amazon Web Services, JSON, GitHub

● Preferred – MongoDB, NewRelic, JavaScript, .NET Core 3.1, Confluent, Kafka, R, Jupyter

AAP/EEO Statement:

Clear One Advantage provides equal employment opportunity to all employees and job seekers without regard to race, color, religion, national origin, sex, age, disability, pregnancy, sexual orientation, gender identity, genetic information, veteran status, or any other protected characteristic under federal, state or local laws.",4.4,"ClearOne Advantage
4.4","Baltimore, MD",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2008,Company - Private,Banks & Credit Unions,Finance,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
102,Senior Data Scientist Marketing,$130k-$150k (Employer Est.),"KnowBe4, Inc. is the provider of the world's largest security awareness training and simulated phishing platform. KnowBe4 enables organizations to manage the ongoing problem of social engineering by helping them train employees to make smarter security decisions, every day. Tens of thousands of organizations worldwide use KnowBe4's platform to mobilize their end users as a last line of defense and enable them to make better security decisions, every day.

We have ranked a best place to work for women, millennials, and in technology nationwide by Fortune Magazine as well as #1 or #2 in The Tampa Bay Top Workplaces Survey for the last five years.

****This position is located in Clearwater, FL and is only temporarily remote due to current COVID restrictions.*****

The Senior Data Scientist (Marketing) will work closely with the SVP of FP&A and Dir of Analytics to implement advanced analytical models and other data-driven solutions.

Responsibilities:
Work with stakeholders in marketing to identify opportunities to use available data to develop business solutions.
Enhance existing data collection procedures to ensure that all data relevant for analyses is captured.
Cleanse, consolidate, and verify the integrity of data used in analyses.
Build and validate predictive models to increase customer retention, revenue generation, and other business outcomes.
Assist in the design and data modeling of the data warehouse.
Visualize data, especially in reports and dashboards, to communicate analysis results to stakeholders.
Extend data collection to unstructured data within the company and external sources
Develop machine learning driven products for internal use.
Perform ad-hoc analysis, presentations and other projects as required
Minimum Qualifications:
Master's degree in Statistics, Computer Science, Mathematics or other quantitative discipline. PhD preferred.
Master's degree 4+ yrs in similar role: PhD 3+ yrs
Experience with statistical computer languages (Python, R etc.) to manipulate and analyze large datasets.
Experience with databases, query languages, and associated data architecture.
Experience with data visualization tools like Looker, Tableau, PowerBI, or Plotly
Experience in professional application of machine learning algorithms such as Random Forest, SVM, k-NN, Naïve Bayes, Gradient Boosting. Deep learning frameworks (Keras/Tensorflow, PyTorch, etc.) is a plus
Experience applying data science to marketing including attribution modeling, media mix modeling, and ROI analysis.
Ability to communicate effectively with both technical and non-technical colleagues
Experience with marketing automation platforms and/or CRM software is a plus (Hubspot, Salesforce, Marketo, etc.)
Experience with AWS is a plus
Note: An applicant assessment, background check and drug test may be part of your hiring procedure.

Individuals seeking employment at KnowBe4 are considered without regards to race, color, religion, national origin, age, sex, marital status, ancestry, physical or mental disability, veteran status, gender identity, or sexual orientation.

No recruitment agencies, please.",4.8,"KnowBe4
4.8","Clearwater, FL",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2010,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
103,Supply Chain Solution - Data Scientist,$68k-$110k (Glassdoor Est.),"*CURRENT EMPLOYEES :
Please click here to be redirected to the internal career site.
Job Description


The Supply Chain Solution – Data Scientist will be based in Austin, TX. In this role you will be responsible for creating reports using a variety of tools and methods.

We are looking for someone who demonstrates:
Intense collaboration
Passionate customer focus
Thoughtful, fast, disciplined execution
Tenacious commitment to continuous improvement
Relentless drive to win
Here is a glimpse of what you’ll do…
Use various analytical techniques including visualization, statistical methods, machine learning/AI to create scalable solutions for business problems
Translate Supply Chain business problems and questions into specific quantitative questions to be answered w/ available data using robust methodologies. In many cases, the data collection at scale will be part of the task and may involve co-work with software development team
Coordinate and perform testing on data quality and solutions
Analyze and extract relevant information from big data to help automate and optimize key processes
Establish scalable, efficient, automated processes for large scale data analyses, model development, model validation and model implementation
Research and implement novel machine learning and statistical approaches
Make business recommendations (e.g. cost-benefit, forecasting, experiment analysis) with effective presentations of findings to stakeholders through visual displays of quantitative information
Build scalable prototype analytics solutions
Work closely with software development/engineering teams to build model implementations and integrate successful models and algorithms in production systems at scale
Here is some of what you’ll need (required)…
Minimum 4 years’ experience with R
Demonstrated skill and experience of data analysis within open source scripting languages (e.g. R, Python)
Strong experience with SQL and working with relational databases (SQL Server, Teradata, MySQL etc.)
Strong demonstrated knowledge of applied statistical and machine learning methods
Experience with XML, JSON data formats, working with REST API’s, SVN/Git or other version control tools and techniques
Experience with Tableau in dashboard development, deployment and administration
Demonstrated ability to manage projects and implementation of solutions/applications
Effective written and oral communication skills, team player
Here are some nice to have’s…
Master’s degree in STEM field/Operations Research/Data Science/Supply Chain
Work experience in Supply Chain/Manufacturing
Be able to present quantitative results in the right context to various target audiences
Experience within the RStudio ecosystem (Shiny dashboards and applications, Plumber API’s, RStudio Connect)
Experience working with non-relational databases like MongoDB
Experience of deploying ML applications on platforms like Microsoft Azure, AWS, Google Cloud preferred
Demonstrated experience in business applications of distributed computing (e.g. MapReduce, HIVE, HADOOP)
Demonstrated capability in building scalable analytical solutions
Experience in ownership of solutions – life-cycle, roadmap, implementation, business value generation
Portfolio of data science projects on Github.com, RPubs.com etc.
Knowledge of data structures and algorithms
Demonstrated ability to communicate and influence executives and upper management
Here are a few examples of what you’ll get for the great work you provide…
Full range of medical benefits, dental, vision
Life Insurance
Matching 401K
PTO
Tuition Reimbursement
Employee discounts at local retailers
Job Category
Global Procurement & Supply Chain

Flex does not accept unsolicited resumes from headhunters, recruitment agencies or fee based recruitment services. Flex is an Equal Opportunity Employer and employment selection decisions are based on merit, qualifications, and abilities. Flex does not discriminate in employment opportunities or practices based on: age, race, religion, color, sex, national origin, marital status, sexual orientation, gender identity, veteran status, disability, pregnancy status or any other status protected by law. Flex provides reasonable accommodation so that qualified applicants with a disability may participate in the selection process. Please advise us of any accommodations you request to express interest in a position by e-mailing: accesibility@flextronics.com. Please state your request for assistance in your message. Only reasonable accommodation requests related to applying for a specific position within Flex will be reviewed at the e-mail address. Flex will contact you if it is determined that your background is a match to the required skills required for this position. Thank you for considering a career with Flex.

The information we collect:

We may collect personal information that you choose to submit to us through the Website or otherwise provide to us. This may include your contact details; information provided in online questionnaires, feedback forms, or applications for employment; and information you provide such as CV/Resume. Your details will be provided to the entity you are applying for a job with. We will use your information for legitimate business purposes such as responding to comments or queries or answering questions; progressing applications for employment; allowing you to choose to share web content with others or; where you represent one of our customers or suppliers, administering the business relationship with that customer or supplier. We will process your data in accordance with our Recruitment Privacy Notice.

If you have any queries about the processing of your data, please contact:

Global Data Privacy Officer:

Email Address: chiefprivacyofficer@flex.com",3.8,"Flex
3.8","Austin, TX",-1,10000+ Employees,1969,Company - Public,Electrical & Electronic Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$10+ billion (USD),-1
104,Senior Full Stack Engineer,$118k-$140k (Glassdoor Est.),"Tamr is the enterprise-scale data unification company trusted by industry leaders like GE, Toyota, Thomson Reuters, and GSK. The company’s patented software platform uses machine learning supplemented with customers’ knowledge to unify and prepare data across myriad silos to deliver previously unavailable business-changing insights. With a co-founding team led by Andy Palmer (founding CEO of Vertica) and Mike Stonebraker (Turing Award winner) and backed by founding investors NEA and GV, Tamr is transforming how companies get value from their data.

As we rapidly grow our engineering team, we are seeking for outstanding engineers interested in building products that solve customer problems & enable customer innovation. This is an opportunity to build enterprise software that solves the most time-consuming, manually intensive problem in data science and modern data pipelines: enriching, curating, and preparing data. As part of a talented team, you will design and implement creative solutions to problems in data pipelining, distributed computing, cloud computing, machine learning and user experience.
This job might be a good fit for you if you have:
At least 5 years industry experience in software development
Strong computer science fundamentals. BS or MS in Computer Science preferred. Equivalent industry experience acceptable
Strong experience with Java or any other modern programming language
Experience with Big Data technologies, Distributed systems or Cloud native software
Excellent problem-solving skills
A collaborative working style
A hunger to learn new things and achieve big outcomes
Additional Information

This position is available in Cambridge MA. Tamr does sponsor employees requiring a visa.

Tamr provides equal employment opportunities (EEO) to all employees and applicants for employment without regard to race, color, religion, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, national origin, age, disability, genetic information, marital status, amnesty, or status as a covered veteran in accordance with applicable federal, state and local laws.",4.3,"Tamr
4.3","Boston, MA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2013,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
105,"Software Engineer, Cloud Engineering (optional remote)",$58k-$117k (Glassdoor Est.),"Do you want to work on a large-scale, in-production, secure cloud service platform, using state-of-the-art cloud-native technologies and microservices architecture? Are you looking to make an impact? Do you love seeing your work implemented and hearing how your contributions have made a difference?

ExtraHop gives security and networking teams visibility into how their applications are performing, how long requests are taking, and when errors are occurring. We've built network monitoring capabilities that can process 100 Gbps of data. Our remote analysis service processes over one terabyte per hour.

ExtraHop offers an exciting, high energy, and versatile environment in which people are encouraged and supported to collaborate on industry-leading technology and create a world-class engineering team, while they develop and enrich their individual growth. And we're doing it with creativity, intellectual curiosity, and a sense of humor (it's required here, seriously).

We have a global and diverse user base—we believe in actively investing in a diverse engineering organization. We are seeking highly talented software engineers from all backgrounds, who offer dynamic perspectives, influences, and experiences. Are you as passionate as we are about positive culture and amazing technology? If you are, we can't wait to chat with you.


What does cloud infrastructure at ExtraHop look like?

ExtraHop’s SaaS infrastructure is primarily built on AWS, but also includes GCP and Azure. The technologies that the team uses include Kubernetes, Terraform, and Python to provision and manage customer resources on a greenfield product. We were among the premium technology partners who worked with AWS on their traffic mirroring solution to build our SaaS platform. Our goal is to build a stable platform for customer-facing services while encouraging healthy work-life balance via automated remediation and fault-tolerant designs.


Requirements
2 - 4 years of experience in software engineering
Excellent engineering chops
Solid knowledge of Go, Python, or an equivalent programming language
Self-starter with a strong problem-solving track record and ability to grow and learn
Excellent communicator and collaborator who can iterate quickly
Strong knowledge of AWS technologies (RDS / S3 / SQS / EC2)
Desired skills
Experience around container and related technologies (Kubernetes / Docker / HashiCorp - Packer, Vault, and Terraform).
Experience with building and scaling distributed, highly available systems
Experience with cloud services on GCP or Azure

About ExtraHop

ExtraHop is an enterprise cyber analytics and performance monitoring company helping the world’s leading organizations understand and secure their entire environment from the core to edge to the cloud. Our breakthrough approach to analytics and machine learning helps our customers investigate threats, ensure the delivery of critical applications, and secure their investment in the cloud, resulting in 95% faster threat detection and reducing unplanned downtime by 86% while providing the best possible customer experience.

ExtraHop is recognized by leading organizations for both its innovation in the market and its commitment to building a world-class team. We’ve been named to Wealthfront’s Career-Launching Companies list for the last four years, and JMP Securities put ExtraHop on its 2018 Super 70 List as one of the most strategically positioned private companies in the cybersecurity industry. Credit Suisse recognized ExtraHop as a member of its inaugural Disruptive Technology Recognition Program, and SC Media named ExtraHop a 2019 Industry Innovator for enterprise network traffic analysis.

With well over $150 million in bookings in 2019, and 10x growth in security, the opportunity with ExtraHop has never been greater. Are you ready to rise above the noise?

ExtraHop is an Equal Opportunity Employer. Qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, age, disability, military status, or national origin or any other characteristic protected under federal, state, or applicable local law

#LI-SF1",3.8,"ExtraHop Networks, Inc.
3.8","Seattle, WA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2007,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
106,"Lead Software Engineer, AutoML",$92k-$176k (Glassdoor Est.),"About Alteryx


Alteryx develops software for data preparation and analysis, including a number of server solutions for model deployment, collaborative work on data, and scheduling of automatic data processing. We're revolutionizing data analytics by providing a complete end to end, self-service platform that allows users to get from business questions to business answers at incredible speeds. Why work for just any analytics company? At Alteryx, we are explorers, dreamers, and innovators. We're on a journey to build the best analytics platform in the world, but we can't do it without people like you leading the way.

About the Boston Office


The Boston Office was started earlier this year by the acquisition of MIT-spinout Feature Labs. This rapidly growing team combines the excitement of being part of a fast-paced, innovative startup with the resources, market penetration, and wisdom of the data analytics market leader. Forget the stereotypical tech companies of the past. Embrace the unconventional, exercise your imagination and help alter the future with Alteryx!

Overview


As a Lead Software Engineer on the AutoML team, you’ll be directly responsible for building a core machine learning library which powers Alteryx’s current and future products. You should be comfortable with the challenges of engineering systems for machine learning technologies, adept at software design and implementation, and readily able to solve complex challenges with mathematical dependencies.

Responsibilities
Maintain and improve the quality and performance of the AutoML package
Design, build and validate new machine learning pipelines
Author new features, from conception and design to implementation and testing
Integrate AutoML with other products and services
Promote a culture of rigorous software development practice and high quality standards
Mentor other engineers and promote technical leadership throughout the organization
Be part of a dynamic, friendly and ambitious team with technical influence throughout Alteryx and beyond
***The company will not provide sponsorship for work visas or other employment authorization for this position***


Requirements
Minimum 5 years experience as a software engineer
Experience writing production-quality code in Python
Experience with a broad variety of machine learning algorithms
Experience and interest in leading teams and managing projects
Experience with API design
Understanding of the math which powers machine learning and data analysis in general
Experience with data-related Python tools like NumPy, SciPy, Pandas, Scikit-learn, and Dask
Experience with debugging complex software issues and mathematical systems
Bonus
Experience with AutoML algorithms and products
Experience with performance testing machine learning systems
Experience building systems for distributed computation
Perks
100% company-paid medical, dental, and vision for associates
Health plans that cover your family and pets
Company matched 401(k)
Associate stock purchase plan
Paid time off: 3 weeks’ vacation, 5 sick days, 9 holidays, 3 floating holidays, and 20 hours volunteer time
100% paid parental leave
Tuition reimbursement
Wellness programs with up to $300 fitness reimbursement annually
Collaborative offices stocked with healthy snacks and drinks
Office events, catered lunches, and happy hours
#LI-JE1",3.6,"Alteryx
3.6","Boston, MA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1997,Company - Public,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
107,Software Design Engineer,$53k-$112k (Glassdoor Est.),"Introduction

ASML US brings together the most creative minds in science and technology to develop lithography machines that are key to producing faster, cheaper, more energy-efficient microchips. We design, develop, integrate, market and service these advanced machines, which enable our customers - the world’s leading chipmakers - to reduce the size and increase the functionality of their microchips, which in turn leads to smaller, more powerful consumer electronics. Our headquarters are in Veldhoven, the Netherlands, and we have 18 office locations around the United States including main offices in Chandler, Arizona, San Jose and San Diego, California, Wilton, Connecticut, and Hillsboro, Oregon.

Job Mission

We are looking for hardworking and results-oriented software engineers with a passion for programming, who enjoy working in a dynamic multidisciplinary team responsible for developing the embedded software used to control lithography machines.

This position requires access to controlled technology, as defined in the Export Administration Regulations (15 C.F.R. § 730, et seq.). Qualified candidates must be legally authorized to access such controlled technology prior to beginning work. Business demands may require ASML to proceed with applicants who are immediately eligible to access controlled technology.

Job Description

You will work in a team of highly skilled software engineers responsible for developing software that enables the ever-increasing miniaturization of semiconductor technology. In order to provide the most value to the customer as early as possible, the team will use Agile methodology to develop the software using C and/or C++. You will create architecture and designs that are modular, scalable, robust and meet customer requirements. As part of continuous integration, the team will perform unit testing and on target testing to ensure the software meets the high quality standards our customers expect.

You will also participate in continuous process improvement activities aimed at ensuring the processes and tools used throughout software development lifecycle are increasing the team’s ability to develop high quality software in the most efficient manner.

Education

Undergraduate degree in Computer or Electrical Engineering or Computer Science, or equivalent experience.

Experience
Extensive experience in embedded software development.
Ability to decompose functional requirements into software architecture and design.
Strong software development skills.
Ability to debug complex issues and find root cause on your own.
Creative approach to problem solving.
Excellent communication skills.
Ability to work in a dynamic, customer focused and multidisciplinary environment.
Ability to work independently and in a team.
Personal skills
Can observe and respond to people and situations and interact with others encountered in the course of work.
Can learn and apply new information or skills.
Must be able to read and interpret data, information, and documents.
Strong customer focus and commitment to customer satisfaction through prioritization, quality, efficiency and professionalism.
Ability to complete assignments with attention to detail and high degree of accuracy.
Proven ability to perform effectively in a demanding environment with changing workloads and deadlines.
Result driven-demonstrate ownership and accountability.
Identifies bottlenecks and drives improvements.
Work independently or as part of a team and follow through on assignments with minimal supervision.
Demonstrate open, clear, concise and professional communication.
Ability to establish and maintain cooperative working relationships with manager, co-workers and customer.
Work according to a strict set of procedures within the provided timelines.
Other information

Role within Office

Responsibilities:

Routinely required to sit; walk; talk; hear; use hands to keyboard, finger, handle, and feel; stoop, kneel, crouch, twist, reach, and stretch. Occasionally required to move around the campus.
Occasionally lift and/or move up to 20 pounds.
May require travel dependent on business needs.
Specific vision abilities required by this job include close vision, color vision, peripheral vision, depth perception, and ability to adjust focus.

EOE AA M/F/Veteran/Disability",3.9,"ASML
3.9","Wilton, CT",-1,10000+ Employees,1984,Company - Public,Electrical & Electronic Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$5 to $10 billion (USD),-1
108,Senior Python Software Engineer (Data),-1,"Our mission is to power the future of fan engagement.

Simplebet is a B2B product development company using machine learning and real-time technology to make every moment of every sporting event a betting opportunity.

We are looking to hire a Senior Data Engineer to join the SimpleBet team to expand our data and machine learning platform. This includes building ETL pipelines, relational databases for our applications, and streaming realtime data into analytics applications and a data lake. You will be responsible for fetching, organizing, manipulating, and maintaining all of our data in order to optimize machine learning research, product analytics, and streaming data products for our machine learning and customer use cases.
Responsibilities
Build robust and reliable ETL pipelines with best practices and data governance in mind using Apache Airflow, Databricks, Kafka, and PostgreSQL.
Organize raw sports data from a variety of sources into a cohesive, centralized data warehouse.
Design and build our real-time streaming data infrastructure and products.
Write software to optimize machine learning research and production implementations of machine learning models
What will you be doing
In the first month, you will get acquainted with SimpleBet, how data flows through our systems, and begin contributing to our ETL pipeline and data management systems.
In the second month, you will be a contributor in building out a brand new data pipeline to handle user event data with technologies such as Spark, Kafka, and Apache Airflow.
From the third month onwards, you will continue to take ownership of our data platform, continuing to build and iterate to meet product needs and optimize.
Requirements
3+ years of data-oriented software development experience building data backends
Strong understanding of database and data lake design
Experience with languages including Python, Scala, or similar
Experience building and maintaining web services in production using a modern framework like Django, Flask, or FastAPI
Bachelor's degree or Master's degree from an accredited university or college in computer science or related field
Bonus points for
Experience with Databricks, Spark, Kafka, AWS, Kubernetes, Celery
Experience working on Data Science / Machine Learning projects
Simplebet is an equal opportunity employer. We celebrate diversity and are committed to creating an inclusive environment for all employees. We do not discriminate based upon race, religion, color, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity, gender expression, age, status as a protected veteran, status as an individual with a disability, or other applicable legally protected characteristics.

We are committed to providing access, equal opportunity and reasonable accommodation for individuals with disabilities in employment, its services, programs, and activities. Please let us know if you require reasonable accommodation for the interview process, and we will make every effort to provide it.",2.2,"Simplebet
2.2",Remote,-1,51 to 200 Employees,2018,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
109,"Senior Product Development Engineer, Externals",-1,"Senior Product Development Engineer, Externals *
iota Biosciences, Inc. is a medical device company developing novel bioelectronic diagnostics and therapies. We are looking to hire a highly motivated engineer to lead development of our external devices and accessories. iota Biosciences is based in Alameda, California.

For more information please visit iota.bio
Responsibilities: *
Responsibilities may include the following and other duties may be assigned:
Lead development of iota’s external devices and accessories.
Research, plan, design, verify and validate mechanical and/or electromechanical products and systems.
Recommends various technology options or approaches for system, processes, facility or program improvements in terms of safety, performance, efficiency or costs.
Responsible for transfer from R&D to manufacturing.
Minimum qualifications: *
Please ensure the minimum requirements are evident on your resume.
Education: Bachelor’s degree in Mechanical or Materials Science Engineering with a solid foundation in applied mechanics. Advanced degree preferred.
5+ years developing medical device equipment from concept phase to commercial launch.
Proficiency with CAD software (e.g. SolidWorks, Pro-Engineer).
Experienced working in a regulated quality management system.
Preferred qualifications*:
Strong willingness to be hands on and support a wide variety of activities.
Risk management (risk analysis, FMEA) experience strongly desired.
Experience creating mockups and prototypes using processes such as 3D Printing, casting, machining, and molding.
Experience interfacing with contract manufacturing, operations, quality and regulatory functions.
Experience designing electronics enclosures using relevant manufacturing processes (e.g. machining, injection molding, extrusion, and metal forming).
Understanding and application of Geometric Dimensioning & Tolerancing (GD&T).
Self-motivated to seek out new ways to solve problems.
Eagerness to learn and a willingness to accept constructive criticism.
Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k)
Dental insurance
Health insurance
Paid time off
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Experience:
Product Development: 5 years (Required)
Medical Devices: 2 years (Required)
Education:
Bachelor's (Required)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Application Question:
Minimum of 4 years of experience with CAD software.
Work Remotely:
No",-1,iota Biosciences,"Alameda, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
110,Senior Data Scientist,$136k-$225k (Glassdoor Est.),"Company Overview

Imagine if we could match patients with the treatments that prove the most effective for them . . .
GNS Healthcare applies a powerful form of AI called causal machine learning to predict which treatments and care management programs will work for which patients, improving individual patient outcomes and the health of populations while reducing the total cost of care.

Headquartered in the biotechnology and health IT center of Cambridge, MA, our patented REFS technology is based on recent breakthroughs in causal machine learning and AI that transforms massive quantities of patient data into computer models of disease at molecular, patient, and health system levels. These computer models power up solutions, products, and services that health plans, biopharmaceutical companies, health systems, and patient foundations utilize to slow disease progression, reduce adverse events and hospitalization, and improve therapeutic effectiveness. Our platforms and solutions have been validated across more than 45 diseases including oncology, cardiovascular and metabolic disease, autoimmune diseases, neurology, etc. and have appeared in over 50 peer-reviewed publications.

Position Summary

The Senior Data Scientist will join a dynamic team responsible for start-to-finish work on the analysis and interpretation of real-world datasets using GNSs powerful cloud-based analytics platform. We are looking for someone who thrives working in a fast-paced, exciting, and collaborative environment in one of the most cutting-edge industries where big data analytics meets healthcare. You will help manage real world data, as well as create and interpret data-frames for modeling and analysis. You will collaborate with our research scientists to carry out analysis projects using our proprietary, supercomputer-powered Bayesian network modeling and simulation platform, and will synthesize these results into meaningful reports for clients and product development.

Responsibilities
Collaborate with internal research teams and clients to evaluate study design, define research questions, design data frames, write statistical analysis plans/study protocols, conduct analyses, and participate in the full research process, including client presentation and publication
Communicate highly technical results and methods clearly to clients, discuss how to incorporate information into their processes, and achieve high client satisfaction
Troubleshoot with clients and internal stakeholders to refine and optimize models
Provide scientific communications to peer-reviewed journals and publications
Develop data frames of high complexity while adhering to a project-based timeline
Perform data manipulations and develop algorithms on multi-data sets that create the analytic files necessary to support analyses.
Consult on how to use data to perform predictive and causal modeling using both proprietary and off-the-shelf tools.
Qualifications

Minimum Qualifications:
Masters Degree in a quantitative discipline or equivalent practical experience
3-5 years of experience working with advanced ML techniques, probability theory, Bayesian analysis, or causal inference methods
Experience working with biomedical data/ population health data, EHR or claims data
Demonstrated experience working with programming languages R and SQL
Strong written and verbal communication; an ability to communicate technical material to non-technical audiences simply and clearly and collaborate well on a team
Strong drive for problem solving, especially around data frame construction and interpretation
Preferred Qualifications:
Experience working with large, complex, or unstructured data requiring post-processing to use effectively
Familiarity with the UNIX and cluster computing environment
Company Culture

Our philosophy at GNS is simple: we cannot transform healthcare with anything less than an all-star team. We are seeking smart, driven people who are experts in their field, have a track record of success and a passion for creating change. We believe that strong teams supercharge the performance of individuals, create a fun and dynamic workplace and great results for our clients and the people they serve.

We are passionate about our work and believe in the ability of our technology to change the world. Our core values of integrity, collaboration, value, diversity, and game-changing guide our behaviors with each other and our clients.

GNS offers competitive salaries, stock options, unlimited vacation, health, dental and vision insurance, life insurance, long-term disability, 401(k), generous parental leave, tuition reimbursement, professional development, subsidized parking and gym membership, tasty food, volunteering opportunities, social gatherings, and more.

Equal Employment Opportunity

GNS Healthcare provides equal employment opportunities to all employees and applicants for employment without regard to race, color, national origin, religion, sexual orientation, gender, gender identity or expression, age, veteran status, disability, pregnancy or conditions related to pregnancy, or genetics. In addition to federal law requirements, GNS Healthcare complies with applicable state and local laws governing nondiscrimination in employment in every location in which the company has facilities.

Powered by JazzHR",3.0,"GNS Healthcare
3.0","Cambridge, MA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2000,Company - Private,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
111,Principal Full Stack Engineer,$92k-$121k (Glassdoor Est.),"Tamr is the enterprise-scale data unification company trusted by industry leaders like GE, Toyota, Thomson Reuters, and GSK. The company’s patented software platform uses machine learning supplemented with customers’ knowledge to unify and prepare data across myriad silos to deliver previously unavailable business-changing insights. With a co-founding team led by Andy Palmer (founding CEO of Vertica) and Mike Stonebraker (Turing Award winner) and backed by founding investors NEA and GV, Tamr is transforming how companies get value from their data.

As we rapidly grow our engineering team, we are seeking for outstanding engineers interested in building products that solve customer problems & enable customer innovation. This is an opportunity to build enterprise software that solves the most time-consuming, manually intensive problem in data science and modern data pipelines: enriching, curating, and preparing data. As part of a talented team, you will design and implement creative solutions to problems in data pipelining, distributed computing, cloud computing, machine learning and user experience.
This job might be a good fit for you if you have:
At least 10 years of industry experience in software development
Strong computer science fundamentals. BS or MS in Computer Science preferred. Equivalent industry experience acceptable
Strong experience with Java or any other modern programming language
Experience with Big Data technologies, Distributed systems or Cloud native software
Excellent problem-solving skills
A collaborative working style
A hunger to learn new things and achieve big outcomes
Additional Information

This position is available in Cambridge MA. Tamr does sponsor employees requiring a visa.

Tamr provides equal employment opportunities (EEO) to all employees and applicants for employment without regard to race, color, religion, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, national origin, age, disability, genetic information, marital status, amnesty, or status as a covered veteran in accordance with applicable federal, state and local laws.",4.3,"Tamr
4.3","Boston, MA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2013,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
112,Resident Service Engineer,$10-$19 Per Hour(Glassdoor Est.),"Resident Services Engineer

We are looking for a highly skilled Field Service Engineer in the New Brunswick, NJ area. This Engineer will travel to one of our Key Customer's locations to install, maintain and support Packsize equipment as well as build and maintain customer relationships by effectively servicing the equipment. This individual must understand the needs of the customer, work proactively and efficiently to meet those needs, and provides 5-Star customer service by proactively visiting or calling the customer to ensure they are fully satisfied with the Packsize equipment, process flow, packaging designs, and service.

This position is considered a sourcing position to build a candidate pool. The job will open within the next 90 days. Please keep this status in mind when applying for the position. You will be notified within 90 days if we are interested in pursuing an interview with you for the position.

Primary Responsibilities

• 100% Travel

• Completes and successfully pass training courses

• Develops knowledge of Packaging Designs
• Learns and develops the customer support and technical skills necessary to perform high quality maintenance
• Performs preventive maintenance on machines, equipment and accessories

• Performs installation of new equipment and train Customer Personnel

• Learns and completes basic administration duties (assigned tasks, emails, etc.)
• Exposed to moving parts and electricity that require safety protocols
• Exposure to varied travel conditions either driving or flying

• Excellent work ethic and time management skills needed

• Must be accessible via telephone, and promptly return email and phone messages
• Travel by vehicle or airplane within assigned geography, overnight travel may be required

Essential Job Requirements

• Excellent Customer Service skills

• Basic Excel, Word skills

• Knowledge of Windows platforms

• Advanced mechanical skills

• Advanced troubleshooting skills to resolve equipment issues utilizing drawings, operational characteristics, and technical documentation

• Ability to learn troubleshooting and problem-solving procedures
• Able and willing to lift up to 50 lbs
• Ability to walk, climb, stand, carry materials, stoop, kneel, bend at waist
• Must be able to climb a ladder

• Exhibit mature, independent judgment with little or no direct supervision
• Effectively communicate through written and verbal reports to customer and direct supervision regarding worksite status

Education
Associate degree or Vocational technical training is strongly desired, Bachelors in related area preferred
Excellent mechanical and troubleshooting skills
Clean driving record with a valid drivers license
Job Summary

Packsize is a disruptive, fast-growth pioneer in the On Demand Packaging space. We are ferociously focused on Sustainability, Saving Forests, and lowering the Carbon Footprint of our Client Partners. Imagine a world where every box shipped downstream in a supply chain is exactly the right size for the product inside it. We arm our customers with the technology to do exactly that. As leaders in the technology space, we serve as a critical ally to companies looking to right size their packaging.

Salary and Benefits

Packsize offers a competitive benefits package including paid time off, Medical, Dental, Vision, Short Term/Long Term Disability, Life, and 401(k) matching.

Packsize is an Equal Opportunity employer and is committed to diversity in its workforce. In compliance with applicable federal and state laws, Packsize policy of equal employment opportunity prohibits discrimination on the basis of race or ethnicity, religion, color, national origin, sex, age, sexual orientation, gender identity/expression, veterans status, status as a qualified person with a disability, or genetic information. Individuals from historically underrepresented groups, such as minorities, women, qualified persons with disabilities, and protected veterans are strongly encouraged to apply. Reasonable accommodations in the application process will be provided to qualified individuals with disabilities.

About Packsize

Founded in 2002 and headquartered in Salt Lake City, UT, Packsize is the worlds leading provider of lean packaging systems for businesses with complex corrugated packaging needs. Recognized by Inc. 5000, ranked by Deloittes Technology Fast 500, and listed by Forbes as One of Americas Most Promising Companies, Packsize delivers an alternative to the existing corrugated supply chain with On Demand Packaging®.",3.7,"Packsize
3.7","New Brunswick, NJ",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2002,Company - Private,Industrial Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
113,Senior Systems Software Engineer Database Operations at Vertica (US - REMOTE),$88k-$130k (Glassdoor Est.),"Senior Systems Software Engineer Database Operations at Vertica (US - REMOTE)

Job Description:
Title: Senior Systems Software Engineer Database Operations at Vertica (US - REMOTE)

Location: Remote Eligible

Vertica believes that each of us knows the work environment that makes us the most productive. Thats why we provide our employees with the ability to work how and where they will be the most successful. We enable a flexible approach to work location, meaning for roles where it makes sense, you can work from the office or from home, or a combination of both, but you make that choice including where you choose to live. Vertica invests in the best technologies and provides flexible benefits and collaborative work environments to empower employees to work productively in the setting that meets their personal needs. Thats why were so proud to have a highly productive and engaged team in every function of the company.

About your role
The Vertica Ecosystem Team is looking for an experienced software engineer and python expert to help us take our Big Data Analytics Platform to the next level.

Our team is responsible for the components that enable deployment and operation of our distributed database: installation, upgrade, orchestration, administration, configuration, and diagnostics. Our users experience these parts of the product first and rely on these components during critical points in their deployments lifetime. In this role you will make contributions that impact Verticas entire customer base and help us expand to new customers who want to deploy in novel ways.

We need a self-directed engineer who is capable of solving problems in diverse areas, including:
Distributed systems
Systems programming
Networking
Operating system integration
The candidates responsibilities will include:
Design and implement features in the Vertica Analytics Platform to improve distributed database installation, upgrade, orchestration, administration, configuration, and diagnostics
Define requirements for new features in collaboration with Product Managers, Support Engineers, and customers
Diagnose, debug, and resolve product issues discovered during the development process and coming from customers
Influence the design of other in-database features based on their interaction with the deployment mechanisms
Provide technical leadership and support for junior members of the team by conducting thorough design and code reviews
The recommended requirements the candidate should meet are:
Bachelor, Masters, or PhD in Computer Science, Engineering, or related field
At least 4 years of experience working full time as a software engineer
Strong understanding of data structures, algorithms, and software engineering practices for sustainable development
Strong working knowledge of python3
Experience writing software for Linux and working on the command line
Familiarity with popular cloud deployment, provisioning and infrastructure-as-code tools

About our team
The best ideas often come from fresh perspectives. At Vertica, our open-minded, diverse and inclusive team is always learning from each other. We approach intellectually challenging work with a ""get it done"" attitude. Vertica Engineers are given significant latitude and support to pursue what they are passionate about to make Vertica an even better place. If you are excited about building great technology with a proactive team, you will find yourself in good company at Vertica. Welcome to the family.
About our product
Vertica is a recognized leader in analytics powering some of the worlds most data driven organizations like Uber, Wayfair, Intuit, Cerner, and more. Our columnar, MPP, distributed database delivers unprecedented speed, petabyte scale, with analytics and machine learning functions built into the core.
We believe the future belongs to the fast. Join us for the ride!

#LI-GC2
#DiceGC

Job:

Engineering

Micro Focus is proud to be an Equal Opportunity Employer. Prospective employees will receive consideration without discrimination because of race, colour, religion, creed, gender, national origin, age, disability, marital or veteran status, sexual orientation, genetic information, citizenship or any other legally protected status",3.3,"Micro Focus
3.3","Cambridge, MA",-1,10000+ Employees,1976,Company - Public,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
114,"Senior Software Engineer, Applied Machine Learning",-1,"Every day, SmartNews analyzes millions of URLs to deliver the top articles that matter in near-real time to millions of users around the world. Our News Ranking team, along with our AI Foundation team, works on a range of recommendation and optimization problems, e.g. news feed ranking, push recommendation, search ranking/discovery, collaborative filtering, personalized recommendation, diversification to deliver the world's quality information to the people who need it.

Responsibilities

This is a hybrid of system engineering and machine learning role:
Propose machine learning initiatives to fuel our business growth, build end to end machine learning framework/solution to improve our KPI/metrics
Write server-side production code for applications that are robust and efficient
Develop machine learning algorithms, combining with rule-based optimization to deliver improvement in product metrics
Build recommendation and ranking algorithms for news articles
Develop toolings to make ML engineers to be more productive
Lead medium/large sized projects to improve news ranking
Requirements

Minimum Qualifications
3+ years of experience in designing and implementing machine learning algorithms, and applying them to real world problems
Solid Machine Learning background and deep understanding of certain domain of machine learning techniques, especially in natural language processing, recommendation systems, computer visions
Strong software development skills with proven record of shipping changes to production that improved product metrics with machine learning technologies
Able to have deep end-to-end understanding of sophisticated ranking systems and can proactively detect problems and make improvement suggestions
Good written and spoken communication skills, can work across functional teams
Expert coding abilities in multiple programming languages (e.g. Java, C++, Python, Scala)
MS or BS in computer science, mathematics, physics or other quantitative fields
Preferred Qualifications
Experience with cloud based architecture (e.g. Amazon Web Services)
Strong interest in news media and our mission
Benefits
Equity included
100% medical, dental and vision insurance coverage (60% coverage for dependents)
Monthly housing, commute, mobile phone and gym allowances
401k matching program
Free lunch, snacks, drinks, etc.
Pet friendly office",4.6,"SmartNews, Inc.
4.6","San Francisco, CA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2012,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
115,Software Engineer (StudentTracker 3.0),$48k-$103k (Glassdoor Est.),"This position is funded through December 31, 2021.

About the Role:


We are seeking a Java full stack developer that is willing and able to learn other technologies, new, existing, and old. Then apply this desire and experience in a large data centric environment to support our mission and vision. In this role, you conduct analysis, design, development, testing, and debugging of Clearinghouse database-driven application programs. You will assist the development team in providing comprehensive support for existing and new applications, and offer expertise regarding methods, standards and technical considerations for software applications.

The Clearinghouse is planning on modernizing its application portfolio to be hosted in a hybrid cloud environment from its current on-premise environment. This modernization effort will also include migrating to an open source technology stack. This position works in an Agile/Scrum environment where the focus is on the teamwork and ownership of each project. The ideal incumbent has a drive for learning new things and is passionate about engineering end-to-end technical solutions. A commitment to collaborative problem solving, sophisticated design, and product quality are essential.

How You Contribute:
Analyze, design, develop, test, and debug web and/or cloud based multi-tier database-driven Java applications and components to support business requirements. Testing is inclusive of automated testing as part of an automated test suite which has been adopted by the development team.
Any code developed is expected to conform to defensive coding practices that supports the OWASP Top 10 and is evaluated for security (e.g., cross site scripting, SQL injection) and improper coding practices by tools from the Burp Suite, SonarQube and Fortify.
Collaborate with project team members to deliver technical solutions.
Build reusable code and libraries for future use.
Develop and optimize applications for maximum speed and scalability. Applications may have performance SLAs that must be met.
Create and maintain technical and knowledgebase documentation.
Diagnose problems, troubleshoot, and develop technical solutions.
Solve problems independently with minimal technical or managerial guidance.
Support production issues as required.
Demonstrate NSC’s competencies, which align with our corporate value
Core Competencies include: Customer Focus, Optimizes Work Processes, Collaborates, Communicates Effectively, and Be Open and Authentic
Manager will provide more detail to candidates as needed.
Position may be required to perform other duties as required. These essential functions are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the job. Reasonable accommodations will be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform these essential functions.

What You Bring to the Table:
Bachelor’s degree in Computer Engineering, Computer Science, or a related field. A combination of education and experience, including through military service will also be considered.
Proficiency with a combination of the following (typically acquired by 4-7 years of experience):
Strong Java programming, hands-on professional software development, hands-on SQL, and experience with building end-to-end solutions with front-end frameworks and integration with backend data services using API Web/REST Services.
Maintaining code quality and security standards using tools such as SonarQube, Fortify, and/or Crucible.
Agile/Scrum procedures and processes.
Analyzing, troubleshooting, and debugging issues in a Production environment.
MVC frameworks and/or multi-tier architectures.
Application/web server/cloud environment.
Strong analytical skills and attention to detail.
Excellent written, verbal, and Interpersonal skills, with a proven track record of working effectively both in a team environment and independently.
Live within a commutable distance of Herndon, VA.
Additional Desired Requirements:

Demonstrated experience:
Working in large data centric application environment and detailed understanding business tier modeling, data flows, data architecture and real-time/batch-based processing.
Developing cloud-based applications using open source technology, containers, and microservices.
With software such as Tableau, Postgres, Glue, Redshift, Semarchy, Docker, Kubernetes, or AWS products.
Certification as an AWS Developer/AWS Solutions Architect.
Physical Demands:

Use of a computer for 8 or more hours a day.
Use of a copy machine and telephone.
Frequently required to sit for 7 or more hours per day in close proximity to others in an open office environment.
Occasionally required to use hands and fingers to operate, handle, and reach.
Vision abilities include close vision and the ability to adjust focus.
Travel via car, train and airplane when needed.
Occasional overtime and work on weekends may be necessary to support production deployment.",3.1,"National Student Clearinghouse
3.1","Herndon, VA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1993,Nonprofit Organization,Colleges & Universities,Education,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
116,Senior Full Stack Engineer/ Leader,-1,"Position Summary: Senior Full Stack Engineer/Leader
The Opportunity: Leadership at an extremely innovative cloud security startup
Must Have Requirements:
8+ years of SW development building highly available enterprise systems
6+ years of full stack development. Experience to include the following:
React: Multi-page web applications using React and Material
Python, Golang, NodeJS, etc.
Client-side JavaScript, CSS, SQL
4+ years of cloud development experience; ideally with AWS
Must be a Player/Coach
Prolific coder with demonstrable experience as a system level architect
Leadership experience with multiple direct reports
Ability to create realistic schedules and manage cross disciplinary projects
Demonstrable experience managing off-shore teams either contracted or FTEs
Detailed Job Description
This is an opportunity for a skilled architect and full stack developer to work alongside a team of creative and talented software engineers who are building an industry-leading, cloud-native, next generation email security platform. Help us beat bad actors and make a difference to millions of users.
The ideal candidate will be comfortable working with a multi-tenant, highly scalable, microserviced infrastructure with demonstrable experience therein. In addition to contributing significantly to product development, the successful candidate will be comfortable mentoring other members of the team, serving as a key voice in the product management process, and helping to ensure on-time delivery of high-quality code which protects our customers’ mission critical communication systems.
The ideal candidate has the following additional experience:
Tools including the following:
Kubernetes, Docker, Jaeger, Jenkins, etc.
ElasticSearch, Redis, PostgreSQL, Cassandra, etc.
Kafka, RabbitMQ, nginx, Kubernetes, Docker
HA architectural development experience
Bonus: Cybersecurity and startup experience

Team
You will be joining a highly talented team made up of security start-up experts who care deeply about their customers. This team is passionate about safeguarding the mission critical communication capabilities of businesses globally. We are fanatically driven to make one of the most basic communication modalities, email, safe and secure to use in a world which is not only constantly evolving, but which is constantly under attack with phishing attempts, identity theft, ransomware, and more.
We are a “work family”. As such, we are highly selective as to who we ask to join. However, if we mutually agree that it makes sense, you will be joining a highly collaborative, supportive, skilled, thoughtful, and intellectually curious group of people who are focused on making GreatHorn a great place to work!
Benefits
We offer competitive salaries, stock options, medical, vision, and dental insurance, a matched 401k, unlimited vacation time, a fully stocked kitchen, and weekly catered team lunches.
About GreatHorn
GreatHorn is disrupting the email security industry to better protect organizations against advanced email threats through modern data analytics, machine learning, and cloud-native design. Our execution of this mission has driven triple-digit growth for three years in a row, and we’re poised to accelerate that growth in the coming year.
Run by a team of cybersecurity veterans with a track record of success, we solve a pervasive problem with smart technology, employ clever people with common sense from diverse backgrounds, and adhere to a “No A**holes” policy. If that sounds like a place you’d fit in, we hope you’ll come join us!
We believe strongly in diversity, and seek to recognize, develop, and support talent from all backgrounds.
To apply for this position, email your resume to jluciani@greathorn.com",4.8,"GreatHorn
4.8","Waltham, MA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2015,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
117,Principal Static Analysis Software Engineer,-1,"Position Overview: At Praetorian, we are collectively joining the world's cybersecurity expertise to address one of the great technical opportunities of our era: to be safe and secure in a digital-first world. From cryptocurrency exchanges to autonomous vehicles, we apply expertise and engineering to find, fix, stop, and ultimately solve cybersecurity problems across our customers' digital landscape and product portfolios. Our accolades include Inc's Best Places to Work and Fastest Growing Companies for 7 years running. Our employees are concerted innovators who put our customers first and care about doing real and permanent good.

As part of that investment, Praetorian is seeking a Principal Static Analysis Software Engineer that specializes in the intricacies of programming languages. As an Inc. Best Places to Work, Inc. 500 | 5000, Cybersecurity 500, and Austin Fast 50 Award recipient, we are seeking a person that appreciates the professional and personal growth attached to this opportunity and who has the corresponding internal drive to maximize it. You will have the opportunity to work with some of the best security engineers in the world who hail from organizations such as Amazon, CIA, Facebook, Google, Microsoft, NSA, Sun Microsystems., and US Air Force.

To learn more about Praetorian, visit: https://www.praetorian.com/careers Career opportunity:
Join an industry with massive socio, economic, and political importance in the 21st century
Partner with prominent clients and help them solve hard security problems
Work alongside some of the best and the brightest minds in the security industry
Leave an indelible mark on a company where a persons input has a real impact
Be recognized, internally and publicly, for your contributions in a high profile position
Align your career trajectory with a hyper-growth company that is on the move
Be part of the initial team designing and building out this product
Work alongside some of the best minds in Machine Learning to help them build models that find security vulnerabilities better than standard static analysis
Qualifications:
Fluent in programming languages, abstract representations, compiler theory, and assembly
Fluent in static analysis, pointer analysis, and taint analysis
Fluent in data flow and control flow analysis
Fluent with modern tech stacks and development practices
Bachelors in computer science or computer engineering
Desired qualifications:
Fluent with micro-services architectures
Fluent with Google Compute, Docker, Kubernetes
Fluent with agile/scrum development
Fluent with test driven development, unit testing, and continuous integration
Masters or PhD in computer science or computer engineering
Desired behaviors:
Relentless restlessness to improve precision and scalability of the platform
Ability to maintain high levels of output and work ethic
A personable person who enjoys working in a team-oriented environment
Comfort dealing with ambiguity in an environment where we build the plane as we fly it
Ability to work within constraints and to test the status quo
Ability to self-direct work, orient to action, and truly own the position in a hyper-growth environment
Compensation package:
Highly competitive base-salary
16 weeks of fully paid maternity and paternity leave
Eligible for performance-based incentive compensation
Employee stock option plan
Health insurance
4% company 401K matching vested immediately
Company contributions to training and conferences
In compliance with federal law, all persons hired will need to verify identity and eligibility to work in the United States and to complete the needed employment eligibility verification document form upon hire.

We are committed to an inclusive and diverse Praetorian. We are an equal opportunity employer. We do not discriminate based on race, ethnicity, color, ancestry, national origin, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, disability, veteran status, genetic information, marital status, or any other legally protected status.

We ask that you please include a few paragraphs about yourself and what you are passionate about in your application.",4.7,"Praetorian
4.7",Remote,-1,51 to 200 Employees,2010,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
118,Lead Front End Engineer,$95k-$207k (Glassdoor Est.),"About Alteryx


Alteryx develops software for data preparation and analysis, including a number of server solutions for model deployment, collaborative work on data, and scheduling of automatic data processing. We're revolutionizing data analytics by providing a complete end to end, self-service platform that allows users to get from business questions to business answers at incredible speeds. Why work for just any analytics company? At Alteryx, we are explorers, dreamers and innovators. We're on a journey to build the best analytics platform in the world, but we can't do it without people like you leading the way. We want Alteryx to be recognized as much for our dynamic work culture as for our products.

About Alteryx Innovation Labs


The Innovation Labs office, Alteryx's first office presence in Boston, was started earlier this year by the acquisition of MIT-spinout Feature Labs. This rapidly growing team combines the excitement of being part of a fast-paced, innovative startup with the resources, market penetration, and wisdom of a data analytics market leader. Our goal is to turbo-charge machine learning and data science efforts on the Alteryx platform, and to enable anyone to solve dynamic problems. We are working on high-impact, high-visibility projects, and we’re looking for collaborative and knowledge-hungry teammates who want to join us as we work to democratize machine learning.

Overview


As a Lead Front End Engineer, you will lead the Innovation Labs’ front end development efforts on a new web-based data science product. In this role, you will have the opportunity to problem solve, drive projects to success, communicate with stakeholders, and learn from both success and failures as part of a dynamic, friendly and ambitious team with technical influence throughout Alteryx and beyond.

Responsibilities
Architect large scale projects using modern Javascript frames (React and Redux)
Work closely with UI/UX team to provide feedback on designs and transform them into functioning user-facing products
Work closely with Product and Engineering leadership on the technical and product roadmap
Consume and inform the design of machine learning and data science APIs that powers the application
Incorporate user feedback to improve the product
Author new features, from conception and design to implementation and testing
Promote a culture of rigorous software development practice and high quality standards
Mentor and coach up more junior team members
***The company will not provide sponsorship for work visas or other employment authorization for this position***
Requirements
7+ years of experience in front-end web development
Track record of sharing knowledge with team members through mentoring, code reviews, pair programming, and presentations
Experience writing production-quality code in Javascript, including a recent React project
Experience writing clear and effective documentation
Experience with Git, Amazon Web Services (EC2, S2, Lambda)
Experience with automated testing and tools like Jest, Cypress, CircleCI, Github Actions, Selenium, etc.
Bonus
Built and maintained a component library
Experience with data visualization
Experience with API design
Demonstrated (in your portfolio) eye for design and solving real-world user problems
Working knowledge with other server/web technologies (Python, NodeJS, Java, etc.)
Contributions to open-source frameworks and/or libraries
Perks
100% company-paid medical, dental, and vision for associates
Health plans that cover your family and pets
Company matched 401(k)
Associate stock purchase plan
Paid time off: 3 weeks’ vacation, 5 sick days, 9 holidays, 3 floating holidays, and 20 hours volunteer time
100% paid parental leave
Tuition reimbursement
Wellness programs with up to $300 fitness reimbursement annually
Collaborative offices stocked with healthy snacks and drinks
Office events, catered lunches, and happy hours
#LI-JE1",3.6,"Alteryx
3.6","Boston, MA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1997,Company - Public,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
119,Principal DevOps Engineer,$135k-$163k (Glassdoor Est.),"At Tamr we believe that clean, up to date data is the linchpin of making informed decisions. We assert that the best way to have accurate data is via human guided machine learning system, that improves over time. We believe that human intelligence can not be replaced by machines. We are building the core set of tools, to enable companies to leverage their existing domain expertise and data, to produce clean, up to date data to be used as fuel to make better decisions and deliver transformational business outcomes.

We are currently looking for a Principal DevOps Engineer to join our DevOps team as we continue to evolve the Tamr Platform. With our growing customer base and increasing demand for additional services, we are growing our Devops team to focus on supporting the development of new products, deploying to new cloud environments, incorporating third party integrations and tools to enable product engineering.
As a member of the DevOps team some of the project you will be working on are:
Develop highly scalable, cloud native architectures for large data pipelines
Build out Tamr Platform as a Service (PaaS) to deploy and monitor scaled out Tamr deployments in the cloud
Enhance observability of our platform in the cloud via distributed tracing and other technologies
Enable the engineering team to build scalable, performant, reliable, & secure software
Support in establishing DevSecOps and Chaos Engineering as core disciplines of Product Engineering
Overhauling our build and deployment pipeline (CI/CD) to utilize open source platforms and tools to support a core platform and the many applications built on the platform
You might be a good fit if you have 2 or more of the below:
7+ years of experience in DevOps/Systems Administration with 5+ years of experience with Linux/Unix systems administration
3+ years of experience with cloud-based provisioning, monitoring, and troubleshooting (preferably AWS or Azure)
3+ years of hadoop experience1+ year(s) of k8s experience
Experience with configuration management tools (we use ansible + puppet)
Experience with infrastructure automation tools like CloudFormation or Terraform
Experience with one or more scripting languages such as Python
Minimum Bachelor degree in Computer Science or equivalent
Technologies we use:
Multi-cloud (GCP/AWS/Azure)
Terraform/Ansible/Puppet
Kubernetes
Big Data Technologies (BigTable/Hbase, Dataproc/Databricks/Spark)
Postgres
Java, Python, Scala
Additional Information

This position is available in Cambridge MA. Tamr does sponsor employees requiring a visa.

Tamr provides equal employment opportunities (EEO) to all employees and applicants for employment without regard to race, color, religion, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, national origin, age, disability, genetic information, marital status, amnesty, or status as a covered veteran in accordance with applicable federal, state and local laws.",4.3,"Tamr
4.3","Boston, MA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2013,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
120,Sr. Controls Software Engineer,$77k-$157k (Glassdoor Est.),"Job Title: Sr. Controls Software Engineer
Location: Wilsonville, OR
Department: Engineering
Job Type: Full-Time
DWFritz
DWFritz Automation has been engineering and building precision automation solutions for over 45 years. In the last 10 years, we have grown our global footprint with employees and clients in the U.S., Asia, and Europe, while diversifying the industries we serve.
What’s our secret to success?
We're the company that can solve the challenges that nobody else can. We do so by hiring incredibly talented employees who innovate through team-work.
Why would you want to work here?
We are a progressive company that continually strives towards being world-class in our practices, cutting-edge with our technology, and empowering with our leadership. We believe in big things, because we believe in our employees who impress us every day with their ideas and their execution.
Our World Headquarters operates from a modern, state-of-the-art facility located in Wilsonville, Oregon. Our employees enjoy standing desks, a recreation room, a fitness room, and a hearty oatmeal breakfast to start each day. Our spacious lunch room is the venue for weekly All Staff meetings and our frequent “Lunch and Learns.”
We also know how to have fun at DWFritz. From ping-pong tournaments and monthly socials to working with our community through our RISE program and paid volunteer day, we know well how to work and play together. We hope you get the chance to visit our building and experience a culture that is unlike any other.

Your Challenge

The Senior Controls Software Engineer is a challenging, high visibility position that will utilize your experience and software skills and allow you to work with high-level automation technologies within a project team to develop cutting edge automation equipment. These systems include features such as:
Real time PC control architecture.
Sophisticated machine vision software.
Sub-micron PID Servo motion control.
4 to 6-axis robot integration.
High Level Custom GUI.
2D and 3D Laser Metrology.
Your Responsibilities
Architects, designs, codes, tests, and maintains complex software applications.
Develops detailed software design specifications for assigned projects.
Maintains state-of-the-art knowledge in software design, testing techniques, and software development tools.
Provides design guidelines, and general and detailed software design specifications to other software engineers.
Assists in project schedule development.
Suggests new and innovative approaches to solving problems.
Interfaces with customers during quoting, specification, design-review, buy-off, and installation phases.
Participates to develop company processes, procedures, and standards.
Drives personal or company vehicle to customers’ facilities for project meetings, design reviews, start-up training, and follow-up review.
Your Qualifications
Excellent organizational, problem solving, and time management skills.
Excellent software development skills.
Excellent C#.NET/C++ programming skills (min 8 years of experience).
Excellent C#.NET GUI development skills.
Ability to actively participate in team development and team-oriented processes and motivate others to do the same.
Excellent usage of Version Control Software (GIT, VSS, Subversion, etc.).
Excellent Machine Vision applications skills (Cognex Vision Pro/Insight, Keyence CV/XG, Halcon, OpenCV).
Ability to startup and debug complex systems.
Ability to read electrical schematics.
Familiarity with SQL database schemas, design and software interfacing.
Ability to derive solutions to complex problems.
Proficient with Statistical Analysis.
Able to integrate into an existing software engineering team environment.
Able to use existing standards, procedures, and practices.
Excellent written and verbal communication skills.
Attention to detail and accuracy.
Ability to work under pressure to meet project deadlines in a multi-tasking environment.
Sense of urgency to meet project schedules.
Ability to maintain confidentiality.
PC-based machine controls.
Servo based motion control.
Use Microsoft software – Word, Excel, Outlook, PowerPoint, Visio, etc.
Must possess a valid driver’s license, acceptable driving record, and proof of current vehicle insurance.
Requires domestic/international travel for installation and support. Typically 3, 3-week trips/year.
Must be eligible for or have a valid passport.
Your Education and Experience
BSEE or BSME (MS a plus).
Minimum 10 years recent manufacturing programming experience.
Experience with machine control, C#.NET, vision and motion control programming skills highly desired.
Experience integrating software with Scara and 6-Axis robots.
Experience with software project management.
PLC programming skills a plus.
Equal Opportunity Statement
DWFritz is an equal opportunity employer. In accordance with applicable law, the company prohibits discrimination based on race, color, religion, creed, gender, pregnancy or related medical conditions, age, national origin or ancestry, physical or mental disability, sexual orientation, genetic information, uniformed service or any other consideration protected by federal state and local laws. Our commitment to equal opportunity employment applies to all persons involved in our operations and prohibits unlawful discrimination by any employee.
DWFritz is not currently sponsoring work visas for this role. Authorization to work in the U.S. is required to be considered.",3.4,"DWFritz
3.4","Wilsonville, OR",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1973,Company - Private,Electrical & Electronic Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
121,Senior System Software Engineer at Vertica (US - REMOTE),$66k-$131k (Glassdoor Est.),"Senior System Software Engineer at Vertica (US - REMOTE)
Job Description:
Title: Senior System Software Engineer at Vertica (US - REMOTE)
Location: Remote Eligible
About your role
Youll work on the execution engine of an analytics database that is used by thousands of enterprise customers, around the world, each with unique requirements.
Youll implement high-performance, scalable, and distributed execution frameworks capable of crunching petabytes of data. Use your algorithmic skills to tune low-level system code and make queries run orders of magnitude faster, using fewer resources, and increasing the overall query throughput.
Its an exciting time to join the team. There is high demand for innovative functionality and our engineers are constantly thinking of new ways to do things faster.
Required skills
C and an object-orientated language (e.g. C++ or Java)
Proficient with multi-threaded applications
Customer focused with the ability to work in a cross-functional team with QA, documentation and others
Advanced knowledge of algorithms and data structures
Excellent communication
Desired skills
Database internals
Distributed systems
Operating systems
Ability to read assembly
Willingness and ability to mentor interns and junior team members
SQL, Postgres, SQL Server, Oracle
About our team
The best ideas often come from fresh perspectives. At Vertica, our open-minded, diverse and inclusive team is always learning from each other. We approach intellectually challenging work with a ""get it done"" attitude. Vertica Engineers are given significant latitude and support to pursue what they are passionate about to make Vertica an even better place. If you are excited about building great technology with a proactive team, you will find yourself in good company at Vertica. Welcome to the family.
About our product
Vertica is a recognized leader in analytics powering some of the worlds most data driven organizations like Uber, Wayfair, Intuit, Cerner, and more. Our columnar, MPP, distributed database delivers unprecedented speed, petabyte scale, with analytics and machine learning functions built into the core.
We believe the future belongs to the fast. Join us for the ride!
#LI-GC2
#DiceGC

Job:
Engineering
Micro Focus is proud to be an Equal Opportunity Employer. Prospective employees will receive consideration without discrimination because of race, colour, religion, creed, gender, national origin, age, disability, marital or veteran status, sexual orientation, genetic information, citizenship or any other legally protected status",3.3,"Micro Focus
3.3","Cambridge, MA",-1,10000+ Employees,1976,Company - Public,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
122,Data Scientist,$59k-$101k (Glassdoor Est.),"Data Scientist, St. Louis, MO

***No c2c or sponsorship, must be our W2 employee***

Required Skills / Experience:

• MS in computer science, machine learning, statistics, genetics, animal/plant breeding, or closely-related field with at least 1 year of industry experience

• Strong code development experience with R and Python for 3+ year

• Strong object-oriented programming (OOP) and design experience

• Strong in SQL and experience with big data ecosystem

• Experience with coding best practices, version control and documentation

• Problem solver and analytical thinking

• Commitment to ensuring data quality and accuracy and attention to detail

• Strong business aptitude, the ability to rapidly learn new problem domains, and become conversant in the domain with subject matter experts.

• Strong organizational, interpersonal skills with proven ability to communicate complex qualitative analysis in clear, concise, and precise manner.

Desired Skills / Experience:

• PhD in computer science, machine learning, statistics, genetics, animal/plant breeding, or closely-related field

• Experience with AWS, docker and other automation tools

• Experience with workflow orchestration

• Knowledge of plant breeding and genomic prediction

• Experience with web development",4.5,"Envision LLC
4.5","Saint Louis, MO",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1994,Company - Private,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
123,DevOps Engineer - TS or TS/SCI Required,-1,"General Duties:
Support the analysis, design, development, integration, verification and validation of a large complex scientific mission system. The primary responsibility will be requirements analysis with mission subject matter experts (SMEs), engineers, and other program stakeholders. Secondary responsibilities include the evaluation of hardware and software components for integration into the system. Both responsibilities (requirements analysis and component evaluations) will require familiarity with the current on-premise solution (physical hardware) and the planned cloud-hosted platform (Amazon Web Services).

Required Experience:
5+ years using Software Development Life Cycle (SDLC) in an Agile Model
5+ years eliciting, refining, explaining and vetting system requirements
5+ years conducting hardware and software component evaluations
5+ years working with Linux-based systems
2+ years supporting programs that leverage Amazon Web Services
2+ years scripting or coding in BASH, Python, Ruby, Perl, or Java
1+ years working with Puppet or Ansible
Must work well in teams
Desired Skills:
Familiarity with Tomcat Web Application deployment
Familiarity with stateless RESTful Architecture
Familiarity with basic AWS Services such as EC2, S3, IAM, RDS and CloudWatch
Familiarity with industry standard commodity hardware for information systems (servers, storage, network devices)
Familiarity with industry standard software products for information systems (e.g. operating systems and databases)
Experience with Terraform
Experience with GIT, Bitbucket and Jenkins
Experience with Agile (Scrum) development processes and tools including Confluence and Jira.
Education/Experience Level:
Bachelors Degree
Certifications Required: None, but AWS certifications are highly desirable
Clearance:
US Citizenship Required - TS or TS/SCI required

BENEFITS OFFERED:


Medical, Dental, Vision Insurance - 100% Company-Paid Premiums
STD, LTD, and Life Insurance - 100% company paid
401K Additional 10% salary contribution immediately vested
Bonus Plan
PTO - 4 weeks/year
Holidays - 10 paid/year
Birthdays off with pay
Upfront and Recurring Referral Bonuses
Education Reimbursement
Paid Parental Leave
ABOUT PHOENIX OPERATIONS GROUP:
Phoenix Operations Group is a high-end engineering services company dedicated to protecting and advancing our national intelligence, defense and scientific interests. As a small start-up operating out of the Baltimore/Washington DC area, we rely on innovation to continually advance our employees' skills and provide game-changing solutions to our customers.

Our technical competencies include Big Data analytics, Cloud Computing infrastructure, Machine Learning, Multi-INT visualization, and enterprise architectures. We believe in open-source initiatives, agile development processes, and arming analysts with amazing capabilities. For more information, visit us at: https://phoenix-opsgroup.com

Phoenix Operations Group is an Equal Opportunity Employer. Phoenix Operations Group does not discriminate on the basis of race, religion, color, sex, gender, gender identity, sexual orientation, age, non-disqualifying physical or mental disability, national origin, veteran status or any other basis covered by appropriate law. All employment is decided on the basis of qualifications, merit, and business need.",5.0,"Phoenix Operations Group
5.0","Charleston, SC",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2011,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1
124,Sr. Software Engineer - Open Source Tools,$82k-$159k (Glassdoor Est.),"About Alteryx


Alteryx develops software for data preparation and analysis, including a number of server solutions for model deployment, collaborative work on data, and scheduling of automatic data processing. We're revolutionizing data analytics by providing a complete end to end, self-service platform that allows users to get from business questions to business answers at incredible speeds. Why work for just any analytics company?

At Alteryx, we are explorers, dreamers and innovators. We're on a journey to build the best analytics platform in the world, but we can't do it without people like you leading the way. We want Alteryx to be recognized as much for our dynamic work culture as for our products.

About Alteryx Innovation Labs


The Innovation Labs office, Alteryx's first office presence in Boston, was started earlier this year by the acquisition of MIT-spinout Feature Labs. This rapidly growing team combines the excitement of being part of a fast-paced, innovative startup with the resources, market penetration, and wisdom of a data analytics market leader. Our goal is to turbo-charge machine learning and data science efforts on the Alteryx platform, and to enable anyone to solve impactful problems. We are working on high-impact, high-visibility projects, and we’re looking for collaborative and knowledge-hungry teammates who want to join us as we work to democratize machine learning.


Overview


As a Senior Software Engineer, you will help the Open Source Tools team create and maintain innovative, open source tools for machine learning. Responsibilities you will encounter in this role include:
Working with other team members to design and implement new features for our tools
Create new open source libraries to complement our existing ones
Identifying the source of an issue a user is having with one of our libraries and implement a fix
Assisting community members in contributing changes of their own to our projects
Building integrations with other popular open source libraries such as pandas, scitkit-learn, or dask
Writing documentation and creating demos that communicate how to user our tool and the challenge it is trying to solve
Presenting our tools and technology at industry conferences such as PyCon and PyData
Performing peer code review
***The company will not provide sponsorship for work visas or other employment authorization for this position***
Requirements
BS or higher in Computer Science or equivalent
Extensive experience with Python development
Experience with data-related Python tools like numpy, scipy, pandas, scikit-learn, and dask
Work in our Boston office near Copley Square
Bonus
Contributed to or maintain open source libraries
Experience with performance testing machine learning systems
Experience with API design
Benefits and Perks
100% company-paid medical, dental, and vision for associates
Company matched 401(k)
Associate stock purchase plan
Paid time off: 3 weeks’ vacation, 5 sick days, 9 holidays, 3 floating holidays, and 20 hours volunteer time
100% paid parental leave
Tuition reimbursement
Wellness programs with up to $300 fitness reimbursement annually
Collaborative offices stocked with healthy snacks and drinks
Office events, catered lunches, and happy hours
#LI-JE1",3.6,"Alteryx
3.6","Boston, MA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1997,Company - Public,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
125,Principal Process Engineer / Environmental Compliance Manager,-1,"Alliance Finishing & Manufacturing (www.alliance-finishing.com) is Ventura County's leader in providing anodizing, electroplating and engineering services that help military, aerospace, healthcare and commercial manufacturers all over the world measurably improve equipment strength, reduce corrosion, and improve metal and plastic product aesthetics. We are Nadcap certified for chemical processing and our company has been in business for over 25 years. Our robust plating technology called “GreenPOP” resets the standard for what yields, adhesion and quality can be expected from plating on plastics and structural composites (www.alliance-finishing.com/plating-on-plastics).

THE ROLE:
*
The Principal Process Engineer / Environmental Compliance Manager at Alliance designs, optimizes, and troubleshoots our overall process activities to scale our proprietary chemical POP processes and ensures that the processes consistently produces the highest quality plating yields in a production environment. This position is ultimately responsible for process development engineering, maintaining and overseeing our company wide quality programs (e.g. Nadcap certification, audits), overseeing our process control laboratory and staff, and maintaining all aspects of environmental compliance, including maintaining both the documentation and management of properly controlling the generation, storage, and disposal of hazardous materials. You will also partner with company leadership to manage Nadcap compliance and Audits, and maintain all aspects of our Quality Program including maintenance of all quality documentation, industry/customer specifications and outside third party verification of quality control test panels. Successful candidates will enjoy making sure we’re staying up to date with all QA processes and procedures across the company. This will involve creating new shop travelers, being responsible for coordinating and obtaining monthly periodic test panels for outside lab verification, and maintaining all QA requirements for our Nadcap chemical processing certifications. In addition, when the General / Production Manager is unavailable, you will act as the Production Manager to ensure the overall successful operations of the plant.
*
RESPONSIBILITIES:

\* Maintaining the existing POP line for Ultem while facilitating the design of our new PEEK processing line to support customer expansion.

\* Environmental wastewater treatment and compliance (e.g. help implement, coordinate installation, train operator(s) to maintain and operate the zero discharge system).

\* Learn all aspects of our POP process in order to perform duties such as the design of new racks for incoming PEEK or other composite parts, manage all electrochemical plating issues related to current density (e.g. build current density robbers), fluid movement through anode baskets, basket design and placement for optimum throwing and even plating thickness across parts, and direct our chemist to support POP tank maintenance.

\* Be the main internal and external point of contact for Ultem and PEEK POP customers/ engineers/ operators and help design new processing capabilities in order to scale up new PEEK plating services. \* Partner with Lead POP Supervisor/Plater to lead weekly status update phone calls with customers and manage all weekly PO acceptances, ship dates, and be the primary customer support liaison for POP.

\* Take yield data generated from our Lead POP Plater and our Chemist related to our POP process and build custom excel reports for internal analysis as well as sharing this analysis with our customers for external consumption.

\* Lead and design engineering experiments to troubleshoot new composite plating techniques and or solve plating complications and drive process performance improvements including: optimization, cost reduction, training and coaching of plating personnel.

\* Manage the activities of about 10 chemical platers and inspectors working on the

production line.

\* Establish process controls to maintain robust process capabilities.

\* Manage all POP customers reporting to track our metrics related to quality, on time delivery, receipt of payment, and process chemistry.

\* Verify that the shop travelers reflect what the actual operators do based on materials that they are processing. If the shop travelers are not correct, amend them and if the operators are not performing the process correctly, train them to perform the process correctly.

\* Make sure that travelers (with input from Production Manager) are specific based upon the metal substrates they’re running (ferrous vs non-ferrous, copper, stainless steel, or other alloys such as Invar, etc.).

\* Ensure that all paperwork whether Nadcap or commercial is checked off and stamped correctly.

\* Verify with all inspectors that the inspection criteria as documented on the travelers and any quality control testing is being done correctly.

\* Organize operators and inspectors to ensure they are trained to use the necessary tools to perform their duties (e.g. calipers, copper sulfate testing for passivation, thickness testers, x-ray fluorescence machines, etc.)

\* Maintain or delegate all aspects of Company wide environmental compliance such as training wastewater operators and personnel handling hazardous waste, managing hazardous materials storage and disposal, and maintaining all record keeping documentation associated with waste storage and disposal (e.g. CUPA

inspections, manifest management, etc).

\* Perform monthly safety training to meet all local, state, and Federal requirements. This can be done via on the job training, or through MFASC management courses.

\* Maintain a safe work environment for personnel, plant equipment, and coordinate with maintenance staff to ensure the plant’s environmental integrity in terms of plant piping, and process equipment, and preventative maintenance of equipment or new equipment installations.
*
MINIMUM QUALIFICATIONS:

\* Must have a Bachelor’s degree or higher in Electrochemical, Chemical Engineering, or Materials Science or have sufficient work experience in lieu of degree.

\* Minimum 9 years of Leadership experience in a metal finishing environment. Familiar with ISO/AS9100 Quality systems, NADCAP shop travellers, MIL-spec plating and various aerospace and commercial aircraft quality/process control systems.

\* Familiarity with plating on military and high-end commercial parts, Ultem, PEEK and or ABS-PC plastics.

\* Ability to autonomously drive and prioritize multiple projects with limited direction.

\* Proven track-record of developing and deploying creative and practical process solutions for high-volume manufacturing.

\* Willingness to take responsibility and ownership to aggressively focus on problems either individually or part of a larger team.

\* Proven ability to analyze and make meaningful inferences from sometimes incomplete data.

\* Comfort working with a wide variety of different functions including R&D, Process Integration, and Operations to effectively accomplish tasks in a timely manner.

\* Excellent verbal and written communication skills.

\* Capability to adapt to the company's changing needs and priorities and be a self-motivated team player.

\* Demonstrated project management skills, including the ability to deliver projects on schedule, within budget, and meeting the predefined quality requirements. A big plus would be familiarity with third party registered accreditation like ISO 9000 or NADCAP.
*
PREFERRED QUALIFICATIONS:

\* Bilingual in Spanish and English preferred
*
BENEFITS:

\* Competitive Salary (Salaried position)

\* Vacation Pay

\* Sick Pay (3 days)

\* Holiday Pay

\* Medical/Dental Benefits

\* 401k Plan
*
EQUAL OPPORTUNITY EMPLOYER -- Alliance Finishing & Manufacturing does not discriminate on the basis of age, sex, sexual orientation, religion, national origin, marital status or disability status in its employment actions, decisions, policies and practices.
Job Type: Full-time
Pay: $75,000.00 - $90,000.00 per year

Experience:
chemical plating, anodizing or electroplating: 9 years (Required)
optimally utilizing manufacturing labor and plating line: 9 years (Required)
Education:
Bachelor's (Required)
Location:
Oxnard, CA (Required)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)",-1,Alliance Finishing & Manufacturing – 1721 Ives Avenue,"Oxnard, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
126,Lead Back End Engineer,$107k-$161k (Glassdoor Est.),"About Alteryx


Alteryx develops software for data preparation and analysis, including a number of server solutions for model deployment, collaborative work on data, and scheduling of automatic data processing. We're revolutionizing data analytics by providing a complete end to end, self-service platform that allows users to get from business questions to business answers at incredible speeds.

Why work for just any analytics company? At Alteryx, we are explorers, dreamers and innovators. We're on a journey to build the best analytics platform in the world, but we can't do it without people like you leading the way. We want Alteryx to be recognized as much for our dynamic work culture as for our products.

About Alteryx Innovation Labs


The Innovation Labs office, Alteryx's first office presence in Boston, was started earlier this year by the acquisition of MIT-spinout Feature Labs. This rapidly growing team combines the excitement of being part of a fast-paced, innovative startup with the resources, market penetration, and wisdom of a data analytics market leader. Our goal is to turbo-charge machine learning and data science efforts on the Alteryx platform, and to enable anyone to solve dynamic problems. We are working on high-impact, high-visibility projects, and we’re looking for collaborative and knowledge-hungry teammates who want to join us as we work to democratize machine learning.

Overview


As a Lead Back End Engineer you will you will lead the Innovation Labs’ back end development efforts on a new web-based data science product (sorry we can’t say much yet on what it is publicly, but we promise it’s great!). In this role, you will have the opportunity to problem solve, drive projects to success, communicate with stakeholders, and learn from both success and failures as part of a dynamic, friendly and ambitious team with technical influence throughout Alteryx and beyond.

Responsibilities
Work closely with Engineering Leadership to architect, design and develop the back end services, APIs and infrastructure to power this new application
Design and develop and deploy a robust data processing and ML API platform
Help to recruit, scale and mentor the back end engineering team
Define and promote a culture of rigorous software development practice and high quality standards
Work closely with Product and Front End counterparts to drive the product to completion
***The company will not provide sponsorship for work visas or other employment authorization for this position***
Requirements
7+ years of experience in building large scale web applications, ideally into a B2B and/or enterprise environment
3+ years in a Technical Leadership capacity
Experience writing production-quality code in a modern web framework/technology (Python, Node, Go, Scala, etc)
Experience writing clear and effective documentation
Experience in docker-based infrastructure on AWS (or another cloud provider).
Experience with automated testing and CI/CD platforms and tools like CircleCI, Selenium, etc.
Track record of sharing knowledge with team members through mentoring, code reviews, pair programming, and presentations.
Experience working with Product, Design, DevOps and other departments in a cross-functional way.
Bonus
Experience with Java/Scala and/or Python.
Startup experience (building products from 0→1 and 1->10).
Contributions to open-source frameworks and/or libraries.
Experience in ML/AI/Data Science python environment (sklearn/etc.)
Perks
100% company-paid medical, dental, and vision for associates
Health plans that cover your family and pets
Company matched 401(k)
Associate stock purchase plan
Paid time off: 3 weeks’ vacation, 5 sick days, 9 holidays, 3 floating holidays, and 20 hours volunteer time
100% paid parental leave
Tuition reimbursement
Wellness programs with up to $300 fitness reimbursement annually
Collaborative offices stocked with healthy snacks and drinks
Office events, catered lunches, and happy hours
#LI-JE1",3.6,"Alteryx
3.6","Boston, MA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1997,Company - Public,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
127,SR. RESEARCH ENGINEER,$59k-$85k (Glassdoor Est.),"Who We Are:


Providing design, development, and analysis on components, engines, transmissions, and vehicles, we also support research and modeling for fuel mixing, combustion, filtration, and fluid flow analysis. We are pioneers in measuring engine and vehicle exhaust emissions.


Objectives of this Role:

Serve as project leader and design engineer on in-cylinder flow, turbulence, combustion, and emissions from SI and CI engines.
Lead or facilitate projects involving 3D CFD to model engine after treatment system and battery. Offer technical leadership and direction to team developing new models or techniques to describe phenomena within an engine
Supervise reports and makes presentation summarizing test results to domestic and international clients.Interface with clients to define and coordinate projects, provide updates, and share results.
Manage CFD and other modeling and simulation tests. Prepare bids and promotional efforts as well as proposal presentation in the area of powertrain analysis. Develop long-term goals and projects for clients and internal research teams

Daily and Monthly Responsibilities:


Serve as project leader and design engineer on in-cylinder flow, turbulence, combustion, and emissions from SI and CI engines.
Lead or facilitate projects involving 3D CFD to model engine after treatment system and battery. Offer technical leadership and direction to team developing new models or techniques to describe phenomena within an engine
Supervise reports and makes presentation summarizing test results to domestic and international clients.Interface with clients to define and coordinate projects, provide updates, and share results.
Manage CFD and other modeling and simulation tests. Prepare bids and promotional efforts as well as proposal presentation in the area of powertrain analysis
Develop long-term goals and projects for clients and internal research teams

Requirements:


Requires a Masters or foreign equivalent, in Mechanical Engineering
Must have three years of post-baccalaureate mechanical engineering experience
The three years of experience must include experience with engine systems analysis related to in-cylinders, emissions, and aftertreatment in-cylinder CFD; 3D CFD software
Pro/E; modeling in-cylinder flow, turbulence, and emissions; aftertreatment systems; and modeling and simulation of engine systems
Must travel 10% domestically and internationally


Special Requirements:


Job Locations: San Antonio, Texas


An Equal Employment Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer
Race/Color/Religion/Sex/Sexual Orientation/Gender Identity/National Origin/Disabled/Veteran
Committed to Diversity in the Workplace
If you need assistance, please Contact Us",4.0,"Southwest Research Institute
4.0","San Antonio, TX",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1947,Nonprofit Organization,Research & Development,Business Services,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
128,X-Ray Tubes Senior Processing Engineer,$69k-$123k (Glassdoor Est.),"Job Summary: Sr. Process Engineer to work with Tubes Engineering team, comprised of Process Engineers, Design and Development Engineers, Scientists, and Engineering Technicians to support the development and sustainment of X-Ray tubes. The Sr. Process Engineer will work directly with engineering, logistics and production to incorporate new product into manufacturing and support manufacturing and production control in the continuous improvement to existing product. The Sr. Process Engineer will also be responsible for the mentoring and development of junior engineers and technicians.

Essential Functions:
Drives the gathering and analysis of data relating to engineering design, manufacturing & product support requirements.
Utilizes an advanced understanding of product design and build processes and applies standard methods and basic principles of Lean Product Development, Theory of Constraints and Project Management.
Coordinates the gathering of raw data and processes data and communicates in meaningful forms (e.g. Flow Charts, Pareto Charts, Control Charts) to capture current manufacturing yields as well as drive yield improvements.
Oversee the performance of processes and tests. Document the results of processes and tests.
Evaluate current processes and designs. Identify potential improvements and be able to evaluate the return on investment and risk associated with identified improvements.
Use problem solving and decision making tools to analyze a situation and determine the best course of action.
Support Materials Team with First Article reviews and communicate with vendors for non-conformity issues and to coordinate material and specification changes.
Detailed knowledge of UHV design and requirements, clean room operations, and machining technology.
Detailed knowledge of metal to ceramic brazing processes.
Strong understanding of electron optics and high voltage electric field interaction.
Education and Experience:
B.S. or M.S. in engineering field or science related discipline (ABET preferred)
10+ years of experience in micro-manufacturing environment (X-Ray tube manufacturing preferred)
Six Sigma and/or lean manufacturing training preferred.
DOE matrix creation and interpretation
Proficient in MS Office. Specifically: Excel, Word, Visio and Project.

Competencies:
To perform the job successfully, an individual should demonstrate the following competencies to perform the essential functions of this position.
Adaptability - understands changes in work-group tasks, situations, and the department as well as the logic or basis for change; actively seeks information about changes affecting their individual job. Treats changes and new situations as opportunities for learning or growth.
Engineering Processes - Advanced knowledge of responsibilities and tasks performed by various Engineering departments/disciplines (e.g., design, test, software, technology). Advanced knowledge of the interaction between departments/ disciplines and how their products/processes affect one another and impact non-engineering processes (e.g., Operations, Logistics, Business).
Motivation self-starter able to function with minimal supervision. Actively coordinates with others to proactively identify and resolve potential conflicts in order to meet defined project timelines.
Communication strong communication skills, both written and verbal.
Statistical Background strong understanding of various statistical tools and programs

design and development, x-ray tubes, ABET, x-ray manufacturing
Job Posted by ApplicantPro",3.2,"Moxtek
3.2","Orem, UT",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1986,Company - Private,Electrical & Electronic Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
129,Intern - Data Scientist - Product Management - Summer,$63k-$104k (Glassdoor Est.),"Lumen’s internship program is a 10 week, fast-paced and exciting opportunity to gain professional experience within your field of study and career interest. Interns within the Product Management Department will be part of an accelerated learning experience, to challenge skills learned in the classroom and develop new skills while working on active Lumen work projects. Interns within the Product Management group will be part of an accelerated learning experience, to challenge skills learned in the classroom and develop new skills while working on active Lumen work projects. Product Management leads the product strategy, financial targets, product requirements and go-to-market strategy for a product portfolio.The internship will take place in Tempe, AZ. In addition, interns will connect to our company culture through community outreach projects, engage with our employee resource groups and be able to develop their professional skills and business acumen through frequent exposure to senior leadership, cutting-edge technology, groundbreaking projects, and a network of mentors and fellow interns. Come Intern with us and create the beginnings of a career right for YOU!

Job Description

We are seeking problem solvers unafraid of big challenges, who have a passion for transforming data into valuable, actionable insights and are looking to help build something from the ground up and make an impact.

• Make data visually appealing and simple to both navigate and comprehend for end-users.
• Work cross functionally with Product Finance, Strategic Pricing, Financial Intelligence and IT team to build/implement analytic dashboards, models and intelligent automation.
• To discover, collect, cleanse, and enrich the data needed for analysis and modeling.
• Responsible for building advanced analytics models while utilizing structured and unstructured information.
• Identify key business levers, establish cause & effect, and communicate key findings to facilitate data driven decision-making.

Qualifications
Minimum Cumulative GPA: 3.0 or higher (preferred)
Enrolled at a 4-year accredited college or university, in a rising junior, rising senior, or masters level status at time of internship.
Graduating between August 2021 – May 2023
Education/Degree: In pursuit of a bachelor’s level degree in business, accounting or finance in a senior level status at the start of the internship. Master’s Degree preferred.
Strong sense of urgency and ability to meet deadlines
Ability to demonstrate ownership and accountability
Ability to collaborate and have agility while making effective decisions
Strong written and verbal communication skills
Flexible and adapts well to change
Professional appearance and attitude
Experience & Skills : PowerBI, Clickhouse, Tableau, Jupyter, Python, Perl, R, M, Javascript/JSON, SQL
Intern is responsible for their travel to/from work location
Must be available to work 30 – 40 hours, during the specified 10-week timeframe
US work authorization is required

Requisition #: 232796

EEO Statement
We are committed to providing equal employment opportunities to all persons regardless of race, color, ancestry, citizenship, national origin, religion, veteran status, disability, genetic characteristic or information, age, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity, marital status, family status, pregnancy, or other legally protected status (collectively, “protected statuses”). We do not tolerate unlawful discrimination in any employment decisions, including recruiting, hiring, compensation, promotion, benefits, discipline, termination, job assignments or training.

Disclaimer
The above job definition information has been designed to indicate the general nature and level of work performed by employees within this classification. It is not designed to contain or be interpreted as a comprehensive inventory of all duties, responsibilities, and qualifications required of employees assigned to this job. Job duties and responsibilities are subject to change based on changing business needs and conditions.",3.2,"Lumen
3.2","Tempe, AZ",-1,10000+ Employees,1930,Company - Public,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),-1
130,Senior Systems Software Engineer at Vertica (US - REMOTE),$66k-$131k (Glassdoor Est.),"Senior Systems Software Engineer at Vertica (US - REMOTE)

Job Description:
Title: Senior Systems Software Engineer at Vertica (US - REMOTE)

Location: Remote Eligible

Vertica believes that each of us knows the work environment that makes us the most productive. Thats why we provide our employees with the ability to work how and where they will be the most successful. We enable a flexible approach to work location, meaning for roles where it makes sense, you can work from the office or from home, or a combination of both, but you make that choice including where you choose to live. Vertica invests in the best technologies and provides flexible benefits and collaborative work environments to empower employees to work productively in the setting that meets their personal needs. Thats why were so proud to have a highly productive and engaged team in every function of the company.

About your role
Youll be part of the team that enables the database to scale larger without compromising on consistency. The ability to scale-out the database can lead to higher query throughput and faster single query performance.
You will help design and implement innovative features to efficiently maintain consistency even in the face of frequent updates made to a database that is comprised of very many nodes. To accomplish this, youll leverage your knowledge of distributed systems, networking, and systems level programming.
Its an exciting time to join the team. The amount of data stored and analyzed is growing fast, as is the number of transactions and queries processed per second. In response our engineers are constantly thinking of new ways to scale larger.
Required skills
C/C++ or Java
Proficient with multi-threaded applications
Customer focused with the ability to work in a cross-functional team with QA, documentation and others
Advanced knowledge of algorithms and data structures
Excellent communication
Desired skills
Distributed systems
Database internals
Willingness and ability to mentor interns and junior team members
SQL

About our team
The best ideas often come from fresh perspectives. At Vertica, our open-minded, diverse and inclusive team is always learning from each other. We approach intellectually challenging work with a ""get it done"" attitude. Vertica Engineers are given significant latitude and support to pursue what they are passionate about to make Vertica an even better place. If you are excited about building great technology with a proactive team, you will find yourself in good company at Vertica. Welcome to the family.
About our product
Vertica is a recognized leader in analytics powering some of the worlds most data driven organizations like Uber, Wayfair, Intuit, Cerner, and more. Our columnar, MPP, distributed database delivers unprecedented speed, petabyte scale, with analytics and machine learning functions built into the core.
We believe the future belongs to the fast. Join us for the ride!

#LI-GC2

#DiceGC

Job:

Engineering

Micro Focus is proud to be an Equal Opportunity Employer. Prospective employees will receive consideration without discrimination because of race, colour, religion, creed, gender, national origin, age, disability, marital or veteran status, sexual orientation, genetic information, citizenship or any other legally protected status",3.3,"Micro Focus
3.3","Cambridge, MA",-1,10000+ Employees,1976,Company - Public,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
131,DevOps / Automation Engineer in Test,-1,"About Us:

SentinelOne was formed by an elite team of cyber security and defense experts from IBM, Intel, Check Point, Cylance, McAfee, and Palo Alto Networks. SentinelOne is shaping the future of endpoint security through its unified, converged platform that automatically prevents, detects, and responds to threats in real-time. Our unique approach is based on deep inspection of all system processes combined with innovative machine learning to quickly isolate malicious behaviors, protecting devices against advanced, targeted threats in real time.

Hiring for this role is limited to US Citizens only under various Federal laws and regulations

What are we looking for?
You will be the DevOps expert for the SentinelOne iV&V team which is focused on the SentinelOne Government SaaS offering
The successful candidate will be a team player but will also be able to take “ownership” of the mirrored SaaS test environment
This person will have to have great communication skills and like solving puzzles and problems.
What will you do?
Creation of automation scripts using Automation frameworks
Write scripts for debugging
Setting up CI/CD pipelines, Jenkins Job etc
Logging Defects with all relevant details (debug logs, network logs, initial root cause analysis, etc) and tracking the defect to closure
Working with the DevOps teams to explain issues and suggest solutions
Communicating status of the testing with the project manager
Exploring new techniques and tools in testing and sharing this with others in the testing team
You will design test plans that would challenge the product and the development teams, write and execute the manual and automated test with a focus on covering in code anything that can be automated.
Review and perform static, dynamic, blackbox analysis and testing of SentinelOne’s Federal SaaS offering.
You will work in a multi-platform environment, side by side with our development, customer service, and product teams.
You will think, brainstorm, solve puzzles, work in collaboration with wonderful people, and huge talents.
What skills and knowledge you should bring?
Experience with CI/CM tools such as Docker/Kubernetes, Artifactory, Jenkins, Git/Gerrit, especially automation/REST interfaces to these tools
Experience with test automation/management tools
Experience with the Atlassian suite JIRA/Confluence and/or automation of those tools
Experience with Database/DBA skills SQL, Graphing Databases, Data analytics tooling such as Qlikview/Tableau
Experience with front-end development involving bootstrap and/or jQuery or full-stack development with Django
Ability to come up to speed quickly on complex systems, perform technical research and thoroughly document findings
Python, Java, DSL experience
Self-starter who likes to be challenged and solve tough technical issues
Proven ability to work in a dynamic team environment
Mature interpersonal skills with an ability to collaboratively work with varied teams and resolve problems spanning multiple disciplines
Excellent written and verbal communication skills.
Hands-on experience in architecting and building Kubernetes infrastructure on AWS
Hands-on experience with ‘Big Data’ technologies like Kafka, Elastic, hBase/Hadoop, Ambari
Hands-on experience with Infrastructure as Code (IaC) languages like Terraform or Ansible
Hands-on experience developing dashboards/alerting via CSP native and ELK tools
Advantages
AWS Architect or AWS DevOps Engineer Certification
Experience with monitoring tools such as Splunk, AppDynamics, DataDog, etc.
Why us?

You will work on real-world problems and make an impact by protecting our customers from cyber threats. You will join a cutting-edge project and will be able to influence the architecture, design and structure of our core platform. You will tackle extraordinary challenges and work with the very BEST in the industry.
Medical, Vision, Dental, 401(k), Commuter, and Dependent FSA
Unlimited PTO
Paid Company Assigned Holidays
Paid Sick Time
Gym membership reimbursement
Cell phone reimbursement
Numerous company-sponsored events including regular happy hours and team-building events",4.9,"SentinelOne
4.9",United States,-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2013,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
132,Software Engineer,$90k-$131k (Glassdoor Est.),"Software Engineer

OSBU | Denver, CO, United States

Why Join Rincon Research Corporation (RRC)?

At Rincon Research Corporation, our primary business is innovating, developing, and fielding digital signal processing (DSP) products and services for the United States Defense and Intelligence Communities in support of national security.

Rincon Research Corporation seeks a Software Engineer to create cutting edge signal processing, geolocation, and communication systems solutions to challenging national security and defense problems. You will work in a multi-disciplinary R&D environment with similarly skilled and motivated electrical engineers, mathematicians, and computer scientists/engineers in a highly rewarding personal and professional environment.

Come join the team that is creating cutting edge signal processing, geolocation, and communication systems for the future!

What are the primary responsibilities in the Software Engineer position?

Core responsibilities include designing real-time processing solutions, implementing advanced signal processing and geolocation algorithms in efficient software, testing with real data, and deploying to front-line customer facilities. You also create effective user interfaces and data visualization tools. A key responsibility is mastering and evolving framework capabilities as applications migrate to a cloud-based computing environment. RRC personnel can expect to work across all functional areas: systems engineering, development, integration and test, deployment and O&M, and experience the direct mission feedback from the customer and seeing your project provide real-world contributions that make a significant difference.

What required background will make you successful?
Degree (Bachelor’s, Master's, or PhD) in Computer Engineering or Computer Science
Competent in using C/C++/Python for engineering or scientific applications in the Linux environment
Facility with agile software development practices at all stages of the software life cycle
Good speaking skills with the ability to interact with customers and senior engineers
Able to assist in creation of cutting-edge solutions for customer issues
Ability to obtain and maintain a TS/SCI security clearance
(US CITIZENSHIP REQUIRED)
Technical Interest Areas:
High Performance Computing including parallel and distributed computation
Numerical algorithms
GPU acceleration using CUDA
Machine learning
Virtualization and Cloud computing
Visualization of large engineering data
HTML5 for real-time GUI engineering applications
Where is the position located?

This position is located at our Denver, CO office.

What benefits does RRC offer?
100% employer-paid premiums for family medical and dental insurance, employee life insurance, short-term and long-term disability (STD & LTD)
Flexible reimbursement spending accounts for medical expense and dependent care
Immediate participation and vesting in the company’s Employee Stock Ownership Plan (ESOP) and 401(k) Plan
Employer contributions to RRC’s ESOP
Employer matching contributions to the company’s 401( k) Plan
Employer discretionary contributions to the company’s 401(k) Plan
Rincon Research Corporation is an equal opportunity employer and considers qualified applicants for employment without regard to race, color, creed, religion, national origin, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity and expression, age, disability, veteran status, or any other protected factor.",4.1,"Rincon Research Corporation
4.1","Centennial, CO",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1983,Company - Private,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
133,Software Engineer - Saalfeld Lab,$101k-$113k (Glassdoor Est.),"Primary Work Address: 19700 Helix Drive, Ashburn, VA, 20147
Current HHMI Employees, click here to apply via your Workday account.
Janelia Research Campus is a pioneering research center in Ashburn, Virginia, where scientists pursue fundamental questions in neuroscience and imaging. The Howard Hughes Medical Institute (HHMI) launched Janelia in 2006, establishing an intellectually distinctive environment for scientists to do creative, collaborative, hands-on work. Our integrated teams of biologists, computational scientists, and tool-builders pursue a small number of scientific questions with potential for transformative impact. We share our methods, results, and tools with the scientific community. It is a uniquely innovative and collaborative atmosphere that reflects HHMI’s reputation for excellence.

Summary:

We are looking for a software engineer to work with the lab on novel machine learning based analysis methods and tools for large biological images and videos at the interface of cell biology and neuroscience. We are open source and open science enthusiasts, you will help us to develop new and maintain existing open source libraries and tools developed in the lab (Paintera, N5, BigWarp, ...), and contribute to popular open source packages in the field. You will collaborate with excellent scientists and software engineers and have access to the latest and most exciting data and computational resources.

Education:
M.S. or B.A in Computer Science or related field
Experience:
Experience with writing efficient code with Java or other JVM based languages
Familiarity with Python, other programming languages
Ideally, you have a record of contributing to open source projects, so we can discuss code
If you do not meet all of the above criteria but you believe that you can compensate this with enthusiasm, creativity, and practical experience, reach out to us and let's talk.

For more information on the Saalfeld lab, visit here or email Stephan at saalfelds@janelia.hhmi.org

Physical Requirements

Remaining in a normal seated or standing position for extended periods of time; reaching and grasping by extending hand(s) or arm(s); dexterity to manipulate objects with fingers, for example using a keyboard; communication skills using the spoken word; ability to see and hear within normal parameters; ability to move about workspace. The position requires mobility, including the ability to move materials weighing up to several pounds (such as a laptop computer or tablet).

Persons with disabilities may be able to perform the essential duties of this position with reasonable accommodation. Requests for reasonable accommodation will be evaluated on an individual basis.

Please Note:

This job description sets forth the job’s principal duties, responsibilities, and requirements; it should not be construed as an exhaustive statement, however. Unless they begin with the word “may,” the Essential Duties and Responsibilities described above are “essential functions” of the job, as defined by the Americans with Disabilities Act.

HHMI is an Equal Opportunity Employer",4.5,"Howard Hughes Medical Institute
4.5","Ashburn, VA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1953,Nonprofit Organization,Grantmaking Foundations,Non-Profit,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
134,Senior System Software Engineer (Medical Devices),-1,"The Company

We are a fast-paced startup building the next generation surgical robot platform. We’re a diverse team dedicated to creating non-invasive solutions that provide clinical value for both patients and doctors. Working here means joining an experienced startup team that is excited and passionate about creating world class products. Founded by a serial entrepreneur with 2 successful exits, the team includes former engineers from top medical robotics companies. We are a well-funded startup and expect talented, motivated, ambitious and interesting co-workers.
General description: *
Looking for a highly motivated candidate skilled in UI development for medical devices.
Requirements*
• Proven experience in C# Desktop Application Development (.NET Framework 4.5 and

higher), multithreading with TPL

• Experience developing/debugging mixed C++ and C# applications,

• Object Oriented Programming experience - design and development

• Experience with State Machine based software design, asynchronous programming patterns

• Experience with RTOS and/or firmware development is plus

• UI development using WPF MVVM with Caliburn Micro framework is a plus

• Experience with Graphics Rendering (DirectX, OpenGL, etc) a plus.

• B.S. or higher in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, or equivalent

• 5-10 years of relevant job experience
Experience*
• Developed desktop applications in C# and/or C++,

• Developed applications spanning multiple systems with a variety of communication protocols

(TCP/IP, RS232, CAN or similar)

• Ability to troubleshoot complex (distributed) systems,

• Familiar with Git based VCS and CD/CI pipeline

• Accustomed to collaborative software development mode - design and code reviews.
Personal Attributes*
• Great team player, focused on problem solving and productivity

• Open to receiving and giving feedback - good communicator

• Always thinking about how to make things more efficient

• Strong work ethic and detail-oriented

• Love learning and being challenged

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $100,000.00 - $175,000.00 per year

Benefits:
Dental insurance
Health insurance
Paid time off
Referral program
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
COVID-19 considerations:
Company will provide and request masks in the office.

Education:
Bachelor's (Required)
Experience:
C/C++: 3 years (Required)
C#: 3 years (Required)
graphic rendering: 1 year (Preferred)
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",-1,Stealth Mode Startup,"Redwood City, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
135,Data Scientist – Protein Sciences,$86k-$143k (Glassdoor Est.),"127! That’s the number of drug discovery projects impacted this year by protein science data at Novartis Institutes for BioMedical Research.

Are you a curious and inspired Data Scientist passionate about bringing protein science data to the next level of informing and impacting drug discovery projects? Do you like working in cross-functional and multidisciplinary teams? Do you enjoy transforming scientific challenges into computational solutions to catalyze efficiency in data-driven drug discovery? As a team member of a global Data Science group with expertise in protein data science, data engineering, computational biology, bioinformatics, screening analytics and predictive modelling this is a unique opportunity waiting for you to leverage protein science data at scale.

Your responsibilities include, but are not limited to:
Engage in an interdisciplinary environment with structural biologists, biophysicists, protein chemists, proteomic scientists and molecular modelers to advance structure-based drug discovery using innovative computational approaches.
Champion data stewardship in protein crystallography, biomolecular NMR, cryo-EM and biophysics to enable predictive science.
Design and implement robust applications, methods and end-to-end analysis workflows for automated data processing, quality control and publishing.
Exploit and integrate internal and external protein data sources to generate drug discovery impact.
Ideate and proto-type tailored visualizations and webservices for data dissemination across the organization.
Mentor scientists who are developing their computational skills.
What You'll Bring to the Role:
PhD, or equivalent years of experience in structural biology, bioinformatics, cheminformatics, computational biology, molecular modeling or related scientific domain.
Demonstrated experience with scripting languages (Python, R) and high-performance computing frameworks on Linux platforms.
An agile engineering mentality.
Familiarity with relational databases and SQL.
High learning agility, solution-oriented approach, looking to make a difference.
Superb communication skills and proficiency in written and oral English.
Desirable Requirements:
Ability to engineer protein science data for end-to-end enabling solutions.
An understanding of the processes behind lead discovery and structure-based drug design.
Experience with advanced machine learning techniques.
Why Consider Novartis?

799 million. That’s how many lives our products touched in 2019. And while we’re proud of that fact, in this world of digital and technological transformation, we must also ask ourselves this: how can we continue to improve and extend even more people’s lives?

We believe the answers are found when curious, courageous and collaborative people like you are brought together in an inspiring environment. Where you’re given opportunities to explore the power of digital and data. Where you’re empowered to risk failure by taking smart risks, and where you’re surrounded by people who share your determination to tackle the world’s toughest medical challenges.

Imagine What You Could do at Novartis!

Commitment to Diversity and Inclusion:

Novartis embraces diversity, equal opportunity and inclusion. We are committed to building diverse teams, representative of the patients and communities we serve, and we strive to create an inclusive workplace that cultivates bold innovation through collaboration, and empowers our people to unleash their full potential.

The Novartis Group of Companies are Equal Opportunity Employers and take pride in maintaining a diverse environment. We do not discriminate in recruitment, hiring, training, promotion or any other employment practices for reasons of race, color, religion, gender, national origin, age, sexual orientation, marital or veteran status, disability, or any other legally protected status.",4.0,"Novartis
4.0","Cambridge, MA",-1,10000+ Employees,1996,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$10+ billion (USD),-1
136,Sr. Full Stack Engineer,$75k-$128k (Glassdoor Est.),"About Alteryx

Alteryx develops software for data preparation and analysis, including a number of server solutions for model deployment, collaborative work on data, and scheduling of automatic data processing. We're revolutionizing data analytics by providing a complete end to end, self-service platform that allows users to get from business questions to business answers at incredible speeds. Why work for just any analytics company?

At Alteryx, we are explorers, dreamers and innovators. We're on a journey to build the best analytics platform in the world, but we can't do it without people like you leading the way. We want Alteryx to be recognized as much for our dynamic work culture as for our products.

About Alteryx Innovation Labs

The Innovation Labs office, Alteryx's first office presence in Boston, was started earlier this year by the acquisition of MIT-spinout Feature Labs. This rapidly growing team combines the excitement of being part of a fast-paced, innovative startup with the resources, market penetration, and wisdom of a data analytics market leader. Our goal is to turbo-charge machine learning and data science efforts on the Alteryx platform, and to enable anyone to solve dynamic problems. We are working on high-impact, high-visibility projects, and we’re looking for collaborative and knowledge-hungry teammates who want to join us as we work to democratize machine learning.

Overview

As a Senior Full stack Engineer, you will work within the Innovation Labs engineering teams to build features and components end-to-end in order to help us build and deliver a new web-based data science product. In this role, you will have the opportunity to problem solve, drive projects to success, communicate with stakeholders, and learn from both success and failures as part of a dynamic, friendly and ambitious team with technical influence throughout Alteryx and beyond.

Responsibilities
Be a senior member on the engineering team to build a large and complex (in a fun way!) application using React/Redux with Scala/Python backend
Work closely with UI/UX team to provide feedback on designs and transform them into functioning user-facing products
Work closely with Product and Engineering leadership on the technical and product roadmap
Consume and inform the design of machine learning and data science APIs that powers the application
Incorporate user feedback to improve the product
Author new features, from conception and design to implementation and testing
Requirements
5+ years of experience in front-end web development, ideally with several years of React
3+ years of experience in a modern backend language (Python, NodeJS, Go, Scala, etc.)
Experience building and deploying applications in a dockerized-based environment, ideally on AWS.
Experience writing clear and effective documentation
Experience with automated testing and tools like Jest, Cypress, CircleCI, Github Actions, Selenium, etc.
Drive to build quality features and components end-to-end
Bonus
Demonstrated (in your portfolio) eye for design and solving real-world user problems end-to-end, if you have examples to show that’s awesome
Experience with data visualization
Experience with API design
Contributions to open-source frameworks and/or libraries.
Benefits & Perks
100% company-paid medical, dental, and vision for associates
Health plans that cover your family and pets
Company matched 401(k)
Associate stock purchase plan
Paid time off: 3 weeks’ vacation, 5 sick days, 9 holidays, 3 floating holidays, and 20 hours volunteer time
100% paid parental leave
Tuition reimbursement
Wellness programs with up to $300 fitness reimbursement annually
Collaborative offices stocked with healthy snacks and drinks
Office events, catered lunches, and happy hours
#LI-JE1",3.6,"Alteryx
3.6","Boston, MA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1997,Company - Public,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
137,Data Management Engineer,$69k-$122k (Glassdoor Est.),"Introduction

ASML brings together the most creative minds in science and technology to develop lithography machines that are key to producing faster, cheaper, more energy-efficient microchips. We design, develop, integrate, market and service these advanced machines, which enable our customers - the world’s leading chipmakers - to reduce the size and increase the functionality of their microchips, which in turn leads to smaller, more powerful consumer electronics. Our main headquarters are located in Veldhoven, the Netherlands, and we also have 18 office locations around the United States- including main offices in Wilton, CT, Chandler, AZ, San Jose, CA and San Diego, CA.

Job Mission

ASML is a world leader in the manufacture of advanced technology systems for the semiconductor industry.ASML’s corporate headquarters is in Veldhoven, the Netherlands. Manufacturing sites and research and development facilities are located in Connecticut, California and the Netherlands. Technology development centers and training facilities are located in the United States, Japan, Korea, the Netherlands, and Taiwan. Additionally, ASML provides optimal service to its customers via over 50 sales and service organizations in 16 countries. Founded in the Netherlands in 1984, the company is publicly traded on Euronext Amsterdam and NASDAQ under the symbol ASML.

Job Description

The Technical Analyst provides a high level of broad spectrum technical analysis and support for CS sectors’ tools and products.

You will build dashboards, self-service tools, and reports to analyze and present data associated with customer experience, product performance, business operations, and strategic decision making.Engage with Project, Business, and Engineering teams to capture requirements, influence end-state way we make decisions, and craft world class BI tools to support those partners. You will craft our data infrastructure investments in support of BI needs. You should influence upstream data model design, drive aggregate definitions, and develop your own data solutions as needed, successfully bridge analytics and business, ability to speak the language of both. Provide coverage on ad-hoc analysis from diverse partners and automate those needs over time.

Responsibilities
-Tell stories with data and propose analytical solutions instilling confidence to leaders making operational and strategic business decisions.
-Manage expectations by communicating project plans, features, and statuses to business stakeholders.
-Build strong relationships within business units and support functions to understand the business needs.
-Construct reporting utilizing Excel and BI software to drive insight for engineering leadership.
-Collaborate and knowledge share to ensure single source of truth for all data.
-Perform ongoing assessment of analytics tools and dashboards relative to their usability, efficacy and adoption with their respective audiences.
-Synthesize data to provide actionable insights.
-Take data, understand it, process it, extract value from it, and communicate if visually / verbally throughout the organization.
-Work closely with customers and IT teams to turn data into critical information and knowledge that can be used to make sound business decisions.
-Deliver ad hoc reporting and analytics within an agreed-upon SLA.
-Play an active role in business reviews, especially in reviewing analytical findings and in strategic planning discussions.

Education

Position requires a BS degree technical field, statistics, information technology, economics, business, or equivalent experience.

Experience

-5+ years of experience working in a technical analyst capacity, or related business/technical experience.
-Demonstrated proficiency in Microsoft Office programs, such as advanced Excel and PowerPoint.
-Demonstrated ability using windows app development, web design and back-end development, and/or data cleaning & structuring.
-Experience in Spotfire preferred.
-Experience developing metrics, graphs, and charts to present information in digestible formats for a broad audience.
-Experience in forecasting and reporting on KPIs.
-Demonstrated ability to analyze data and present to various levels of an organization.
-Must be able to read and interpret data, information, and documents.

Personal skills

-Must be comfortable working in ambiguity.
-Analyze and process complex data sets using predictive modelling, regression, querying, visualization and analytics tools.
-Proven experience working within the technical side of business intelligence reporting.
-Must be creative in developing visual graphics and summaries to illustrate a story of data.
-Strong Communications skills- communicates clearly and convincingly.
-Excellent time management and delegation skills.
-Ability to prioritize and organize actions effectively and efficiently.
-Self-starter that shows high drive, creativity, ambition and accountability.
-Advanced analytic and problem solving skills, pays attention to detail and produces work that meets high quality standards.

The ideal candidate:
-Is curious – a strong desire to dig to understand the real root cause of problems (5x why RCA).
-Is never satisfied with ‘good enough’ but is able to deliver when ‘good enough’ is acceptable.
-Is obsessive about data quality.
-Understands the big picture but often lives in the details.
-Strong sense of ownership.Focus on understanding details and able to work under minimal supervision.
-Is a self-starter – we don’t expect you to know everything, but you need to be able to teach yourself anything.
-Is outspoken while maintaining good interpersonal skills.
-Does not mind occasionally doing repetitive data-entry/data-cleanup tasks in order to get a desired output.
-Is hyper organized and is energized from bringing clarity and control to ambiguous and chaotic situations.
-Can articulate simple accurate conclusions from large amounts of data.
-Is the type of person who is constantly looking for the best way to do things.
-Can focus when working in a distracting, open office environment.
-Takes pride in output that has their name on it.
-Can quickly build trust and establish rapport with all stakeholders and management levels.
-Can work under tight deadlines.

Context of the position

The physical demands described here are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of this job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.
-While performing the duties of this job, the employee routinely is required to sit; walk; talk; hear; use hands to keyboard, finger, handle, and feel; stoop, kneel, crouch, twist, reach, and stretch.
-The employee is occasionally required to move around the campus.
-The employee may occasionally lift and/or move up to 20 pounds.
-May require travel dependent on company needs.
-Specific vision abilities required by this job include close vision, color vision, peripheral vision, depth perception, and ability to adjust focus.
-Can work under deadlines.
-The environment generally is moderate in temperature and noise level.
-Must be able to read and interpret data, information, and documents.
-Can observe and respond to people and situations and interact with others encountered in the course of work.
-Can learn and apply new information or skills.

Other information

-Position requires up to 30% travel, and the willingness to work extended hours
-Valid driver’s license and passport required.
-Ability to travel in US and internationally.

EOE AA M/F/Veteran/Disability",3.9,"ASML
3.9","Chandler, AZ",-1,10000+ Employees,1984,Company - Public,Electrical & Electronic Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$5 to $10 billion (USD),-1
138,Lead Data Scientist,$111k-$178k (Glassdoor Est.),"At the intersection of technology, science, business and sports, Strivr offers an end-to-end, VR-based immersive learning platform that changes the way people around the world train, learn and perform. With a mission to elevate performance through immersive experience, we are redefining an industry in real time and shaping the future of learning.

Strivr was founded in 2015 out of Stanford University’s Virtual Human Interaction Lab, using the football field as our proving ground. Since then, we have quickly expanded from the athlete to the enterprise, partnering with leading Fortune 500 companies including Walmart, Verizon and Fidelity to innovate and elevate employee development.

More than just content inside a headset, immersive learning provides realistic, high-impact experiences driven by L&D experts, instructional designers, data scientists, and immersive content specialists. Strivr offers the only end-to-end solution available today, bringing together the software, hardware, content and services needed to deliver effective training at scale.

Recognized by Fast Company’s Most Innovative Companies of 2019 and 2020, we take pride in our passion for innovation and we use that energy to fuel our work. Our culture thrives on teamwork, grit, transparency and impact, and celebrates every win. It’s an exciting time to join our fast growing team!

At Strivr, our Data Science team develops cutting-edge techniques to improve people’s performance in the real world based on their experiences in the virtual world. As a Data Scientist at Strivr, you will be at the forefront of defining approaches to Immersive Data Science and will be evaluating and optimizing user experience in the virtual world.

Your responsibilities:
Develop innovative approaches to measuring user behavior and evaluating performance in the virtual environment
Collaborate with partners such as Engineering and Solutions teams to instrument the data collection process and build ETL pipelines to obtain data required for your analyses
Implement approaches and communicate insights in a compelling narrative
Incorporate your research outcomes into the data product offering
Minimum Qualifications:
5+ years of industry experience as a Data Scientist
An advanced degree in a quantitative field (e.g Economics, Statistics, Sciences, Engineering)
Experience developing and implementing in-depth approaches, including statistical and econometric analyses and/or ML models
Experience building ETL pipelines
Proficiency with Python (or R), and SQL
Strong communication skills
Passion for using data to improve immersive experiences",4.5,"Strivr
4.5","Palo Alto, CA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2015,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
139,Senior Data Scientist,-1,"Senior Data Scientist
Location/City: Any US location (offices in Atlanta, GA and Playa Vista, CA)

Responsibilities
We are looking for a sharp, highly-motivated Senior Data Scientist to join our team. This is a high-impact role that will leverage data & analytics to derive insights from our Members’ data and make recommendations to help improve their financial wellbeing. You will collaborate with product, and engineering as well as executive stakeholders to create analytical solutions to help achieve business goals. An ideal candidate is an individual who has a deep background in statistics, analysis, experiment design, and can bring those skills to bear in a start-up environment. A strong understanding and hands-on ability with data science technology and infrastructure is important as well.
As the Senior Data Scientist, you will:
Work with large volumes of bank transactions to create proprietary intelligence about the nature of employment and earnings for our Members
Help build out our job recommendation engine to aid our Members in finding new or additional work to increase their income
Help drive a data-first culture where data is understood and leveraged in decision making
Collaborate with the data science team and CDO to define the technical strategy for Steady’s data science ecosystem
Develop and codify processes and best practices for modeling, testing, and analytics
Effectively balance short term delivery with long term direction and value
Advocate for data science innovation and increased contribution to Steady’s mission

Skills & Requirements
Advanced degree and relevant experience (MS + 5 years, PhD + 3 years) in statistics, mathematics, computer science, or similar field
Demonstrated experience creating production ML pipelines (training, scoring, leveraging in real-time systems)
Expert knowledge of modern machine learning algorithms (regression, classification, random forests, clustering, optimization, etc.) and statistical inference
Experience with bank or credit card transaction data preferred
Experience with NLP and textual data analysis is a plus
Demonstrated experience of efficient manipulation and storage of large datasets
Hands on experience and expertise with SQL, Spark, Python (preferred) or R
Experience with machine learning platforms Sagemaker/Databricks a plus
Strong data visualization skills (experience with Tableau preferred)
Familiarity and experience with the AWS data ecosystem (S3, AWS Glue, EMR, etc.)
Excellent verbal and written communication skills with the ability to interact at all levels of the organization
Comfortable working with distributed teams across multiple offices and timezones
Ability to thrive in a fast-paced, entrepreneurial, high-energy environment


Benefits
We value our Steady Team Members and are committed to their success. We are located in downtown Atlanta near MARTA, as well as in Playa Vista CA. We offer competitive compensation packages and a 100% company-paid benefits package including medical, dental, and vision. Steady is a relaxed, casual work environment with flexible hours and lunch provided once weekly in addition to a weekly meal stipend. We also offer a generous PTO plan, 401K, and future growth opportunities within the company. We strive to maintain a positive and fun environment for our employees where people can learn and grow with the company.
About Steady
Steady is a mission-driven business that helps people earn more. Through the free Steady app users can build & track income, networks, and buying power – allowing them to augment retirement savings, work around childcare responsibilities, pay down debt, save for purchases, and supplement their income from primary employers, while limiting their income volatility and better positioning themselves for access to a sustainable financial services ecosystem.
Every Steady member will build something different. We celebrate those who take the initiative to create a path that works for them. Whatever that looks like, Steady is there to support it, providing a stable foundation that allows people to build financial success over a lifetime.

Mission: Steady turns the tables by putting workers back in charge of their financial future with an income-building platform that creates financial stability and helps its users to take charge of their future.

For more information, visit us at www.steadyapp.com or on Twitter @TheSteadyApp.

Steady, Platform Inc. (Steady) is an Equal Employment Opportunity employer – All qualified applicants/employees will receive consideration for employment without regard to that individual’s age, race, color, religion or creed, national origin or ancestry, sex (including pregnancy), sexual orientation, gender, gender identity, physical or mental disability, veteran status, genetic information, ethnicity, citizenship, or any other characteristic protected by law.
Statement to ALL Third-Party Agencies and Similar Organizations: Steady accepts resumes only from agencies with which we formally engage their services. Please do not forward resumes to our applicant tracking system, Steady employees, Steady hiring manager, or send to any Steady facility. Steady is not responsible for any fees or charges associated with unsolicited resumes.",4.0,"Steady
4.0","Atlanta, GA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2017,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
140,Perception Engineer,-1,"Kodiak Robotics is not just a software company, we are developing autonomous technology for long-haul trucking. Our team is highly experienced and comes from the leading technology companies in the space.

We are looking for a highly skilled Perception Engineer to join us and solve real-world robotics problems.
In this role, you will:
Be responsible for designing perception algorithms and implementing them in robust, efficient, and well-tested C++ code.
Solve real-world perception challenges such as lane detection, object detection and classification, tracking, sensor fusion, localization, mapping, or sensor calibration.
Integrate both novel and well-established techniques such as deep neural networks, decision trees, Kalman and particle filters, or point cloud processing on camera, laser, radar, and ultrasound data.
Collaborate closely with other experts on the team, including the planning and systems engineering team.
Qualifications:
Strong technical background. BS, MS or PhD with 2+ years of academic or industry experience in designing and implementing perception algorithms. You are a skilled software engineer with experience in C++ and strong problem-solving skills. You are passionate about solving real-world robotics problems, and you have ideally worked on autonomous robots before. Prior knowledge of working with deep neural networks is a strong plus.
A team player. You take ownership and work with the team to deliver exceptional results. You are interested in the performance of the entire system across engineering disciplines.
Ability to build and iterate quickly. You enjoy working fast and smart, and you are comfortable in the earlier stages of developing an algorithm from scratch.
Hands on. You dig deep into important details such as the sensor driver if it improves the overall system. You like working with production machine learning pipelines, from dataset collection and labeling to training and validation.
Great communicator. You have experience writing clear, concise, and detailed documentation.
What we offer:
A place with big goals that we trust we can achieve.
A fast paced environment where we work with talented, committed and supportive teammates.
Equity and competitive pay. Every employee is a stakeholder in Kodiak’s success.
Excellent medical, dental and vision benefits.
Flexible PTO and generous parental leave policies.
A beautiful facility in Mountain View.
We love our dogs, so we are a dog friendly office!
At Kodiak, we strive to build a diverse community working towards our common company goals in a safe and collaborative environment where harassment of any kind is strictly prohibited. Kodiak is committed to equal opportunity employment regardless of race, ethnicity, religion, gender identity, sexual orientation, age, disability, or veteran status, or any other basis protected by applicable law.",4.5,"Kodiak Robotics
4.5","Mountain View, CA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2018,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
141,Continuous Improvement Engineer/Team Lead,$59k-$96k (Glassdoor Est.),"Avalign produces innovative, high-performance, and cost-effective medical devices with a particular focus on high growth and ingenuity. Our team is growing quickly and proud of the fact that our custom-made devices continue to make a huge difference in the lives of medical professionals and their patients. Our employees are actively involved in the design, engineering and manufacture of technologically advanced medical devices that ensure that we meet our customer’s quality specifications for each product we produce.

We are looking for a Continunous Improvement Engineer/Team Lead to join our Mentor location for the 1st Shift schedules. You will be accountable for plant-level responsibilities including general accounting, payables, order entry, billing, cost accounting, bill of materials, business analysis, financial reporting and analysis, sales management, and computer operations. You will also liaison with corporate financial staff, as required. If you are interested, please apply in person or via email to hr.mentor@avalign.com.

Job Purpose

To work cooperatively within manufacturing, engineering and quality to train , direct and improve process for ongoing continuous improvement

Duties and Responsibilities
Works toward continuous improvement via process improvements scrap reductions, efficiency improvements using Lean Six sigma methodologies.
Audit product and process for compliance to standard regulations and goals
Evaluate efficiency, utilization, the usage of labor and
May use analysis methods of the quality tools box
A3- 5 Whys pareto analysis histogram CPK PPK C charts P charts
Conducts time studies
Audit process per establish procedures
Working in process launch meeting to ensure processes are followed
Works with operators in process launch- 5 S , tool sheet
3 pan systems and PM programs
Works to maintain lean initiative and TPS system on the shop floor.
Performs CPK analysis Maintains product and company reputation by complying with government regulations.
Completes projects by training and guiding technicians.
Contributes to team effort by accomplishing related results as needed.
Does training and orientation
Planning, assigning, and directing work
Reporting on efficiency, utilization and quality metrics by person and production area
Ensuring safety, delivery, quality and cost are maintained
Compiling improvement plans, where needed
Coordinating shop activities
Other duties may be assigned as needed
Education

Bachelor Degree in science or Engineering preferred or equivalent combination of education and experience.

Green belt certification preferred

Qualifications

Analysis, Design Skills, Presenting Technical Information, Machining Knowledge, Conceptual Skills, Quality Focus, General Consulting Skills, Control Engineering, Production Planning, Job Knowledge, Organization, Production Flow.

Blueprint Reading

GD&Tand metrology.

Competencies

Analytical - Synthesizes complex or diverse information; Collects and researches data; Uses intuition and experience to complement data; Designs work flows and procedures.

Knowledge of blueprints GD& T

Design - Generates creative solutions; Translates concepts and information into images; Uses feedback to modify designs; Applies design principles; Demonstrates attention to detail.

Problem Solving - Identifies and resolves problems in a timely manner; Gathers and analyzes information skillfully; Develops alternative solutions; Works well in group problem solving situations; Uses reason even when dealing with emotional topics.

Project Management - Develops project plans; Coordinates projects; Communicates changes and progress; Completes projects on time and budget; Manages project team activities.

Technical Skills - Assesses own strengths and weaknesses; Pursues training and development opportunities; Strives to continuously build knowledge and skills; Shares expertise with others.

Interpersonal Skills - Focuses on solving conflict, not blaming; Maintains confidentiality; Listens to others without interrupting; Keeps emotions under control; Remains open to others' ideas and tries new things.

Oral Communication - Speaks clearly and persuasively in positive or negative situations; Listens and gets clarification; Responds well to questions; Demonstrates group presentation skills; Participates in meetings.

Written Communication - Writes clearly and informatively; Edits work for spelling and grammar; Varies writing style to meet needs; Presents numerical data effectively; Able to read and interpret written information.

Teamwork - Balances team and individual responsibilities; Exhibits objectivity and openness to others' views; Gives and welcomes feedback; Contributes to building a positive team spirit; Puts success of team above own interests; Able to build morale and group commitments to goals and objectives; Supports everyone's efforts to succeed.

Change Management - Develops workable implementation plans; Communicates changes effectively; Builds commitment and overcomes resistance; Prepares and supports those affected by change; Monitors transition and evaluates results.

Leadership - Exhibits confidence in self and others; Inspires and motivates others to perform well; Effectively influences actions and opinions of others; Accepts feedback from others; Gives appropriate recognition to others.

Quality Management - Looks for ways to improve and promote quality; Demonstrates accuracy and thoroughness.

Cost Consciousness - Works within approved budget; Develops and implements cost saving measures; Contributes to profits and revenue ; Conserves organizational resources.

Diversity - Demonstrates knowledge of EEO policy; Shows respect and sensitivity for cultural differences; Educates others on the value of diversity; Promotes a harassment-free environment; Builds a diverse workforce.

Ethics - Treats people with respect; Keeps commitments; Inspires the trust of others; Works with integrity and ethically; Upholds organizational values.

Organizational Support - Follows policies and procedures; Completes administrative tasks correctly and on time; Supports organization's goals and values; Benefits organization through outside activities; Supports affirmative action and respects diversity.

Strategic Thinking - Develops strategies to achieve organizational goals; Understands organization's strengths & weaknesses; Identifies external threats and opportunities; Adapts strategy to changing conditions.

Judgement - Displays willingness to make decisions; Exhibits sound and accurate judgment; Supports and explains reasoning for decisions; Includes appropriate people in decision-making process; Makes timely decisions.

Motivation - Sets and achieves challenging goals; Demonstrates persistence and overcomes obstacles; Measures self against standard of excellence; Takes calculated risks to accomplish goals.

Planning/Organizing - Prioritizes and plans work activities; Uses time efficiently; Plans for additional resources; Sets goals and objectives; Organizes or schedules other people and their tasks; Develops realistic action plans.

Professionalism - Approaches others in a tactful manner; Reacts well under pressure; Treats others with respect and consideration regardless of their status or position; Accepts responsibility for own actions; Follows through on commitments.

Quality - Demonstrates accuracy and thoroughness; Looks for ways to improve and promote quality; Applies feedback to improve performance; Monitors own work to ensure quality.

Quantity - Meets productivity standards; Completes work in timely manner; Strives to increase productivity; Works quickly.

Safety and Security - Observes safety and security procedures; Determines appropriate action beyond guidelines; Reports potentially unsafe conditions; Uses equipment and materials properly.

Adaptability - Adapts to changes in the work environment; Manages competing demands; Changes approach or method to best fit the situation; Able to deal with frequent change, delays, or unexpected events.

Attendance/Punctuality - Is consistently at work and on time; Ensures work responsibilities are covered when absent; Arrives at meetings and appointments on time.

Dependability - Follows instructions, responds to management direction; Takes responsibility for own actions; Keeps commitments; Commits to long hours of work when necessary to reach goals.; Completes tasks on time or notifies appropriate person with an alternate plan.

Initiative - Volunteers readily; Undertakes self-development activities; Seeks increased responsibilities; Takes independent actions and calculated risks; Looks for and takes advantage of opportunities; Asks for and offers help when needed.

Innovation - Displays original thinking and creativity; Meets challenges with resourcefulness; Generates suggestions for improving work; Develops innovative approaches and ideas; Presents ideas and information in a manner that gets others' attention

Working Conditions

The work environment characteristics described here are representative of those an employee encounters while performing the essential functions of this job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.

Physical Requirements

The physical demands described here are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of this job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.

The employee is frequently required to sit for long hours while working on a brightly lit computer screen.

What You Won’t Do:
Feel stuck – we offer great opportunities to advance and learn
Get bored – we make custom products, so no day is the same
Feel like a number – we’re a close-knit bunch and always have each other’s backs
Who You Are:
A self-starter who thrives in a fast-paced environment
A quick learner who is always ready to gain depth of knowledge in manufacturing processes
A reliable worker who knows the importance of showing up when it counts
Accept assignments with open, cooperative, positive and team-oriented attitudes
Able to plan and execute plans across teams
Effective communicator, both written and verbal
What You’ll Enjoy:
Competitive wage and benefits package
Vacation, make-up time, and immediate eligibility for paid holidays
Medical, dental, and vision insurance
Life and AD&D insurance, disability insurance
Great 401k with company match
Temperature controlled environment
We are an equal opportunity employer and value diversity at our company. We do not discriminate on the basis of race, religion, color, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, age, marital status, veteran status, or disability status.",2.6,"Avalign Integrated Medical Solutions
2.6","Mentor, OH",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2005,Company - Private,Health Care Products Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
142,Multi-skilled maintenance engineer,$43k-$86k (Glassdoor Est.),"C&W Services is the industry leader in Integrated Maintenance Solutions providing service to more than 600 companies worldwide and a sister company of Cushman & Wakefield.
Location: *Salt Lake City
Job Description*
As a Maintenance Technician, you will learn new skills as you support the Operations Maintenance team in repairing and maintaining material handling equipment and pneumatic systems throughout the building. You will have the opportunity to install, maintain and repair automated packaging and distribution equipment. We are committed to improvement; you will be encouraged to participate in career development opportunities as presented to progress your career. Responsibilities include, but are not limited to: Promote a safe working environment by following all safety procedures.

Complete preventative maintenance routines with proper documentation. Use of appropriate tooling to troubleshoot simple AC/DC circuits, basic troubleshooting of material handling equipment (MHE), and repairs to miscellaneous Operational equipment as needed. Maintain a positive working relationships across all of the Operations facility. Track and store department inventory. Move up to 49lbs as well as stand and walk during shifts lasting up to 12 hours, with or without reasonable accommodation.

Basic Qualifications: High school diploma or equivalent. 1+ years of experience in basic preventive/predictive maintenance, troubleshooting skills and repair methods of industrial machines. 1+ years of experience in Mechanical and/or Electrical basic components. 1 + years of experience with compressors and pneumatics.

Preferred Qualifications: 1+ years of experience using power tools to include saws and drills with proper safety precautions. Experience with Microsoft Office suite and OS. Experience with basic metal and wood fabrication, including saws and drills. Basic understanding of a Computerized Maintenance Management System (CMMS).

If you have these skills too, we would love to talk to you: Electomechanics, Electromechanical Assembly, Electrical Schematics, Industrial Electrical Equipment, Wiring, Conveyor Material Handling, Industrial Equipment, Component Repair, Component Troubleshooting, PLC, Mechanical Maintenance, Industrial Maintenance, Rigging, Troubleshooting, Wood Manufacturing, Power Tools, Electricity, Predictive Maintenance, Preventive Maintenance

Job Ref: CWPO21

C&W Services is an Equal Opportunity / Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, sexual orientation, gender identity, protected veteran status or any other characteristic protected by law.

About: C&W Services

Why Work At This Company: Competitive Pay, Great benefits that start FIRST DAY and Growth opportunities!

About C&W Services

A leader in facilities services with over 65 years of experience. C&W Services is one of the largest facility services companies in the USA & Canada with a 65-year history of helping clients drive down operating expenses, increase facility efficiency and up-time, enable strategic business decisions and create positive experiences for the people who work, shop, learn, live and play in the facilities we maintain. We’re building the best team in the industry – our people are the heart and vitality of C&W Services. In joining C&W Services, you’re joining a firm with a rich history, blue-chip client list, and the backing of sister company Cushman & Wakefield, one of the world’s largest property advisory firms and the reason for our success is simple: talented people.

Our success is due to a supportive and friendly culture that fosters collaboration.

Why C&W Services?

• Weekly Pay

• Comprehensive Benefits that start on day 1

• Advance opportunities

• Training to work in a cutting-edge facility

• A safety first culture

Visit our website at: https://careers.cushmanwakefield.com/cwservices/global/en

Learn why C&W Services is an ideal place for veterans to continue their careers: https://cwservices.com/veterans/

We are an equal opportunity employer and all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability status, protected veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by law.

Job Type: Full-time

Experience:
Mechanical and/or Electrical basic components: 1 year (Preferred)
compressors and pneumatics.: 1 year (Preferred)
basic preventive/predictive maintenance: 1 year (Required)
Education:
High school or equivalent (Required)
Schedule:
12 hour shift
Company's website:
https://careers.cushmanwakefield.com/cwservices/global/en",3.7,"Cushman & Wakefield
3.7","Ogden, UT",-1,10000+ Employees,1917,Company - Public,Real Estate,Real Estate,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
143,Hardware Engineer,$63k-$83k (Glassdoor Est.),"The Role

The Principal Hardware Engineer is an expert in all stages of FPGA development and verification, from the creation of real-time processing architectures through final hardware qualification and production. The candidate has extensive experience with large, complex FPGA designs employed in heterogenous signal processing systems. This individual will lead the development of FPGA firmware for sophisticated embedded sensor systems, working with system, software, RF and other hardware engineers to implement and verify the solution in an integrated software defined radio platform.
Lead FPGA development and verification within a small multi-disciplinary team
Analyze problem space to elicit and validate requirements
Assess technologies & products to recommend vendors & partners
Write design specifications, define project tasks, create estimates of effort
Develop and implement FPGA architectures for Digital Signal Processing (DSP) and machine learning systems
Conduct simulation, lab, qualification and field testing to verify FPGA operation
Interface with other design teams to resolve design, implementation, and deployment issues
Assist with reviews of all major hardware development projects
Stay current with latest FPGA technologies, development environments, tools, processes and best practices
Report status against project plan
Prepare and present technical briefings to customers and senior management
Qualifications
10+ years of comprehensive experience in high-speed, high-complexity FPGA development
Experienced with high-speed memory and I/O interfaces (DDR3/4, PCIe, etc.)
Familiar with a wide range of hardware interfaces (I2C, SPI, DMA engines, etc.)
Fluent with VHDL/Verilog and with industry-standard design and simulation tools
Experienced in development for rugged embedded environments
Additional Consideration Given to Candidates with The Following Skills
Digital Signal Processing methods and applications
Schematic-level hardware design
Design for Signal Integrity (SI) and SI analysis
Federated Wireless is committed to providing equal opportunity for all employees and applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual preference/orientation, gender identity or expression, age, marital status, national origin, physical or mental disability, veteran status, or any other protected classification under applicable law.",4.4,"Federated Wireless
4.4","Arlington, VA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2012,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
144,Unity Engineer,$53k-$111k (Glassdoor Est.),"Company Overview:
Age of Learning is a leading education technology innovator based in Glendale, California, with a talented team of more than 600 individuals comprised of nationally-renowned educators, curriculum experts, developers, artists, writers, designers, engineers, producers, product managers, analysts and marketing experts! Together we develop engaging, effective digital learning technology and content to help children build a strong academic foundation for lifelong success.
Our flagship product ABCmouse.com Early Learning Academy® is a comprehensive online curriculum and the #1 digital learning product for young children. To-date, more than 30 million children worldwide have completed over 7 billion Learning Activities on ABCmouse. We recently launched Adventure Academy, the first massively multiplayer online (MMO) game designed specifically to help elementary- and middle-school-aged children learn. It features thousands of engaging Learning Activities—including minigames, books, original animated and live action series, and more—in a fun and safe virtual world. Other Age of Learning programs include immersive English language learning products for children in China and Japan; ReadingIQ, a digital library and literacy platform; and a groundbreaking personalized, adaptive digital learning system that individualizes math instruction for every child through AI-driven technology.

We are committed to helping all children succeed. We provide our educational programs at no cost to teachers, Head Start programs, public libraries, and other community organizations, and have served millions of children through these initiatives. We recently established the Age of Learning Foundation to expand this work globally.
As we expand our global reach and increase the educational impact of our programs, we’re looking for passionate, ambitious, and collaborative leaders to become a part of our growing team.


Summary:
We are seeking a full-time in-house Unity developer to join our team to help us build high performance Unity based applications using existing standards, conventions, and an existing product architecture for our educational games.
Responsibilities:
Develop features and functionality within the AofL Unity platform for deployment to Android and iOS targets
Identify, design, and develop, new features and components requested by your business team
Review and provide specs for supporting documentation of the AofL Unity platform
Integrate Unity Code written by your team members into project codebases to create a fully realized set of features and functionality
Collaborate with UI/UX team members to ensure layouts, animations, and graphical assets are efficiently integrated into application features while preserving artistic integrity and performance
Perform other related duties and special projects as assigned
Required Qualifications:
2-5 years of experience building software with Unity (games or apps), ideally that are consumer facing and content driven
Exposure to the full software development life cycle
Ability to write documented, unit-testable C# code that is compliant with our company coding conventions and standards
A high level of motivation as a self-starter and a team player
Preferred Qualifications:
BS/MS degree in Computer Science, Engineering or a related subject
Experience working in Unity 5.x
Mobile development experience (iOS and/or Android)
We Provide:
Medical, Dental, Vision + 401k
Highly competitive PTO policy
Casual Dress Code
Snacks + Drinks (Coca Cola Freestyle Machine)
Gaming room including an Arcade (2,000+ games)
Frequent team and company outings
Limitless opportunities for professional growth!",3.1,"Age of Learning
3.1","Glendale, CA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2007,Company - Private,K-12 Education,Education,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
145,Senior Software Engineer - ML Infrastructure,$160k-$180k (Employer Est.),"Who we are:
Grabango is the leading provider of checkout-free shopper technology for existing stores. Founded by Will Glaser (technology founder of Pandora Media), the Grabango team has developed the only enterprise class solution for large store chains in the market today. Grabango's system accommodates thousands of store locations, hundreds of thousands of SKUs and millions of square feet across a given retail enterprise.
We're a growing group of kind, curious, self-directed people working towards a common goal. We delight in taking risks and testing hypotheses in a collaborative and supportive environment. Our ability to celebrate both our successes and failures as milestones of growth opens the door to tremendous breakthroughs.
Computer vision and machine learning are at the core of our patent pending technology. Our accomplished team is a powerful combination of technology and commerce professionals that are working to ""Eliminate lines and save people time!""
Overview:
We use computer vision, machine learning, and general feats of information processing to understand shopping, eliminate checkout lines, and save you time.
The experience of leaving a store without stopping to checkout feels like magic. We're making that magic happen behind the scenes by processing data gathered from distributed sensor networks, turning sets of isolated observations into coherent narratives.
This full-time role reports directly to the Director of Computer Vision and is based in Berkeley.
What you'll be doing:
Collaborating across multiple research and engineering disciplines and assessing technology tradeoffs required to rapidly deliver software solutions
Analyzing, designing and developing software for embedded and cloud platforms focused on solving complex and as yet undefined machine learning problem
Getting up to speed on our various systemsLearning about our technology and how/why we will use machine learning
Reviewing our tools and code to help us continue moving at state-of-the-art speed
Collaborate on current projects while understanding our development process
Contributing/leading new projects, tools and frameworks to understand and use our computer vision data as part of a machine learning pipeline to provide checkout-free shopping
What you should have:
5+ years as a Machine Learning Engineer
5+ years experience using some combination of Python and/or C++
Ability to design and prototype software in simple, understandable code
Familiarity with software engineering best practices in an Agile environment
Ability to build tools to extracting useful information from, label and analyze video data
An understanding of the computational trade offs needed for real-time machine learning applications
Familiarity with libraries/packages/APIs (e.g. scikit-learn, Keras, PyTorch, TensorFlow, etc.)
Familiarity with linux/unix Familiarity with different ML models (decision trees, random forests, support vector machines, neural networks, nearest neighbor, ensemble of multiple models, etc.)
An understanding of how different ML pipeline pieces work together and how to communicate with them (using SQL database queries, REST APIs, etc.) and the ability to build appropriate interfaces for your component that others will depend on
Familiar with ML Experiment at scale, ML experiment artifacts management and Machine Learning model deployment.
For the stack : Google compute for cloud computing. Spark/Dataproc for experiment at scale, mlflow for experiment management.
Education & Certifications:
PhD or equivalent industry experience in a relevant field and demonstrated application of Machine Learning
Grabango Values:
Integrity: Do the right thing, particularly when you don't have to.
Bold Innovation: Think recklessly, but temper your actions with pragmatism.
People Matter: Hire the best, and treasure them.
Don't Live with Broken: Have the courage to admit mistakes, and the urgency to correct them.
Customer Focus: Deliver beyond expectations, both internally and externally.
Inclusion: Foster an environment that welcomes all.
Simplify: Everything should be made as simple as possible, but not simpler.
Grabango is proud to be an equal opportunity employer and is committed to developing a workplace where diversity and inclusion are an essential part of who we are. We strive to hire and support a workforce as diverse as our shopper base, so we can develop products and services that best suit our customers. We do not make employment decisions based on race, color, religion, ethnic or national origin, nationality, sex, gender, gender-identity, sexual orientation, disability, age, military or veteran status and we comply with all local, state and federal employment laws.
Grabango participates in the E-Verify Program, an internet-based system operated by the Department of Homeland Security and the Social Security Administration. It allows employers to confirm an individual's employment eligibility to work in the United States.",3.8,"Grabango
3.8","Berkeley, CA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2016,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
146,Senior Data Scientist,$130k-$215k (Glassdoor Est.),"About Us

In 2018, Fashion Nova was the #1 most-searched fashion brand on Google. We are among the top e-commerce brands in the world engaging with millions of consumers, and global fashion influencers. We have built a platform and brand through innovative marketing and merchandising strategies that we believe connects with the next generation and redefines fashion retail.

At Fashion Nova, we have strived for success and creativity to make this the top e-commerce brand in the world. With a team based out of Los Angeles, California, we are motivated to take Fashion Nova to the next level. Our goal is to hire candidates that are positive go-getters and problem solvers who love fashion. The right candidate should be able to work independently in a fast-paced and always evolving environment.

About the Role

Fashion Nova is looking to hire a Senior Data Scientist who will be a trusted partner to business leaders that can translate business questions/requirements into analytical problems and ultimately develop and deploy models into production that support ongoing decision-making. You will help enable the long-term strategy, development, and execution across the organization.

Responsibilities
Fully leverage our data assets by developing algorithms to give our customers an unparalleled, highly personalized experience on our website and mobile app.
Improve and/or automate everyday decision-making using data, including occasionally building dashboards.
Work closely with our engineering teams to take ideas from offline prototypes to scalable production services.
Communicate with product management and other business teams on problem definition and writing requirement documents for efficient model building and deployment.
Play a foundational role in helping shape data science. Lead the development and execution of our data strategy.
Propose solutions driven by data that help enable growth and drive revenue.
Champion a data lead culture through the entire organization.

Required Skills
6-8 years of E-Commerce Retail data science experience; grasp applied probability and statistics commensurate with a Master's degree in a quantitative discipline
Highly proficient in Python, R, Sql (and their accompanying data science stacks)
Experience with cloud computing
Experience with natural language processing and computer vision
Experience developing code and production ready algorithms in collaborative environments
Experience in data visualization platforms (e.g. Looker, Google Analytics)
We build our own datasets, so you need to have the ability to write SQL in your sleep
You can put together a decent slide deck and communicate complex ideas to colleagues in other areas of the business
You take initiative, naturally curious and eager to learn
Benefits
Employee Discount
Full health care coverage
Dental and vision coverage
401k Match
Kitchen stocked with great snacks and drinks
Fun and friendly culture
Fashion Nova, Inc. is an equal opportunity employer committed to a diverse workplace environment.

#LI-EC1",3.3,"Fashion Nova - Careers
3.3","Vernon, CA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2006,Company - Private,"Department, Clothing, & Shoe Stores",Retail,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
147,Staff or Senior Machine Learning Scientist,$154k-$253k (Glassdoor Est.),"About iRhythm

iRhythm is a leading digital healthcare company focused on the way cardiac arrhythmias are clinically diagnosed by combining our wearable bio sensing technology with powerful cloud-based data analytics and machine- learning capabilities. Our goal is to be the leading provider of first-line ambulatory ECG monitoring for patients at risk for arrhythmias. iRhythm's continuous ambulatory monitoring has already put over 2 million patients and their doctors on a shorter path to what they both need – answers.

About this role

iRhythm is looking for a (Sr./Staff) Machine Learning Scientist to advance the company's during wear arrhythmia detection and cardiac insights algorithms. In this position you will play a key role in leveraging the vast iRhythm labeled ECG data set (2M+ records) to develop novel machine-learned algorithms. Furthermore, you will be contributing to the development of algorithms for the analysis of signals obtained from wearables and IoT devices.

Responsibilities
Design, build and test machine learning algorithms for the analysis of biosignal data from a variety of data sources, including wearables (e.g. ECG, PPG, accelerometry) and simulation of efficient signal transmissions over IoT devices.
Identify and apply advanced machine learning and statistical methods in both exploratory and confirmatory data analysis of multivariate clinical data sets, electronic health and claims records.
Participate in the design, development and maintenance of the Deep Learning infrastructure that fuels iRhythm's insights generation engine
Work closely with our software/firmware engineering teams and clinical experts to transition algorithms developed into production.
Present research findings to internal stakeholders, iRhythm leadership, as well as at industry conferences.


About You
Excellent understanding of Machine Learning/Deep Learning, statistical modeling and time-series analysis.
Strong understanding of signal processing concepts (Filtering, Fourier, and Wavelet transforms).
Experience with deep neural network architectures and software frameworks like TensorFlow.
Strong programming skills in Python and familiarity with python libraries like numpy, scikit-learn, pandas etc.
Experience working with large data sets and excellent knowledge of database languages (such as SQL)
Passion for materializing ideas that impact the lives of patients.
Effective presentation and interpersonal skills.
Ability to motivate others and provide focus on large collaborative and challenging goals and deadlines.
Demonstrated ability to interact with, and exert significant influence on internal/external collaborators on research/development objectives, methods, and results' interpretation
MS or PhD in Computer Science, Electrical Engineering, Statistics or a related quantitative field.
Additional desired/preferred qualifications include:
Previous research experience with biomedical data
Experience developing software in a Unix/Linux programming environment
Familiarity with cloud computing and big data technologies
What's in it for you:

This is a full-time position with competitive compensation package, excellent benefits including medical, dental and vision insurance (all of which start on your first day), paid holidays, and PTO!

iRhythm also provides additional benefits including 401K (with company match), an Employee Stock Purchase Plan, paid parental leave, pet insurance discount, Cultural Committee/Charity events, and so much more!

FLSA Status: Exempt

As a part of our core values, we ensure a diverse and inclusive workforce. We welcome and celebrate people of all backgrounds, experiences, skills and perspectives. iRhythm Technologies, Inc. is an Equal Opportunity Employer (M/F/V/D). Pursuant to San Francisco Fair Chance Ordinance, we will consider for employment all qualified applicants with arrest and conviction records.

Make iRhythm your path forward.",3.2,"iRhythm
3.2","San Francisco, CA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2008,Company - Public,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
148,Software Engineer,$54k-$114k (Glassdoor Est.),"Returning Candidate? Log back in to the Career Portal and click on 'Job Browsing/History' and find the job you're looking for.

2020-035-INT: Software Engineer

Directorate Intelligence & Defense Solutions
Location Chantilly, VA
Riverside Research is seeking software engineers to support research, development and operational deployment related to national mission needs. This role will join a team of satellite engineers, developers, and intelligence professionals to support exploratory research, analysis, design, and development of advanced processing algorithms and other innovations to improve existing systems and analytic capabilities. The ideal candidate has previous experience in mission-focused R&D environments. The position is based in Chantilly, VA.

All Riverside Research opportunities require U.S. citizenship.

Job Responsibilities:
• Develop full-stack data solutions and apply systems and software engineering principles to design and implement solutions
• Support collaborative R&D initiatives that span the data lifecycle to collect, ingest, process, store, persist, access, and deliver data and analytic results at scale and at speed
• Use a combination of tools, technologies, and analytic computing systems to achieve results
• Explore novel applications of advanced analytics to signal processing, including machine learning
• Optimize the performance of software algorithms, applications, and platforms
• Leverage and refine existing software in support of new application development
• Support verification/validation that software solutions and/or system performance meet requirements
• Visualize and communicate findings and provide a quantitative framework for evaluating and analyzing alternatives

Qualifications:
• Bachelor’s degree or higher in engineering, computer science, physics, or related field
• Experience with software design and multiple software languages, GPU processing, distributed computing, parallel processing, cloud computing, machine learning, visualization, system modelling and simulation
• Demonstrated signal processing and mathematical skills, including implementation of these concepts in software (C++/C, Python, Matlab, etc)
• Engineering expertise spanning systems design, requirements, analysis, and lifecycle maintenance
• Experience in data management, data integration & analytics, and/or software engineering with data-diverse analytic objectives
• Prior experience supporting complex DoD/IC IT programs, working and collaborating in a multi-disciplinary and results-oriented research team setting
• Knowledge of modern enterprise data architectures, design patterns, data toolsets and the ability to apply them
• Data integration skills and experience especially around moving large data sets in batch & near real time across cloud & ground desired
• Experience with DevOps/Agile development environments
• Strong problem solving, conceptualization, organization, and communication skills
• Active TS/SCI clearance

Desired Qualifications:
• Advanced degree in engineering, computer science, physics, or related field

Riverside Research strives to be one of America’s premier providers of independent, trusted technical and scientific expertise. As we continue to add experienced, technically astute staff, we are looking for highly motivated, talented team members that can help our DoD and Intelligence Community (IC) customers continue delivery of world class programs. As a not-for-profit, technology-oriented Defense Company, we believe service to customers and support of our staff is our mission. Our goal is to serve as a destination company by providing an industry-leading, positive, and rewarding employee experience for all who join us. We aspire to be a valued partner to our customers and to earn their trust through our unwavering commitment to achieve timely, innovative, cost-effective and mission-focused solutions.

All positions at Riverside Research are subject to background investigations. Employment is contingent upon successful completion of a background investigation including criminal history and identity check.

This contractor and subcontractor shall abide by the requirements of 41 CFR 60-741.5(a). This regulation prohibits discrimination against qualified individuals on the basis of disability, and requires affirmative action by covered prime contractors and subcontractors to employ and advance in employment qualified individuals with disabilities.

This contractor and subcontractor shall abide by the requirements of 41 CFR 60-300.5(a). This regulation prohibits discrimination against qualified protected veterans, and requires affirmative action by covered contractors and subcontractors to employ and advance in employment qualified protected veterans.

Apply Now",3.4,"Riverside Research Institute
3.4","Chantilly, VA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1967,Nonprofit Organization,Federal Agencies,Government,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
149,LEAD ENGINEER - SR. RESEARCH ENGINEER - EMBEDDED HARDWARE,$87k-$123k (Glassdoor Est.),"Job Summary:


Join our Defense and Intelligence Solutions Division to lead and participate in embedded hardware development teams involved in developing requirements, designing, implementing, testing, and documenting embedded software/hardware applications focusing primarily in C/C++. Support Junior engineers by providing guidance and leadership in embedded design, development, prototyping, integration, and testing against customer requirements. Perform embedded design, development, coding, integration, testing, research, programming and documentation for software systems, applications and/or Real-Time Operating Systems in conjunction with hardware design team; develop designs using UML Object Oriented design techniques. Assist junior staff with developing technical documentation and reports based on investigations. Perform laboratory, field tests, and troubleshooting. Interact directly with technical customer to fully understand requirements and constraints of the task objectives.


Education/Experience:


Requires a BS or MS degree in Computer Engineering with at least 7 years of software and hardware testing experience. Must have at least a 3.0 GPA. Embedded firmware design, development, and/or test experience strongly desired. Familiarity with configuration management tools such as AccuRev. Familiarity with Model Based System Engineering design using Enterprise Architecture preferred. Requires excellent interpersonal and communication skills. Experience in software and hardware development is desirable. Advanced experience in software development is desirable. Experience in embedded real-time RTOS application development preferred. A valid/clear driver's license is required.


Special Requirements:


Work assignment is in Dayton, Ohio. Applicant selected will be subject to a government security investigation and must meet eligibility requirements for access to classified information. Applicant must be a U.S. citizen.

Job Locations: Dayton, Ohio


For more information about this division, visit the Defense & Intelligence Solutions home page.

An Equal Employment Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer
Race/Color/Religion/Sex/Sexual Orientation/Gender Identity/National Origin/Disabled/Veteran
Committed to Diversity in the Workplace
If you need assistance, please Contact Us",4.0,"Southwest Research Institute
4.0","Dayton, OH",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1947,Nonprofit Organization,Research & Development,Business Services,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
150,Master Software Engineer,$83k-$143k (Glassdoor Est.),"114 5th Ave (22114), United States of America, New York, New York

Master Software Engineer

Do you love building and pioneering in the technology space? Do you enjoy solving complex business problems in a fast-paced, collaborative, inclusive, and iterative delivery environment? At Capital One, you'll be part of a big group of makers, breakers, doers and disruptors, who love to solve real problems and meet real customer needs.

We are seeking Software Engineers who are passionate about marrying data with emerging technologies to join our team. As a Capital One Software Engineer, you’ll have the opportunity to be on the forefront of driving a major transformation within Capital One. Learn more about #lifeatcapitalone and our commitment to diversity & inclusion by jumping to slides 76-91 on our Corporate Social Responsibility Report.

What You’ll Do:

Lead a portfolio of diverse technology projects and a team of developers with deep experience in machine learning, distributed microservices, and full stack systems to create solutions that help meet regulatory needs for the company

Share your passion for staying on top of tech trends, experimenting with and learning new technologies, participating in internal & external technology communities, mentoring other members of the engineering community, and from time to time, be asked to code or evaluate code

Collaborate with digital product managers, and deliver robust cloud-based solutions that drive powerful experiences to help millions of Americans achieve financial empowerment

Work with cloud native stack, build on AWS, use technologies like Kubernetes and Serverless

Basic Qualifications:

Bachelor’s Degree

At least 5 years of experience in software engineering

At least 1 year experience with Amazon Web Services (AWS), Microsoft Azure or public cloud service

Preferred Qualifications:

Master's Degree

4+ years of experience in at least one of the following: Java, Scala, Python, Go, Javascript, Angular.js or Node.js

4+ years of experience in open source frameworks

1+ years of people management experience

2+ years of experience in Agile practices

At this time, Capital One will not sponsor a new applicant for employment authorization for this position.",4.0,"Capital One
4.0","New York, NY",-1,10000+ Employees,1994,Company - Public,Banks & Credit Unions,Finance,$10+ billion (USD),-1
151,Radar System Analysis Engineer,$52k-$97k (Glassdoor Est.),"Radar System Analysis Engineer

SEG is seeking a Radar System Analysis Engineer to be part of a team providing support for U.S. Surface Navy (e.g. Aegis Baseline) programs and Missile Defense Agency (MDA) Ballistic Missile Defense System (BMDS) projects

Responsibilities
Characterize sensor performance against threat ballistic and cruise missiles through modeling, simulation and analysis using digital simulations.
Develop, integrate and use analytical models and tools to test new threat data and software products, assess system capability, and drive system requirements and design.
Define technical approach and plan studies based on understanding of engineering community and appreciation of customer need. Define study measures of performance and effectiveness, design experiments, and demonstrate analytical skills. Conduct individual analyses, and contribute to team technical studies.
Communicate with external customer and internal technical staff, via correspondence and briefings.
Support technical leadership for internal project and contribute in external customer forums.
Author technical details of statements of work
A majority of the work is based out of our Columbia, MD office. Travel is occasionally required to participate in technical forums and reviews.
Local travel anticipated at 10 percent and occasional overnight trips at 5 percent time.
Required Skills

Required Qualifications
Ability to obtain and maintain a US DoD SECRET clearance
Bachelor’s Degree: Systems Engineering, Electrical, Physics, Applied Math or related technical degree.
5+ 7 years work experience
Systems engineering experience
Experience with sensors, seekers, or remote sensing in RF and IR bands.
Strong analytical skills
Programming and scripting experience in a Linux environment
Communication, documentation and briefing via Microsoft office products (Outlook, Powerpoint, Excel, Word)
Desired Qualifications
Active US DoD SECRET or TOP SECRET Security Clearance
Masters or PhD degree preferred with relevant research project experience
MATLAB for the visual display of quantitative information, and prototyping M&S codes
Python for modeling and simulation development, data analysis, etc.
Facility working with C++ API and creating test drivers
Self-starter – Demonstrate independent ownership of tasking. Position affords opportunity to define path and lead tasks based on technical understanding of engineering community and appreciation of customer needs
Modeling and analysis experience and capability in one or more of the following areas:
RF Sensors / EO-IR Imaging / Remote Sensing Systems – Signal Processing, Detection and Track Filtering
Multi-Sensor Data Fusion, Target Classification and Discrimination (Machine Learning / AI applications)
Missile Systems (Aerodynamic, Ballistic, Space)
Defense Weapon System Performance (e.g. Navy Surface systems, Ballistic Missile Defense systems)
Ground Test and Field Test Events (missile flight and sensor track pre-event prediction and post-mission assessment)
Familiarity with version-control (Git), issue tracking (JIRA), collaboration software (Confluence), and cross-language software integration tools (SWIG).
Familiarity with high-performance computing environments
Systems Group Overview
Candidate will be part of a team responsible for weapon system simulation and performance analysis. The team develops and integrates individual system models for analysis (threats, weapons, sensors) to include multiple interacting systems. This team contributes to defining, leading and performing analyses for requirements feasibility, sensitivity studies for threat variability and fidelity, asset planning and what-if scenarios, flight-test mission (requirements, planning, and analysis) support and certification efforts.
The group provides independent verification and validation support for internal system-level products. This offers opportunities to work with SEG sensors, vehicles, phenomenology products and engineers integrated within our simulation software development environment to view the battle environment scenes through the eyes of combat systems.
The group includes subject matter experts and technical leads providing direct technical support to various defense programs as a contributing member of broad cross-functional and technical subject-specific integrated product teams.
We bring threat and weapons knowledge together to support concept definition, threat driver assessments, system requirements, design reviews, test planning, and defining road maps for future development
Company Overview

Systems Engineering Group, Inc. (SEG) is a highly regarded and leading provider of missile systems engineering and analysis. Principal customers include the U.S. Navy, Missile Defense Agency, AEGIS Ballistic Missile Defense Program, and Program Executive Offices for Integrated Warfare Systems and Ships. SEG is headquartered in Columbia, MD and is convenient to routes 32, 29, and 95. SEG is a wholly owned subsidiary of Telephonics Corporation. SEG provides excellent benefits, work environment and outstanding growth opportunities.

We are an Affirmative Action / Equal Employment Opportunity Employer (M/F/D/V). All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, gender, religion, sex, national origin, disability, protected veteran status or any other protected characteristic. Reasonable accommodations may include but are not limited to that which may enable individuals with disabilities and special disabled veterans to perform the essential functions of this position.

Required Experience

Job Location
Columbia, US-MD",2.5,"Telephonics
2.5","Columbia, MD",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1933,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
152,Distinguished Machine Learning Engineer,$166k-$280k (Glassdoor Est.),"About ForgeRock:

In today's highly connected digital world, understanding, managing and securing the identity of individuals and things is essential to safety and success of both businesses and their customers. Billions of people connect from anywhere, use a wide variety of devices and expect a seamless yet secure experience.

The ForgeRock mission is to provide the most simple and comprehensive Identity and Access Management Platform to help our customers deepen their relationships with their consumers and improve the productivity and connectivity of their employees and partners. Our identity solution enables great digital experiences and is embedded with a rich set of security, privacy and consent features. We deliver our platform through both cloud services and on-premises software.

Our customers are some of the biggest companies, organizations, and even countries in the world. On any given day, it's likely that the ForgeRock Identity Platform helped keep your data safe, gave you access to stuff, and supported trusted relationships between you, companies and the devices you were using.

ForgeRock is headquartered in San Francisco, but we are a global company with offices in the following cities: Vancouver, WA; Austin, TX; Munich, Germany; London & Bristol, UK; Grenoble & Paris, FR; Oslo, NO; Singapore and Sydney, Australia. Please read more about us at forgerock.com or follow ForgeRock on Twitter at http://www.twitter.com/forgerock.

The Role:

We are looking for a highly motivated,Principal Machine Learning Engineer to build out the next generation Identity platform. This role requires someone to develop the technology and platform for data processing, feature engineering and analysis to propel company transformation into a data insight driven organization. Work with peers in cloud engineering, SRE to drive data driven insight through the enterprise. Work on complex, high scale machine learning models in production and develop cutting edge algorithms that are deployed directly to customers in real-time. If you are self-driven, passionate about learning, work well in a collaborative environment and have effective communication skills, then we'd love to hear from you!

Responsibilities:
Provide architectural leadership; conduct regular reviews of project work and peer review.
Help in development and scaling of data pipelines, feature pipelines and data lakes to support large scale processing of millions of data events.
Develop an industry view of analytics and design-driven problem solving. Use academic and competitor research to understand recent advances and best practices and inform our approach to developing solutions.
Required Skills and Qualifications:
Masters or PhD degree in computer science, mathematics, statistics, physics, or related quantitative field
Ten years of progressive experience in a data engineering or quantitative role.
Business acumen to work with business partners and understand their domains, processes, and issues to identify strategies to optimize and innovate
Ability to leverage data visualizations to highlight insights to business partners and make a business case for a recommended action or innovation opportunity
Proficient in the language of statistics with an advanced understanding of mathematical statistics, including combinatorics, probability, common discrete and continuous distributions, univariate and multivariate distributions, conditional probability, random variables, expectation, variance, convergence, estimation (bias, MSE, consistency, sufficiency, maximum likelihood, moments, etc.), hypothesis testing, and confidence intervals.
Ability to collaborate effectively with Data Scientists, product management, engineering, UI/UX
Theoretical and practical understanding of a range of machine learning techniques including unsupervised learning (e.g. clustering, outlier detection, PCA, ICA, NNMF, SVD, etc.), supervised learning (e.g., regression techniques, naive bayes, support vector machines, LDA, decision trees, neural networks, etc.), reinforcement learning (e.g., Q-learning, neural networks, etc.), and meta-methods (e.g., boosting, bagging)
Written communication skills to engage partners, document methodology and results, and publish research
Organizational and project management skills for overall project planning and task management
Solid understanding of (1) data structures, (2) sequential algorithms, (3) distributed algorithms, (4) runtime and space complexity
Knowledge of information technology integration and deployment patterns to design and implement solutions
Advanced proficiency in one of the programming languages like Java, Scala or Python.
Advanced proficiency in data processing frameworks like Pandas.
Advanced proficiency in TensorFlow, Keras, Cloud based ML frameworks, external ML libraries and NLP libraries.
Nice to haves:
Project and/or program management experience.
Experience in representing company in International ML conferences.
Proficiency in cloud and ML deployment strategies.
Docker, Kubernetes and VM experience
Life at ForgeRock:

We believe in and facilitate a flexible, collaborative work environment. We've grown enormously, but remain true to the innovative, can-do startup values that got us here. Most important of all, we keep hiring talented, smart, fun, and genuinely nice people because that's who we want to succeed with every day. Below are just a few of the great things we have to offer at ForgeRock:
A great team of smart, fun and genuinely nice individuals.
Awesome company culture focused around providing a flexible and collaborative work environment
Regular office bonding events, from lunches and happy hours to group offsites and hack-days
Well-stocked fridges, whether you're hungry or thirsty
Competitive benefits and perks
We're Mac-friendly!
Generous employee referral bonus program
Amazing offices across the globe San Francisco HQ; Vancouver, WA; Austin, TX; Munich, Germany; London & Bristol, UK; Grenoble & Paris, FR; Oslo, NO; Singapore, Australia & counting!
ForgeRock is the collective sum of all our individual experiences, backgrounds and influences and we pride ourselves in growing and learning together. We are committed to building an inclusive and diverse environment where everyone's individuality is respected and everyone has an Identity. In recruiting for new colleagues, we welcome the unique contributions you can bring and encourage you to be your best self.

We are an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex including sexual orientation and gender identity, national origin, disability, protected Veteran Status, or any other characteristic protected by applicable federal, state, or local law.",4.2,"ForgeRock
4.2","Austin, TX",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2010,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
153,"Machine Learning Compiler Engineer, Staff",$132k-$221k (Glassdoor Est.),"Company:
Qualcomm Technologies, Inc.
Job Area:
Engineering Group, Engineering Group > Systems Engineering
Job Overview:


Qualcomm is a company of inventors that unlocked 5G ushering in an age of rapid acceleration in connectivity and new possibilities that will transform industries, create jobs, and enrich lives. But this is just the beginning. It takes inventive minds with diverse skills, backgrounds, and cultures to transform 5Gs potential into world-changing technologies and products. This is the Invention Age - and this is where you come in.

Qualcomm is a company of inventors that unlocked 5G - ushering in an age of rapid acceleration in connectivity and new possibilities that will transform industries, create jobs, and enrich lives. But this is just the beginning. It takes inventive minds with diverse skills, backgrounds, and cultures to transform 5Gs potential into world-changing technologies and products. This is the Invention Age - and this is where you come in. We are investing in several supporting technologies including 4G, 5G, Edge Computing, and Deep Learning.

The Qualcomm CR&D team is developing hardware and software for Machine Learning solutions spanning the data center, edge, infrastructure, automotive markets and beyond. We are seeking ambitious, bright and innovative engineers with experience in compiler technology, vectorization and optimization, and machine learning toolchains.

Job activities span the whole product life cycle from early R&D to commercial deployment. The environment is fast-paced and requires cross-functional interaction on a daily basis so good communication, planning and execution skills are a must.

We are looking to staff engineers at multiple levels in systems & software, integration and test. Details of one of the roles we are looking to staff are listed below.

Responsibilities:
Research, design, develop, enhance, and implement the different components of machine learning compiler based on performance and code-size needs of the customer workloads and benchmarks.
Analyze software requirements, determine the feasibility of design within the given constraints, consult with architecture and HW engineers, and implement software solutions best suited for Qualcomm's SOCs.
Analyze and identify system level integration issues, interface with the software development, integration and test teams.
Minimum Qualifications
Bachelor's degree in Engineering, Information Systems, Computer Science, or related field.
5+ years Systems Engineering or related work experience.
Preferred Qualifications
LLVM or any industrial strength compiler development experience is a plus.
Knowledge of the structure and function of the compiler internals.
Hands on experience writing SIMD and/or multi-threaded high-performance code
Hands-on experience implementing DSP Kernels a plus
Hands-on Experience in C/C++, Python development (3+ years)
Hands-on Experience with Object Orientated Design, TDD development solutions such as GoogleTest etc. (2+ years)
Experience with Source Code and Configuration management tools, git knowledge is required
Willingness to work in a cohesive software development environment with ability to work on low level implementation (code & test) and interfacing with hardware and simulators
Experience in machine learning frameworks and neural network architectures + ML compiler workload synthesis, a plus
Prior working experience of hardware accelerators and hardware software co-design
Experience in using C++ 14/17 (advanced features)
Experience at both the firmware (RTOS) and system level (Linux) in SOC
Experience of profiling software and optimization techniques
Passion to drive to develop leading-edge \""deep learning\"" framework and algorithms working on mobile and embedded platforms.
Applicants: If you are an individual with a disability and need an accommodation during the application/hiring process, please call Qualcomm’s toll-free number found here for assistance. Qualcomm will provide reasonable accommodations, upon request, to support individuals with disabilities to be able participate in the hiring process. Qualcomm is also committed to making our workplace accessible for individuals with disabilities. Qualcomm is an equal opportunity employer and supports workforce diversity.

To all Staffing and Recruiting Agencies: Our Careers Site is only for individuals seeking a job at Qualcomm. Staffing and recruiting agencies and individuals being represented by an agency are not authorized to use this site or to submit profiles, applications or resumes, and any such submissions will be considered unsolicited. Qualcomm does not accept unsolicited resumes or applications from agencies. Please do not forward resumes to our jobs alias, Qualcomm employees or any other company location. Qualcomm is not responsible for any fees related to unsolicited resumes/applications.

EEO Employer: Qualcomm is an equal opportunity employer; all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, Veteran status, or any other protected classification.",4.0,"Qualcomm
4.0","San Jose, CA",-1,10000+ Employees,1985,Company - Public,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),-1
154,Principal Software Engineer,-1,"Who we are:


Grabango is the leading provider of checkout-free shopper technology for existing stores. Founded by Will Glaser (co-founder/former CTO of Pandora Media), the Grabango team has developed the only enterprise class solution for large store chains in the market today. Grabango's system accommodates thousands of store locations, hundreds of thousands of SKUs and millions of square feet across a given retail enterprise.

We're a growing group of kind, curious, self-directed people working towards a common goal. We delight in taking risks and testing hypotheses in a collaborative and supportive environment. Our ability to celebrate both our successes and failures as milestones of growth opens the door to tremendous breakthroughs.

Computer vision and machine learning are at the core of our patent pending technology. Our accomplished team is a potent combination of technology and commerce professionals that are looking to ""Eliminate lines and save people time!""

Role Overview:

Grabango seeks an experienced backend software engineer to help design and build its distributed systems, ML/CV, and data pipelining infrastructures. In order to generate a receipt based on computer vision only, we need to have tools to process massive amounts of video and other downstream data, making decisions about real-world events at every layer of our infrastructure simultaneously. Additionally, the system doing this work needs to be able to scale horizontally, and be fault tolerant at every layer.

We are looking for a flexible, curious engineer with deep experience of high-throughput distributed systems using modern tooling and languages. Though we use many tools, depth of experience with Python and its use with distributed and real-time systems (Celery + Redis / RabbitMQ, Kafka + Faust, etc) will be central to this role. Deep working experience with the placement of different kinds of data in microservice architectures will be a critical element of this role as we work towards the infinitely scalable future. Shared tools such as Kubernetes, Docker and Git should be second-nature.

As a deeply technical lead, the ideal candidate will prefer spending about 50% of their time actually writing code, splitting the rest between planning and mentorship and code review. We are looking for an engineer who has already seen success in growing their team around them, as well as engineering highly available high-throughput distributed systems.

This full-time role reports directly to the Sr. Engineering Manager (Scale Team) and is based in Berkeley.

What you'll be doing:


Within the first 3 months
Getting up to speed on our various systems
Expanding our data pipeline across multiple networks
Instrumenting code to help us find areas to improve our designs
Working with other developers to identify and resolve bugs
Reducing latency and improving reliability of our internal APIs
Collaborating on system design to optimize petabyte-scale data set management
Supporting frontend developers in expanding our labeling and management system
Within the first 6 months
Designing distributed computing infrastructure for real time data processing
Scaling computer vision algorithms to run massively parallel in production
Determining technical roadmap based on current tech maturity and business objectives

What you should have:


8+ years Python and/or C++ experience with mastery of modern language features and libraries
Depth of experience with distributed and real-time systems, infrastructure, frameworks, and datastores
Second-nature familiarity with shared tools: Kubernetes, Docker, Git
You recognize the need to balance pragmatism and creativity
You have made mistakes, learned from them and avoided making them again.
You are able to use your knowledge and experience to help solve problems that may not be in your field of expertise
You work well with a diverse team of high-quality people focused on customer delight.
You can rapidly become familiar with and apply new tools and technologies

Educations & Certifications:


BS or equivalent experience in Computer Science or Computer Engineering

Grabango Values:
Integrity: Do the right thing, particularly when you don't have to.

Bold Innovation: Think recklessly, but temper your actions with pragmatism.

People Matter: Hire the best, and treasure them.

Don't Live with Broken: Have the courage to admit mistakes, and the urgency to correct them.

Customer Focus: Deliver beyond expectations, both internally and externally.

Inclusion: Foster an environment that welcomes all.

Simplify: Everything should be made as simple as possible, but not simpler.

Grabango is proud to be an equal opportunity employer and is committed to developing a workplace where diversity and inclusion are an essential part of who we are. We strive to hire and support a workforce as diverse as our shopper base, so we can develop products and services that best suit our customers. We do not make employment decisions based on race, color, religion, ethnic or national origin, nationality, sex, gender, gender-identity, sexual orientation, disability, age, military or veteran status and we comply with all local, state and federal employment laws.

Grabango participates in the E-Verify Program, an internet-based system operated by the Department of Homeland Security and the Social Security Administration. It allows employers to confirm an individual's employment eligibility to work in the United States.",3.8,"Grabango
3.8","Berkeley, CA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2016,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
155,LEAD ENGINEER - SR. COMPUTER SCIENTIST - SR. RESEARCH ENGINEER - UNMANNED SYSTEMS,$76k-$109k (Glassdoor Est.),"Job Summary:


What’s the next hardest challenge for autonomous vehicles? Join our Unmanned Systems Group and help drive our research forward. Provide technical leadership and innovation, project management, and business development support to our research and development projects and programs in areas like unmanned ground and aerial vehicles (UGVs and UAVs), automated material handling, connected and automated vehicles (CAVs), automated transit, and autonomous off-road vehicles for global commercial and government clients. Our 50-person team handles everything from small investigations of new sensors to multi-year development of complete autonomous systems. See some of them at https://ivs.swri.org. Lead internal and external research projects from ideation through proposal, capture, execution, and delivery. Maintain familiarity with both industry and academic research to ensure SwRI remains on the cutting edge of valuable near- and far-term technology and capability. Share your successes at global conferences and present to industry experts and your team.


Education/Experience:


Requires a B.S., M.S., or Ph.D. in Computer Engineering, Electrical Engineering, Mechanical Engineering, Computer Science, or a related engineering field with at least 7 years of research and development experience in robotics, autonomous systems, or a related field. Must have at least a 3.25 GPA. We mostly work with vehicles, related experience is preferred. Excellent interpersonal skills and experience leading a technical team are required. You’ll need to lead your colleagues on your projects as well as help mentor junior engineers. Must be comfortable writing proposal performing business development activities. We’re looking for someone to take our research in new and challenging directions, including working with all levels of staff and being hands-on. Technical skills from programming (ROS is highly desired) to electrical and mechanical design will be very helpful and occasionally required. A valid/clear driver's license is required.


Special Requirements:


Applicant selected will be subject to a government security investigation and must meet eligibility requirements for access to classified information. Applicant must be a U.S. citizen.

Job Locations: San Antonio, Texas


For more information about this division, visit the Intelligent Systems home page.

An Equal Employment Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer
Race/Color/Religion/Sex/Sexual Orientation/Gender Identity/National Origin/Disabled/Veteran
Committed to Diversity in the Workplace
If you need assistance, please Contact Us",4.0,"Southwest Research Institute
4.0","San Antonio, TX",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1947,Nonprofit Organization,Research & Development,Business Services,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
156,"Software Engineer, US Engagement",-1,"Overview


SmartNews is a leading mobile app of news aggregation services. We analyze millions of articles to deliver the most engaging information with high quality, in near-real time fashion, to millions of users around the world. We are looking for talented backend engineers to help us build user growth and engagement related features in the US market. Together, we are working to break through the filter bubble and deliver the best quality information to our end users.

Responsibilities
Design and implement scalable backend solutions (client-server protocols, business logic, database layer, etc) end to end for user facing features
Identify bottlenecks and apply optimizations in complex distributed systems
Collaborate cross functionally with mobile, frontend, machine learning engineers and product managers to communicate challenges and define milestones
Provide thoughtful code reviews and technical insights to multiply team productivity
Requirements

Minimum Requirements
3+ years of experience working on backend development in large scale distributed system
Hands on coding experience that delivers scalable and fault tolerant components with test strategy in mind
Experience solving complex problems with other engineers and business stakeholders in backend environment and drive the progress of execution to the finish line
Ability to guide and onboard junior engineers on technical side
Expert coding abilities in multiple programming languages (e.g. Java, C++, Python, Golang)
MS or BS in computer science, mathematics, physics or other quantitative fields|
Preferred Requirements
Proficient coding skills in Java and familiar with Java frameworks
Experience with public cloud technologies like AWS, GCP, Azure, etc
Experience working with user growth and engagement related projects in large scale
Strong interest in news media and our mission to deliver high quality information to the world",4.6,"SmartNews, Inc.
4.6","San Francisco, CA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2012,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
157,"Software Engineer, AI",-1,"Paige is on a mission to accelerate and transform the diagnosis and treatment of cancer. Paige is creating a digital platform for pathologists to transform their workflow and is developing a new class of computational diagnostics positioned to drive the future of pathology.

A career at Paige is deeply mission-driven where you will work with state-of-the-art technologies alongside leaders in the field and to improve cancer care every day. We reach high, help each other succeed, and believe in creativity, curiosity, and creating amazing products.

Paige employees receive great benefits, including health insurance, 401(k), paid parental leave, a generous health and wellness stipend and snacks delivered to your door on a weekly basis. We recently raised $70M in series B investment to ensure we're able to continue our mission and expand our impact. Join us!

We're seeking a Software Engineer, AI to join us. In this role you'll join a team of world-leading experts in machine learning, computer vision and pathology. You'll be part of the team that builds solutions for pathologists, clinicians and researchers to accelerate and improve the accuracy of cancer detection, classification and staging. This is an extraordinary opportunity to be part of a high-performing team and to pursue a life-changing mission.

This position will be working from our NYC HQ once the working conditions are deemed safe due to Covid-19. Until then, this position can be fully remote for candidates based in the U.S.

Key responsibilities:
Develop machine learning tooling and infrastructure to improve the scale and efficiency of machine learning development.
Work closely with scientists as well as engineers to support planning, developing, training and testing machine learning models for the purposes of computational pathology while leveraging and championing software engineering best practices.
Contribute to the whole product development life cycle from high uncertainty research and experimentation to deployment in production and maintenance.
Requirements:
Very strong Python proficiency.
Experience working in a team implementing and evaluating deep neural networks, especially for computer vision tasks.
Experience with Machine learning development tooling.
Experience with modern product development practices, including software testing (e.g. unit testing, regression testing).
Experience with Agile development methodologies.
Experience with parallelization, threading and concurrency problems.
Experience with design patterns, algorithms and data structures.
Experience with distributed systems.
Minimum qualifications:
Master's degree in computer science or a related field, or equivalent years of experience
3+ years of industry experience as a software engineer",5.0,"Paige
5.0",Remote,-1,51 to 200 Employees,2018,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
158,"R&D Electrical Engineer, Sensing and Instrumentation Products",-1,"Job Title:

R&D Electrical Engineer, Sensing and Instrumentation Products
_Job Summary: _*
Lion Precision is looking for Electrical Engineer to support the development of our ultra-high precision position sensing and instrumentation products used in scientific, metrology, semiconductor, aerospace, medical, and packaging & printing markets. These sensing systems are based on capacitive, inductive, and ultrasonic technologies, and encompass probes and transducers, high speed analog and digital drivers, embedded processors, analog and digital output, network and cloud connectivity, and back-end application software for analysis and documentation of system performance. This position is for an individual who has a background and interest in high precision sensors, analog devices and circuits, and high-speed signal processing. The candidate must have solid collaborative team skills and desire to work in a fast-paced and growing R&D environment. The job requires curiosity and innovation that lead to new and/or improved sensing products, technologies, and capabilities that will support the growth of the company. Projects include development of new “Standard” products, and well as custom OEM products for specific demanding applications.
_Company Overview: _*
Lion Precision was acquired by Carlisle Companies Incorporated on July 22nd, 2020. Carlisle is a $4.9B Global company with a diversified Product Portfolio that designs and manufactures highly engineered products across many industries.

Lion Precision designs and manufactures ultra-high precision standard and customized (OEM) sensing systems for measuring displacement, vibration, and dimension. Technologies include Capacitive and Eddy Current probes and instruments capable of ranges from 10um (0.0004 inch) to 15mm (0.6 inches), Bandwidth of up to 80kHz, and Resolution down to 50 pico-meters (0.000,000,002 inches). Markets served include semiconductor equipment, machine tool, packaging, and research institutions.
_Primary Job Responsibilities: _*
 Design, develop, test new and/or improved Sensor/Instrumentation products
 Support ongoing product modifications and continuation engineering
 Product and process scale-up in manufacturing
 Develop, execute, and document development test plans and results
 Perform competitive assessments
 Assist sales in customer communication and visits
 Participate and contribute to project planning and customer proposal generation
 Participate in Product and Market Strategy Development
 Other related duties as assigned
_Required Experience: _*
 BS degree in Electrical Engineering or Physics (MS Preferred)
 Prior R&D or academic experience with high speed Analog and Digital Circuit Design (3+ years preferred)

 Sensor design & development experience

_*Required Skills: *_

 Analog and Digital Circuit Design (Altium or equivalent)
 FPGA and uProcessor based circuit design
 Multilayer PC Board Design
 Signal Processing & Numerical analysis coursework and application
 Technical Communication (written, presentation)
 Use of lab tools, test equipment (scopes/meters)
 Coursework or experience in magnetic and electric field theory and modeling
_Additional Preferred Skills: _*
 ERP (GSS, Epicor, Oracle, or similar)
 Labview programming, data collection and control
 Matlab/Simulink or equivalent
 SPICE or equivalent circuit simulation
 Embedded software development in RT environment
_Other: _*
 Strong problem solving skills
 Inquisitive, eager to learn about new technology, tools, processes
 Cross-disciplinary knowledge (software, electronics, hardware)
 Ability to work and communicate effectively with customers
 Excellent math and analytic skills
 Ability to manage multiple tasks under tight deadlines
 Understanding and modeling of Collaboration
 History of successful project Execution (on time/budget)
 Strong sense of personal Accountability (can describe good accountability)
 Takes initiative, strong sense of internal motivation
 US Person
 Ability to travel up to 20% for work

Job Type: Full-time

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $55,000.00 - $75,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Employee assistance program
Flexible schedule
Flexible spending account
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Parental leave
Professional development assistance
Retirement plan
Tuition reimbursement
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Supplemental Pay:
Bonus pay
Education:
Bachelor's (Required)
Experience:
Altium: 1 year (Preferred)
Digital Design: 1 year (Preferred)
Work Location:
One location
Company's website:
https://www.lionprecision.com
Work Remotely:
No",-1,"Motion Tech Automation, LLC","Oakdale, MN",-1,51 to 200 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Electrical & Electronic Manufacturing,Manufacturing,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
159,Cloud DevOps Engineer (Active TS SCI),-1,"Volume Integration, LLC partners with our customers to deliver leading edge ""Big Data"" analytics solutions.

By leveraging our teams' extensive experience in cloud capabilities and emerging technologies, we design and deploy custom solutions to unique and evolving challenges. Volume employees and their families are our number one priority, while also ensuring our customer's mission and success remain the primary focus and objective.

If you are a motivated individual willing to tackle challenging, and interesting problems in cyber security, big data, and machine learning, come be a part of our dynamic team!

Job Description

Volume Integration is seeking a highly motivated, self-directed professional to fill the role of Cloud DevOps Engineer. The candidate must have a minimum clearance of active TS SCI.

The individual will serve as the technical lead to guide the project efforts for cloud DevOps configuration, automation, and deployment. The effort will include analysis of the current system configuration as well as documentation for optimization and future architectures.

The individual will participate in the setup, maintenance, and deployment of cloud system resources and services. This includes providing requirement inputs and traceability from applicable software requirements, architecture diagrams, and conceptual operations. Maintenance activities will include monitoring resources for utilization and cost performance.

The individual will assist in testing updates and addressing issues as identified by the end users of the operational deployments.

The individual will provide summary reports, progress, and status of system architecture milestones and be able to communicate to senior leadership risks and opportunities that need to be addressed.

The ideal candidate will have:
Experience acting in an advisory role interpreting cloud system architectures and communicating recommendations
Demonstrated ability to convey technical information to non-technical individuals via formal and informal briefings and technical exchange meetings
Strong knowledge of cloud automation, configuration control, and deployment
Experience preparing system documentation and architecture plans
Experience with writing and deploying cloud framework automation as part of the DevOps environment
Required Skills:
Bachelor's degree in Computer Science, Software Engineering, or Information Systems with at least 8-12 years of work experience; or a combination of related work experience, technical training, and professional certifications.
Practical experience with designing, developing and testing complex software systems in a cloud environment
Active TS SCI clearance
Desired Qualifications:
Demonstrated experience with Java, Python, and one or more of Bash, JavaScript, PowerShell, Bash, React, Vue, XML, etc Cloud Identity and Access Management configuration experience
Exposure to relational, NoSQL and/or file-based storage (e.g. MySQL, MongoDB, Cassandra, Oracle, Postgres, etc.).
Amazon Web Services (AWS) DevOps Professional certification or Microsoft Certified: DevOps Engineer Expert (Other cloud certifications are also beneficial)
Active TS SCI with Polygraph desired
Location:
Chantilly, VA

Many Volume positions require an active (or ability to obtain) U.S. Security Clearance, for which the US Government requires US Citizenship. Volume Integration, LLC. is an Equal Opportunity Employer. Employment decisions are made without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, veteran status or other characteristics protected by law.",4.4,"Volume Integration, LLC
4.4","Chantilly, VA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2013,Company - Private,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
160,CNC Applications Engineer,$34k-$59k (Glassdoor Est.),"Overview


At Ellison Technologies we are a provider of advanced machining solutions to North American metal-cutting manufacturers and their global affiliates. As a 62 year old company we are committed to the survival and growth of the American manufacturing industry. Independent offices provide us a local market focus and the flexibility to advocate the needs of each of our valued customers.

Our priority is to introduce technologies that strengthen our customers’ ability to compete in the markets they serve. Whether the solution involves a stand alone machine, multi-process equipment, or an integrated manufacturing system with robotic automation, our goal remains the same; to optimize throughput and quality at the lowest per-part manufacturing cost.

In brief, this role will provide you the opportunity to showcase your ability to consult with our myriad clients in the Southern Ohio market and help guide them to take their products from raw stock to a finished good in the most efficient and accurate manner while meeting the aforementioned goals.

Please review our Glassdoor page and our Ellison ""About Us"" page to learn more

Responsibilities


Although not all-inclusive, below should provide a sense of what the opportunity entails:

Coordinate various manufacturing supportive services for internal and external customers.

Tasks may include but are not limited to the following:

• Creating Process Cycle Time Estimates• Provide Training Classes and Support on-site and at the customer • Support the Sales Team During Throughout Sales Process• Manage Customer Relationships• Provide Machine Demonstrations at ET and for Trade Shows• Assist In Fixture/Tooling Design• Complete Turnkey System Execution Including Documentation• Manage Turnkey System Projects• Document Activities

Accountable for Customer Satisfaction. Prepare reports for management and project requirements. Maintain proper records of customer issues and requests for support. Interface and assist parts, service, applications, and sales department as needed with the goal of exceeding customer expectations. Participate with enthusiasm on other related duties as assigned.

Qualifications


We are looking for that rare candidate that is truly energized by teaching and working directly with clients.

You’ll have experience with process cycle times, process capabilities and of course a strong understanding of controls such as Fanuc, Siemens, Heidenhain, Mitsubishi and/or similar. What's more, you'll have created myriad parts with Mastercam, GibbsCAM, ESPRIT or similar.

Minimum qualification include 5 years programming and working on CNC machines.

Our Mission: Equip manufacturers to compete and win, both locally and globally!

“The Ellison Way principles continue to drive our company forward. The Ellison Way principle of Adaptation will ensure that Ellison will evolve to further grow market share, strengthen our relationships with our key partners and our customers. The major focus moving forward must be on the development of Ellison’s most valuable resource – its people.""Graham Hooper (CEO)

""Ellison Technologies is an Equal Opportunity employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex including sexual orientation and gender identity, national origin, disability, protected Veteran Status, or any other characteristic protected by applicable federal, state, or local law.”

#ZR *PM18",4.4,"ELLISON TECHNOLOGIES, INC.
4.4","Hamilton, OH",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1955,Company - Private,Industrial Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
161,Mechanical Engineer II - Systems,$51k-$134k (Glassdoor Est.),"Fujifilm Dimatix, Inc. strives to offer a healthy work environment that promotes individual responsibility and growth, a collaborative spirit, and an atmosphere that encourages learning, professional development and achievement.
We search for the most talented and qualified people for both external and internal opportunities. At Fujifilm, performance, development and accountability are the standards to which the company and its people strive toward. And to support its employees, we offer programs that motivate, educate and promote a healthy work-life balance, which increase employee satisfaction and overall personal well-being.
Fujifilm is committed to offering a comprehensive and flexible benefit program to meet the needs of employees and their families. This flexible approach allows employees to create a program that fits their lives. At Fujifilm, INNOVATION and PEOPLE matter.
FUJIFILM Dimatix, Inc. is an E-Verify Employer
EO-employer-M/F/Vets/Disabled
ATTN Staffing Services: We do not accept unsolicited resumes.

POSITION SUMMARY:
Mechanical Engineer to contribute to the development of industrial inkjet printing systems. This position requires a combination of technical depth, design experience, a willingness to be hands on, and a collaborative spirit. The engineer will be involved at all stages of the development process from initial scoping and requirements generation, to engineering analysis and design execution, through validation and field support.
KNOWLEDGE: Uses skills as a seasoned, experienced professional with a full understanding of industry practices and company policies and procedures; resolves a wide range of issues in imaginative as well as practical ways. This job is the fully qualified, career-oriented, journey-level position.
JOB COMPLEXITY: Works on problems of diverse scope where analysis of data requires evaluation of identifiable factors. Demonstrates good judgment in selecting methods and techniques for obtaining solutions. Interacts with senior internal and external personnel.
SUPERVISION: Normally receives little instruction on day-to-day work, general instructions on new assignments.
ESSENTIAL JOB FUNCTIONS:
Scoping project proposals. This includes estimating effort, cost, and technical risk.
Thermofluid analysis of inkjet system components including ink delivery systems, electronics enclosures, and electronics cooling.
Structural analysis of machine components such as gantries and mounts
Evaluation of, and contribution to, product requirements.
Concept generation and proposals
Feasibility testing
Design of industrial inkjet systems including high tolerance machined components, sheet metal, fluid systems, and industrial motion.
Tolerance stack up analysis
Conducting Design Failure Mode and Effect Analysis on new designs
Value engineering to reduce the cost of existing designs
Work cross-functionally with marketing, operations, field support and external partners to produce designs that achieve a thoughtful balance between function, quality, and cost.
Prepare and release product documentation including part drawings, assembly prints, product manuals, process documentation, etc.
Collaborate with the production and test teams to produce and enhance designs.
Drive verification and validation through the creation of test plans, working with technicians, performing tests, analyzing data, and meeting project goals by developing creative solutions to problems.
Interfacing with stakeholders to ensure that the product meets the intended customer’s requirements.
Work with the field support team to achieve successful installation of equipment and troubleshoot customer issues. This may include some travel.
Leverage research from industry and academic best practices to create new development processes that extend the engineering capabilities of the team
SUPERVISORY RESPONSIBILITIES:
None
REQUIRED:
Advanced problem-solving skills utilizing science and engineering education to arrive at practical solutions.
Excellent written and verbal communication skills
Ability to work individually as well as interact with vendors, customers, and other engineers and ability top work across several functional departments
High creativity
BS Engineering and 5-10 years related experience
Product design experience using a commercial CAD software.
Knowledge of proper drafting techniques per ANSI/ASME Y14.5M.
Ability to participate, lead, mentor in a team environment
DESIRED:
Advanced Engineering degree
Familiarity with commercial CFD and/or FEA analysis software
Statistics
Knowledge of printing, print systems
PHYSICAL DEMANDS:
The physical demands described here are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully
perform the essential functions of this job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with
disabilities to perform the essential functions.
Ability to work long hours as required.
WORK ENVIRONMENT:
The work environment characteristics described here are representative of those an employee encounters while performing the essential functions of this job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.
Ink Lab
OTHER:
Other duties as may be assigned.
Each employee’s primary objective is to assure that the quality, delivery and cost controls within his/her control meet or exceed all of our internal and external customers’ requirements.
Each employee is required to abide by the Employee Handbook and the rules and regulations explained and provided at each orientation and training session. Special attention must be given to the safety aspects of these documents.
FUJIFILM Dimatix provides competitive wages, a generous benefits package and a friendly, dynamic working environment.
Equal Opportunity Employer
FUJIFILM Dimatix is an E-Verify Employer",3.8,"FUJIFILM Dimatix
3.8","West Lebanon, NH",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1984,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Industrial Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
162,Entity Resolution / Data Correlation Engineer,$69k-$125k (Glassdoor Est.),"Join our team dedicated to developing and executing innovative solutions in support of customer mission success.

Job Description:

Novetta has an exciting opportunity for a self-motivated and accomplished Computer Scientist to join our entity analytics team. You will work on complex projects involving data analysis, software engineering, and deploying software in a cloud computing environment. The team combines data from disparate sources to visualize the complex relationships between entities. This effort involves large scale data integration and entity resolution leveraging a best in class Novetta product. We are looking for a flexible problem solver with significant technical experience to join a team providing unique solutions for our customers and stakeholders.

Responsibilities include:
Analyze large amounts of data.
Deploy applications on a large-scale data processing cluster using AWS technologies.
Design and implement entity correlation strategies that are tailored to mission needs and unique data qualities.
Develop algorithms and visualization tools to help stakeholders understand their data and prioritize new data sources.
Develop and integrate applications to automate ingestion, processing and monitoring of data
Develop and maintain tools to support operations and maintenance of production and development computing clusters.
Basic Qualifications:
A Bachelor's degree in computer science or related field and a minimum of 5 years of experience; or a Master's degree in computer science or related field and a minimum of 3 years of experience.
Experience in software development/engineering including requirements analysis, software development, installation, integration, evaluation, enhancement, maintenance, testing and problem diagnosis/resolution.
Software development experience on Linux-based systems in Python or shell scripting or JavaScript.
Experience developing against full-featured REST APIs and using a command line interfac
Desired Skills:
Software development experience with JavaScript, Python, or other modern programming languages.
Hands-on experience with Spark.
Experience working with Databricks
Interest in statistical analysis, machine learning, or data science.
Experience with entity resolution products or a background in data matching theory and technologies.
Experience developing applications in AWS.
Security Clearance:
Active TS/SCI with Polygraph
Novetta, from complexity to clarity.

Novetta delivers highly scalable advanced analytics and secure technology solutions to address challenges of national and global significance. Focused on mission success, Novetta pioneers disruptive technologies in machine learning, data analytics, full-spectrum cyber, cloud engineering, open source analytics, and multi-INT fusion for Defense, Intelligence Community, and Federal Law Enforcement customers. Novetta is headquartered in McLean, VA with over 1,000 employees across the U.S.

Our culture is shaped by a commitment to our core values:

Integrity • We hold ourselves accountable to the highest standards of integrity and ethics.

Customer Success • We strive daily to exceed expectations and achieve customer mission success.

Employee Focus • We invest in our employees' professional development and training, respecting individuality and fostering a culture of diversity and inclusion.

Innovation • We know that discovering new and innovative ways to solve problems is critical to our success and makes us a great company.

Excellence in Execution • We take pride in flawless execution as we build a company that is best in class.

Earn a REFERRAL BONUS for the qualified people you know.

For more details, or to submit a referral: bit.ly/NovettaReferrals

Novetta is an equal opportunity/affirmative action employer.

All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to sex, gender identity, sexual orientation, race, color, religion, national origin, disability, protected veteran status, age, or any other characteristic protected by law.",4.6,"Novetta
4.6","Herndon, VA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2012,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
163,SAR/DSP Engineer,-1,"SAR/DSP Engineer

NSBU | Melbourne, FL, United States

Why Join Rincon Research Corporation (RRC)?

At Rincon Research Corporation, our primary business is innovating, developing, and fielding digital signal processing (DSP) products and services for the United States Defense and Intelligence Communities in support of national security.

Rincon Research Corporation seeks a candidate that has a detailed software and computer skillset but is interested in advanced signal processing applications.

Come join the team that is creating cutting edge signal processing, geolocation, and communication systems for the future!

What are the primary responsibilities in the SAR/DSP Engineer position?

Candidate will be responsible for developing within a heterogeneous software environment containing code in Python, MATLAB, C/C++ and Java. A strong CS background is needed and experience in cloud computing and machine learning are very desirable. Good communication skills, with ability to interact with remote co-workers and customers are required. Looking for people able to find creative and cutting-edge solutions for customer issues.

What required background will make you successful?
Degree in Computer Science, Electrical Engineering, or other equivalent field of discipline
Master’s degree and 5+ years applied and relevant experience or Bachelor’s degree and 7+ years’ experience
Demonstrated capability in scientific programming of high-level language such as C/C++on Unix/Linux platforms
Working knowledge of high level interpreted languages such as PYTHON and/or MATLAB
Experience with interfacing extensive C/C++ libraries within interpreted languages
Ability to obtain and maintain TS/SCI security clearance
US CITIZENSHIP REQUIRED
Where is the position located?

This position is located at our Melbourne, FL office.

What benefits does RRC offer?
100% employer-paid premiums for family medical and dental insurance, employee life insurance, short-term and long-term disability (STD & LTD)
Flexible reimbursement spending accounts for medical expense and dependent care
Immediate participation and vesting in the company’s Employee Stock Ownership Plan (ESOP) and 401(k) Plan
Employer contributions to RRC’s ESOP
Employer matching contributions to the company’s 401( k) Plan
Employer discretionary contributions to the company’s 401(k) Plan
Rincon Research Corporation is an equal opportunity employer and considers qualified applicants for employment without regard to race, color, creed, religion, national origin, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity and expression, age, disability, veteran status, or any other protected factor.",4.1,"Rincon Research Corporation
4.1","Melbourne, FL",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1983,Company - Private,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
164,LEAD ENGINEER - SR. RESEARCH ENGINEER - INSTRUMENT SYSTEMS,$76k-$109k (Glassdoor Est.),"Job Summary:


Join our Space Science and Engineering Division; collaborate with your team of scientists, engineers, and technicians to develop mechanical designs for space programs, including structural components and assemblies of space sensors, mechanisms, and spacecraft. Perform structural and thermal analyses of flight hardware. Specify, design, and coordinate fabrication of spacecraft and instrument thermal control systems (MLI and thermal control surface finishes). Design mass efficient structures and electronic packaging for extreme environment situations. Supervise and coordinate fabrication of hardware. Develop and supervise environmental screening tests, development tests, and experiments. Produce high quality engineering documentation including drawings, specifications, test plans, procedures, and reports. Oversee and assist with assembly, integration, and testing efforts. Support various design reviews throughout product life cycle, including defending design and analytical work to customer, third party, and non-advocate reviewers. Mentor and participate in the development of junior technical staff. Propose and perform independent research activities in line with personal strengths to improve related technology, and to establish and maintain competitive advantage. Support promotional and proposal activities as part of a team effort to develop new business opportunities. Field support may require travel to customer's facilities, NASA field centers, military bases, and overseas.


Education/Experience:


Requires a BS degree in Aerospace Engineering or Mechanical Engineering with 7 years of experience, those with an MS degree require 6 years experience. Must have at least a 3.0 GPA. Experience using structural analysis software (e.g., ANSYS, NASTRAN), thermal analysis software (e.g., Thermal Desktop, Sinda), computer aided design (CAD) software (e.g., CREO or PRO/Engineer, SolidWorks), and standard office productivity software is required. The ability to productively interface with team members, suppliers and clients is a must. Working knowledge of GD&T, environmental testing methodology, mechanism design, material selection and characterization, composite structural design and analysis, electromechanical design, and/or space mission concept design a plus. Previous experience presenting designs and analysis to review panels also a plus. A valid/clear driver's license is required.


Special Requirements:


Must be a U.S. citizen or Permanent Resident due to ITAR work in section.

Job Locations: San Antonio, Texas


For more information about this division, visit the Space Science & Engineering home page.

An Equal Employment Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer
Race/Color/Religion/Sex/Sexual Orientation/Gender Identity/National Origin/Disabled/Veteran
Committed to Diversity in the Workplace
If you need assistance, please Contact Us",4.0,"Southwest Research Institute
4.0","San Antonio, TX",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1947,Nonprofit Organization,Research & Development,Business Services,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
165,Sr. Front End Engineer,$76k-$176k (Glassdoor Est.),"About Alteryx

Alteryx develops software for data preparation and analysis, including a number of server solutions for model deployment, collaborative work on data, and scheduling of automatic data processing. We're revolutionizing data analytics by providing a complete end to end, self-service platform that allows users to get from business questions to business answers at incredible speeds. Why work for just any analytics company?

At Alteryx, we are explorers, dreamers and innovators. We're on a journey to build the best analytics platform in the world, but we can't do it without people like you leading the way. We want Alteryx to be recognized as much for our dynamic work culture as for our products.

About Alteryx Innovation Labs

The Innovation Labs office, Alteryx's first office presence in Boston, was started earlier this year by the acquisition of MIT-spinout Feature Labs. This rapidly growing team combines the excitement of being part of a fast-paced, innovative startup with the resources, market penetration, and wisdom of a data analytics market leader. Our goal is to turbo-charge machine learning and data science efforts on the Alteryx platform, and to enable anyone to solve dynamic problems. We are working on high-impact, high-visibility projects, and we’re looking for collaborative and knowledge-hungry teammates who want to join us as we work to democratize machine learning.

Overview

As a Senior Front End Engineer, you will work within the Innovation Labs front end development team to build a new web-based data science product. In this role, you will have the opportunity to problem solve, drive projects to success, communicate with stakeholders, and learn from both success and failures as part of a dynamic, friendly and ambitious team with technical influence throughout Alteryx and beyond.

Responsibilities
Be a senior member on the front end team to build a large and complex (in a fun way!) application using React/Redux
Work closely with UI/UX team to provide feedback on designs and transform them into functioning user-facing products
Work closely with Product and Engineering leadership on the technical and product roadmap
Consume and inform the design of and then consume machine learning and data science APIs that powers the application
Incorporate user feedback to improve the product
Author new features, from conception and design to implementation and testing
***The company will not provide sponsorship for work visas or other employment authorization for this position***

Requirements
5+ years of experience in front-end web development, ideally with several years of React
Fluency in SASS/CSS
Experience writing clear and effective documentation
Experience with automated testing and tools like Jest, Cypress, CircleCI, Github Actions, Selenium, etc.
Experience with Git, Amazon Web Services (EC2, S2, Lambda)
Bonus
Built and maintained a component library
Experience with data visualization
Experience with API design
Demonstrated (in your portfolio) eye for design and solving real-world user problems
Working knowledge with other server/web technologies (Python, NodeJS, Java, etc.)
Contributions to open-source frameworks and/or libraries
Benefits & Perks
100% company-paid medical, dental, and vision for associates
Company matched 401(k)
Associate stock purchase plan
Paid time off: 3 weeks’ vacation, 5 sick days, 9 holidays, 3 floating holidays, and 20 hours volunteer time
100% paid parental leave
Tuition reimbursement
Wellness programs with up to $300 fitness reimbursement annually
Collaborative offices stocked with healthy snacks and drinks
Office events, catered lunches, and happy hours
#LI-JE1",3.6,"Alteryx
3.6","Boston, MA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1997,Company - Public,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
166,DevOps Engineer,$100k-$135k (Employer Est.),"Take part in the explosive growth this industry has to offer. If you have a passion for DevOps, are hungry to learn, and are looking for a creative, fun and friendly workplace where you get to develop software that will transform the industry, we would love to get in touch with you. Our ideal candidate must have 3+ year’s experience in mission critical Cloud operations and DevOps engineering and has a strong understanding and experience working with Linux operating systems; specifically troubleshooting and providing administration.

Responsibilities Include:
Troubleshooting network, OS, and application issues for a complex distributed cloud-based communications platform.
Automating infrastructure build-outs and deployments for web, database, and application servers and containers with an emphasis on scale.
Defining and developing strategies for systems logging, monitoring, and reporting to facilitate pro-active service repair and resource allocation planning.
Helping to establish and document the technical architecture and procedural standards required to meet the organization’s goals for high availability and reliable service.
Candidates Must have:
2+ years working with virtualized environments and containers (Docker, Kubernetes)
Working knowledge of configuration management, monitoring, and unified logging (SaltStack, Ansible, Terraform, Nagios, ELK Stack)
Solid understanding of general networking principles and common protocols
Ideal candidates will have:
Prior work with Asterisk, SIP, or telephony in general
Experience operating a full Linux production stack in a cloud environment (CentOS, CoreOS, Debian, Google, Digital Ocean)
Knowledge of RDBMS and NoSQL databases (MySQL, MongoDB, Redis)
Familiarity with standard development tools and deployment pipelines (git, CI/CD)
Grafana
ElasticSearch
Promethius
GoLang
We’ll hire the candidate that:
Enjoys solving problems through the entire application stack
Is able to take loose requirements, work with others to figure out what needs to be done, and drive a project forward
Cares about quality and know what it means to ship high quality code and infrastructure
Mentors and inspires others to raise the bar for everyone around them
Loves to collaborate with their peers, designing pragmatic solutions
Has experience working in an Agile environment
What We Offer:
Health Insurance, Dental Insurance, Vision
Generous PTO policy, paid leave
401k Plan
Company equity program
Education Reimbursement
Fancy espresso machine, dog-friendly, and free beer!",3.7,"FluentStream Technologies
3.7","Denver, CO",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2007,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
167,Sr Data Scientist,$106k-$169k (Glassdoor Est.),"Neustar is an information services and technology company and a leader in identity resolution providing the data and technology that enables trusted connections between companies and people at the moments that matter most. More information is available at https://www.home.neustar.
Job Requisition:
R-3226 Sr Data Scientist (Open)
Primary Location:
LOS ANGELES
Job Description:
Job Description
Who are we?
As a company built on the foundation of Privacy by Design, for more than 20 years Neustar’s unique capabilities have made us the leader in the field of responsible identity resolution. Neustar enables trusted connections between companies and people at the moments that matter most, with world-class and industry leading solutions in Marketing, Identity, Risk, Communications, Security and Registry services.
Job Requisition:
Senior Data Scientist
Primary Location:
Los Angeles, New York or another major Neustar office in the US (Virtual OK for experienced candidates with record of successful telecommuting)

Job Description:
The senior data scientist will work on challenging problems extracting actionable information out of the many data sources available to Neustar. She/he/they will focus on marketing analytics and privacy-preserving big data analytics, and will be involved in projects from end-to-end, including data ingestion and curation, hypothesis development, feature engineering, and model development and evaluation.
At Neustar senior data scientists create prototypes of new algorithms and support engineering teams in productizing these capabilities. They work closely with various teams including data acquisition, data products, other data science teams within various business units including Risk, Security, and OneID to ensure implementation of capabilities that enable the organization’s vision.
Responsibilities:
·         Algorithm Development: Develop a deep understanding of all the data relevant to the problem to be addressed. Establish deterministic and probabilistic linkages between data sources and develop ways to extract and summarize the sought information in the data using a wide variety of statistical, data mining and machine learning techniques.
·         Prototyping: Create prototypes of productizable ways to perform the analysis at scale, provide documentation and help educate your colleagues in different function about the solution.
·         Support Implementation: Closely work with product, engineering and client teams to incorporate Data Science capabilities into Neustar’s products and services.
Experience and Qualifications:
·         A PhD in an analytical field such as computer science, machine learning, data science, statistics, physics and/or engineering, or a Master’s degree in a related field with 3 to 5 years of experience is a minimum requirement.
·         Minimum 5 years of experience with Python and SQL, and one or more enterprise level programming languages such as Java or Scala.
·         Minimum 2 years of hands-on experience with Linux-based cloud systems such as AWS and GCP.
·         Minimum 2 years of experience with wrangling large (terabytes) event level datasets.
·         Academic or industrial experience in privacy-preserving analytics on large datasets preferred.
·         Some experience writing code for highly distributed systems such as Apache Spark, Dask and Hive.
·         Several years of experience engineering features for machine learning models from raw data.
·         Background in applying optimization theory to real-world problems.
·         Ability to modify cost functions in machine learning algorithms based on business problems.
·         Some experience with TensorFlow or PyTorch.
·         Excellent oral and communication skills.
·         Ability and experience working in a cross-functional environment.
At Neustar, we are committed to the growth and development of our employees whose individual skills, curiosity and passion for their work, contribute to the overall success of our business. Our core values (Accountability, Collaboration, Transparency, Resilience, and Respect) are the driving force of our culture across our locations around the globe. We offer our employees a comprehensive benefits package including perks such as tuition & certification reimbursement, awesome company discounts, community service events, pet swag and much more!  We are all learning and creating together; and having some major fun along the way.
JOIN US!  We can’t wait to meet you!
Neustar does not accept unsolicited resumes from external firms or agencies. Neustar will not be responsible for placement fees associated with unsolicited resumes.
DIVERSITY
Diversity, inclusion and teamwork are second nature to Neustar; and these values permeate our entire business structure. Neustar is committed to creating an environment where a wide spectrum of opinions and beliefs are actively sought, listened to and respected. Further, our talented workforce draws from the many geographic areas and markets in which Neustar operates worldwide, which represents a distinct competitive advantage. The rich and varied personal and professional backgrounds of our employees make Neustar a dynamic and rewarding company at which to build a career. We invite you to join us.

EOE of Minorities/Females/Vets/Disability
Neustar, Inc. considers all applicants for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, age, disability, sexual orientation, or status as a Vietnam-era or special disabled veteran in accordance with federal law and other state and local requirements. Neustar, Inc., complies with applicable state and local laws prohibiting discrimination in employment and provides reasonable accommodation to qualified individuals with disabilities in accordance with the American with Disabilities Act (ADA) and applicable state and local laws.",3.6,"Neustar
3.6","Los Angeles, CA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1996,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
168,Senior Infrastructure Engineer,$90k-$160k (Glassdoor Est.),"About Alteryx

Alteryx develops software for data preparation and analysis, including a number of server solutions for model deployment, collaborative work on data, and scheduling of automatic data processing. We're revolutionizing data analytics by providing a complete end to end, self-service platform that allows users to get from business questions to business answers at incredible speeds. Why work for just any analytics company?

At Alteryx, we are explorers, dreamers and innovators. We're on a journey to build the best analytics platform in the world, but we can't do it without people like you leading the way. We want Alteryx to be recognized as much for our dynamic work culture as for our products.

About Alteryx Innovation Labs

The Innovation Labs office, Alteryx's first office presence in Boston, was started earlier this year by the acquisition of MIT-spinout Feature Labs. This rapidly growing team combines the excitement of being part of a fast-paced, innovative startup with the resources, market penetration, and wisdom of a data analytics market leader. Our goal is to turbo-charge machine learning and data science efforts on the Alteryx platform, and to enable anyone to solve impactful problems. We are working on high-impact, high-visibility projects, and we’re looking for collaborative and knowledge-hungry teammates who want to join us as we work to democratize machine learning.

Overview

As an Infrastructure Engineer you will lead the Innovation Labs’ effort to deploy, scale, secure and manage our new multi-platform data science product (sorry we can’t say much yet on what it is publicly, but we promise it’s great!). In this role, you will have the opportunity to problem solve, drive projects to success, communicate with stakeholders, and learn from both success and failures as part of a dynamic, friendly and ambitious team with technical influence throughout Alteryx and beyond.

Responsibilities
Work with the rest of the infrastructure team to build, design and scale a Docker-based cloud version of the product.
Develop compliance and security practices across the engineering organization
Define and promote a culture of rigorous software development practice and high quality standards
***The company will not provide sponsorship for work visas or other employment authorization for this position***

Requirements
5+ years experience in Docker-based cloud deployments, ideally with Kubernetes and on AWS
Experience in Single and Multi-Tenant Enterprise deployments
Experience writing clear and effective documentation
Experience with automated testing and CI/CD platforms and tools like CircleCI, Selenium, etc
Experience with Infrastructure as Code (Terraform for example)
Bonus
Experience with Windows Server, Powershell and installers
Experience with Azure and/or Google Cloud
Contributions to open-source frameworks and/or libraries
Experience in building ML data pipelines
Perks
100% company-paid medical, dental, and vision for associates
Health plans that cover your family and pets
Company matched 401(k)
Associate stock purchase plan
Paid time off: 3 weeks’ vacation, 5 sick days, 9 holidays, 3 floating holidays, and 20 hours volunteer time
100% paid parental leave
Tuition reimbursement
Wellness programs with up to $300 fitness reimbursement annually
Collaborative offices stocked with healthy snacks and drinks
Office events, catered lunches, and happy hours
#LI-JE1",3.6,"Alteryx
3.6","Boston, MA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1997,Company - Public,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
169,Backend Engineer,$69k-$110k (Glassdoor Est.),"Company Overview:
Age of Learning is a leading education technology innovator based in Glendale, California, with a talented team of more than 600 individuals comprised of nationally-renowned educators, curriculum experts, developers, artists, writers, designers, engineers, producers, product managers, analysts and marketing experts! Together we develop engaging, effective digital learning technology and content to help children build a strong academic foundation for lifelong success.
Our flagship product ABCmouse.com Early Learning Academy® is a comprehensive online curriculum and the #1 digital learning product for young children. To-date, more than 30 million children worldwide have completed over 7 billion Learning Activities on ABCmouse. We recently launched Adventure Academy, the first massively multiplayer online (MMO) game designed specifically to help elementary- and middle-school-aged children learn. It features thousands of engaging Learning Activities—including minigames, books, original animated and live action series, and more—in a fun and safe virtual world. Other Age of Learning programs include immersive English language learning products for children in China and Japan; ReadingIQ, a digital library and literacy platform; and a groundbreaking personalized, adaptive digital learning system that individualizes math instruction for every child through AI-driven technology.

We are committed to helping all children succeed. We provide our educational programs at no cost to teachers, Head Start programs, public libraries, and other community organizations, and have served millions of children through these initiatives. We recently established the Age of Learning Foundation to expand this work globally.
As we expand our global reach and increase the educational impact of our programs, we’re looking for passionate, ambitious, and collaborative leaders to become a part of our growing team.


Summary:
Document and implement API services that support Marketing business requirements across all Age of Learning products; write integration tests for Marketing use cases; develop and exercise department coding and documentation standards and best practices; assist Quality Assurance with feature testing; collaborate with other departments in the event of project co-ownership.
Responsibilities:
Write efficient, scalable, and easily testable APIs
Document existing and new code using PSR documentation standards
Write and maintain Postman integration tests
Fix API bugs when needed
Complete projects by target deadlines
Communicate effectively to technical and non-technical members of the company
Qualifications:
Some experience / knowledge in building RESTful APIs in PHP
Some experience working experience with SQL and NoSQL data store
Some experience in Postman or other integration testing platform
Some experience with OOP (Object-Oriented Programming)
Some experience with Git
Basic knowledge of container services, such as Docker, is a plus
Excellent problem-solving skills
Strong interpersonal skills and a self-starter
Strong verbal and written communication skills
Comfortable working in a fast-paced and collaborative environment
Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science or related field or equivalent combination of education and experience
Strong work ethic required, sense of humor a plus
We Provide:
Medical, Dental, Vision + 401k
Highly competitive PTO policy
Casual Dress Code
Snacks + Drinks (Coca Cola Freestyle Machine)
Gaming room including an Arcade (2,000+ games)
Frequent team and company outings
Limitless opportunities for professional growth!",3.1,"Age of Learning
3.1","Glendale, CA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2007,Company - Private,K-12 Education,Education,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
170,Data Engineer,$58k-$114k (Glassdoor Est.),"As a Data Engineer at CoverMyMeds, youll be the expert for our data that is used to make decisions about the future of our business. Youll be a liaison for our teams, creating solutions to keep the AMP program working as effectively as possible, and solving the tough problems when they arise. Partnering with our data architecture team, youll be responsible for the continuous delivery of data and data enhancements, managing and building out the AMP data mart, and monitoring our data sources and extracts for scheduling and performance. Youll work with everyone from the technical side to the operations side with endless opportunities to take on responsibility and continue learning. The ideal candidate is someone who is a consultant and teacher at heart, with an innate desire to mentor and educate other teammates.

Tech Stack

SQL-Server, PostgreSQL, Git, Tableau, Google Analytics

What You'll Do
Provide exceptional technical support to our teams by working through requests in our ticketing system
Create new and improve existing ETL processes, testing practices, scripts and tools to manage first-line, backend data
Design and build architectural models that support analytical systems with use of relational and non-relational data stores.
Schedule and support our production, test, and development environments
Document everything important you do for our data
Research and implement new tools to take AMP and the Analytics practice to the next level
About You
2+ years of technical support experience
2+ years of SQL coding experience in a relational database
2+ years of SQL testing experience
2+ to data profiling, ETL concepts, and BI tools
Experience with cloud database architecture, deploying machine learning models and/ statistical models
Experience with database administration tasks, such as patching, replication, and addressing performance issues
Advanced programming knowledge a plus
About Us

CoverMyMeds, part of McKessons Prescription Technology Solutions, is a fast-growing healthcare technology company. Our mission: Help patients get the medications they need to live healthy lives. Our solutions seamlessly connect the health care network to improve medication access, increasing speed to therapy and reducing prescription abandonment for patients like you and me.

We hire ambitious people and make it a priority to invest in them by providing opportunities to grow their careers and connections within the community. On-site culinary team, flexible hours and paid benefits? Yeah, we have those too. But dont take our word for it. Weve been recognized as a Best Place to Work by Glassdoor, a Best Company to Work For by FORTUNE, and our employees have great things to say, too.

CoverMyMeds is an equal opportunity and affirmative action employer. We embrace diversity and are committed to creating an inclusive environment for all employees. Qualified applicants will be considered for employment without regard to race, religion, gender, gender identity, sexual orientation, national origin, age, disability or veteran status.

Powered by JazzHR",4.7,"CoverMyMeds
4.7","Columbus, OH",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2008,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
171,Cybersecurity Engineer - SECRET Required,-1,"Job Description:
Phoenix Cybersecurity Engineers are technically adept and perform the hands-on work to secure systems (not just write about it). We specialize in Linux-based systems that leverage Cloud and Container technologies for Defense and Intelligence programs. Your experience with RMF and implementing STIGs against modern technologies will help secure the systems that are critical for national security.

This position supports multiple programs and is open to both mid-level and senior candidates. A typical day includes collaboration with program stakeholders, information assurance representatives, system administrators, and software development teams. All program activities are conducted within an Agile process using standard Scrum practices (daily stands-ups, sprint planning, sprint demos/retrospectives).

*** SECRET Clearance Required ***

Technical Skills Required
3+ years supporting accreditations using the Risk Management Framework (RMF)
2+ years implementing STIGs for Linux-based systems
2+ years securing systems that use Virtualization or Container technologies
Experience educating software development teams on modern security practices
At least one Information Security related certification (Security+, CISSP, CISM)
Technical Skill Preferred
Experience performing vulnerability scans on Linux systems using Nessus
Experience configuring, reviewing and monitoring systems using Splunk
Experience with Amazon Web Services or similar cloud platforms
Experience in Computer Network Defense or Defensive Cyber Operations
Benefits Offered:
Medical, Dental, Vision Insurance - 100% Company Paid Premiums
STD, LTD, and Life Insurance - 100% Company paid
401K Automatic 10% company contribution; no matching required
PTO - 4 weeks/year
Holidays - 10 paid/year
Birthdays off with pay
Company laptop built to your specification
Referral Bonuses Upfront AND Annually Recurring
Open Source Bonuses Contribute to our GitHub projects
Professional Development Paid training, Certifications and Enrichment
ABOUT PHOENIX OPERATIONS GROUP:
Phoenix Operations Group is an engineering services company that protects US Warfighters and supports US Intelligence efforts. As a small business operating in the Baltimore & DC areas, we rely on innovation to continually advance our employees' skills and provide game-changing solutions to our customers.

Phoenix specializes in inter-agency functionality that connects our federal, military and commercial clients with shared mission solutions. We do this with Big Data technologies, Machine Learning techniques, Cloud-Hosted platforms, and enterprise architectures.

Our team is geographically dispersed across the country. Thus, we rely on innovative techniques to advance our employees' skills and promote company culture:
We incentivize employees to participate in our Open-Source GitHub projects
We incentivize and support employees in writing whitepapers for the community
We invest in research and development (R&D) to expand our mission capabilities
We promote technical discussion across Slack, Google Meet and Social Media platforms
With these innovations, Phoenix provides a dynamic and inclusive environment for our employees. Please visit us at https://www.phoenix-opsgroup.com/ for more information.

Phoenix Operations Group is an Equal Opportunity Employer. Phoenix Operations Group does not discriminate on the basis of race, religion, color, sex, gender, gender identity, sexual orientation, age, non-disqualifying physical or mental disability, national origin, veteran status or any other basis covered by appropriate law. All employment is decided on the basis of qualifications, merit, and business need.",5.0,"Phoenix Operations Group
5.0","Annapolis Junction, MD",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2011,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1
172,Multi Skilled Maintenance Engineer,-1,"C&W Services is the industry leader in Integrated Maintenance Solutions providing service to more than 600 companies worldwide and a sister company of Cushman & Wakefield.
Locations: * Worcester, MA
Job Description*
As a Multi Skilled Maintenance Engineer , you will learn new skills as you support the Operations Maintenance team in repairing and maintaining material handling equipment and pneumatic systems throughout the building. You will have the opportunity to install, maintain and repair automated packaging and distribution equipment. We are committed to improvement; you will be encouraged to participate in career development opportunities as presented to progress your career. Responsibilities include, but are not limited to: Promote a safe working environment by following all safety procedures. Complete preventative maintenance routines with proper documentation. Use of appropriate tooling to troubleshoot simple AC/DC circuits, basic troubleshooting of material handling equipment (MHE), and repairs to miscellaneous Operational equipment as needed. Maintain a positive working relationships across all of the Operations facility. Track and store department inventory. Move up to 49lbs as well as stand and walk during shifts lasting up to 12 hours, with or without reasonable accommodation. Basic Qualifications: High school diploma or equivalent. 1+ years of experience in basic preventive/predictive maintenance, troubleshooting skills and repair methods of industrial machines. 1+ years of experience in Mechanical and/or Electrical basic components. 1 + years of experience with compressors and pneumatics. Preferred Qualifications: 1+ years of experience using power tools to include saws and drills with proper safety precautions. Experience with Microsoft Office suite and OS. Experience with basic metal and wood fabrication, including saws and drills. Basic understanding of a Computerized Maintenance Management System (CMMS).

If you have these skills too, we would love to talk to you: Electomechanics, Electromechanical Assembly, Electrical Schematics, Industrial Electrical Equipment, Wiring, Conveyor Material Handling, Industrial Equipment, Component Repair, Component Troubleshooting, PLC, Mechanical Maintenance, Industrial Maintenance, Rigging, Troubleshooting, Wood Manufacturing, Power Tools, Electricity, Predictive Maintenance, Preventive Maintenance

CWPO21

C&W Services is an Equal Opportunity / Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, sexual orientation, gender identity, protected veteran status or any other characteristic protected by law.
Why C&W Services?*
• Weekly Pay

• Comprehensive Benefits that start on day 1

• Advance opportunities

• Training to work in a cutting-edge facility

• A safety first culture

Learn why C&W Services is an ideal place for veterans to continue their careers: https://cwservices.com/veterans/

Reference ID: CWPO21

Job Type: Full-time

Job Type: Full-time",4.3,"C&W
4.3","Worcester, MA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,-1,Company - Private,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
173,"Data Scientist, Senior",$112k-$182k (Glassdoor Est.),"Join our team dedicated to developing and executing innovative solutions in support of customer mission success.

Job Description:

Novetta is seeking a Data Scientist (Senior)) in the role of the Maritime Safety Office.This position is to provide both digital and hardcopy maritime products, services, and data to support worldwide Safety of Navigation. Without accurate and up-to-date nautical products, military platforms are at increased risk when they conduct operations, transport personnel and deliver material. The U.S. Navy has made it clear to NGA that it will continue to require both digital and hard copy maritime products for the foreseeable future. Services procured under this contract will primarily support the production and maintenance of Maritime GEOINT at NCE facilities.

Responsibilities include:
Strong data management skills, including SQL, NoSQL (MongoDB), and triplestore/graph databases
Experience creating and managing ETL processes using Ni-Fi or similar software using both structured and unstructured data
AWS experience, particularly with EC2, S3, Cloudwatch, RDS
Experience with data visualization tools
Experience with or working knowledge of ElasticSearch or similar
Perform ad-hoc analysis and present results in a clear manner
Conduct undirected research and frame open-ended industry/customer questions
Recommend cost-effective changes to existing procedures and strategies
Create/maintain tools to extract features from a variety of sources including raster to vector, vector to vector, text to vector, and text to database
Write/maintain Python Scripts in ARCGIS to improve efficiency of the production process
Support Business Processing Re-Engineering
Perform Data Conversion/migration
Perform Business Analytics
Work with the Government on new production capabilities/services
Strong data management skills, including SQL, NoSQL (MongoDB), and RDF
(triplestore/graph) databases
Linux experience
Basic Qualifications:
Strong data management skills, including SQL, NoSQL (MongoDB), and triplestore/graph databases
Experience creating and managing ETL processes using Ni-Fi or similar software using both structured and unstructured data
AWS experience, particularly with EC2, S3, Cloudwatch, RDS
Experience with data visualization tools
Experience with or working knowledge of ElasticSearch or similar
Perform ad-hoc analysis and present results in a clear manner
Desired Skills:
Experience with combining digital cartography, computer technology, GIS, cartographic and geospatial
production techniques, remote sensing, photogrammetry, and digital data formats
Ability to clean/prune data to discard irrelevant information
Ability to examine data from a variety of angles to determine hidden value, weaknesses, trends, and/or opportunities
Advanced knowledge of ESRI ArcGIS and ArcServer

Novetta, from complexity to clarity.

Novetta delivers highly scalable advanced analytics and secure technology solutions to address challenges of national and global significance. Focused on mission success, Novetta pioneers disruptive technologies in machine learning, data analytics, full-spectrum cyber, cloud engineering, open source analytics, and multi-INT fusion for Defense, Intelligence Community, and Federal Law Enforcement customers. Novetta is headquartered in McLean, VA with over 1,000 employees across the U.S.


Our culture is shaped by a commitment to our core values:

Integrity • We hold ourselves accountable to the highest standards of integrity and ethics.

Customer Success • We strive daily to exceed expectations and achieve customer mission success.

Employee Focus • We invest in our employees' professional development and training, respecting individuality, and fostering a culture of diversity and inclusion.

Innovation • We know that discovering new and innovative ways to solve problems is critical to our success and makes us a great company.

Excellence in Execution • We take pride in flawless execution as we build a company that is best in class.


Earn a REFERRAL BONUS for the qualified people you know.
For more details or to submit a referral, visit bit.ly/NovettaReferrals.

Novetta is an equal opportunity/affirmative action employer.
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to sex, gender identity, sexual orientation, race, color, religion, national origin, disability, protected veteran status, age, or any other characteristic protected by law.",4.6,"Novetta
4.6","Fort Belvoir, VA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2012,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
174,"Software Engineer, AR Server Infrastructure",$94k-$182k (Glassdoor Est.),"Are you passionate about building the core technology powering Niantic's Augmented Reality Real World Platform? Niantic's AR Engineering team is seeking Software Engineers to build the server infrastructure that is at the heart of all our AR applications. You will work on concurrent, real-time computer vision systems at scale. Your work will advance Niantic's AR platform for the next generation of AR and wearable devices. It will also enable game developers to create engaging AR apps for a user base in the billions.

Responsibilities
Create robust, low-latency, scalable systems that support Niantic's AR Real World Platform.
Design and implement concurrent AR features in C++ that index AR data at scale.
Work closely with computer vision engineers to bring AR features to production.
Collaborate with other engineers, product managers, and other departments to ensure code meets internal standards.
Perform load testing, participate in code reviews, write unit tests, and conduct troubleshooting to ensure uptime for live systems.
Qualifications
BS, MS, or PhD in Computer Science, or a related technical field.
Proficiency in C++.
Experience building networked and distributed systems.
Experience building concurrent and multi-threaded services.
Plus If...
You have experience working with ZeroMQ or message passing/stream based logic frameworks.
You have experience with deployment on hosting providers, such as Google Cloud, Azure or AWS.
You have experience working with NoSQL databases such as Cassandra, Redis, or RocksDB.
You have experience scaling machine learning or 3D geometry systems.
You have experience with SLAM.
Join the Niantic team!


Niantic is the world's leading AR technology company, sparking creative and engaging journeys in the real world. Our products inspire outdoor exploration, exercise, and meaningful social interaction.

Originally formed at Google in 2011, we became an independent company in 2015 with a strong group of investors including Nintendo, The Pokémon Company, and Alsop Louie Partners. Our current titles include pioneering global-control game Ingress, record-breaking AR game Pokémon GO, and recently released third title, Harry Potter: Wizards Unite.

Niantic is an Equal Opportunity employer. We believe that cultivating a workplace where our people are supported and included is essential to creating great products our community will love. Our mission emphasizes seeking and hiring diverse voices, including those who are traditionally underrepresented in the technology industry, and we consider this to be one of the most important values we hold close.

We're a hard-working, fun, and exciting group who value intellectual curiosity and a passion for problem-solving! We have growing offices located in San Francisco, Sunnyvale, Bellevue, Los Angeles, London, Tokyo, Hamburg, and Zurich.",4.1,"Niantic
4.1","Sunnyvale, CA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2011,Company - Private,Video Games,Media,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
175,Senior Research Engineer,$64k-$105k (Glassdoor Est.),"Desktop Metal is pioneering a new generation of additive manufacturing technologies focused on the production of end-use parts. Our mission is to make additive manufacturing accessible to all engineers, designers and manufacturers. In doing so, we believe we will empower businesses to adopt radical, new approaches to design and production and enable businesses to realize the promise of additive manufacturing across a breadth of vertical markets.

Desktop Metal is located in Burlington, MA - a short 30 minute drive from Boston. We are now going public via a business combination with TRNE and have previously raised $438 million from investors including Google, BMW, NEA, KPCB and GE. Join us and our talented team of engineers, materials scientists, and startup veterans as we change the way products are designed and produced using additive manufacturing.

The Advanced R&D group at Desktop Metal seeks a Senior Research Engineer to contribute to the development of next-generation metal 3D printers. The Advanced R&D group is a small (<10>

Primary Responsibilities:
Contribute to the development of printer hardware and systems for next-generation 3D printers, through the design, fabrication, and testing of test fixtures, custom instrumentation, and printer subsystems.
Contribute to the development of printing processes to produce accurate, functional metal parts with next-generation 3D printing technology, through process design and testing.
Basic Qualifications:
Excellent grasp of mechanical engineering fundamentals, and ability to use this knowledge to inform designs and experiments
Excellent design sense and engineering intuition, coupled with the ability to evaluate ideas via basic hand-calculations and order-of-magnitude estimation based on the relevant physics
Ability to design and run efficient experiments at the correct level of fidelity
Ability to troubleshoot issues, determine root causes, and propose and implement solutions
Ability to find, understand and apply unfamiliar technologies to technical problems
Proficiency with SolidWorks CAD software, including part design and large-assembly management
Proficiency with machine tools (manual and preferably CNC mill, lathe, drill press, band saw, etc.) as needed to make modifications to existing parts and create parts from stock.
Ability to complete projects independently but ask for help/guidance when needed
Ability to work in a fast-paced environment with frequent changes in task priority and scope.
Ability to work in a small team as well as independently to achieve project goals.
Preferred Background/Experience Areas:
Comfort with and interest in materials science
3D printing -- code-level familiarity with slicing software a plus
High-temperature, vacuum and/or inert atmospheres
Line- and low-voltage electrical systems, industrial electronics (sensors, switches, etc.), and basic logic circuits
HSMWorks CAM
Motion control
Design of Experiments
Hot work including soldering/brazing and light welding (TIG)
FEA (static, thermal, flow)",4.4,"Desktop Metal
4.4","Burlington, MA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2015,Company - Private,Electrical & Electronic Manufacturing,Manufacturing,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
176,Cybersecurity Engineer - TS/SCI w/FSP Required,-1,"Job Description:
Phoenix Cybersecurity Engineers are technically adept and perform the hands-on work to secure systems (not just write about it). We specialize in Linux-based systems that leverage Cloud and Container technologies for Defense and Intelligence programs. Your experience with RMF and implementing STIGs against modern technologies will help secure the systems that are critical for national security.

This position supports multiple programs and is open to both mid-level and senior candidates. A typical day includes collaboration with program stakeholders, information assurance representatives, system administrators, and software development teams. All program activities are conducted within an Agile process using standard Scrum practices (daily stands-ups, sprint planning, sprint demos/retrospectives).

*** Top Secret SCI Clearance with Full-Scope Polygraph Required ***

Technical Skills Required
3+ years supporting accreditations using the Risk Management Framework (RMF)
2+ years implementing STIGs for Linux-based systems
2+ years securing systems that use Virtualization or Container technologies
Experience educating software development teams on modern security practices
At least one Information Security related certification (Security+, CISSP, CISM)
Technical Skill Preferred
Experience performing vulnerability scans on Linux systems using Nessus
Experience configuring, reviewing and monitoring systems using Splunk
Experience with Amazon Web Services or similar cloud platforms
Experience in Computer Network Defense or Defensive Cyber Operations
Benefits Offered:
Medical, Dental, Vision Insurance - 100% Company Paid Premiums
STD, LTD, and Life Insurance - 100% Company paid
401K Automatic 10% company contribution; no matching required
PTO - 4 weeks/year
Holidays - 10 paid/year
Birthdays off with pay
Company laptop built to your specification
Referral Bonuses Upfront AND Annually Recurring
Open Source Bonuses Contribute to our GitHub projects
Professional Development Paid training, Certifications and Enrichment
ABOUT PHOENIX OPERATIONS GROUP:
Phoenix Operations Group is an engineering services company that protects US Warfighters and supports US Intelligence efforts. As a small business operating in the Baltimore & DC areas, we rely on innovation to continually advance our employees' skills and provide game-changing solutions to our customers.

Phoenix specializes in inter-agency functionality that connects our federal, military and commercial clients with shared mission solutions. We do this with Big Data technologies, Machine Learning techniques, Cloud-Hosted platforms, and enterprise architectures.

Our team is geographically dispersed across the country. Thus, we rely on innovative techniques to advance our employees' skills and promote company culture:
We incentivize employees to participate in our Open-Source GitHub projects
We incentivize and support employees in writing whitepapers for the community
We invest in research and development (R&D) to expand our mission capabilities
We promote technical discussion across Slack, Google Meet and Social Media platforms
With these innovations, Phoenix provides a dynamic and inclusive environment for our employees. Please visit us at https://www.phoenix-opsgroup.com/ for more information.

Phoenix Operations Group is an Equal Opportunity Employer. Phoenix Operations Group does not discriminate on the basis of race, religion, color, sex, gender, gender identity, sexual orientation, age, non-disqualifying physical or mental disability, national origin, veteran status or any other basis covered by appropriate law. All employment is decided on the basis of qualifications, merit, and business need.",5.0,"Phoenix Operations Group
5.0","Annapolis Junction, MD",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2011,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1
177,"Java Engineer, Team Lead",$98k-$189k (Glassdoor Est.),"Title: Lead Software Engineer / Architect
Location: Indianapolis, IN
Salary: Up to $145k based on experience

Your Purpose:
hc1 is seeking a highly collaborative player-coach with a passion for creating innovative and scalable solutions. With increasing business demands, we are looking for a solution visionary that can help build and lead a new Java Scrum team to construct life-changing healthcare solutions using AWS.

How we will make an impact:
hc1 is focused on improving lives with high-value care. Our unique machine learning algorithms transform laboratory data into personalized healthcare insights. As an AWS Partner Network organization, our cloud-based software organizes live data (including lab results, genomics, and medications) to deliver solutions that ensure the right patient gets the right test and the right prescription.

Your Key Responsibilities:
Lead the design and development of hc1's products
Design and implement new features and components based on business requirements
Develop high-level product specifications and technical designs
Conduct code reviews, documentation of design, and implementation of Agile methodologies to ensure high quality software
Lead projects with minimal supervision
Produce working proof of concepts to jump-start development
Investigate and evaluate new and emerging technologies
Troubleshoot and fix software application problems
Participate in hc1's software process quality efforts
Mentor other engineers
Your Skills & Experiences:
5+ years experience with software design and Java development
At least 1 year developing on AWS
Experience in designing and developing modern distributed applications
Extensive experience in designing, developing and debugging Restful Web services and micro-services
Experience designing cloud-based systems
Our Technical Environment (NOT necessarily required, but for your information):
hc1 platform
Java (Spring & SpringBoot)
Amazon Web Services (AWS)
AWS Glue
React.js
Snowflake
Python
Linux
Jenkins
What's in it for you:
Unlimited PTO, remote friendly and flexible hours
401k Matching
Career planning, mentorships and professional development
Stock Options
Volunteer Opportunities
Wellness Programs
Join our Talent Community:
Get a glimpse into our culture and perks by visiting hc1.com/careers and follow us on Instagram (@hc1dotcom) to get a day in the life at hc1.

Inclusion and Equal Opportunity Employment:
hc1 is an equal opportunity employer committed to diversity and inclusion. We are pleased to consider all qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, disability, protected veterans status, Aboriginal/Native American status or any other legally-protected factors. Disability-related accommodations during the application process are available upon request.",3.0,"hc1
3.0","Indianapolis, IN",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2011,Company - Private,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
178,Mechatronics & Robotics Engineer,$53k-$101k (Glassdoor Est.),"Introduction

ASML US brings together the most creative minds in science and technology to develop lithography machines that are key to producing faster, cheaper, more energy-efficient microchips. We design, develop, integrate, market and service these advanced machines, which enable our customers - the world’s leading chipmakers - to reduce the size and increase the functionality of their microchips, which in turn leads to smaller, more powerful consumer electronics. Our headquarters are in Veldhoven, the Netherlands, and we have 18 office locations around the United States including main offices in Chandler, Arizona, San Jose and San Diego, California, Wilton, Connecticut, and Hillsboro, Oregon.

Job Mission

ASML is seeking a Mechatronics / Robotics Design Engineer to join the Wilton, CT development location as we break new ground in the emerging field photolithography. As ASML pushes the boundaries of nano-technology beyond current state of the art, we have developed a need to develop high precision equipment while maintaining a focus on cost effectiveness and reliability. We are looking for someone to help pioneer knowledge in this developing area.

This position requires access to controlled technology, as defined in the Export Administration Regulations (15 C.F.R. § 730, et seq.). Qualified candidates must be legally authorized to access such controlled technology prior to beginning work. Business demands may require ASML to proceed with applicants who are immediately eligible to access controlled technology.

Job Description

Primary Responsibilities:

Primary role will be a Mechatronics Engineer in the New Product Design & Development Team.
Responsible for design and development of custom mechatronics systems, including industrial robots, translating stages, linear motors, sensors, servos, etc….
Design quality products using six sigma and lean process techniques for robust designs both in atmosphere and vacuum environment.
Experience with understanding and troubleshooting legacy designs to determine potential new risks, failure modes, and corrective actions for new products.
Participate in “sustaining engineering” tasks, resolving equipment design issues in a timely fashion as they arise at customer sites.
Integration of industrial robotic systems into capital equipment, developing with the cross sector team all related aspects such as dynamics, end effector design, controls, etc….
Basic experience with mechatronics behavior predictive modeling and methods, including “first principle” engineering equations and other techniques.
Take direction from ASML System Architects and Senior Engineering mentors who are leading the development effort of critical large capital equipment.
Create documentation and Statements of Work for new product design and operation to be used in a clean Manufacturing Environment.
Work with external suppliers to define and develop certain aspects of new product design while collaborating with internal cross discipline teams.
Education

MS or PhD Degree with an Engineering Degree in Mechatronics, Mechanical, Electrical or similar, or equivalent experience.

Experience
0 to 5+ years of experience with an Engineering Degree in Mechatronics, Mechanical, Electrical or similar.
The ideal candidate needs to have a deep understanding of mechatronics, control theory systems and servo tuning to be incorporated into end product.
Mechatronics engineering background or specialization in closely related areas such as robotics, or other fields.
Strong skills in proof of concept development and design of experiments for a wide range of project needs.
Ability to run complex mechatronic systems for test and qualification of design changes.
Demonstrated ability to derive conclusions from analysis and to make practical recommendations.
Exposure to multi-disciplinary projects, such as imaging / optical systems, semiconductor, or lithography preferred but not required.
Strong technical writing and communication skills, including the ability to present results based on strong statistical evidence to audiences of a wide range of technical abilities.
Customer oriented team player willing to work with high level problem solvers on a daily basis.
Genuine interest in mechatronics engineering, and analysis, as well as in developing precision systems that can perform reliably at customer sites.
High energy, self-motivated, quick study with flexible nature.
Customer-centric personal ethos.
Self-motivated team player with strong desire to learn and ability to handle multiple projects and tasks concurrently and with minimal guidance.
High potential to develop into a technical or personal leader in the organization.
Personal skills
Can observe and respond to people and situations and interact with others encountered in the course of work.
Can learn and apply new information or skills.
Must be able to read and interpret data, information, and documents.
Strong customer focus and commitment to customer satisfaction through prioritization, quality, efficiency and professionalism.
Ability to complete assignments with attention to detail and high degree of accuracy.
Proven ability to perform effectively in a demanding environment with changing workloads and deadlines.
Result driven-demonstrate ownership and accountability.
Identifies bottlenecks and drives improvements.
Work independently or as part of a team and follow through on assignments with minimal supervision.
Demonstrate open, clear, concise and professional communication.
Ability to establish and maintain cooperative working relationships with manager, co-workers and customer.
Work according to a strict set of procedures within the provided timelines.
Other information

ASML Offers:

A challenging opportunity to expand your knowledge in a wide variety of engineering application areas and to work on problems spanning all technical fields.
Highly creative and qualified teams with a diversity of experience.
Great career opportunities at a quickly growing high-tech company.
World class technical problems to solve.

Role within Office

Responsibilities:

Routinely required to sit; walk; talk; hear; use hands to keyboard, finger, handle, and feel; stoop, kneel, crouch, twist, reach, and stretch. Occasionally required to move around the campus.
Occasionally lift and/or move up to 20 pounds.
May require travel dependent on business needs.
Specific vision abilities required by this job include close vision, color vision, peripheral vision, depth perception, and ability to adjust focus.

EOE AA M/F/Veteran/Disability

Internal Reference: #LI-KG1",3.9,"ASML
3.9","Wilton, CT",-1,10000+ Employees,1984,Company - Public,Electrical & Electronic Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$5 to $10 billion (USD),-1
179,Software Engineer II,$46k-$96k (Glassdoor Est.),"Wondering whats within Beckman Coulter?
Take a closer look.
Join a team where you can be heard, be supported, and always be yourself. At Beckman Coulter, a Danaher company, were building a culture that celebrates backgrounds, experiences, and perspectives of all our associates. At first glance, youll see we are dedicated to advancing and optimizing the laboratory to move science and health care forward for more than 80 years. Look again and youll see we are invested in you and youll have the opportunity to build a meaningful career, be creative, and try new things with the support you need to be successful.
What you find at Beckman Coulter and within yourself might just change the world!
Beckman Coulter specializes in lab automation to improve the efficiency, cost, and accuracy of medical laboratory testing. As a software developer on our research and development team, youll be working on our next generation of clinical chemistry and immunoassay systems. We work in collaborative cross-functional teams with engineers from multiple disciplines to bring innovative solutions to our customers. You can expect to collaborate and coordinate with diverse development teams across the globe. Youll have the opportunity to work directly with scientists and marketing teams to ensure we have the right solutions to meet the needs of an ever-changing healthcare environment.
As part of the Chemistry/Immunoassay software development team, youll work with a variety of technologies to bring new products to market. We develop product software with primarily a C#/.NET windows-based technology stack. Some of the additional products and languages in use within the group include SQL, JSON, XML, ASP.NET, Javascript, Python, and more. We write software for robotic control, image processing, and use machine learning to optimize our system. Continuous improvement, including staying current with the latest tools and methodologies, is important to us, and we want people who will help drive this goal.
We use agile/Scrum to collaborate effectively and respond rapidly to change. We balance the support of a committed team with lots of opportunities for individual growth and leadership. Growing your career with us will give you a chance to express your talent while fulfilling the mission of improving healthcare for everyone.
In this role, you will have the following opportunities, but are not limited to:
Develop software using technologies such as C# and .NET
Participate on an Agile Scrum team
Collaborate on requirements and design options with stakeholders
Collaborate in the troubleshooting and determination of root cause of failures
Participate in technical decisions affecting product modules and/or subsystems, including functional specifications and technical reviews
Be relentless in making our process and product better. We plan time to solve our systemic problems and expect team members to help expose them and find creative solutions.
Identifies opportunities for innovation in areas within department
The essential requirements of the job include:
Bachelor of Science in Computer Science, BME with computational focus, or similar
2 or more years of experience in the software engineering field
Excellent written and oral communication skills
It would be a plus if you also possess:
Knowledge of common object-oriented design patterns
Has some interesting side projects such as a mobile app, built something with a Raspberry Pi project, etc.
Beckman Coulter offers a broad array of comprehensive, competitive benefit programs that add value to associates and their families lives. Whether its a health care program or paid time off, our programs contribute to life beyond the job.
Beckman Coulter is a Danaher Operating Company. As a $20B company with 60,000 associates, ranked #162 on the Fortune 500 and, during the past 25 years, DHR stock has outperformed the S&P 500 Index by more than 5,000 percent. The strength of our results is a testament to our teams and the power of the DanaherBusiness System. Our Purpose: Helping Realize Lifes Potential is what makes us excited to come to work each day!
At Danaher, were driven by a sense of wonder for what we can createand what we can become. Here, youll accelerate your career while driving innovation that improves lives. Youll work hard and take risks, with guidance from committed leaders, powerful DBS tools, and the support of a global organization.
Danaher Corporation and all Danaher Companies are equal opportunity employers that evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, national origin, religion, sex, age, marital status, disability, veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity, or other characteristics protected by law.
Individuals who need a reasonable accommodation because of a disability for any part of the employment process should call 202-419-7762 or email applyassistance@danaher.com to request accommodation.

Danaher Corporation and all Danaher Companies are equal opportunity employers that evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, national origin, religion, sex, age, marital status, disability, veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity, or other characteristics protected by law. The EEO is the Law poster is available here.",3.5,"Beckman Coulter Diagnostics
3.5","Chaska, MN",-1,10000+ Employees,1935,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Health Care Products Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
180,Sr. Software Engineer II,$73k-$148k (Glassdoor Est.),"Search by Keyword
More Options

Search by Location

Clear

Loading...

Department

All

State

All

×

Send me alerts every days
alert frequency in every certain days
Create Alert

form.emailsubscribe-form {
display: none;
}
×

Send me alerts every days
alert frequency in every certain days

Share this Job

AddThis
Email
Facebook
Twitter
LinkedIn
Pinterest

Apply now »



Sr. Software Engineer II

Date:

Oct 22, 2020

Location:

Danvers, MA, US

#job-location.job-location-inline {
display: inline;
}

Abiomed is a pioneer and global leader in healthcare technology and innovation, with a mission of Recovering Hearts & Saving Lives. With corporate headquarters in Danvers, Massachusetts, offices in Aachen & Berlin, Germany and Tokyo, Japan, Abiomed’s 1,500 employees form one of the fastest growing medical device companies in the world. We attract and retain exceptional talent with our collaborative culture, passion for our work, and a strong commitment to employee professional development.

Patients First | Innovation | Winning Culture | Heart Recovery

ABIOMED is redefining team-driven success while reshaping heart recovery. Here, new ideas are welcomed and encouraged, learning is constant, and our dynamic setting enables positive people to do profoundly important work.

Impella Connect is the first-of-its kind cloud-based technology that allows clinicians and Abiomed support to remotely view intuitive summary dashboards and live video stream of case information transmitted from the Automated Impella Controller.

Abiomed has an immediate opportunity for a Senior Software Engineer to join the Impella Connect team and help with building something completely new for this top-performing medical device company. This is an exciting opportunity to impact development initiatives that will help to shape future product development and industry standards. You will assist in breakthrough software and database development, including requirements definition, software and database design, risk analysis, coding, verification & validation exercises. If you are eager to leverage your technical software development skills to make a difference and directly impact patient lives, this could be perfect for you.

Primary Responsibilities:
Development
Lead technology stabilization and integration by developing a detailed understanding of the architectural goal, and define the technical architecture.
Design, modify, develop, write, and implement software applications
Develop software for the cloud environment (Azure) that supports the Impella line of heart pumps
Design, estimate, document and deliver significant capabilities while effectively working across team and project boundaries
Identify and recommend appropriate technical development
Prepare high level and detailed design document for the technical framework components
Design reusable components and drive reusability across application
Resolve technical problems and complex design constructs of team
Ensure design, development and deployment guidelines and standards are in place for compliance w/architectural goals & tech standards
Contribute actively in sizing and estimation (entire application and technical framework)
Define the performance testing strategy, toolsets, and guide testing team in execution of appropriate non-functional testing
Innovation
Employ innovative approaches to solve complex technical problems, apply advanced technical concepts and principles to product development
Experiment with new technologies to help solve unique problems
Propose and implement new techniques in the field of IOT and cloud(AWS, Microsoft, Google) and AI
Leadership
Provide technical leadership and direction to various software projects, while exercising independent judgement in methods, techniques and evaluation to obtain the best results
Determine the scope and lead building of proof of concepts and reference implementations on technology stack
Take ownership (define and ensure compliance) of non-functional requirements and technical standards
Ensure required toolsets are selected and used to improve Developer productivity
Guide/Coach and Mentor team members and perform code reviews
Identify skills & gaps in training needs of Development team
As an expert, contribute to various technology communities (e.g. Oracle, Microsoft, Java, IOT) and industry forums
Contribute to knowledge assets e.g. White papers, Technical notes, Technical Evaluation reports etc.
Security
Identify key technology related risks in development and implementation of solution
Lead security modeling and resolution of identified vulnerabilities or threats in the application
Ensure protection of company assets and compliance to information security policies
Required Education & Experience:
10+ years in software development with expertise in cloud-based systems
3+ years development experience in a cloud-based Environment (Azure preferred)
Demonstrated knowledge of WebJobs, WebApps, Serilog Sinks, Service bus/queues, Network security, Docker, Kubernetes, Redis, Microsoft Identity, Entity Framework Core
Ability to work on SDLC methodologies (Agile, SCRUM, RUP, other)
AI, Machine Learning (e.g., Regression, Clustering, Classification, NLP, CNN, ANN, Deep learning)
Python Programming - Data science - Preparing & Cleansing data, Feature Scaling (e.g. SKLearn, Pandas, Scipy,Numpy, Apyori, TensorFlow, NLTK, Keras)
Familiarity with:
Front-end web app architecture (e.g., Angular with ASP.NET Core, JSON, TypeScript, HTML, CSS)
Software Engineering development cycle (SDLC), including experience breaking down requirements into epics, user stories, and understanding key dependencies and risks that may arise.
Various software development tools (e.g., Postman, Wireshark, Beyond compare, CURL, MobaXterm, CodeMaid)
Experience working in a regulated environment, FDA-regulated preferred
BS degree in Engineering or Computer Science (or equivalent in experience), Advanced degree preferred

Abiomed is an Equal Opportunity Employer committed to a diverse workforce. Abiomed will not discriminate against any worker or job applicant on the basis of race, color, religion, gender, gender identity, national origin, ancestry, age, sexual orientation, gender identity, marital or civil partnership status, pregnancy, gender reassignment, non-job related mental or physical disability, genetic information, veteran status, military service, application for military service, or membership in any other category protected under law.

Nearest Major Market: Boston

Apply now »

Find similar jobs:
Engineering & R&D

Apply now »



Sr. Software Engineer II

Date:

Oct 22, 2020

Location:

Danvers, MA, US

#job-location.job-location-inline {
display: inline;
}

Abiomed is a pioneer and global leader in healthcare technology and innovation, with a mission of Recovering Hearts & Saving Lives. With corporate headquarters in Danvers, Massachusetts, offices in Aachen & Berlin, Germany and Tokyo, Japan, Abiomed’s 1,500 employees form one of the fastest growing medical device companies in the world. We attract and retain exceptional talent with our collaborative culture, passion for our work, and a strong commitment to employee professional development.

Patients First | Innovation | Winning Culture | Heart Recovery

ABIOMED is redefining team-driven success while reshaping heart recovery. Here, new ideas are welcomed and encouraged, learning is constant, and our dynamic setting enables positive people to do profoundly important work.

Impella Connect is the first-of-its kind cloud-based technology that allows clinicians and Abiomed support to remotely view intuitive summary dashboards and live video stream of case information transmitted from the Automated Impella Controller.

Abiomed has an immediate opportunity for a Senior Software Engineer to join the Impella Connect team and help with building something completely new for this top-performing medical device company. This is an exciting opportunity to impact development initiatives that will help to shape future product development and industry standards. You will assist in breakthrough software and database development, including requirements definition, software and database design, risk analysis, coding, verification & validation exercises. If you are eager to leverage your technical software development skills to make a difference and directly impact patient lives, this could be perfect for you.

Primary Responsibilities:
Development
Lead technology stabilization and integration by developing a detailed understanding of the architectural goal, and define the technical architecture.
Design, modify, develop, write, and implement software applications
Develop software for the cloud environment (Azure) that supports the Impella line of heart pumps
Design, estimate, document and deliver significant capabilities while effectively working across team and project boundaries
Identify and recommend appropriate technical development
Prepare high level and detailed design document for the technical framework components
Design reusable components and drive reusability across application
Resolve technical problems and complex design constructs of team
Ensure design, development and deployment guidelines and standards are in place for compliance w/architectural goals & tech standards
Contribute actively in sizing and estimation (entire application and technical framework)
Define the performance testing strategy, toolsets, and guide testing team in execution of appropriate non-functional testing
Innovation
Employ innovative approaches to solve complex technical problems, apply advanced technical concepts and principles to product development
Experiment with new technologies to help solve unique problems
Propose and implement new techniques in the field of IOT and cloud(AWS, Microsoft, Google) and AI
Leadership
Provide technical leadership and direction to various software projects, while exercising independent judgement in methods, techniques and evaluation to obtain the best results
Determine the scope and lead building of proof of concepts and reference implementations on technology stack
Take ownership (define and ensure compliance) of non-functional requirements and technical standards
Ensure required toolsets are selected and used to improve Developer productivity
Guide/Coach and Mentor team members and perform code reviews
Identify skills & gaps in training needs of Development team
As an expert, contribute to various technology communities (e.g. Oracle, Microsoft, Java, IOT) and industry forums
Contribute to knowledge assets e.g. White papers, Technical notes, Technical Evaluation reports etc.
Security
Identify key technology related risks in development and implementation of solution
Lead security modeling and resolution of identified vulnerabilities or threats in the application
Ensure protection of company assets and compliance to information security policies
Required Education & Experience:
10+ years in software development with expertise in cloud-based systems
3+ years development experience in a cloud-based Environment (Azure preferred)
Demonstrated knowledge of WebJobs, WebApps, Serilog Sinks, Service bus/queues, Network security, Docker, Kubernetes, Redis, Microsoft Identity, Entity Framework Core
Ability to work on SDLC methodologies (Agile, SCRUM, RUP, other)
AI, Machine Learning (e.g., Regression, Clustering, Classification, NLP, CNN, ANN, Deep learning)
Python Programming - Data science - Preparing & Cleansing data, Feature Scaling (e.g. SKLearn, Pandas, Scipy,Numpy, Apyori, TensorFlow, NLTK, Keras)
Familiarity with:
Front-end web app architecture (e.g., Angular with ASP.NET Core, JSON, TypeScript, HTML, CSS)
Software Engineering development cycle (SDLC), including experience breaking down requirements into epics, user stories, and understanding key dependencies and risks that may arise.
Various software development tools (e.g., Postman, Wireshark, Beyond compare, CURL, MobaXterm, CodeMaid)
Experience working in a regulated environment, FDA-regulated preferred
BS degree in Engineering or Computer Science (or equivalent in experience), Advanced degree preferred

Abiomed is an Equal Opportunity Employer committed to a diverse workforce. Abiomed will not discriminate against any worker or job applicant on the basis of race, color, religion, gender, gender identity, national origin, ancestry, age, sexual orientation, gender identity, marital or civil partnership status, pregnancy, gender reassignment, non-job related mental or physical disability, genetic information, veteran status, military service, application for military service, or membership in any other category protected under law.

Nearest Major Market: Boston

Apply now »",3.7,"ABIOMED
3.7","Danvers, MA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1981,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
181,Mechanical Engineer,$45k-$121k (Glassdoor Est.),"Job Title: Mechanical Engineer

TICO Manufacturing, Ridgeland, SC

TICO is a worldwide designer, manufacturer, and marketer of Terminal Tractors; with more than 5000 vehicles in operation around the world we are leading the industry in product innovation, new technology, and exceeding the expectations of our customers. Launch your career with TICO!

We're looking for the right candidate to join our engineering team!

The mechanical engineer will collaborate with a variety of colleagues across project teams from engineering and product development to implementation and manufacturing. In addition to being a team player, our ideal candidate is a self-motivated problem solver who finds pragmatic solutions to highly technical challenges.

Essential Duties & Responsibilities:
Design functional systems through the development and testing of components.
Research and design components for equipment and systems for use in commercial vehicle.
Supervise the manufacturing and installation of mechanical equipment, components, and systems
Inspect and observe facilities to evaluate the efficacy and quality of mechanical systems, components, and products
Devise testing methods and properties to confirm the functionality of mechanical components and systems
Develop mechanical products and systems to meet customer specifications
Research and test manufacturing and assembly processes; develop innovative processes to improve or modify current methods
Conduct research to collect and analyze data to create reports about ongoing projects
Comply with local, state, and federal regulations to uphold the companys reputation
Communicate engineering information across teams and departments to facilitate successful completion of large-scale projects
Troubleshoot to solve unforeseen problems with product design or implementation
Maintain detailed database to catalog products and component parts
Train and supervise technicians to assist in project completion
Expand professional and technical knowledge of leading-edge developments in mechanical engineering through participation in professional organizations, networking events, and educational workshops
Review industry publications to maintain a current perspective on the mechanical engineering field
Have 3D modelling experience (SolidWorks preferred, Catia V5 or Pro-E) acceptable.
Have 2D AutoCAD experience.
Understanding safety and environmental compliance of the department. Actively participates in safety improvement activities.
Actively participate in continuous improvement activities within the departments. Implementation of Lean foundational blocks of Identification of Waste, 5S, Standard Work, and Visual Management. Participates in Kaizen Events and takes on roles of subject matter expert where appropriate. Participates in value stream map creation and goal setting for the department product lines.
The tasks this person will perform:

Conceive conceptual ideas and thoughts for vehicle design, components of vehicle, and systems of vehicles.
Makes sketches, creates components, 3D models of components, systems and schematics.
Analyses data to develop new designs. Uses engineering principles to determine loads and performs necessary calculations to support new design.
Uses the computer assisted design 3D software to create detail drawings from prepared 3D models, sketches and vendor documents from which manufacturing either makes or purchases component/parts.
Translates CAD drawings into pdf format and files for company wide use.
Assist in testing to verify and develop new/existing machine design
Assist in building, or modification of vehicle components and vehicle.
Uses the computer assisted design software to alter /change existing drawings.
Uses the computer assisted design software to generate part assemblies, instructions and specifications
Using Engineerings bill of material format, generate BOM.
Uses computer assisted 2D software to create schematics and diagrams.
Creates the engineering documentation to communicate the release/change of parts, assemblies and bills of material to manufacturing.
Responsible for setting up and maintaining organizes files in computer system.

Qualifications:
Bachelor of Science in Mechanical Engineering or related Engineering fields, or adequate experience/skills equal to a degree.
Experience level of 5-7 years in mechanical engineering disciplines
Proficient in the use of AutoCAD or other computer-aided design software applications
Ability to write clearly about highly technical subject matter
Thorough knowledge in mechanical engineering and drafting standards.
Knowledgeable in strength of materials.
Capacity to analyze a problem from multiple perspectives and explore creative solutions
Exceptional verbal and written communication skills
Strong public speaking and interpersonal skills
High attention to detail with a desire for excellence
Knowledgeable in manufacturing processes, fabrications, welding, machining and assembly techniques
Knowledge in engineering principles and disciplines
Knowledge in higher mathematics: algebra, geometry, trigonometry, and English language.
OTHER SKILLS AND ABILITIES:
Company sponsored programs, vendor sponsored programs, ASE certifications
General computer proficiency including spreadsheet and data base tools.
Familiarity Manufacturing Resource Planning (MRP) systems.
Must be able to participate in Lean principles and continuous improvement activities.

Excellent Benefit Package:
Health, Dental, and Vision insurance
Basic Life Insurance; Short-Term and Long-Term Disability Insurance - TICO 100% sponsored
Medical tax saving account options: FSA or HSA
Voluntary Supplemental Insurances: Voluntary Life, Accident, Critical Illness, Hospital
Employee Assistance Program - EmployeeConnect
Travel Assistance Program - TravelConnect
Life Value Adds - LifeKeys (Estate Guidance, Guidance Resources, Identity Theft education, Beneficiary Assistance)
401K plan with company match
Drug and Alcohol Free Workplace
Paid Vacation available in 6 months
Paid 7 Holidays
Free Membership to Tickets at Work
TICO is a Drug-Free Workplace.

Position: Mechanical Engineer

Location: Ridgeland, SC (South Carolina low-country within an hour of Savannah, Bluffton, Beaufort, and Hilton Head)

Job Type: Full-Time

FLSA: Exempt

Detailed Job Description:
FLSA Status: Exempt
Department: TICO Manufacturing in Ridgeland, SC
Location: Ridgeland
Prepared Date: 7/1/2020
Overview:

TICO is a worldwide designer, manufacturer, and marketer of Terminal Tractors with more than 5000 vehicles in operation around the world. Manufacturing Facility in Ridgeland, SC. TICO is the industry leader in product innovations, new technologies, and exceeding customer expectations.

Our vision is to have the most competent workforce available. We are proud to provide excellence in our products and invite you to join our team.

SCOPE:

The mechanical engineer will collaborate with a variety of colleagues across project teams from engineering and product development to implementation and manufacturing. In addition to being a team player, our ideal candidate is a self-motivated problem solver who finds pragmatic solutions to highly technical challenges.
ESSENTIAL FUNCTIONS:
Design functional systems through the development and testing of components.
Research and design components for equipment and systems for use in commercial vehicle.
Supervise the manufacturing and installation of mechanical equipment, components, and systems
Inspect and observe facilities to evaluate the efficacy and quality of mechanical systems, components, and products
Devise testing methods and properties to confirm the functionality of mechanical components and systems
Develop mechanical products and systems to meet customer specifications
Research and test manufacturing and assembly processes; develop innovative processes to improve or modify current methods
Conduct research to collect and analyze data to create reports about ongoing projects
Comply with local, state, and federal regulations to uphold the companys reputation
Communicate engineering information across teams and departments to facilitate successful completion of large-scale projects
Troubleshoot to solve unforeseen problems with product design or implementation
Maintain detailed database to catalog products and component parts
Train and supervise technicians to assist in project completion
Expand professional and technical knowledge of leading-edge developments in mechanical engineering through participation in professional organizations, networking events, and educational workshops
Review industry publications to maintain a current perspective on the mechanical engineering field
Have 3D modelling experience (SolidWorks preferred, Catia V5 or Pro-E) acceptable.
Have 2D AutoCAD experience.
Understanding safety and environmental compliance of the department. Actively participates in safety improvement activities.
Actively participate in continuous improvement activities within the departments. Implementation of Lean foundational blocks of Identification of Waste, 5S, Standard Work, and Visual Management. Participates in Kaizen Events and takes on roles of subject matter expert where appropriate. Participates in value stream map creation and goal setting for the department product lines.

The tasks this person would perform would be:
Conceive conceptual ideas and thoughts for vehicle design, components of vehicle, and systems of vehicles.
Makes sketches, creates components, 3D models of components, systems and schematics.
Analyses data to develop new designs. Uses engineering principles to determine loads and performs necessary calculations to support new design.
Uses the computer assisted design 3D software to create detail drawings from prepared 3D models, sketches and vendor documents from which manufacturing either makes or purchases component/parts.
Translates CAD drawings into pdf format and files for company wide use.
Assist in testing to verify and develop new/existing machine design
Assist in building, or modification of vehicle components and vehicle.
Uses the computer assisted design software to alter /change existing drawings.
Uses the computer assisted design software to generate part assemblies, instructions and specifications
Using Engineerings bill of material format, generate BOM.
Uses computer assisted 2D software to create schematics and diagrams.
Creates the engineering documentation to communicate the release/change of parts, assemblies and bills of material to manufacturing.
Responsible for setting up and maintaining organizes files in computer system.

POSITION EXPECTATIONS:

SAFETY: Follow TICO General Health & Safety Rules, ensure safe operating conditions within area of responsibility, and notify coworkers and supervisors of hazardous acts and conditions. Proper use of PPE; use only defect-free equipment. Promote safety in department. Use proper lifting techniques and overhead hoist when needed. Maintain clean and safe working environment in line with 5-S Philosophy. Participate in hazardous communication training and safety meetings.
QUALITY: Responsible for the quality of work. This requires defect-free work and understanding of the requirements of the companys quality system as it pertains to job duties and responsibilities. Must be able to check work to ensure conformance to process control instructions, specifications, and quality standards. Identify and segregate non-conforming product. Identify the need for and assist in initiating and implementing corrective and preventive actions when appropriate.
FLEXIBILITY: Able and willing to work in other areas as needed. Must be flexible in taking lunch and breaks when workflow requires. Willing to work additional hours as necessary.
INITIATIVE: Actively participate in continuous improvement of products and processes to better serve customers and improve the overall profitability of TICO. Actively seek out work in other areas when current assignment is complete. Make suggestions for improving product safety, quality, deliver, cost, processes and company profitability.
TEAMWORK: Positive working attitude toward other employees; be a team player. Work with others constructively and abide by company policies and procedures. Working together as a team for continuous improvement is vital to ensure the future of TICO and its employees. Teamwork will be required to be effective in daily production assignments as well as special improvement projects.
CAREER DEVELOPMENT: Attend and participate in a variety of meetings, training programs, and task force groups to integrate activities, communicate issues, obtain approvals, resolve problems, and maintain specific level of knowledge pertaining to changes to equipment or process, new developments, requirements, procedures, and policies.
LEADERSHIP: Lead the team, provide innovative thought leadership on strategies to grow market share, increase profitability, and meet long-term business goals.
ACTION-ORIENTED: Enjoy working hard; is action-oriented and energetic; not fearful of acting with a minimum of planning; seize more opportunities than others.
CONFLICT MANAGEMENT: Step up to conflicts, seeing them as opportunities; read situations quickly; good at focused listening; can hammer out tough agreements and settle disputes equitably; can find common ground and get cooperation.
DEALING WITH AMBIGUITY: Can effectively cope with change; can shift gears comfortably; can decide and act without having the total picture; isnt upset when things are up in the air; doesnt have to finish things before moving on; can comfortably handle risk and uncertainty.
DRIVE FOR RESULTS: Can be counted on to exceed goals successfully; is constantly and consistently one of the top performers; very bottom-line oriented; steadfastly pushes self and others for results.

Physical Requirements:

Lift/Push/Pull- Exerting up to 40 pounds of force frequently, and/or up to 20 pounds of force constantly to move objects.
Climbing- Ascending or descending ladders, stairs, scaffolding, ramps, poles and the like, using feet and legs and/or hands and arms.
Stooping- Bending body downward and forward by bending spine at the waist.
Kneeling- Bending legs at knee to come to a rest on knee or knees.
Crouching/Crawling/Reaching - Bending the body downward and forward by bending leg and spine. Moving about on hands and knees or hands and feet. Extending hand(s) and arm(s) in any direction.
Standing- Particularly for sustained periods of time.
Walking- Moving about on foot to accomplish tasks, particularly for long distances or moving from one work site to another.
The worker is required to have visual acuity to perform an activity such as: operating machines such as lathes, drill presses, power saws and mills where the seeing job is at or within arms reach; performing mechanical tasks of a non-repetitive nature such as carpenters, technicians, service people, plumbers, painters, mechanics, etc. The worker is required to have visual acuity to operate motor vehicles or heavy equipment.
The worker is subject to hazards: Includes a variety of physical conditions, such as proximity to moving mechanical parts, moving vehicles, electrical current, working on scaffolding and high places, exposure to high heat or exposure to chemicals.

Requirements and Qualifications:

Bachelor of Science in Mechanical Engineering or related Engineering fields, or adequate experience/skills equal to a degree.
Experience level of 5-7 years in mechanical engineering disciplines
Proficient in the use of AutoCAD or other computer-aided design software applications
Ability to write clearly about highly technical subject matter
Thorough knowledge in mechanical engineering and drafting standards.
Knowledgeable in strength of materials.
Capacity to analyze a problem from multiple perspectives and explore creative solutions
Exceptional verbal and written communication skills
Strong public speaking and interpersonal skills
High attention to detail with a desire for excellence
Knowledgeable in manufacturing processes, fabrications, welding, machining and assembly techniques
Knowledge in engineering principles and disciplines
Knowledge in higher mathematics: algebra, geometry, trigonometry, and English language.

OTHER SKILLS AND ABILITIES:
Company sponsored programs, vendor sponsored programs, ASE certifications
General computer proficiency including spreadsheet and data base tools.
Familiarity Manufacturing Resource Planning (MRP) systems.
Must be able to participate in Lean principles and continuous improvement activities.

We offer a comprehensive benefits package to our employees and their families that includes health, dental, vision, disability and life insurance. 401K, vacation and paid holidays. TICO is a Drug-Free Workplace.

To learn more about TICO, visit our website at www.ticotractors.com.

Join us today!",3.6,"TICO
3.6","Ridgeland, SC",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1946,Company - Private,Transportation Equipment Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
182,Software Engineer,$48k-$103k (Glassdoor Est.),"The safety and security of CSC’s current and prospective employees, customers, and the communities we serve are our first priority.

Due to coronavirus (COVID-19) concerns, we have transitioned to virtual interviews for the foreseeable future. We look forward to all upcoming video and phone interview conversations with our prospective candidates.

We are always in search of top talent to join the CSC family. If you are looking for a career change, don’t hesitate to apply or reach out to us. We’ll have virtual interactions until we are able to move forward again with in-person interactions.

If you value rewarding software development projects, access to training and career advancement, and working with great people in a positive culture—we do too! Come help us create automation software for over 50% of the Fortune 500 companies. You will receive an industry-best total compensation package and work with tools like Visual Studio 2017, Azure, Cloud Services, TypeScript, Angular 6, .NET/C#, and SQL 2017

Qualified engineers should have a strong working knowledge of the latest Microsoft tools and technologies used to develop .NET Web applications. In this role you will play an active role in the design and development of features for our cloud-based commercial Tax Software product. This role can be REMOTE.

TECHNICAL QUALIFICATIONS
At least 3 years of software design and development experience
C#, .NET 4.6+, ASP.NET MVC, LINQ, JavaScript/Typescript, Angular, CSS, AJAX
Visual Studio, Team Foundation Server
Windows Server, IIS
MS SQL Server
CANDIDATE QUALITIES
Penchant and passion for software product development
Demonstrable skills in object oriented design, patterns and programming
Proficiency with unit and integration testing of code
Proven ability, willingness and motivation to learn and grow in an organization
Willingness to learn from mistakes, adapt and improve
Track record of delivering high quality work in a fast-paced environment
Ability to communicate clearly, concisely and accurately
A history of contributing ideas and opinions in a dynamic, diverse and talented team
What can we offer you?
Competitive compensation and benefit programs including 401k, medical, dental, vision and vacation plans are just a few of the many ways this company rewards its employees for their excellent performance
Continuous on-the-job training, mentoring, MSDN and Pluralsight subscriptions and the opportunity to learn from experienced and talented software professionals
Opportunity to work with customers directly and have an immediate and direct impact on their work
Sit or stand work stations, dual monitors available, SSD hard drives, i7 CPU, 64gb machines
A casual work environment with flexible schedules and work from home options
CSC Corptax is an Equal Opportunity Employer
#corptax",3.3,"Corptax
3.3","Buffalo Grove, IL",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1974,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
183,Intern - Software Engineer - Summer,$40k-$84k (Glassdoor Est.),"Lumen’s internship program is a 10 week, fast-paced and exciting opportunity to gain professional experience within your field of study and career interest. Interns within the Strategic Planning and Transformation organization will be part of an accelerated learning experience, to challenge skills learned in the classroom and develop new skills while working on active Lumen work projects. Software Engineer interns will have the potential to contribute to ongoing projects within the Enterprise Data, Architecture, and IT Operations team. The internship will take place in Monroe, LA from 6/1/2021 - 8/13/2021.

In addition, interns will connect to our company culture through community outreach projects, engaging with our employee resource groups and developing their professional skills and business acumen through exposure to senior leadership, cutting-edge technology, groundbreaking projects, and a network of mentors and fellow interns. Launch your career with Lumen and be a part of something amazing!

Job Description
Build Splunk dashboards, searches, and alerts
Assist and troubleshoot end-user issues
Assist with ongoing streaming data analytics projects
Qualifications

Minimum Requirements:
Enrolled at a 4-year accredited college or university
Graduating between August 2021 – May 2023
In pursuit of bachelor’s or master’s in computer science or related degree program
Intern is responsible for their travel to/from work location
Must be available to work 30 – 40 hours, during the specified 10-week timeframe
Proficient in Microsoft Office (Excel, PowerPoint, Word, Teams)
Understand how to build web-based visualizations using Python and JavaScript
Familiarity with basic machine learning algorithms and/or the mathematical foundations of these algorithms through courses, probability and statistics, or traditional statistical modeling
US work authorization is required
Preferred Qualifications:
Cumulative GPA of 3.0 or higher
Experience in working with one or more source control tools like GitHub.
Working knowledge of APIs such as SOAP and REST.
Operational experience with a diverse range of technology areas: APIs, APMs, storage (DAS, SAN, Object), virtualization and containers (Kubernetes, Docker), networking concepts and load balancing, infrastructure-as-code (Puppet, Saltstack, Ansible ).
Software design, development and scripting skills (Mandatory: Bash/shell, Python. Desirable: JavaScript, Java) and an understanding of CI/CD and test automation.
Understanding of service monitoring concepts and techniques, KPIs
Requisition #: 234853

EEO Statement
We are committed to providing equal employment opportunities to all persons regardless of race, color, ancestry, citizenship, national origin, religion, veteran status, disability, genetic characteristic or information, age, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity, marital status, family status, pregnancy, or other legally protected status (collectively, “protected statuses”). We do not tolerate unlawful discrimination in any employment decisions, including recruiting, hiring, compensation, promotion, benefits, discipline, termination, job assignments or training.

Disclaimer
The above job definition information has been designed to indicate the general nature and level of work performed by employees within this classification. It is not designed to contain or be interpreted as a comprehensive inventory of all duties, responsibilities, and qualifications required of employees assigned to this job. Job duties and responsibilities are subject to change based on changing business needs and conditions.",3.2,"Lumen
3.2","Monroe, LA",-1,10000+ Employees,1930,Company - Public,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),-1
184,Senior Machine Learning Engineer,Employer Provided Salary:$125k-$150k,"SkySync is a dynamic, fast-paced, venture-backed software innovator based in the Ann Arbor tech cluster, with remote Syncopaths in all US time zones. Our quirky and unique workforce excels at managing our customers’ content migration, synchronization, and orchestration challenges like no other in our space. We are poised for rapid growth and need a Machine Learning Engineer to contribute to building a large-scale machine learning, natural language processing (NLP) system and developing our understanding of the data we encounter. This role will be a cross between an ML/NLP researcher and a software engineer, and good candidates will have prior experience doing both. We are looking for someone from the southeastern Michigan area and preference will be given to candidates within this geographic location.

You’ll be doing a lot of this:
Rapidly iterating over different techniques in a solution space, and effectively analyzing the performance of models on various tasks
Contributing to several large-scale production machine learning and natural language processing efforts
Developing and building guidelines for evaluation datasets
Understanding the decision-making process, workflows, and business and information needs of business unit heads and service manager/owners
Translating business needs into analytics/reporting requirements to support executive decisions and workflows with required information
Visualizing information and developing engaging reports on the results of experiments
Advising product teams on new products, features or updates through evidence-based recommendations
Supporting user experience specialists and information architects to enhance information visualization through the development of dashboards and user interfaces
Distributing best practices to analytics and product teams and provides consultations for their data-based experimentations
Other duties as assigned
So you should have this:
Up-to-date knowledge of machine learning, natural language processing (NLP), and data analytics tools and techniques
Strong knowledge of Python, and related machine learning tools (e.g. TensorFlow, PyTorch)
Strong experience with Docker, AWS
Familiarity with current SOTA NLP models like BERT
4+ years of work experience with Python and machine learning
Willingness and ability to learn new technologies on the job
Demonstrated ability to communicate complex results to technical and non-technical audiences
Demonstrated ability to work with minimal supervision
Experience building and deploying predictive models, web scraping, and scalable data pipelines
Master’s degree or PhD in computer science, electrical engineering, computer engineering, statistics, or related fields preferred
Ability to think critically while solving problems in a rapidly changing product
Nice to have:
Publications from ML/NLP venues such as ACL, NAACL, EMNLP, NeurIPS, ICML, ICLR

This position is a great fit for you if you like keeping up with the cutting edge of machine learning and NLP and helping build a position and product from the ground up. Knowing how to engage with new challenges daily and handle competing priorities is a must.
This position is not a great fit for you if you like established processes for every situation or a static set of duties and responsibilities.

Qualities Needed for Success
Excellent listening, writing, and professional communication skills are a must. You should be able to demonstrate proficiency in most of the duties and responsibilities listed above. In our fast-paced world, a great attitude combined with enthusiasm is key to individual success along with embodying our entrepreneurial spirit.",5.0,"SkySync
5.0","Ann Arbor, MI",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2011,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
185,Lead Artificial Intelligence Engineer,$122k-$204k (Glassdoor Est.),"Why choose between doing meaningful work and having a fulfilling life? At MITRE, you can have both. That's because MITRE people are committed to tackling our nation's toughest challenges—and we're committed to the long-term well-being of our employees. MITRE is different from most technology companies. We are a not-for-profit corporation chartered to work for the public interest, with no commercial conflicts to influence what we do. The R&D centers we operate for the government create lasting impact in fields as diverse as cybersecurity, healthcare, aviation, defense, and enterprise transformation. We're making a difference every day—working for a safer, healthier, and more secure nation and world. Our workplace reflects our values. We offer competitive benefits, exceptional professional development opportunities, and a culture of innovation that embraces diversity, inclusion, flexibility, collaboration, and career growth. If this sounds like the choice you want to make, then choose MITRE—and make a difference with us.

Use Artificial Intelligence to solve problems for a safer world! At MITRE we work across the whole of government on big problems that challenge our nation’s stability. We use our strengths to build coalitions of collaboration that strengthen government and create positive change for citizens. You can be a part of this!

MITRE’s Army Mission Command and Intelligence Systems Department at Aberdeen, MD has a need for a Lead Artificial Intelligence Engineer. Our work programs need top individuals with a passion for artificial intelligence, experience and proficiency with algorithmic design and development; specifically, in machine learning (including deep learning), and one or more of the following technical areas: cognitive science, multi-agent systems, knowledge-based reasoning, automated planning, semantics, and ontologies.

You will have opportunities to work on a wide range of problems, leading and working with teams possessing a broad range of skills. Your experience will allow you to influence research directions; evaluate the challenges and potential solutions for designing, developing, and fielding artificial intelligence solutions; assess the adequacy and maturation of existing research programs and shape their technical and programmatic direction; and identify new areas where research and development are needed to strengthen the nation’s growing artificial intelligence capabilities.

Responsibilities include:
Work on, or lead, a team to develop and implement AI algorithms.
Develop and use modern software engineering techniques to develop AI-related software.
Maintain knowledge of advances of AI capabilities in industry and academia.
Develop, propose and execute research in the field of AI.
Develop and propose new research directions in AI-enabled systems in support of MITRE’s internal research program and sponsor’s research programs.
Evaluate AI solutions and compare to sponsor requirements and needs.
Basic Qualifications:
BS and 8 years related experience
Applicants selected for this position will be subject to a government security investigation and must meet eligibility requirements for access to classified information or applicants who are eligible for security clearances
Required Qualifications:
Must be a US citizen able to obtain and maintain a US government clearance.
MSc degree or higher in artificial intelligence or related discipline.
8+ years of experience in defining, developing, and deploying AI solutions.
Ability to articulate AI-specific challenges, discuss critical issues, and identify gaps.
Excellent communication skills (both written and verbal) along with ability to foster relationship development with sponsors.
Proven ability to work independently to learn new technologies, techniques, processes, languages, platforms, systems.
Strong written and verbal communication skills.
Ability to work both independently and with a team.
Experience with programming languages such as C++ and Python.
Familiarity with the state of the art in the field.
Experience in AI-relevant fields, such as machine learning, deep learning, multi-agent systems, planning, and data science.
Preferred Qualifications:
PhD degree in artificial intelligence or related discipline w/ 10+ years of experience in defining, developing, and deploying AI solutions
Active DoD Secret clearance.
MITRE is proud to be an equal opportunity employer. MITRE recruits, employs, trains, compensates, and promotes regardless of race, religion, color, national origin, gender, gender expression, sexual identity, disability, age, veteran status, and other protected status.

MITRE intends to maintain a website that is fully accessible to all individuals. If you are unable to search or apply for jobs and would like to request a reasonable accommodation for any part of MITRE’s employment process, please contact MITRE’s Recruiting Help Line at 703-983-8226 or email at recruitinghelp@mitre.org.

Copyright © 1997-2020, The MITRE Corporation. All rights reserved. MITRE is a registered trademark of The MITRE Corporation. Material on this site may be copied and distributed with permission only.",3.4,"MITRE
3.4","Aberdeen, MD",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1958,Nonprofit Organization,Federal Agencies,Government,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
186,Manufacturing Engineer - CM,$40k-$83k (Glassdoor Est.),"We are a global leader in the irrigation, outdoor lighting, dispensing technology, and custom manufacturing industries. Driving our continued success is the combined energy and talents of the nearly 3,000 people on our team. Together, we create a diverse array of products that can be seen all over the world, from residential landscapes to national landmarks, stadiums, parks, hotels, and municipal buildings. Although we’re global, we’re family owned, and our casual, fun, and caring company culture is what makes this a special place to work. As we grow, we are dedicated to preserving our unique culture that makes our employees proud to work here. Whether you’re pursuing a career at our headquarters in Southern California, or an opportunity at one of our state-of-the-art manufacturing facilities, or something somewhere in between, we look forward to welcoming you to Hunter Industries and our Family of Companies.
About This Role:
The Contract Manufacturing Engineer identifies and implements manufacturing processes, procedures, and projects focused on minimizing product cost, improving product quality, and maintaining product availability for assigned product lines. S/he works on projects across multiple departments that are aligned with the organization’s strategic objectives.
Demonstrates behavior that is consistent with the company’s values of Customer Satisfaction, Innovation, Family, and Social Responsibility.
Essential Job Functions/Tasks:
1. Responsible for the resolution of manufacturing issues of assigned product lines that affect product quality and/or availability. Develops and coordinates the necessary processes and sustaining engineering protocols to ensure manufacturing operational efficiencies. Maintains manufacturing-related documentation and production reports that define key metrics and outline current activities.
2. Uses lean manufacturing practices and Six Sigma methodology to evaluate and improve assembly line performance per established key performance indicators. Implements improvement processes to ensure that projects are justifiable, on schedule and within budget.
3. Manages progress of new and modified molds and assembly equipment for assigned product lines throughout qualification process. Ensures that the mold/assembly equipment meets established manufacturing capacity and utilization requirements.
4. Provides manufacturing engineering support for complete integration of new products into full production per the organization’s New Product Development and Introduction (NPDI) process. Provides focus on delivering a repeatable process with high quality yield. Supports the concurrent engineering effort on behalf of manufacturing as a member of the product development team.
5. Maintains updated capacity models for both injection molds and assembly equipment for assigned product lines. Submits capital requests as required to insure timely completion of equipment to meet forecasted production. Provides capital requirements for annual budgeting process.
6. Leads or supports cost reduction projects including qualification of new vendors for materials or parts. Participates in test plan development and execution.
Other Job Functions:
Performs other related tasks as assigned, some of which may become essential to the position.
Hunter Industries’ approach to the health and safety of each employee is based on adherence to our Injury and Illness Prevention Program (IIPP). Every employee is responsible for their safety and must work safely at all times. Employees are to immediately report all unsafe or hazardous conditions, including injuries and near misses to their Supervisor, Environmental Health& Safety Department, or Workers’ Compensation Manager. Those employees who do not comply with safe work practices may be subject to disciplinary action, up to and including termination.
Education/Training Required:
Bachelor’s degree in Engineering or related field.
Experience Required:
Minimum of one year of engineering experience within a manufacturing organization.
Knowledge, Skills and Abilities (KSA's):
KSA #1: Knowledge of the practical application of engineering science and technology. Knowledge of LEAN Manufacturing& Six-Sigma methodology techniques and how to apply them in the manufacturing environment.
KSA #2: Ability to speak and write effectively as appropriate for the needs of the audience. Excellent written and verbal communication skills in the English language, with strong report-writing and presentation skills.
KSA #3: Excellent computer knowledge, including strong proficiency in Microsoft Office programs.
KSA #4: Strong logic and reasoning skills to identify the strengths and weaknesses within processes.
KSA #5: Excellent organizational and time management skills, and the ability to work within time lines.
KSA #6: Excellent judgment and decision-making skills, with the ability to consider the relative costs and benefits of potential actions to choose the most appropriate one.
KSA #7: Must be able to travel domestically and internationally, and work flexible hours to visit supplier facilities worldwide. Ability to obtain a valid passport if necessary.
Knowledge, Skills and Abilities (KSA's) Preferred:
KSA #8: Knowledge of assembly of electronics and injection molded plastic components.
KSA #9: Knowledge of SPC, FMEA, DOE and process capability studies.
KSA #10: Experience with irrigation products and/or industry.
Physical Demands:
Ability to sit to use a computer, attend meetings, evaluate work stations and assembly ergonomics issues.
Ability to work in a variety of positions (bending, kneeling and crouching) to gain access to the lower areas of machines in the facility.
Ability to climb stairs to gain access to upper levels of the facility.
Ability to carry material, fixtures, tools, equipment weighing up to 60 pounds.
Finger dexterity sufficient to use standard measuring equipment and a computer.
Visual acuity sufficient to use standard measuring equipment and a computer, and to read written material.
Work Environment:
Office with carpeted floor and temperature controls. Production area with tile floor and temperature controls.
Various inside locations with varying temperatures and floor surfaces.
Follow us on LinkedIn, check out our rave reviews on Glassdoor, and learn more about our company culture on our career site:http://corporate.hunterindustries.com/careers",4.2,"Hunter Industries
4.2","San Marcos, CA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1981,Company - Private,Consumer Products Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
187,Lead Software Engineer - Data Platform,$86k-$171k (Glassdoor Est.),"At the intersection of technology, science, business, and sports, Strivr offers an end-to-end, VR-based immersive learning platform that changes the way people around the world train, learn, and perform. With a mission to elevate performance through immersive experience, we are redefining an industry in real-time and shaping the future of learning.

Strivr was founded in 2015 out of Stanford University’s Virtual Human Interaction Lab, using the football field as our proving ground. Since then, we have quickly expanded from the athlete to the enterprise, partnering with leading Fortune 500 companies including Walmart, Verizon, and Fidelity to innovate and elevate employee development.

At Strivr, our engineering teams develop immersive experience software and a cloud-based software platform that powers the creation, management, and experience of immersive learning with a unique level of insights and predictive analytics. The platform is scalable, secure, and compliant which is critical to making our customers and users successful on our platform. The engineering team is distributed and supports a culture of remote work. In addition to the five company values of teamwork, grit, transparency, impact, and passion, we index on strong communication skills, a growth mindset, responsibility and ownership, and a collaborative and respectful work culture.

We capture and analyze device, usage, sentiment, and assessment data, attention, and engagement data based on spatial (gaze, hand) and voice data over tens of millions of in-headset immersive learning and training sessions. We are developing a streaming analytics platform that will allow us to process, join, aggregate, reform, and query data across these very large structured and unstructured datasets to produce immersive analytics with deep insights on learning sessions. Consumers include customers and external users for insights on their learning and training performance, and internal users like Data Scientists and Analysts who need access to raw and processed data from pipelines using notebooks and machine learning frameworks to develop, experiment with, and train learning models.

We are hiring software engineers who are passionate about data engineering, analytics, and developing secure, scalable, and reliable data pipelines and platforms. As an engineer working on Strivr’s data platform, you will have the opportunity to own the full cycle development of distributed services, data pipelines, and infrastructure that needs to scale to process petabytes of data and deliver insights and immersive analytics to hundreds of thousands of users and devices, all in real-time access. You will be expected to prioritize scalability, reliability, and security in your designs and implementation. You will work cross-functionally with other engineering teams, Product Managers, and Data Scientists to deliver end-to-end user-facing functionality and experience.

Your responsibilities:
Systems architecture, design, implementation, and support of the following platform areas and capabilities:
Real-time and batch processing pipelines to process data into logical data sets in data lakes and analytical databases
Business and semantic layer services to transform data into reports, insights, and immersive analytics
APIs for querying raw and processed data for consumption by user-facing visualizations and dashboards in web applications
Tooling and infrastructure for machine learning frameworks, notebooks, and pipelines for querying raw and processed data for training and experimentation
Tooling and infrastructure for data validation in the different phases of the pipeline and in the data stores
Tooling and infrastructure to implement and enforce security and compliance policies for data protection and governance
Write secure, reliable, and performant code and add monitoring for everything you develop
Be data-driven, use instrumentation and monitoring to make improvements to the platform, functional or for-performance, or otherwise
Be a visible technical leader in the organization. Influence engineers by advocating for and practicing a culture of engineering excellence. Mentor and coach lesser experienced engineers to make a positive impact on their career development
Minimum Qualifications:
5+ years of software engineering experience, specifically with development of data pipelines and platforms, and a solid background in software development with one or more of C#, Java, Go
Experience with development and operationalization of large-scale data pipelines and distributed services for structured and unstructured data using streaming frameworks and systems like Kafka, Beam, Spark
Strong database fundamentals including SQL and operational experience with relational (like Postgres) and non-relational databases (like Druid, BigQuery, Elastic)
Experience with development of a data platform with tools and infrastructure for machine learning, training models, and experimentation
Strong written and verbal communication skills, both technical and non-technical
Ability to apply concepts from computer science, data-structures, and algorithms in order to solve problems in a pragmatic and efficient way
Passion for writing secure, readable, modular, and maintainable code and a drive for shipping high quality software with an emphasis on testing, data validation, monitoring, and SLOs to ensure data accuracy with high availability
Bachelors in Computer Science or related field, or equivalent experience
Preferred Qualifications:
Experience developing secure and scalable API services based on GraphQL or REST for web applications
Experience developing on public cloud platforms (Google Cloud, AWS, or Azure) including experience with orchestration using Kubernetes and Docker
Experience with one or more of the following: Natural Language Processing, text understanding, classification, pattern recognition, or similar
This position may be based anywhere in the United States.",4.5,"Strivr
4.5","Palo Alto, CA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2015,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
188,Senior Supplier Quality Engineer,$56k-$98k (Glassdoor Est.),"Introduction

ASML US brings together the most creative minds in science and technology to develop lithography machines that are key to producing faster, cheaper, more energy-efficient microchips. We design, develop, integrate, market and service these advanced machines, which enable our customers - the world’s leading chipmakers - to reduce the size and increase the functionality of their microchips, which in turn leads to smaller, more powerful consumer electronics. Our headquarters are in Veldhoven, the Netherlands, and we have 18 office locations around the United States including main offices in Chandler, Arizona, San Jose and San Diego, California, Wilton, Connecticut, and Hillsboro, Oregon.

Job Mission

The Senior Supply Chain Engineer is responsible for the technical performance of a selected number of suppliers. He or she works with suppliers on performance monitoring, solving technical issues and driving technical process improvements (quality and yield improvement, process control, cycle time reduction, risk analysis and reduction). He or she works closely together with Project Lead Supply Chain Engineering, Logistics Supplier Management Project Leads, Procurement Account Managers (PAM’s) and Supply Chain Engineers NPI in the ASML Development Organization. Depending on the size of the account, he or she is member of Supplier Account Teams. Focus of the work is on volume control, process optimization and supplier development.

Are you an engineer who is challenged by managing the quality performance of suppliers in a high tech-low volume environment, specialized in electrical, mechanical, chemical or optical engineering?

This position requires access to controlled technology or information, as defined in the Export Administration Regulations (15 C.F.R. § 730, et seq.). Qualified candidates must be legally authorized to access such controlled technology prior to beginning work. Business demands may require ASML to proceed with candidates who are immediately eligible to access controlled technology.

Job Description
Responsible for entire Quality (Q) and process Technology (T) performance for volume suppliers and with their n-tier suppliers.
Monitor and review supplier quality performance (MQP of volume deliveries).
Contribute to supplier development (e.g. implementing SPC, lean, FMEA, operational excellence at suppliers or n-tier suppliers).
De-risk manufacturing processes at suppliers by optimizing quality, testing and qualification infrastructure (configuration management, SW support, processes and organization capabilities.
Drive yield and technical process improvements at supplier. Actively participate in improvement project at suppliers (CT reduction, COG reduction).
Carry-out analysis of Q-issues and drive technical solutions in material escalations.
Support implementation of EC changes at suppliers.
Follow-up on operational material quality issues.
Build-up and develop technical competences within ASML (SPC, lean manufacturing, FMEA, operational excellence).
Education

Bachelor or Master’s degree in Physics or Optical Engineering, or equivalent experience.

Experience
5 – 10 years relevant work experience.
Experience with supply chain processes in production environment.
Experience in improvement projects in supply chain, preferably in High-tech industry.
Experience in working in relationships with suppliers.
Excellent communication skills.
Pro-active attitude.
Strong analytical skills.
Attention to detail.
In-depth understanding of manufacturing techniques.
Result oriented, hands-on mentality.
Personal skills
Can observe and respond to people and situations and interact with others encountered in the course of work.
Can learn and apply new information or skills.
Must be able to read and interpret data, information, and documents.
Strong customer focus and commitment to customer satisfaction through prioritization, quality, efficiency and professionalism.
Ability to complete assignments with attention to detail and high degree of accuracy.
Proven ability to perform effectively in a demanding environment with changing workloads and deadlines.
Result driven-demonstrate ownership and accountability.
Identifies bottlenecks and drives improvements.
Work independently or as part of a team and follow through on assignments with minimal supervision.
Demonstrate open, clear, concise and professional communication.
Ability to establish and maintain cooperative working relationships with manager, co-workers and customer.
Work according to a strict set of procedures within the provided timelines.
Other information

Sourcing Logistics (SL) is a department of Global Logistics Services (GLS), represents ASML’s logistics interface to its supply base and is responsible for material availability for ASML’s factories. In today’s complex multi-tier supply chains, this is only possible by creating full transparency in the chains and flexibility at suppliers. SL manages over 100 chains up to seven tiers deep, addressing potential bottlenecks and supply risks before they impact our customers. It must handle the increased complexity of ASML’s systems while reducing cost of ownership for customers. To do this, the SL supply chain- and logistics engineers work with suppliers to continuously reduce cycle time for components, modules and assemblies, increasing supply chain flexibility and customer value. SL also monitors suppliers’ quality, flexibility, cycle time reductions, move rate compliance and on-time delivery reliability, driving supplier development in all areas to ensure ASML’s supply keeps pace with technological developments and can adapt to changing market conditions.

Global Logistics Services (GLS) is part of ASML’s industry-leading supply chain and responsible for ensuring material availability to ASML’s factories and customers. Our DNA contains customer focus, concurrent engineering, virtual integration, acceleration of the supply chain and delivering creative solutions. With over 350 highly educated and motivated people, GLS has contributed to ASML winning the “VLM Jaarprijs 2013” for having the best Supply Chain in The Netherlands.

Role within Office

Responsibilities:

Routinely required to sit; walk; talk; hear; use hands to keyboard, finger, handle, and feel; stoop, kneel, crouch, twist, reach, and stretch. Occasionally required to move around the campus.
Occasionally lift and/or move up to 20 pounds.
May require travel dependent on business needs.
Specific vision abilities required by this job include close vision, color vision, peripheral vision, depth perception, and ability to adjust focus.

Role within the Factory

Responsibilities:

Must be willing to work in a clean room environment, wearing coveralls, hoods, booties, safety glasses and gloves for entire duration of shift.
While performing the duties of this job, the employee routinely is required to sit; walk; talk; hear; use hands to keyboard, finger, handle, and feel; stoop, kneel, crouch, twist, reach, and stretch.
The employee may occasionally lift and/or move up to 50 pounds.
Specific vision abilities required by this job include close vision, color vision, peripheral vision, depth perception, and ability to adjust focus.
Can work under deadlines.
The environment generally is moderate in temperature with moderate to high noise level.
Must be willing to work a compressed work week schedule – twelve-hour long shift and rotating from three to four days a week.
This must include references to day and night shifts for accommodation purposes.

Additional responsibilities for Wilton Factory:

The physical demands described here are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of this job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.

The employee is required to work in a cleanroom environment: full gowning (full body coveralls, hood, CR safety shoes, face mask, nitrile gloves and safety glasses. Working under ISO 9000/14000 standards).
Operating/working around overhead cranes, fork trucks and motorized pallet movers.
Working around lasers; working with ladders; working on platforms; and working around chemicals.
The employee is occasionally required to move around the campus.
The employee may occasionally lift and/or move up to 20 pounds.
May require travel dependent on company needs.
The environment generally is moderate in temperature and noise level.

EOE AA M/F/Veteran/Disability",3.9,"ASML
3.9","Wilton, CT",-1,10000+ Employees,1984,Company - Public,Electrical & Electronic Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$5 to $10 billion (USD),-1
189,"Senior Manager, Machine Learning Engineer",$139k-$243k (Glassdoor Est.),"50 Fairfield Street (21004), United States of America, Boston, Massachusetts

Senior Manager, Machine Learning Engineer

Are you a high performing data engineer and/or data scientist that has experience leading, mentoring and ideally managing a team of data scientists and engineers? Are you looking to apply the latest machine learning research in production implementations? Do you enjoy collaborating with your engineering team and your business partners to find creative ways to use machine learning to drive business objectives? You could be a great match for a Senior Manager role at Capital One.

As a Senior Manager, you will manage teams that build fast data and machine learning solutions to create and improve some of the most interesting use cases in the financial services industry. You will work alongside the Directors to solve critical problems for the organization. Capital One maintains a full stack of technology solutions including streaming big data, state of the art machine learning, micro-service architecture, distributed computation engines, and intuitive visualizations in the cloud. To manage this, we are working with several cutting-edge technologies and are actively developing and contributing to the open source community.

What you will bring to the role:

Excellent communication skills

Leadership skills, mentorship, and management of team members

Demonstrated ability to build full-stack systems architected for speed and distributed computing.

Demonstrated ability to quickly learn new tools and paradigms to deploy cutting-edge solutions.

Experience teaching junior engineers.

Adept at simultaneously working on multiple projects, meeting deadlines, and managing expectations.

Basic Qualifications:

Bachelor’s Degree

At least 5 years of experience designing and building full stack data solutions

At least 5 years of experience working with Python, Scala or Java

At least 3 years of people management experience

At least 2 years leading teams in code review, code development and balancing feature requests with feasibility constraints

Preferred Qualifications:

Master’s Degree or PhD

At least 2+ years working on consulting or client service engagements

At least 2+ years experience with Big Data Frameworks (Spark or Kafka)

At least 2+ years experience with RESTful web service framework

At least 2+ years building applications that use statistical or machine learning methods

At least 2+ years utilizing distributed computing or cloud-based solutions

Capital One will consider sponsoring a new qualified applicant for employment authorization for this position.",4.0,"Capital One - US
4.0","Boston, MA",-1,10000+ Employees,1994,Company - Public,Banks & Credit Unions,Finance,$10+ billion (USD),-1
190,Senior Computer Vision Engineer,$175k-$190k (Employer Est.),"Who we are:


Grabango is the leading provider of checkout-free shopper technology for existing stores. Founded by Will Glaser (technology founder of Pandora Media), the Grabango team has developed the only enterprise class solution for large store chains in the market today. Grabango's system accommodates thousands of store locations, hundreds of thousands of SKUs and millions of square feet across a given retail enterprise.

We're a growing group of kind, curious, self-directed people working towards a common goal. We delight in taking risks and testing hypotheses in a collaborative and supportive environment. Our ability to celebrate both our successes and failures as milestones of growth opens the door to tremendous breakthroughs.

Computer vision and machine learning are at the core of our patent pending technology. Our accomplished team is a powerful combination of technology and commerce professionals that are working to ""Eliminate lines and save people time!""

Overview:
Grabango is looking for talented Computer Vision Engineers who are passionate about pushing the boundaries of Computer Vision, Artificial Intelligence, and Deep Learning, and enjoy collaborating closely with cross-functional teams to make sure all of the technologies integrate seamlessly to create an impactful product that our customers love.

What you'll be doing:


Improve Grabango's acquisition system by focusing on: Camera placement, optics validation, calibration
Collaborate closely with the hardware and optics team
Use computer vision to gather vital data
Turn research papers into implementations, separating the wheat from the chaff
Contribute to the production code

What you should have:


3 - 5+ years of professional experience in the computer vision field
2+ years of production-level development experience with Python and/or C++
Experience with traditional computer vision fields combined with a good mathematical background: epipolar geometry, projective geometry, linear algebra
Relevant experience with camera calibration and/or camera evaluation
Ability to use computer vision to gather necessary data, avoid obstacles, etc.
Experience with OpenCV
Big Plus for experience with deep learning frameworks

Education & Certifications:


PhD in computer vision

Grabango Values:
Integrity: Do the right thing, particularly when you don't have to.

Bold Innovation: Think recklessly, but temper your actions with pragmatism.

People Matter: Hire the best, and treasure them.

Don't Live with Broken: Have the courage to admit mistakes, and the urgency to correct them.

Customer Focus: Deliver beyond expectations, both internally and externally.

Inclusion: Foster an environment that welcomes all.

Simplify: Everything should be made as simple as possible, but not simpler.

Grabango is proud to be an equal opportunity employer and is committed to developing a workplace where diversity and inclusion are an essential part of who we are. We strive to hire and support a workforce as diverse as our shopper base, so we can develop products and services that best suit our customers. We do not make employment decisions based on race, color, religion, ethnic or national origin, nationality, sex, gender, gender-identity, sexual orientation, disability, age, military or veteran status and we comply with all local, state and federal employment laws.

Grabango participates in the E-Verify Program, an internet-based system operated by the Department of Homeland Security and the Social Security Administration. It allows employers to confirm an individual's employment eligibility to work in the United States.",3.8,"Grabango
3.8","Berkeley, CA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2016,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
191,Senior Computer Vision Engineer - Tracking,$175k-$190k (Employer Est.),"Who we are:


Grabango is the leading provider of checkout-free shopper technology for existing stores. Founded by Will Glaser (technology founder of Pandora Media), the Grabango team has developed the only enterprise class solution for large store chains in the market today. Grabango's system accommodates thousands of store locations, hundreds of thousands of SKUs and millions of square feet across a given retail enterprise.

We're a growing group of kind, curious, self-directed people working towards a common goal. We delight in taking risks and testing hypotheses in a collaborative and supportive environment. Our ability to celebrate both our successes and failures as milestones of growth opens the door to tremendous breakthroughs.

Computer vision and machine learning are at the core of our patent pending technology. Our accomplished team is a powerful combination of technology and commerce professionals that are working to ""Eliminate lines and save people time!""

Overview:
Grabango is looking for talented Computer Vision Engineers who are passionate about pushing the boundaries of Computer Vision, Artificial Intelligence, and Deep Learning, and enjoy collaborating closely with cross-functional teams to make sure all of the technologies integrate seamlessly to create an impactful product that our customers love.

What you'll be doing:


Improve Grabango's acquisition system by focusing on:
People tracking system
Collaborate closely with the platform team
Use computer vision to gather vital data
Turn research papers into implementations, separating the wheat from the chaff
Contribute to the production code

What you should have:


3 - 5+ years of professional experience in the computer vision field
2+ years of production-level development experience with Python
Experience with design and implementation of tracking algorithms, such as multi-view multi-object tracking
Experience with object detection, metric learning, 3D geometry
Ability to use computer vision to gather necessary data, avoid obstacles, etc.
Experience with OpenCV
Big Plus for experience with deep learning frameworks

Education & Certifications:


PhD in computer vision

Grabango Values:
Integrity: Do the right thing, particularly when you don't have to.

Bold Innovation: Think recklessly, but temper your actions with pragmatism.

People Matter: Hire the best, and treasure them.

Don't Live with Broken: Have the courage to admit mistakes, and the urgency to correct them.

Customer Focus: Deliver beyond expectations, both internally and externally.

Inclusion: Foster an environment that welcomes all.

Simplify: Everything should be made as simple as possible, but not simpler.

Grabango is proud to be an equal opportunity employer and is committed to developing a workplace where diversity and inclusion are an essential part of who we are. We strive to hire and support a workforce as diverse as our shopper base, so we can develop products and services that best suit our customers. We do not make employment decisions based on race, color, religion, ethnic or national origin, nationality, sex, gender, gender-identity, sexual orientation, disability, age, military or veteran status and we comply with all local, state and federal employment laws.

Grabango participates in the E-Verify Program, an internet-based system operated by the Department of Homeland Security and the Social Security Administration. It allows employers to confirm an individual's employment eligibility to work in the United States.",3.8,"Grabango
3.8","Berkeley, CA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2016,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
192,"Enterprise Solution Engineer, East",$69k-$144k (Glassdoor Est.),"Position Overview

Solution Engineers (SEs) at MemSQL are solving some of the most cutting-edge technical challenges in today's data-driven world. When customers evaluate MemSQL, SEs are their trusted technical experts who evaluate, identify, and demonstrate how MemSQL can solve their mission-critical business needs. As key contributors to our sales organization, Solution Engineers add tremendous value to the customer journey and directly impact company growth and revenue.

In this role, you will be responsible for identifying the technical requirements necessary to deliver business value for our Fortune 1,000 customers. Working in partnership with Enterprise Account Executives, you will help to acquire new customers and expand existing accounts. You will do this by leveraging your technical skill set and business acumen to understand complex solutions and create high-quality demos that resonate with our customers.

Role and Responsibilities
Partner with Account Executives to close new business (logos) and expand existing accounts
Design, develop, and deploy Proofs of Concept (POCs) with prospective customers
Drive the technical evaluation stage of the sales cycle, acting as the technical lead/subject matter expert (query tuning, load testing, etc.)
Partner with internal teams (Product, Engineering, etc.) to share feedback on customer needs and requests
Required Skills and Experience
Experience successfully selling infrastructure software, preferably a database, distributed system, or similar product
Firm understanding of database fundamentals, including both analytic and transactional processing
Expertise executing POCs, with experience designing and deploying complex technologies into existing customer environments
In-Depth understanding of databases, including various competitive products (Oracle, SAP, MySQL, Teradata, etc.)
Proficient programming skills in Python, PHP, or other programming language
Ability to travel within the region and internationally
Bachelor's Degree in Computer Science or other technical field
MemSQL is The Database of Now, powering modern applications and analytical systems with a cloud-native, massively scalable architecture. MemSQL delivers maximum ingest, accelerated transaction processing and blisteringly fast query performance, including AI integration and machine learning models, all at the highest concurrency. Global enterprises use the MemSQL distributed database to easily ingest, process, analyze and act on data, to thrive in today's insight-driven economy. MemSQL is optimized to run on any public cloud or on-premises with commodity hardware.

Headquartered in San Francisco, CA with offices globally, MemSQL has raised nearly $100M from top investors including GV, Accel Partners and Khosla Ventures, among others. MemSQL is trusted by customers including Uber, Akamai, Dell EMC, Samsung, Comcast, Kellogg, and more.

Consistent with our commitment to diversity & inclusion, we value individuals with the ability to work on diverse teams and with a diverse range of people.

To all recruitment agencies: MemSQL does not accept agency resumes. Please do not forward resumes to MemSQL employees. MemSQL is not responsible for any fees related to unsolicited resumes and will not pay fees to any third-party agency or company that does not have a signed agreement with the Company.",4.6,"SingleStore
4.6","New York, NY",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2011,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
193,UX Designer\Software Engineer,-1,"Mission Communications*
UX Designer\\Software Engineer
SUMMARY: *
We are currently seeking an exceptional technical UI/UX Designer and a software engineer who has an emphasis on working with a Human Machine Interface (HMI) and Supervisory control and data acquisition systems (SCADA). Person will majorly contribute to our web application development, making our customer and employee web experiences awesome. This person should have at least five years of experience working with AngularJS, C#, ASP/.NET Framework and Transact SQL with good working knowledge of ANGULAR , Typescript.*
Responsibilities: *
*Create interactive and responsive web applications using best practices and all available tools to augment the user experience.*
*Design and develop a front end based responsive single page application by using web technologies like HTML5, CSS3, ANGULARJS 1.x JAVASCRIPT, BOOTSTRAP, and ANGULAR.*
*Build leading-edge, state-of-art applications. Write code that is robust, secure and scalable.*
*Create Visual Mock ups and manage detailed user interface specifications flowing HMI guidelines.*
*Adhere to Client user experience design standards by following our digital style guide for all elements, such as buttons, fonts, forms, tables, colors, icons and navigation.*
*Develop new REST APIs using C# .NET and consume it for the backend data and contribute to enhancing existing data service API’s.*
*Self-starter with ability to grasp concepts quickly and learn new technologies.*
*Ability to work in a dynamic environment where priorities can change.*
*Provide a verbal and/or written weekly status report.*
*Constant interaction with the QA teams to identify possible bugs and defects beforehand and fixing them before each release to maintain a stable application.*
Qualifications*
*Proven work experience as UI/UX Designer.*
*2- 3 years of experience coding in ANGULARJS 1.x ,Javascript, HTML, CSS, bootstrap, Angular, Typescript.*
*5 years of .NET Web API, C# and MVC experience developing/managing REST Web Service API(s).*
*1 - 2 years of experience working with reporting tools like JIRA.*
*Ability to use version control software such a GIT.*
*Experience with all aspects of the software development life cycle and Agile software development methodologies.*
*Ability to work well in a team environment, while also having the ability to work autonomously*
*Experience working as a designer for HMI/SCADA systems *
*Updated knowledge of design software (Adobe Illustrator, Photoshop) is a big advantage*
*Team spirit; strong communication skills to collaborate with various stakeholders;*
*Bachelor's Degree in Computer science, Graphic Design or equivalent.*
*Interaction with experts both with technical teams (software developers), non-technical (visual designers, product owners, project managers etc.).*
*Experience in writing SQL queries and Stored Procedures for SQL Server.*
*Strong grasp of programming principles like isolation, separation and abstraction.*
*Some experience with SDLC, Agile (Scrum) & Test-driven development writing unit tests. *
Other*
*Must be able to work independently with minimal supervision*
*Strong team player with good communication skills*
*Performs other duties as assigned*
*This position is 100% on-site in the north Atlanta area (no relocation provided)*
Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $85,000.00 - $130,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Flexible schedule
Flexible spending account
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Day shift
Monday to Friday
On call
This Job Is Ideal for Someone Who Is:
Dependable -- more reliable than spontaneous
People-oriented -- enjoys interacting with people and working on group projects
Adaptable/flexible -- enjoys doing work that requires frequent shifts in direction
Detail-oriented -- would rather focus on the details of work than the bigger picture
Achievement-oriented -- enjoys taking on challenges, even if they might fail
Autonomous/Independent -- enjoys working with little direction
Innovative -- prefers working in unconventional ways or on tasks that require creativity
Company's website:
www.123mc.com
Benefit Conditions:
Waiting period may apply
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",4.0,"Mission Communications, LLC
4.0","North Atlanta, GA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,1999,Company - Private,Telecommunications Manufacturing,Telecommunications,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
194,Optical Metrology Engineer - Wafer & Alignment Sensors Team,$89k-$140k (Glassdoor Est.),"Introduction

ASML US brings together the most creative minds in science and technology to develop lithography machines that are key to producing faster, cheaper, more energy-efficient microchips. We design, develop, integrate, market and service these advanced machines, which enable our customers - the world’s leading chipmakers - to reduce the size and increase the functionality of their microchips, which in turn leads to smaller, more powerful consumer electronics. Our headquarters are in Veldhoven, the Netherlands, and we have 18 office locations around the United States including main offices in Chandler, Arizona, San Jose and San Diego, California, Wilton, Connecticut, and Hillsboro, Oregon.

Job Mission

ASML in Wilton CT is seeking an Optical Engineer/Physicist in the Wafer Alignment Sensor Department US to work with a multi-discipline engineering team to define and develop optical/photonic sensor systems and/or test equipment used within ASML’s photolithography and/or metrology equipment. These systems typically include light sources, detectors, optical/electro-optical components, fiber optics, electronics and signal processing SW. Understanding the components in their relation to the sensor system function and understanding the interaction with the rest of the metrology or lithography system is of fundamental importance.

The Wafer Alignment Sensor Department in Wilton CT is seeking a well-rounded engineer with direct experience in optical engineering. The optical modules developed for ASML’s products will include sources, detectors, geometric/diffractive optics and electro-optic components. This position will require skills in optical systems engineering: specific to the optical lithography or semi-conductor industry.

This position requires access to controlled technology, as defined in the Export Administration Regulations (15 C.F.R. § 730, et seq.). Qualified candidates must be legally authorized to access such controlled technology prior to beginning work. Business demands may require ASML to proceed with applicants who are immediately eligible to access controlled technology.

Job Description

The main focus of this position will be:

Leading the design team in test equipment development to find solutions to difficult technical problems in an efficient manner.
Decomposition of top-level system requirements into lower level module, sub-module, or component level design specifications for product or test equipment towards the engineering team.
Deriving specifications for module, sub-module, or test equipment consistent with our manufacturing practices.
Development of alignment methods for complex optical sensors and systems.
Development of tooling and test equipment to support optical sensor alignment methods.
Develop clear understanding of optical tests needed for qualifying optical sub-modules.
Preparation of leading system engineer documentation (Element Performance Specifications, Element Design Specifications, Test Performance Specification; Test Analysis Reports) through review, release and change control.
Support preparation of design reviews for the development team.
Write engineering procedure and train technicians to efficiently transfer the build/ alignment & test process to manufacturing.
Supporting systems in the factory and in the field, by being able to relate observed sensor anomalies to potential system defects.
Clearly communicating progress and status of ongoing technical activities to senior management.
Understanding how the performance of the sensor system affects the performance of ASMLs equipment.
Some travel ( ~ 20%) to Europe, Asia, and within the US can be expected.
Education

Minimum BS in Optical Engineering, or Physics, or equivalent experience.

Experience

Candidate must:

Be experienced with diverse optical metrology setups such as interferometers, Shack – Hartmann sensor, polarimetry/ellipsometry & optical alignment.
Be experienced in optical design/ analysis software like: CodeV and/or Zemax; FRED; MATLAB.
Have competencies in: optical design theory, lasers, polarization, detectors, electro-optical devices and opto-mechanical constructions.
Have strong written and oral communicative skills and a commitment to achieving results on time.
Demonstrated “team player” with a quality orientation and interpersonal skills.
Be able to interface with multidisciplinary groups and work effectively in a team and be willing to take on responsibility, follow through and keep multiple simultaneous assignments on schedule.
Be able to quickly acquire technical knowledge from documentation and on-the-job training and be capable of thoroughly investigating technical issues (analytically and hands-on in a lab).
Be willing to own the integrated systems performance, and support the entire product life-cycle (development through sustaining engineering), strive to deliver the right design solution for the right cost at the right time.
Personal skills
Can observe and respond to people and situations and interact with others encountered in the course of work.
Can learn and apply new information or skills.
Must be able to read and interpret data, information, and documents.
Strong customer focus and commitment to customer satisfaction through prioritization, quality, efficiency and professionalism.
Ability to complete assignments with attention to detail and high degree of accuracy.
Proven ability to perform effectively in a demanding environment with changing workloads and deadlines.
Result driven-demonstrate ownership and accountability.
Identifies bottlenecks and drives improvements.
Work independently or as part of a team and follow through on assignments with minimal supervision.
Demonstrate open, clear, concise and professional communication.
Ability to establish and maintain cooperative working relationships with manager, co-workers and customer.
Work according to a strict set of procedures within the provided timelines.
Other information

Role within Office

Responsibilities:

Routinely required to sit; walk; talk; hear; use hands to keyboard, finger, handle, and feel; stoop, kneel, crouch, twist, reach, and stretch. Occasionally required to move around the campus.
Occasionally lift and/or move up to 20 pounds.
May require travel dependent on business needs.
Specific vision abilities required by this job include close vision, color vision, peripheral vision, depth perception, and ability to adjust focus.

EOE AA M/F/Veteran/Disability

Internal Reference: #LI-KG1",3.9,"ASML
3.9","Wilton, CT",-1,10000+ Employees,1984,Company - Public,Electrical & Electronic Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$5 to $10 billion (USD),-1
195,Full-Stack Software Engineer - TS/SCI w/FSP Required,-1,"Job Description:
Join our team of talented engineers in the Fort Meade area supporting critical national security programs. As a full-stack software engineer, youll use a wide range of technologies spanning front-end user interfaces, RESTful web services, Java back-end services, and multiple databases (both relational and NoSQL). At Phoenix, youll be continuously challenged to expand your technical skill set in support of our core mission, Arming the analyst.

This position will support multiple programs and is open to all candidate levels (junior, mid-level, and senior). A typical day includes engineering activities across a mid-sized team, developing new capabilities, addressing critical defects, interfacing with mission SMEs, and conducting Scrum activities (stand-ups, sprint planning, sprint demos/retrospectives). This multi-disciplinary team collaborates daily to meet demanding technical and mission needs.

*** Top Secret SCI Clearance with Full-Scope Polygraph Required ***

Technical Skills Required
3+ years of experience in Java software development
2+ years of experience accessing relational databases
2+ years of experience implementing RESTful web services
1+ years of experience using Spring / Spring Boot
1+ years of experience using Git source code control
1+ years developing software in a Linux environment
1+ years of experience using JUnit, Maven, Jenkins
Technical Skill Preferred
Experience working in an Agile (Scrum) environment using Jira and Confluence
Experience with distributed technologies such as Hadoop, Spark and Kafka
Experience with MongoDB, ElasticSearch, HBase or Accumulo data stores
Basic understanding of Python
Basic understanding JavaScript
Benefits Offered:
Medical, Dental, Vision Insurance - 100% Company Paid Premiums
STD, LTD, and Life Insurance - 100% Company paid
401K Automatic 10% company contribution; no matching required
PTO - 4 weeks/year
Holidays - 10 paid/year
Birthdays off with pay
Company laptop built to your specification
Referral Bonuses Upfront AND Annually Recurring
Open Source Bonuses Contribute to our GitHub projects
Professional Development Paid training, Certifications and Enrichment
ABOUT PHOENIX OPERATIONS GROUP:
Phoenix Operations Group is an engineering services company that protects US Warfighters and supports US Intelligence efforts. As a small business operating in the Baltimore & DC areas, we rely on innovation to continually advance our employees' skills and provide game-changing solutions to our customers.

Phoenix specializes in inter-agency functionality that connects our federal, military and commercial clients with shared mission solutions. We do this with Big Data technologies, Machine Learning techniques, Cloud-Hosted platforms, and enterprise architectures.

Our team is geographically dispersed across the country. Thus, we rely on innovative techniques to advance our employees' skills and promote company culture:
We incentivize employees to participate in our Open-Source GitHub projects
We incentivize and support employees in writing whitepapers for the community
We invest in research and development (R&D) to expand our mission capabilities
We promote technical discussion across Slack, Google Meet and Social Media platforms
With these innovations, Phoenix provides a dynamic and inclusive environment for our employees. Please visit us at https://www.phoenix-opsgroup.com/ for more information.

Phoenix Operations Group is an Equal Opportunity Employer. Phoenix Operations Group does not discriminate on the basis of race, religion, color, sex, gender, gender identity, sexual orientation, age, non-disqualifying physical or mental disability, national origin, veteran status or any other basis covered by appropriate law. All employment is decided on the basis of qualifications, merit, and business need.",5.0,"Phoenix Operations Group
5.0","Annapolis Junction, MD",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2011,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1
196,Data Scientist - Manufacturing Technology,$89k-$146k (Glassdoor Est.),"Climb to new heights on your journey when you start Defining Possible with Northrop Grumman. Enjoy a purposeful career in aeronautics that is crucial to the way we connect and protect our world across land, sea, and air. Bring your experience and take advantage of this opportunity to discover how you can start to push past possible and achieve your goals today. Enjoy a diverse, collaborative environment with professionals across the nation ready to help launch your career.

Our Aeronautics Systems sector is seeking a Data Scientist to join our team of qualified, diverse individuals. This position will support our Advanced Manufacturing Technology & Innovation development team and will be located in Palmdale, CA.

Our organization is currently working to build a revolutionary kind of production factory, an IIoT Smart Factory, and we need your help to shape the foundation! As a member of the Advanced Manufacturing Technology & Innovation team, you will identify, develop and implement data analytics, and machine learning technologies for production within our Advanced Manufacturing Technology & Innovation organization. The role will define, develop, and design manufacturing concepts and processes for production applications of manufacturing technologies with a focus on digital manufacturing technologies and applications including, but not limited to, point of use work instructions, industrial internet of things (IIoT), and data analytics solutions for manufacturing processes.

The position requires a strong understanding of computer and database systems as well as data analytics workflows. You will need to be familiar with data ETL processes and standard machine learning techniques. The position requires strong experience using a variety of data mining/data analysis methods, using a variety of data tools, building and implementing models, using/creating algorithms and creating/running simulations. Strong written and oral communication skills are required as the position involves extensive interfacing with internal and external customers, program offices, engineering disciplines, and industry suppliers. You must have a proven ability to drive business results with your data-based insights. The role will require the individual to be comfortable working with a wide range of stakeholders and functional teams. The desired candidate will have a passion for discovering solutions hidden in large data sets and working with stakeholders to improve business outcomes.

Essential Job Functions:
Develop analytical models to support manufacturing operations
Perform in-depth data analysis and report findings
Build and support dashboards / visuals
Support ETL Pipelines as needed
Assess new technologies and software platforms to assist in development of IIoT capability
Support project management and planning as required
Communicate advanced concepts and information in an understandable manner for audiences of varying levels of competency. Continuous interface with stakeholders and customers is required.
Support and enforce the Agile methodology and framework used by the project team
Keeps current on advances in the field of IIoT with demonstrating strategic big picture thinking.

Qualifications:

Basic Qualifications:
Bachelor's Degree in STEM (Science, Technology, Engineering, Math) with 2 years of experience with information systems, data analytics and/or computer programming; OR Master's Degree in STEM
Bachelor's Degree (non-STEM) with 4 years of experience, or Master's Degree (non-STEM) with 2 years of experience with information systems, data analytics and/or computer programming
Experience with one or more: Python, R, C, C++, Java, JavaScript
Experience with querying databases and defining schemas (MS SQL)
Experience with high volume production ETL pipelines
Strong problem solving skills with an emphasis on production environments
Experience working with and creating data architectures
Experience manipulating data using pandas, NumPy, or similar
Experience building analytical models using scikit, SciPy, or similar
Experience with version control software such as Git
Experience with data visualization tools using Tableau or similar
Experience with Command Line / Terminal scripting
Ability to perform data analysis and report findings
Proven ability to learn and master new technologies and techniques
Extensive knowledge of MS Office Products
Self-starter who is able to work with minimal direction
This position requires the ability to obtain and maintain a DOD Secret or Top Secret Clearance as well as Program Special access within a reasonable period of time, as determined by the company to meet its business needs
Ability to travel 10-15% of the time
Preferred Qualifications:
STEM Degree (Science, Technical, Engineering, or Mathematical)
Experience in a fabrication and/or assembly manufacturing environment
Knowledge of a variety of machine learning techniques (clustering, decision tree learning, artificial neural networks, etc.) and their real-world advantages/drawbacks
Experience using Kepware and/or Thingworx to develop IIoT technologies
Experience with Javascript, HTML / CSS to support IIoT dashboards and visuals
Experience with machine communication protocols such as MQTT, MTConnect, OPC
Experience with modern ETL / Big Data tools such as Kafka, Nifi, and Spark
Experience building system architectures using visual tools such as Visio
Experience working in an Agile environment
Experience in the development, capture, and/or execution of R&D technology initiatives and experience in Digital Manufacturing technology applications
Familiarity with DFARS-NIST-800-171 specification for cyber security
Current active Secret or Top Secret clearance preferred
Northrop Grumman is committed to hiring and retaining a diverse workforce. We are proud to be an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer, making decisions without regard to race, color, religion, creed, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, marital status, national origin, age, veteran status, disability, or any other protected class. For our complete EEO/AA and Pay Transparency statement, please visit www.northropgrumman.com/EEO. U.S. Citizenship is required for most positions.",3.9,"Northrop Grumman
3.9","Palmdale, CA",-1,10000+ Employees,1939,Company - Public,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$10+ billion (USD),-1
197,Cleared Data Scientist,$77k-$124k (Glassdoor Est.),"Why choose between doing meaningful work and having a fulfilling life? At MITRE, you can have both. That's because MITRE people are committed to tackling our nation's toughest challenges—and we're committed to the long-term well-being of our employees. MITRE is different from most technology companies. We are a not-for-profit corporation chartered to work for the public interest, with no commercial conflicts to influence what we do. The R&D centers we operate for the government create lasting impact in fields as diverse as cybersecurity, healthcare, aviation, defense, and enterprise transformation. We're making a difference every day—working for a safer, healthier, and more secure nation and world. Our workplace reflects our values. We offer competitive benefits, exceptional professional development opportunities, and a culture of innovation that embraces diversity, inclusion, flexibility, collaboration, and career growth. If this sounds like the choice you want to make, then choose MITRE—and make a difference with us.

As an experienced Data Scientist, you might be wondering what makes MITRE different than other government contractors and consulting firms. Many of our recent hires answered YES to at least one of the questions below:
Do you want to partner with Defense Intelligence professionals to solve problems?
Are you interested in developing, automating and improving capabilities to address technical issues of national importance and making a direct mission impact?
Are you interested in contributing to technical projects that you can feel passionate about?
Are you interested in working for a company where a 40-hour week is the norm and not the exception?
Do you want exceptional benefits, including tuition reimbursement for coursework towards an advance degree in a technical discipline?
In the Defense Intelligence Department, you can apply and expand software development and data skills to recommend solutions to large-scale data challenges. Join our team to develop automated methods to ingest and analyze large datasets; conduct data analysis and data modeling; and develop prototype capabilities. The candidate will be expected to work independently, with Analysts, and with Data Scientists to develop new workflows and approaches to answer questions of national significance. Our department works to identify and bring solutions to the Defense Intelligence Community and work in the public interest. We also actively conduct independent research in areas that further the knowledge of our government partners.

To be successful you will:
Be passionate about applying data analytics to real world problems.
Have an innate curiosity and interest in developing research questions and testing hypotheses with open ended tasking.
Work with Defense Intelligence government sponsors to gain understanding of their challenges, evaluate possible solutions and conduct insightful, actionable analyses.
Support the development and application of a variety of analytical models to sponsor challenges, with a willingness to adapt and learn.
Present results in an intuitive, actionable manner that can be understood by all sponsor audiences, regardless of technical expertise.
Provide relevant day-to-day tasking for one or more junior staff.
Lead projects throughout their life cycle, including conceptualization, requirements definition, data procurement, development, integration, and socialization
Minimum Qualifications :
BS and 8 years related experience
Applicants selected for this position will be subject to a government security investigation and must meet eligibility requirements for access to classified information or applicants who are eligible for security clearances.
Required Qualifications:
Prior experience working with the Department of Defense and/or Intelligence Community.
Significant academic background in a quantitative field such as Computer Science, Engineering, Operations Research, Mathematics, or Statistics.
Excellent written and verbal communication skills.
Demonstrated ability to manipulate large datasets and perform calculations with at least two modern programming language like Python (scikit-learn, pandas, tensorflow), C++, R, or Java or a business intelligence platform like Tableau.
Ability to apply, modify and formulate algorithms and processes to solve challenging problems.
Familiarity with AWS tools.
Demonstrated experience leading customer facing engagements emphasizing data analytics.
Possess and maintain an Active TS/SCI level security clearance with the ability to successfully obtain a CI Poly level clearance.


Preferred Qualifications:
Prior experience working with databases (e.g., PostgreSQL, Oracle, MySQL, MongoDB, Neo4j).Experience visualizing multi-dimensional data using tools like Tableau, ggplot2, Plotly, matplotlib, seaborn, or D3.js.
Experience leading or conducting research.
Experience designing data science tasking and/or leading a team of data scientists.
Experience applying various machine learning approaches (e.g., random forest, neural networks, support vector machines).
Experience using version control (e.g., Git, Mercurial, SVN) to support collaborative development.
Prior experience developing interactive data visualizations using open source web technologies (Angular, Vue, React, D3.js) or other frameworks (Shiny, Jupyter Notebooks).
Prior experience developing data-intensive full stack web applications using Node.js, Flask, Django, or other technologies.
MITRE is proud to be an equal opportunity employer. MITRE recruits, employs, trains, compensates, and promotes regardless of race, religion, color, national origin, gender, gender expression, sexual identity, disability, age, veteran status, and other protected status.

MITRE intends to maintain a website that is fully accessible to all individuals. If you are unable to search or apply for jobs and would like to request a reasonable accommodation for any part of MITRE’s employment process, please contact MITRE’s Recruiting Help Line at 703-983-8226 or email at recruitinghelp@mitre.org.

Copyright © 1997-2020, The MITRE Corporation. All rights reserved. MITRE is a registered trademark of The MITRE Corporation. Material on this site may be copied and distributed with permission only.",3.4,"MITRE
3.4","Charlottesville, VA",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1958,Nonprofit Organization,Federal Agencies,Government,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
198,Data Scientist,$60k-$99k (Glassdoor Est.),"Job Description


Oversight is a leading provider of cloud-based artificial intelligence solutions automating and analyzing financial payment transactions to identify fraud, non-compliant purchases, and wasteful spending. Oversight analyzes over $2 trillion in expenditures annually at Fortune 5000 companies and government agencies worldwide.

In this position as a Data Scientist, you will be working with a team of skilled and motivated data scientists and machine learning engineers designing and building AI solutions to expand our product line.

Responsibilities


Our team is at the fore front of building, operating and supporting business systems with machine learning at their core.

As a Data Scientist you will be incorporating machine learning into our products in order to transform how companies find and manage spend risk throughout their organization. You will collaborate with cross functional teams on complex data science problems and be responsible for solution design, data preparation, model building, and model management.

Ultimately, we’re looking for people who are excited by machine learning, data and technology, love to solve problems, constantly challenge themselves to provide the best user experience, can work well alone, have a wide range of skills and are able and willing to constantly learn.

Skills


Technical Skills/Requirements
3+ years real world experience in a data science or equivalent role
Extensive experience designing and maintaining a machine Learning pipeline – ETL, feature engineering, modeling, predicting, explaining, deploying and ongoing diagnostics
Excellent pattern recognition and predictive modeling skills
Experience communicating complex models and designing
Strong experience with data processing and data analytics
Experience analyzing a wide variety of structured and unstructured data
Strong communication and data presentation skills
Experience in both R&D and commercial software product development environment is a plus
Technologies
Expertise in python, scikit-learn, and pandas
Experience with Deep learning frameworks (FastAI , Keras, PyTorch etc.) preferred
SQL
Linux
Interested and qualified candidates should submit a resume with salary requirements to recruiter@oversightsystems.com.

About Oversight

Oversight is the world’s leading provider of AI-based spend management and risk mitigation solutions for large enterprises. Based in Atlanta, GA, Oversight works with many of the world’s most innovative companies and government agencies to digitally transform their spend audit and financial control processes.

Oversight’s AI-powered platform works across our customers’ financial systems to continuously monitor and analyze all spend transactions for fraud, waste, and misuse. With a consolidated, consistent view of risk across their enterprise, customers can prevent financial loss and optimize spend while strengthening the controls that improve compliance. Learn More.

Oversight is an equal opportunity employer.

Job Applicant Privacy Notice",4.7,"Oversight Systems
4.7","Atlanta, GA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2003,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
199,"Software Engineer, Machine Learning",$122k-$202k (Glassdoor Est.),"Grammarly is continuing to grow our team during the COVID-19 pandemic, conducting fully remote hiring and onboarding processes. All Grammarly team members can work remotely until August 2021. Read more about how we're supporting our team and communities.

The opportunity


Grammarly empowers people to thrive and connect, whenever and wherever they communicate. 30 million people around the world use our AI-powered writing assistant every day. All of this begins with our team collaborating in a values-driven and learning-oriented environment.

To achieve our ambitious goals, we're looking for a Software Engineer focused on machine learning to join our team. This individual will be responsible for building end-to-end intelligence systems that solve complex user problems, including applying ML to solve new problems as well as building the infrastructure and systems that will enable this to operate effectively at scale. The role will have the opportunity to provide feedback about the systems and tools in place to facilitate the creation and improvement of a machine learning platform that can increase the efficacy of the engineering team.

Grammarly's engineers and researchers have the freedom to innovate and uncover breakthroughs—and, in turn, influence our product roadmap. The complexity of our technical challenges is growing rapidly as we scale our interfaces, algorithms, and infrastructure. Read more about our stack or hear from our team on our technical blog.

Your impact


The Software Engineer for machine learning will need to stay up-to-date on the quickly evolving field of NLP while also focusing on building production systems. The majority of the problems we're tackling haven't already been solved elsewhere, which provides the opportunity for creativity and innovative problem-solving.

Working on the Machine Learning team requires close partnership with analytical linguists, computational linguists, and research scientists. You will have the chance to deepen your skills in machine learning and deep learning while increasing breadth in related areas to up-level our entire team.

In this role, you will:
Build end-to-end machine learning solutions to solve complex customer problems.
Collaborate with applied researchers to ensure they are well-calibrated on the constraints of the production system, ensuring their research proceeds along practical pathways as they explore novel techniques to tackle previously unsolved problems.
Effectively communicate technical machine learning results in a business context where most people are not machine learning experts.
Build the systems to help applied researchers scale their models in a production environment.
Design experiments, including for offline prototypes in a statistically sound way that will provide actionable data and enable us to make reliable decisions as we iterate on a project.
Promote excellence and best practices across the machine learning team in regards to research, implementation, tooling, and system design.
Work cross-functionally across multiple partner teams to get new features shipped across our many interfaces.
We're looking for someone who
Embodies our EAGER values—is ethical, adaptable, gritty, empathetic, and remarkable.
Understands traditional machine learning algorithms and how to use them effectively in practice.
Is familiar with deep learning and its applications in industry.
Has a strong working knowledge of statistics as it relates to sampling methodologies and designing experiments
Understands data structures and algorithms at a level sufficient to write performant code when working with large datasets or large incoming data streams.
Is aware of NLP techniques to effectively work with very high-dimensional, sparse data.
Has enough experience with academic research to be comfortable reading and implementing papers to reproduce their results.\
Support for you, professionally and personally
Professional growth: We hire people we trust, and we give team members autonomy to do their best work. We also support professional development with training, coaching, and regular feedback.
A connected team: Grammarly builds products that help people connect, and we apply this mindset to our own team. We have a highly collaborative culture supported by our EAGER values. We also take time to celebrate our colleagues and accomplishments with global, local, and team-specific events and programs.
Comprehensive benefits: Grammarly offers all team members competitive pay along with a benefits package that includes superior health care. We also offer ample and defined time off, catered lunches, gym and recreation stipends, admission discounts, and more.
We encourage you to apply


At Grammarly, we value our differences, and we encourage all—especially those whose identities are traditionally underrepresented in tech organizations—to apply. We do not discriminate on the basis of race, religion, color, gender expression or identity, sexual orientation, national origin, citizenship, age, marital status, veteran status, disability status, or any other characteristic protected by law. Grammarly will consider qualified applicants with criminal histories in a manner consistent with the San Francisco Fair Chance Ordinance. Grammarly is an equal opportunity employer and participant in the U.S. Federal E-Verify program.",4.9,"Grammarly
4.9","San Francisco, CA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2009,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
200,Resident Maintenance Engineer,$53k-$98k (Glassdoor Est.),"We are a global company with our US headquarters right outside of Atlanta, GA. We specialize in dock-to-dock automation of the supply chain process for both B2B (Business to Business) and B2C (Business to Consumer.) With over 4,000 people in our group worldwide we are different than most other supply chain automation companies in that over 25% of our solutions are software-based. We also reinvest 7% of our revenues in R&D ensuring a strong and vibrant future! Come help us change the world! For more information, visit www.knapp.com.
Job Summary:

As a Resident Maintenance Engineer, you will be expected to provide industrial Electrical/Mechanical expertise, and you will be part of a team that works to maximize equipment utilization and efficiency. The role will assist in the development and implementation of processes to maintain proper utilization and functionality. Resident Maintenance Engineer is required to have advanced knowledge; and that involves the exercise of discretion and judgment with regards to your teammates, time management, and services provided, as a part of your normal routine.

This position will focus on the application of knowledge of electrical, mechanical, hydraulics, pneumatics, and automated equipment, including the utilization of 480vac, 240vac, 120vac, and 48vdc, 24vdc, VFDs, and PLCs (Siemens preferred). The successful candidate will work with the existing Maintenance Shift Supervisor, Resident Site Supervisor, and or Site Maintenance Manager and will work within a team of experienced engineers.
To be a team member providing first class maintenance support to “Our Customer’s” on operation and maintenance of automated storage and retrieval systems, and storage and picking systems installed at “Our Customer’s” locations and surrounding area
Successfully provide proven process experience dealing with electro-mechanical faults and failures and understand the importance of providing preventative maintenance services as part of a resident service and support system
Resident Maintenance Engineer must be safety aware of all activities undertaken, with a track record of owning problems and taking them through to successful completion
The Resident Maintenance Engineer may be required to respond to emergency calls, work weekends, and provide structured planning
Essential Functions and Responsibilities:
Rectify electro-mechanical faults; as well as: resolve PLC related issues, provide expert knowledge and expertise, be the resident expert on this subject matter, and provides assistance to customers sites in assigned area
Respond to emergency calls at customer sites
Safety conscious in all activities
Track and record any and all problems and follow through to a successful completion
In conjunction with the customer’s on-site maintenance department, provide a first-class response to customer, ensuring as far as reasonably practical, a first-time right policy
Provide emergency breakdown and specialized maintenance support
Set-up and calibration of precision automation equipment
Create strong, effective working relationships with our customers and their operational agents to enable Knapp to provide a first-class service
Achieve performance with expected output, speed of response, quality of repair, and standards of workmanship
Training of customer’s maintenance team, as required
Provide experience and expertise in the installation of conveyor and precision automation equipment
Maintain quality of service by ensuring quality communications with customers
Ensure that reports are well-written and legible
Execution of site quality procedures, safety procedures, and any statutory procedures
Regular meetings with the Maintenance Shift Supervisor or Resident Site Manager or Site Maintenance Manager to discuss activities and progress; if there is no on-site accountability, you provide that information to the Resident Business Manager
Providing specialized maintenance service support for the Customer’s installed system
Ensure that all spare parts usage issues are logged appropriately and promptly with the customer and Knapp spare parts team or CMMS, if available
Ensuring proper care and maintenance of the tools and equipment supplied
Provide flexibility and the best use of skills and capabilities
Ensure that all time sheets and documents are correct and legible, with all the correct job numbers entered, and presented to Knapp US on biweekly basis for approval
Provide the mechanical strip-down/re-assembly, basic field wiring, machine calibration, and system testing as needed
Work against a timeframe to complete reactive repairs
Interact with on-site management, keeping them informed of repair and maintenance progression, and addressing their concerns in a professional manner
Show hands-on ownership of issues to achieve a timely resolution
Ability to interpret and work with electrical circuit diagrams
Utilize appropriate health & safety considerations with regard to given tasks and be able to carry out risk assessments
Mechanical aptitude including the ability to read assembly drawings
Operate hand tools and be able to disassemble and assemble parts onto equipment
Ability to follow set-up instructions, assembly drawings, and check lists
Attention to detail and exceptional follow-up skills
Excellent communication and customer service skills for both internal and external customers
Computer literate with basic Microsoft Office skills
Willing to learn and adapt to changing role requirements
Appreciation of cultural diversity
Performs other duties, as required
Qualifications:
Extensive experience in equipment maintenance, modifications, and design preferred
Strong problem-solving capabilities
Ability to provide talent that contributes a unique interpretation or analysis of our systems to our customers
Process-oriented mentality
Theoretical and operational experience in the repair, troubleshooting of PLC-based machinery, and control systems
Network equipment interfaces a plus
Hands-on, team oriented, and committed to improvement processes
Experience in reducing costs through processes and efficiencies
Strong verbal and written communication skills
Working Conditions and Environment:
Weekends and overtime, if required
Occasional travel required (must have passport)
Professional office etiquette is required at all times
Physical requirements may be: Sitting, squatting, walking, reaching out to arm’s length, reaching over-head, lifting between 50-100 pounds, and reading
Education & Experience:
Degree in Electrical and or Mechanical Engineering or equivalent work experience
3 - 8 years of progressive experience as Maintenance Repairman, Maintenance Electrician, Machine Repairman, or Industrial Maintenance Engineering, including electrical, mechanical, pneumatic, and hydraulic systems
Bilingual (English/Spanish) and or (English/German) preferred, but not required
We offer:
Premium Health Insurance
Dental Insurance
Paid Vacation & 9 Holidays
Retirement Plan
Flexible Spending Account
Life Insurance
Short & Long Term Disability
Employee Assistance Program
Company Events & outings",3.4,"Knapp
3.4","Pedricktown, NJ",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1952,Company - Private,Logistics & Supply Chain,Transportation & Logistics,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
201,Data Engineer - Azure,$93k-$165k (Glassdoor Est.),"sdg is a high performance software community. sdg consultants build and deliver custom software for some of the largest and most recognizable local and national brands. In this role you will be asked to leverage your current skills and learn new ones. Working in over 400 different technologies and continually learning together, you can expect a one-of-a-kind and award winning work experience.

If you have proven enterprise experience working with Microsoft Azure in a handful of the following, we want to hear from you.

•Design and development of relational and non-relational databases, data warehouses and data lakes
oAzure SQL DB, Azure DB for MySQL, Azure DB for PostgresSQL
oAzure Cosmos DB
oAzure Data Lake Storage, Azure Synapse Analytics
oAzure DB Migration Service
•Development, monitoring and maintenance of data integration and processing tools and pipelines
oAzure Data Factory
•Design and testing of machine learning and data science tools, including the building and deployment of data models
oAzure Databricks, Azure HDInsight
•Implementation of high-capacity, real-time data streaming technologies
oAzure Stream Analytics, Azure Data Lake Analytics
•Data analysis and visualization tools
oAzure PowerBI
oAzure Data Lake Analytics
•Leveraging non-database data storage alternatives to maximize performance, costs and data quality
oAzure Blob Storage
oAzure Cache for Redis
oAzure Search
•Familiarity with security and security policies within Azure

bonus experience

Bachelor's Degree in related field or equivalent work experience
Success working on high performance teams
Delivered solutions in large scale enterprise environments
Prior consulting or professional services experience
Motivated to continually improve your craft, sharing and learning every day
Exceptional integrity with the desire to create the best possible customer outcomes

what's in it for you?

Full-time salaried position with sdg, a 10-time Best Place to Work
Engaged teammates who care about quality solutions
Challenging and rewarding work with great customers
Abundant opportunities to give back to the community
A company proven to make decisions based on its core values
A true stake in success as sdg is an ESOP, 100% employee owned
Year-round technology and social events to stay sharp and have fun
Membership in the best technology community in the Twin Cities",4.9,"Solution Design Group
4.9","Golden Valley, MN",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1989,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
202,Software Engineer,$76k-$134k (Glassdoor Est.),"McLean 2 (19052), United States of America, McLean, Virginia

Software Engineer

Do you love building and pioneering in the technology space? Do you enjoy solving complex business problems in a fast-paced, collaborative, inclusive, and iterative delivery environment? At Capital One, you'll be part of a big group of makers, breakers, doers and disruptors, who love to solve real problems and meet real customer needs.

We are seeking Software Engineers who are passionate about marrying data with emerging technologies to join our team. As a Capital One Software Engineer, you’ll have the opportunity to be on the forefront of driving a major transformation within Capital One. Learn more about #lifeatcapitalone and our commitment to diversity & inclusion by jumping to slides 25-40 on our Corporate Social Responsibility Report.

What You’ll Do:

Collaborate with and across Agile teams to design, develop, test, implement, and support technical solutions in full-stack development tools and technologies

Work with a team of developers with deep experience in machine learning, distributed microservices, and full stack systems

Share your passion for staying on top of tech trends, experimenting with and learning new technologies, participating in internal & external technology communities, and mentoring other members of the engineering community

Collaborate with digital product managers, and deliver robust cloud-based solutions that drive powerful experiences to help millions of Americans achieve financial empowerment

Work with cloud native stack, build on AWS, use technologies like Kubernetes and Serverless

Basic Qualifications:

Bachelor’s Degree

At least 2 years of experience in software engineering

Preferred Qualifications:

Master's Degree

2+ years of experience in Agile practices

1+ years of experience with AWS, GCP, Microsoft Azure, or another public cloud service

4+ years of experience in at least one of the following: Java, Scala, Python, Go, Javascript/TypeScript, Angular/React.js, or Node.js

2+ years of experience working with big data technologies (e.g. Hadoop, Spark, Presto)

2+ years of experience working on streaming data applications (e.g. Kafka, Kinesis, Flink, or Spark Streaming)

4+ years of experience in open source frameworks

At this time, Capital One will not sponsor a new applicant for employment authorization for this position.",4.0,"Capital One
4.0","McLean, VA",-1,10000+ Employees,1994,Company - Public,Banks & Credit Unions,Finance,$10+ billion (USD),-1
203,Cloud Software Engineer - Precision Medicine,-1,"Boston Lighthouse Innovations is a spin-out of the Massachusetts General Hospital. We are backed by one largest investment banks in the world as part of a global precision medicine project. We are poised for a period of rapid growth and it is a great time to join our team.

Boston Lighthouse Innovations builds innovative software for precision medicine diagnostics. We are one of the first solutions developing machine learning models used in everyday clinical practice. You will work closely with a cross-disciplinary team of clinicians, pathologists, bioinformaticians, data scientists and software engineers to build big-data integration systems and decision support tools. As part of our team, you will develop innovative, data-driven solutions which directly impact patient care. We use version control, conduct code reviews, practice unit testing/ci testing, and use the latest open-source libraries and tools.
PRINCIPAL RESPONSIBILITIES: *
· Cloud Systems and application development

· Cloud Architecture planning and design
SKILLS/ABILITIES: *
· Familiarity with Docker, HELM + Kubernetes

· Experience with HTML5 & JavaScript (ES6)

· Familiarity with React, Redux, D3.js, Jest, NPM + Webpack

· Experience with SQL (MySQL, Postgres, MariaDB) & NoSQL DBs (MongoDB)

· Experience with Azure a plus

· Significant experience in computer programming (*Python*, Java, C++ or eq.)

· Knowledge of OOP, Data Structures, Search Algorithms

· Experience with unit testing/ci testing, code refactoring, version control (GIT), & release techniques

· Familiarity with Linux & Bash

· Familiarity with REST APIs (GraphQL a plus)
Ability to work in a highly collaborative and intellectually challenging environment
Excellent oral and written communication skills
QUALIFICATIONS / APPLICATION: *
· Minimum Bachelor’s degree in computer science, mathematics, physical sciences, or similar

· Authorized to work in the U.S.

· Please submit a single formatted word processing document including cover letter, resume, and salary requirements.

· Recent graduates MUST include GPA
WORKING at Boston Lighthouse: *
· Our offices are located at Cambridge, MA (Alewife). Working remote is acceptable during Covid-19.
For more information: **www.bostonlighthouse.us*
Boston Lighthouse provides competitive benefits, health insurance, and 401K plan and is an equal opportunity employer.*
Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $70,000.00 - $270,000.00 per year

Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Experience:
relevant: 1 year (Preferred)
This Job Is Ideal for Someone Who Is:
Dependable -- more reliable than spontaneous
Adaptable/flexible -- enjoys doing work that requires frequent shifts in direction
Detail-oriented -- would rather focus on the details of work than the bigger picture
Achievement-oriented -- enjoys taking on challenges, even if they might fail
Autonomous/Independent -- enjoys working with little direction
Innovative -- prefers working in unconventional ways or on tasks that require creativity
This Job Is:
A job for which military experienced candidates are encouraged to apply
A “Fair Chance” job (you or the employer follow Fair Chance hiring practices when performing background checks)
A good fit for applicants with gaps in their resume, or who have been out of the workforce for the past 6 months or more
A good job for someone just entering the workforce or returning to the workforce with limited experience and education
A job for which all ages, including older job seekers, are encouraged to apply
A job for which people with disabilities are encouraged to apply
Company's website:
https://www.bostonlighthouse.us/
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",-1,Boston Lighthouse Innovations,"Cambridge, MA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
204,Engineer,-1,"Who Are We?

QinetiQ Inc. is a leading innovator with over 25 years of experience rapidly developing advanced C5ISR sensor solutions and is a renowned world leader in robotics and autonomy.

The combined QinetiQ U.S. business unit brings capabilities across the full lifecycle of technology development from applied research and development to rapid prototyping, testing, fielding, and sustainment. Our expertise with unmanned platforms, broad sensing modalities, and cross-domain interoperability ensures that we deliver integrated solutions for Warfighter dominance in all phases of combat.

We are a world-class team of professionals who deliver next generation technology and products in robotic and autonomous platforms and systems, ground systems, soldier systems, maritime systems, airborne sensors and payloads, processing and exploitation capabilities, and integrated C2 solutions. Much of our work contributes to innovative research in ﬁelds such as sensor science, signal processing, data fusion, artiﬁcial intelligence (AI), machine learning (ML), and augmented reality (AR).

Our customers are always our number one priority and we consistently deliver Mission-Led Innovation to empower and protect our Defense and Security forces in the U.S. and abroad.

Your Contribution to Our Mission:
This position provides Engineer support services to the Naval Surface Warfare Center, Dahlgren Division (NSWCDD), Platform Integration (H40) Division. The Unmanned & Expeditionary Weapon Systems division designs, develops, and integrates safe, innovative, and effective weapon control systems, detection systems, sensory, and weapon systems onto manned, unmanned, land, air, and sea platforms for the warfighter to include lethal and non-lethal weapons, guidance and control, unmanned and autonomous systems, advanced sensory, and weapons effectiveness for surface warfare, maritime operations, expeditionary warfare and special operations.
The position supports all technical and engineering stages of development, test, integration, and fielding of safe and innovative weapon control systems, detection systems support, advanced weapon systems support, autonomous system support, mechanical and electrical technician support towards assembly and integration. Other duties indirectly supporting these efforts include providing business operational and financial reporting support, writing technical documentation, maintaining technical databases, and editorial support of technical publications.
Duties and Responsibilities:
conduct system, subsystem, component performance, and effectiveness improvement studies.
perform obsolescence analyses with recommendations for replacement components, parts, and systems.
provide subject matter expertise to investigate system, subsystem, and component level failures during design, integration, test, manufacture, and end-use to provide recommendations for corrective actions.
analyze deficiencies discovered during testing, outlined in production reports, maintenance reports, and user feedback trouble reports, to provide recommendations on corrective actions.
perform producibility trade studies and analyze production processes to: determine the most cost-effective fabrication/manufacturing process; resolve a failure observed during testing attributed to manufacture; and reduce manufacture process technology risk.
develop and generate assembly procedures and analyze approaches and generate plans to validate fabrication/manufacturing processes.
develop and generate user operator manuals, preventive maintenance schedule manuals, and installation and removal procedures.
develop and generate demilitarization plans.
provide subject matter expertise to develop new and modify existing Production Automated Test Equipment (ATE) hardware and software that can successfully run Factory Acceptance Tests (FAT) for USN tactical electronics hardware.
To Land This Job, You Need:
A Bachelor of Science (BS) degree from an accredited college or university in an engineering, scientific, or technical discipline.
Three (3) years professional technical experience which includes at least one (1) year specialized experience performing mechanical, electrical, or computer engineering.
Clearance Level Must Currently Possess:

DOD Secret

Why QinetiQ Inc.?
Your work will contribute to the protection of American Warfighters and Security Forces.
Opportunity to work with cutting edge technology.
Extensive opportunities for continuous learning, professional growth and advancement.
We only hire the best! No matter if you are entry or senior level, you will have the opportunity learn from some of the best in the industry.
We have fun! We regularly have company events, from luncheons and costume contests to golf tournaments.
We care about YOU and YOUR FAMILY. We offer competitive benefits and health insurance options.
No One Has Time for Long Job Applications!

We completely understand. That is why we have made the application process easy. We promise. This will be simple.

Accessibility/Accommodation:

If because of a medical condition or disability, you need a reasonable accommodation for any part of the employment process, please send an e-mail to staffing@us.qinetiq.com or call (540) 658-2720 Opt 4 and let us know the nature of your request and your contact information.

QinetiQ Inc. is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, age, color, religion, creed, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or protected Veteran status.",2.9,"QinetiQ North America
2.9","Dahlgren, VA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1956,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
205,Software Engineer,$47k-$102k (Glassdoor Est.),"JOB TITLE: Software Engineer

PROJECT OVERVIEW:

Decisive Analytics a WBB Company has a Software Engineer opening in Arlington, VA.

The Machine Learning Competency Sector develops a wide range of machine learning capabilities addressing our customers challenges, such as: natural language processing, automated imagery and video analytics, intelligent databases, and wargaming artificial intelligence. We are seeking a Software Engineer experienced in building data processing and machine learning pipelines. Successful candidates will have the education and interest in developing such algorithms with the demonstrated potential of working in all stages of the product development life cycle, from requirements definition through system design, development and deployment.

Candidates should have strong software development skills, with some an interest in machine learning. In this role you will contribute to the development of state of the art machine learning systems and with lead the transition of these technologies to our government and commercial customers.

JOB DESCRIPTION AND RESPONSIBILITIES:
Using your creative and technical skills, design and develop software systems incorporating cutting edge machine learning algorithms in Python, Java, or other languages as appropriate
Engage in full stack development of web applications including front end code running in browsers and thick clients as well as back end application framework APIs and database technologies
Develop portable and scalable implementations of machine learning algorithms and data processing pipelines
Deliver software using continuous integration/continuous deployment tools and technologies such as Git, Jenkins, Maven, and Docker
Design, develop and deploy modular, reusable and scalable applications
Ensure efficient delivery of capabilities using industry standard agile processes
Collaborate with co-workers, leadership, and clients to understand client problems, identify solutions, and demonstrate their software solutions
REQUIRED SKILLS AND QUALIFICATIONS:
Must be a US Citizen to be eligible to obtain a DoD security clearance
Bachelors degree or higher in Computer Science, Engineering, Mathematics, or a related discipline from an accredited university
0-2 years of software engineering experience
Interest in developing machine learning algorithms in Python or Java.
Familiarity with DevOps tools such as Jenkins and Docker
Working knowledge of version control systems such as Git and bug tracking tools such as JIRA
Excellent verbal and written communication skills
Strong team player who can effectively contribute to project development
DESIRED SKILLS AND QUALIFICATIONS:
Bachelors degree or higher in Computer Science, Engineering, Mathematics, or a related discipline from an accredited university
Experience with or interest in TensorFlow, PyTorch, scikit-learn, CUDA, OpenCV
Experience with with or interest in JakartaEE, Wildfly/Thorntail, Flask/Bottle, Angular
Experience with with or interest in Hadoop/Spark, Accumulo, MongoDB, Postgres
WORK LOCATION: Crystal City, VA

TRAVEL: 10%

KEY WORDS: Machine learning, artificial intelligence, python, java #MON

WBB is a technical and management consulting company that provides innovative products and services that solve government and commercial customers toughest problems. For more than 30 years, WBB has set the standard for excellence in consulting services, while providing its employees with an outstanding work environment with ample opportunities for growth and success. WBB continues to enjoy impressive growth, which is directly attributed to the companys hiring practice of always hiring the very best professionals from government, military and industry.

We are proud of our diverse environment and are an Equal Opportunity Employer. WBB is committed to a policy of equal employment opportunity. WBB participates in E-Verify.

WBB does not accept unsolicited resumes through or from search firms or staffing agencies. All unsolicited resumes will be considered the property of WBB and WBB will not be obligated to pay a placement fee.",4.1,"Whitney, Bradley and Brown
4.1","Arlington, VA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1981,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
206,Data Scientist / Quantitative Research,-1,"Overview

PicnicHealth is all about making medical records easy to access and using data to power the next frontier of medical research. We work directly with patients to give them the only tool anywhere that truly provides all of their medical records from any doctor or healthcare system in the USin an easy-to-use, secure online dashboard. Not only that, but patients can choose to contribute their incredibly important data to scientific research, which helps researchers accelerate breakthroughs in care. To date we've helped tens of thousands of patients, partnered with some of the world's largest biopharma companies, and raised more than $35M from Felicis Ventures, Amplify Partners, Foresite Capital, Refactor Capital, and Y Combinator.

It's an exciting time to join the PicnicHealth team - we just announced our Series B raise and are growing quickly in revenue, partnerships, and people. We 3x'd our ARR two years in a row now and on track to continue this trend, building partnerships with over a dozen Life Sciences groups, including 3 of the top 6 Biopharma firms in the US. We're going through a period of hyper-growth - we tripled the size of the team in the last 18 months and we're looking to at least double over the next year. We have a collaborative and engaged team culture that is mission driven and excited about the technology we're building and real solutions we're offering patients.

The Opportunity

At PicnicHealth, Data Scientists on the Quantitative Research team are responsible for translating, assessing, and augmenting our Real World Data (RWD) to develop actionable insights and evidence for our life science partners. We're seeking an experienced data scientist to join the team to deliver bespoke analytics, create internal and customer tools, and develop predictive models to improve our research data product.

As a Data Scientist on the Quantitative Science team you will:
Use PicnicHealth's large, multi-disease multi-modal real-world dataset to answer critical clinical questions;
Become a subject matter expert on our data and its capabilities. Lead technical initiatives that further our understanding of RWD and methods to generate real-world evidence;
Transform real-world clinical data into actionable insights using data analytics, robust statistical methods, and compelling data visualizations accessible to a wide range of end-users;
Work with a cross-functional team to define and clarify analytic requirements, develop analysis plans, ensure data quality standards, and create publication-ready methods and results;
Conduct research to assess our data quality, identifying gaps and proposing solutions.
Develop and manage relationships with external partners (including life science companies, regulatory agencies, academic institutions, and health technology assessment bodies) to advance the integration of our analytic products, including through peer reviewed scientific publications.
Must haves:
At least 4 years of industry experience in a quantitative/statistical position in the life sciences industry
You hold a degree in a quantitative discipline, such as biostatistics, epidemiology, applied statistics, health economics, or a related discipline
Advanced experience with R (tidyverse) and preferably have built an R package before
You have some training in statistics
You are familiar with command line tools
You have experience working with medical data, longitudinal EMR data, and/or data ontologies (OMOP, etc.)
You are an excellent communicator, both oral and written, and can effectively adapt your tone, content, and approach to diverse audiences
Ability to work independently, and experience leading the development of analytical features
You love working with data and have experience exploring it with a critical and thoughtful eye
You are self-motivated, flexible, proactive, and professional
You enjoy coming up with elegant and innovative solutions to challenging problems
You know how to balance attention to detail with execution against tight timelines. You are passionate about our patient-centric mission to improve healthcare for all
You'd be an amazing candidate if you had some/any of the following:
You've built an interactive data visualization app using the shiny package
You have advanced experience with with SQL
You have strong experience in statistics or biostatistical methods
You have a track record of producing scientific publications
Why join PicnicHealth?

At PicnicHealth you get to solve real problems with real solutions, great tech, and great people.

You also get:
Competitive salary
Comprehensive benefits including Health, Dental, Vision
Flexible time off
401k plan
Parental leave
Free PicnicHealth account
Equipment and internet funds while we're working remotely during COVID-19
Due to COVID-19, currently all roles are remote until at least until January 2021.

Equal Opportunity Statement

PicnicHealth is committed to promoting an inclusive work environment free of discrimination and harassment. We value a diverse and balanced team where everyone can belong.",4.6,"PicnicHealth
4.6","San Francisco, CA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2014,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
207,Infrastructure Support Engineer,$37k-$67k (Glassdoor Est.),"Introduction

ASML brings together the most creative minds in science and technology to develop lithography machines that are key to producing faster, cheaper, more energy-efficient microchips. We design, develop, integrate, market and service these advanced machines, which enable our customers - the world’s leading chipmakers - to reduce the size and increase the functionality of their microchips, which in turn leads to smaller, more powerful consumer electronics. Our main headquarters are located in Veldhoven, the Netherlands, and we also have 18 office locations around the United States- including main offices in Wilton, CT, Chandler, AZ, San Jose, CA and San Diego, CA.

Job Mission

As an Infra Support Engineer you are the point of contact for the ASML Customer Support application/infra user community (when the knowledge base and key users cannot support them). While continuously expanding your general knowledge and expertise on our total support portfolio, you either resolve issues immediately or you escalate to an expert within our team or to other service providers. In addition, you will also be responsible to execute one or more expert roles.

Our department covers worldwide functional support (24x5hr) for all off-scanner Applications and Infrastructure. These are used by the Customer Support (CS) work force while performing their job in serving our Customer needs. Our mission is to facilitate and improve the productivity for the users of the before mentioned applications and infrastructure in order to meet ASML’s obligations.

We are located in Asia, US and Europe.We work together by means of knowledge bases (Wiki), key users, a call management system (Service Now), and work instructions. We maintain closerelationships with the key user organizations, internal suppliers and project organizations to drive the sustainability and availability of CS used off-system applications (e.g. Coach, Maintenance Manager) and technical infrastructure (e.g. BRES, EPS), and will offer CS users functional support, process escalations, and will drive issues to closure, freeing the CS engineer to perform the invaluable task of pleasing our customers.

ASML is a world leader in the manufacture of advanced technology systems for the semiconductor industry.ASML’s corporate headquarters is in Veldhoven, the Netherlands. Manufacturing sites and research and development facilities are located in Connecticut, California and the Netherlands. Technology development centers and training facilities are located in the United States, Japan, Korea, the Netherlands, and Taiwan. Additionally, ASML provides optimal service to its customers via over 50 sales and service organizations in 16 countries. Founded in the Netherlands in 1984, the company is publicly traded on Euronext Amsterdam and NASDAQ under the symbol ASML.

Job Description

This position has flexibility to work out of our Wilton, CT or Chandler, AZ or Hillsboro, OR offices.Your main responsibilities are to ensure that support calls are picked up and handled to the satisfaction of our end-users and within given KPI’s, to update the knowledge bases, participate in user acceptance tests and to administrate support requests in Service Now. Working hours need to fit the time window for which the USA team is responsible. To cover our support responsibilities, participation in a ‘standby’ duty schedule might be part of the job.

Within the scope of our team responsibility, as a generalist, you:

Answer questions of CS engineers.
Prioritize, diagnose, solve and/or escalate issues.
Follow up with CS engineers to ensure that issues have been resolved.
Interface with application experts, business application owners and service providers (e.g. IT, development).
Administrate call progress in Service Now.
Align with CS engineers through a series of actions (mainly by email/telephone/MS TEAMS).
Support the roll-out of new/changed applications.
Establish a good working relationship with CS engineers (especially within your continent).
Train users.
Execute functional maintenance tasks.
Document internal procedures and work instructions.
Participate in the emergency phone system duty schedule.
Will perform the needed travel for training (giving/receiving), aligning, executing work at local office or customers premises.

Within the scope of our team responsibility, as an expert role, in addition to the above, you:

Gather CS requirements (that are input for the CS roadmaps and projects).
Align with CS local offices and local CS management, including making arrangements on beta-testing (e.g. User Acceptance Tests).
Test and roll-out improvements.
Participate in projects that develop new and/or affect existing functionality. Your primary responsibility is to provide the knowledge on the CS way of working and the functional support needs such that the project results will seamlessness integrate with the needs of the users. Your input will safeguard our team requirements with respect to serviceability and maintainability of the application/infrastructure.
Education

Position requires a bachelor degree in an engineering field or equivalent experience.

Experience
Analytical trouble shooting abilities.
2 years or more experience working in an application support role in an international setting, preferably in a high tech industry with worldwide coverage.
Knowledge of the ASML way of working in general and the CS way of working specifically is of added value to this position.
Knowledge of business information systems as used by CS or able obtain that knowledge quickly.
Personal skills
Strong communication skills in English (both verbal and written).
Driven, analytical and a team player.
Customer focused, service, support and result driven.
Capable of dealing with a very broad range of (technical) subjects.
Ability to switch to from ‘firefighting’ to ‘helicopter view’ easily.
Continuous improvement mindset.
Able to drive, steer and convince others (influencing without power).
Able to write clear requirement specifications and application documentation.
Able to build strong networks.
Cultural awareness.
Ability to quickly master the business context of automation tools.
Willingness to travel (both foreign and domestic), can be ~25% of the time.
Flexibility in work hours to secure worldwide coverage/support.
Context of the position

The physical demands described here are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of this job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.

While performing the duties of this job, the employee routinely is required to sit; walk; talk; hear; use hands to keyboard, finger, handle, and feel; stoop, kneel, crouch, twist, reach, and stretch.
The employee is occasionally required to move around the campus.
The employee may occasionally lift and/or move up to 20 pounds.
May require travel dependent on company needs.
Specific vision abilities required by this job include close vision, color vision, peripheral vision, depth perception, and ability to adjust focus.
Can work under deadlines.
The environment generally is moderate in temperature and noise level.
Must be able to read and interpret data, information, and documents.
Can observe and respond to people and situations and interact with others encountered in the course of work.
Can learn and apply new information or skills.
Other information

The sector Customer Support (CS) is responsible for the maintenance, repair and continuous improvement of ASML systems at customer locations, as well as transferring all relevant knowledge and supporting the customer in the use of these systems in their production process.

The CS Infrastructure Support, Infra Support Engineer US reports to the Team Leader CS Infrastructure Support USA. Our team is part of the CS Engineering department and we have people located in Veldhoven (HQ and EMEA support), Taiwan/S Korea (APAC support), and the USA (AMER support).

This position will include travel (~25%) e.g. for training, alignment and roll-out purposes. Drivers licensee and Passport required.
In the (near) future our department might expand the 24x5hr coverage to 24x7hr coverage.
Position may require the ability to support shift based working schedules.
Position will require periodic/planned on-call standby service for the weekends.

EOE AA M/F/Veteran/Disability",3.9,"ASML
3.9","Wilton, CT",-1,10000+ Employees,1984,Company - Public,Electrical & Electronic Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$5 to $10 billion (USD),-1
208,Sewing Machine Operator,$12-$22 Per Hour(Glassdoor Est.),"Apply

Description

""Lend your insights and experience to produce innovative products that truly improve people's quality of life.""

United Safety and Survivability Corporation is committed to delivering the most innovative and reliable safety and survivability solutions our customers can trust to protect life and property. As the global leader in our industry, we push boundaries by utilizing innovation to highly engineer and produce the next generation of safety and survivability technologies.

At United Safety we are solving our industry's most important problems with talented individuals who share our passion to change the world. Our culture is fast-paced, energetic and innovative. We work to build an inclusive environment in which everyone, regardless of gender, race, religion, age, or background, can do their best work. We are fully committed to continuous growth and advancement; we will reinvest profits and resources into our employees, our processes and product innovation.

Job Title: Sewing Machine Operator

Department: Cut & Sew

Classification: Non-exempt

Summary:As a Sewing Machine Operator at United Safety, your responsibility is prioritizing industrial sewing for vinyl/canvas/leather materials. This role focuses on reinforcing, or decorating materials by operating an industrial sewing machine. You will work in a brand new, light-filled, state of the art manufacturing facility, together with a team of highly motivated and skilled team members; to build our award-winning transportation seating.

Responsibilities - As a Sewing Machine Operator at United Safety, you will:

• Sew all parts within the timeline set and to customer satisfaction, while using a variety of sewing tools and equipment.

• Select the equipment necessary for the sewing process including setting up the machine and the peripherals.

• Properly use sewing tools, which includes; scissors, seam rippers and measuring devices.

• Pay attention to details throughout all stages of work to meet quality objectives and to eliminate scrap (waste), quality non-compliance and the need for rework.

• Monitor machine operation and inspect the product after it has been finished.

• Adapt as the external environment and organization evolves.

• Be constantly conscientious about workplace safety; observing all the company rules and safety practices.

• Adhere to all company policies and procedures.

• Check your own work, ensure all aspects of the sewing task are complete and correct.

• Provide team with sufficient information and support to accomplish team goals.

• Maintain an organized & clean workstation and work to help maintain the rest of the facility organized and clean as well; leaving each area better than it was found.

• Understand that all team members will need to pitch in, in other areas, as needed to help meet our goals and get excited to do so.

• Perform additional duties as assigned.

Requirements

You’re a great fit for this position if this describes you;

• You possess a high school diploma or GED.

• Proven experience operating a sewing machine, preferably in an industrial environment.

• 1-2 years of recent work experience on industrial sewing machines (single or double needle) is a plus.

• Familiar with seam allowances.

• Capable of construction with a sample for a guide.

• Strong attention to detail.

• Able to accurately measure, read a ruler and use a calculator.

• Perform basic shop math calculations (adding, subtracting, dividing, multiplying, measuring and converting decimals) is something you are experienced in.

• Experience with a multi-needle embroidery machine desirable, but not required.

• Exceptional motor coordination and can easily use a variety of tools in a safe manner.

• You are able to follow verbal and written instructions, directions and other communication in English.

• Perform basic shop math calculations (adding, subtracting, dividing, multiplying, measuring and converting decimals) is something you are experienced in.

• Able to lift up to 10 lbs. regularly.

• You have some experience reading simple blueprints & read drawings.

• Able to perform in a fast-paced, team environment, under pressure with time constrains while responding and adapting to change favorably and quickly.

• Safety is at the forefront of your mind when you are working and you gladly follow all of our safety policies to promote a safe working environment at United Safety.

• You bring with you a positive attitude and the ability to work cohesively in a team environment.

• Help United Safety operate effectively by adhering to United Safety’s attendance and punctuality standards and does not burden co-workers and supervisors unfairly with unnecessary and unplanned absences and lateness.

• Understand that you are part of a growing company, you have no concerns with and able to work extended hours/over-time as needed as well as some Saturdays to support that growth.

Here at United Safety, we embrace the core values that make us great.
P A S S I O N to build the future together.
People Attitude Service Safety Innovation One Company Nimble

People: We are United Safety’s most important asset. We are dedicated, supported and empowered to make decisions. We work ethically, with honor and integrity and do what needs to be done, when it needs to be done.

Attitude: We believe in the power of a positive mindset. We attack challenges with optimism and adjust to change with an enthusiastic team approach. We embrace diversity and treat everyone with respect.

Service: We take pride in treating all customers the way we want to be treated. We go above and beyond to ensure that our internal and external customers receive world class customer service that exceeds expectations.

Safety: We work to overcome obstacles, achieve goals and provide high quality products that improve safety and survivability for our customers. Together, we share the responsibility and the authority to actively create and support a safe work environment that produces the highest quality goods and services.

Innovation: We are driven by innovative technology. We are empowered to creatively and resourcefully overcome challenges. We strive to be a strategic partner for our customers by developing creative products that provide solutions.

One Company: We are One Company, One Team. We work together, grow together and celebrate together. We believe in our team and are dedicated to our collective corporate goals. We are committed to the continuous growth of self, United Safety and each other.

Nimble: We are flexible and respond to changing customer and business needs with focus and speed. We are driven by our continual quest for value creation. We listen, learn, adapt and evolve.

This position description is intended to guide the activities of the person in this role. It is not intended to limit the thinking and creativity of the person in this role, nor is it intended that this description represents all the work that may be required of a person in this position.

United Safety is an Equal Opportunity Employer",4.1,"United Safety & Survivability Corporation
4.1","Exton, PA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1984,Company - Private,Miscellaneous Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
209,Research Engineer,-1,"As the world’s leader in location assistance technology, we are growing. Do you have experience and passion for GNSS, high precision positioning and emerging location technologies? Come join our team!
Location. Enlightened.™ Rx Networks is a leader in location technology. We help shape the mobile location industry and empower devices to get fast and accurate locations in more places than originally possible. We ensure device manufacturers and mobile operators deliver the best possible user location experience. Every day, nearly two billion devices rely on us for accurate assistance for positioning. Along the way, we’ve become very good at dealing with massive amounts of data and deploying cloud-based, high-availability solutions. We’re naturally proud of this. But really, we’re just getting started!
With the growth of autonomous navigation and driving, unmanned vehicles and IoT – the Internet of Things – the need for high-quality assistance data and data management is only growing. If you like large scale technical challenges and working in a diverse environment with a passionate team, then we should talk…


Environment:
We empower our employees to lead, innovate and create. Here’s what our employees enjoy:
High autonomy
Ownership of work and flexibility
Challenging work with immediate impact on customers
Work/life balance and remote work benefit
Collaboration and open communication
Employees’ voice matters
Culture of respect, trust, non-hierarchical and learning
Invest in employee growth (training and promoting from within)
Great downtown Vancouver office location near a major transit hub
Employee lounge and a rooftop overlooking the city (BBQ’s, big screen TV and Foosball)
Competitive total compensation and benefits

Position Summary:
As part of the Research & Development group at Rx Networks, the successful candidate will develop state-of-art algorithms in A-GNSS, high precision positioning area, and improves existing positioning algorithms.
Accountabilities:
Responsible for research of Rx Networks key short and long-term projects and products
Reporting to the Principal Engineer, support the company’s overall strategies and goals
Research, optimize, evaluate, analyze and modify existing location algorithms for improvement working collaboratively with teams
Develop and debug MATLAB scripts / C++ & Java code
Conducts research within their own field of expertise. Applies scientific methodology and principles to new products and ideas
Keep apprised of developments in Global Navigation Satellite Systems and share findings
Brings and maintains a deep knowledge within their own field of expertise and may continue to contribute to the academic community through publications and conference presentations.
Attend workshops/conferences as appropriate, as well as learning independently from available literature
Skills and Qualifications:
Master's or Ph.D. in Geomatics Engineering, Geodesy, Electrical Engineering, Computer Science or related field with 3 to 5 years of experience in GNSS industry or research
Strong background in GNSS technologies, Positioning, Navigation and location-based services, Estimation for Navigation
Experience with MATLAB® or equivalent
Hands-on GNSS data processing experience with standard formats and interfaces (RINEX, RTCM, etc.)
A solid understanding of product lifecycles, software development, software testing, and release practices in a mobile client-server environment
Working Conditions:
This is a full-time position based in Vancouver or remote work within a 4 hour time zone from Vancouver.",4.0,"Rx Networks
4.0",Remote,-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$5 to $10 million (USD),-1
210,"Data Scientist, Product Development",$55k-$91k (Glassdoor Est.),"Spokeo is a people search engine that both enlightens and empowers our customers. With over 12 billion records and 18 million visitors per month, we reconnect friends, reunite families, prevent fraud, and more.

We are looking for a Data Scientist, Product Development to join us in Pasadena, CA, and help us turn our vast repository of data into usable information leveraging solutions that include matching techniques, machine learning, and graph theory to resolve entities across disparate data sets. Ultimately, these entity relationships will be used to build models that will be incorporated into the Spokeo product suite. This is part of Spokeo's Data Operations Team and is not an analytics-based role.

Responsibilities:
Profiling, processing, and evaluating large structured and unstructured data sets.
Developing data-driven models.
Data mining using state-of-the-art methods.
Collaborating with product and engineering to understand the needs of the company and assisting with the development of innovative solutions to meet those needs.
Productionalizing and maintaining algorithms primarily focused on entity resolution, linking, and scoring.
Creating automated anomaly detection systems and quality assurance metrics to constantly track performance.
Keeping up to date with the latest technology trends.
Performing Ad-hoc analysis and presenting results.
Requirements:
Degree in Machine Learning, Computer Science, Engineering, Physics, Statistics, Applied Math, Operations Research, or other quantitative fields.
Minimum of 3 years of working experience in analytics, data mining, data visualization, and/or predictive modeling.
Proficiency in working with statistical tools (such as R, SAS), database query languages (SQL), and scripting languages (Python required).
Experience with Hadoop and NoSQL related technologies such as MapReduce, Spark, Hive, ElasticSearch, and DynamoDB.
Comfortable training and communicating complex ideas to non-technical audiences.
Demonstrated ability to lead and execute projects from start to finish.
Privacy Notice for Candidates: https://www.spokeo.com/recruiting-policy

Spokeo is an equal opportunity employer. Applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, sexual orientation, gender identity, disability or protected veteran status. Spokeo fosters a business culture where ideas and decisions from all people help us grow, innovate, create the best products and be relevant in a rapidly changing world.

Recruiters or staffing agencies: Spokeo is not obligated to compensate any external recruiter or search firm who presents a candidate or their resume or profile to a Spokeo employee without 1) a current, fully-executed agreement on file and 2) being assigned to the open position (as a search) via our applicant tracking solution.

]]>",3.7,"Spokeo
3.7","Pasadena, CA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2006,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
211,Data Scientist,$84k-$136k (Glassdoor Est.),"Why choose between doing meaningful work and having a fulfilling life? At MITRE, you can have both. That's because MITRE people are committed to tackling our nation's toughest challenges—and we're committed to the long-term well-being of our employees. MITRE is different from most technology companies. We are a not-for-profit corporation chartered to work for the public interest, with no commercial conflicts to influence what we do. The R&D centers we operate for the government create lasting impact in fields as diverse as cybersecurity, healthcare, aviation, defense, and enterprise transformation. We're making a difference every day—working for a safer, healthier, and more secure nation and world. Our workplace reflects our values. We offer competitive benefits, exceptional professional development opportunities, and a culture of innovation that embraces diversity, inclusion, flexibility, collaboration, and career growth. If this sounds like the choice you want to make, then choose MITRE—and make a difference with us.

As an early to mid-career Data Scientist, you might be wondering what makes MITRE different than other government contractors and consulting firms. Many of our recent hires answered YES to at least one of the questions below:
Are you interested in contributing to technical projects that you can feel passionate about?
Are you tired of having your performance tied to billable hours?
Do you want to work in the public interest?
Do you want to feel like your ideas are valued and you are more than just an FTE?
Are you interested in working for a company where a 40-hour week is the norm and not the exception?
Do you want exceptional benefits, including tuition reimbursement for coursework towards an advance degree in a technical discipline?
The Model-Based Analytics Department is seeking a motivated, creative Data Scientist for MITRE’s Mclean, VA or Bedford, MA locations to apply cutting edge tools and techniques to challenging problems facing the US government. This position offers the opportunity to interact directly with government leaders in a fast-paced and dynamic atmosphere with the ability to make a difference and impact outcomes with solid analysis.

Our employees are expected to work on multiple projects, cross-pollinate good ideas across the government and continuously learn. We are truly an interdisciplinary department that thrives on having a large toolbox to support data- and model-driven decision making. We value people who can bring diverse perspectives.

Our department works to solve problems in the public interest, in partnership with the government. We also actively conduct independent research in areas of interest to our government partners. Once established with a proven track record of quality delivery and consistent performance, members of our department have latitude to select projects

To be successful you will:
Be passionate about applying data analytics to real world problems.
Have an innate curiosity and interest in developing research questions and testing hypotheses with open ended tasking.
Work with a spectrum of government sponsors to gain understanding of their challenges, evaluate possible solutions and conduct insightful, actionable analyses.
Support the development and application of a variety of analytical models to sponsor challenges, with a willingness to adapt and learn.
Present results in an intuitive, actionable manner that can be understood by all sponsor audiences, regardless of technical expertise.
Work on or lead projects throughout their life cycle, including conceptualization, requirements definition, data procurement, development, integration, and socialization.
Required Qualifications

Candidates will be required to have:
Ability to obtain a DoD Secret Clearance.
Significant academic background in a quantitative field such as Operations Research, Computer Science, Mathematics, or Statistics.
Excellent written and verbal communication skills.
Demonstrated ability to manipulate large datasets and perform calculations with at least one modern programming language like Python (utilizing packages like scikit-learn, pandas, or dask), SAS, R (utilizing packages like caret, dplyr, or data.table), Matlab, C++, or Java or a business intelligence platform like Tableau, Looker, or QlikView.
Experience visualizing multi-dimensional data using tools like Tableau, ggplot2, Plotly, matplotlib, seaborn, or D3.js.
Ability to apply, modify and formulate algorithms and processes to solve challenging problems.
Familiarity with working in cloud-based environments like Amazon Web Services, Google Cloud, or Microsoft Azure.
Demonstrated experience working on or leading customer facing engagements emphasizing data analytics.
Preferred Qualifications

Preference will be given to candidates with desired experience including:
Advanced degree in Operations Research, Computer Science, Mathematics, Statistics, or other related technical field of study.
Experience leading or conducting research.
Experience designing data science tasking and/or leading a team of data scientists.
Experience applying various machine learning approaches (e.g., random forest, neural networks, support vector machines).
Prior experience working with databases (e.g., PostgreSQL, Oracle, MySQL, MongoDB, Neo4j).
Experience using version control (e.g., Git, Mercurial, SVN) to support collaborative development.
Experience utilizing notebooks (e.g., Jupyter, R Markdown, Zepellin),
Prior experience developing interactive data visualizations using open source web technologies (e.g., Angular, Vue, React, D3.js) or other frameworks (e.g., Shiny, Plotly Dash).
Prior experience developing data-intensive full stack containerized web applications using Node.js, Flask, Django, or other technologies.
MITRE is proud to be an equal opportunity employer. MITRE recruits, employs, trains, compensates, and promotes regardless of race, religion, color, national origin, gender, gender expression, sexual identity, disability, age, veteran status, and other protected status.

MITRE intends to maintain a website that is fully accessible to all individuals. If you are unable to search or apply for jobs and would like to request a reasonable accommodation for any part of MITRE’s employment process, please contact MITRE’s Recruiting Help Line at 703-983-8226 or email at recruitinghelp@mitre.org.

Copyright © 1997-2020, The MITRE Corporation. All rights reserved. MITRE is a registered trademark of The MITRE Corporation. Material on this site may be copied and distributed with permission only.",3.4,"MITRE
3.4","Bedford, MA",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1958,Nonprofit Organization,Federal Agencies,Government,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
212,Machine Learning Research Engineer,$79k-$128k (Glassdoor Est.),"Our Company Changing the world through digital experiences is what Adobe’s all about. We give everyone—from emerging artists to global brands—everything they need to design and deliver exceptional digital experiences! We’re passionate about empowering people to create beautiful and powerful images, videos, and apps, and transform how companies interact with customers across every screen. We’re on a mission to hire the very best and are committed to creating exceptional employee experiences where everyone is respected and has access to equal opportunity. We realize that new ideas can come from everywhere in the organization, and we know the next big idea could be yours! Adobe Research (research.adobe.com) is pleased to announce an opening for a machine learning research engineer in the Creative Intelligence Lab (CIL) in San Francisco, San Jose, or Seattle. Responsibilities include working closely with researchers, engineers, user experience designers, and product managers to build a software platform for generative image modeling, develop prototypes that showcase new research technologies, and to help integrate those technologies into Adobe’s products. Other important responsibilities include keeping up to date with the latest research advances and integrating these into our platform. CIL plays a key role in creating next-generation applications and features in Adobe’s flagship products, including Photoshop, Premiere, After Effects, Illustrator, Lightroom, and Acrobat. We have worked on banner features such as Photoshop’s Content-Aware Fill, Upright Photo, and Generator/Export; Premiere’s Multi-Camera Sync; Audition’s Remix; Illustrator’s latest Pencil tool; and an array of forthcoming mobile apps and desktop features. We’re looking for exceptional candidates with expertise in computer science or software engineering. For this position, we will give preference to candidates with hands-on experience in deep generative models, e.g, GANs, Image-to-Image translation. For successful candidates, nearly all of the following will be true: * You have hands-on experience in deep generative models and image processing. * You have significant experience in building and training robust, complex machine-learning systems. * You are excellent at collaborating with a team to get work done. * You are comfortable both building prototypes from scratch and writing maintainable code inside large existing codebases. * You have strong software development skills that encourage code reuse among researchers. * You can understand and prototype ideas from research papers independently. * You have some experience in developing interactive systems and user interfaces Requirements for this position include: * 1+ years of experience with deep learning and generative models * PhD in computer vision, machine learning or related fields or master degree with hands-on experience in generative models such as GANs. * Ability to write efficient, clean, and reusable code in Python * Familiarity with modern deep learning frameworks * Strong communication and collaboration skills. * Ability and willingness to learn new technologies quickly. The research engineer will work with world-class researchers and other research engineers across the entire Adobe Research organization to build a platform that will influence the next generation creative workflow. This is a challenging and exciting forward-looking mission that provides great opportunities for growth in both technical competency and leadership skill. To apply for this position, please send your resume or CV in PDF format to adoberesearchjobs@adobe.com. At Adobe, you will be immersed in an exceptional work environment that is recognized throughout the world on Best Companies lists. You will also be surrounded by colleagues who are committed to helping each other grow through our unique Check-In approach where ongoing feedback flows freely. If you’re looking to grow your career, Adobe’s the place for you. Discover what our employees are saying about their career experiences through the Adobe Life magazine. Adobe is an equal opportunity employer. We welcome and encourage diversity in the workplace regardless of race, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity, disability or veteran status. We will ensure that individuals with disabilities are provided reasonable accommodation to participate in the job application or interview process, to perform essential job functions, and to receive other benefits and privileges of employment. Please contact us to request accommodation.",4.3,"Adobe
4.3","San Jose, CA",-1,10000+ Employees,1982,Company - Public,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$5 to $10 billion (USD),-1
213,Software Engineer - Machine Learning,$120k-$187k (Glassdoor Est.),"We are looking for a Software Development Engineer to join the AWS Neuron team the software that empowers the AWS Inferentia-based Inf1 instances. This role is for engineers who take pride in tackling hardest challenges, excel at working in an agile environment, and are excited about accelerating workloads on the Inferentia hardware.

You will work with the ML Applications team that develops features using Python and C++ across multiple frameworks like Tensorflow, MXNet and PyTorch. You will interact with a diverse team of AWS solution architects, customer representative, complier and hardware engineers to optimize and deliver cost-effective and performant solutions on the AWS Inferentia architecture (for example: https://github.com/aws/aws-neuron-sdk/)




Basic Qualifications

· 2+ years of software development engineering preferable in scalable high performance computing
· Proficient in Python and C++
· Computer Science fundamentals in algorithm design, complexity analysis, and performance
· Familiar with software development, build and deployment process for software libraries and SDKs

Preferred Qualifications

· Software development and use of ML frameworks like , or across applications and use cases
· Masters Degree with experience on and hardware accelerators",3.9,"Amazon
3.9","Cupertino, CA",-1,10000+ Employees,1994,Company - Public,Internet,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),-1
214,Software Engineer - Algorithms,-1,"Pison is a high tech company creating the next generation of nerve-sensing and micro-gesture recognition for control of augmented reality devices. The patented technology is being deployed in partnership with NASA, the ALS Association, NSF, and the Department of Defense.

The company was founded in 2016 with the mission of creating the most intuitive and universal human-computer interface to help people with ALS and other disabilities. The concept of nerve-sensing and micro-gesture input was inspired by our CEO’s mother who had ALS. Our mission is to harness the power of human intent to change the form and function of the world.

\*\*\*\*Must be a US citizen to qualify due to US Government contracts\*\*\*\*

This position is located in our Boston, MA office. For the safety of our employees, we are currently working remotely and will return to the office when it is safe to do so.

About the Job:

We are growing and our Machine Learning team is looking for an Algorithm Software Engineer to join and take on the challenge of implementing an AI production pipeline on our portable platforms that performs AI gesture model inference in real-time. You will be responsible for building the bridge between model development and deployment for real-time stream; working alongside a growing team of engineers and data scientists.

Job Details:
Porting an AI framework to our various mobile/on-device platforms
Research, suggest, create, and improve our production deep-learning pipeline for gesture classification in mission critical environments
Maintain, troubleshoot, and support our production pipeline
Collaborate and support teammates in work and code/algorithm review
Will effectively “close the loop” in the machine learning pipeline - bridging the gap for a given user between training a model and deploying that model for real-time.
About You:
Firm C++ and embedded development skills
Knowledge of deep learning methods and frameworks (ANN, Tensorflow/Keras, Pytorch)
Strong mathematics, computer science, and statistics knowledge
Experience with cross compilation and debugging
Proficient with numeric algorithms implementation
Self-motivated, self-directed, autonomous
A can-do, optimistic attitude
Bonus:
Python knowledge
Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k)
Dental insurance
Health insurance
Paid time off
Work Location:
One location
This Job Is Ideal for Someone Who Is:
Detail-oriented -- would rather focus on the details of work than the bigger picture
Autonomous/Independent -- enjoys working with little direction
Company's website:
https://pisontechnology.com/
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",2.8,"Pison Technology
2.8","Boston, MA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Unknown,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
215,Staff Machine Learning Engineer,$139k-$242k (Glassdoor Est.),"Overview


In this role, youll be embedded inside a vibrant team of data scientists. Youll be expected to help conceive, code, and deploy data science models at scale using the latest industry tools. Important skills include data wrangling, feature engineering, developing models, and testing metrics. You can expect to...
What you'll bring
BS, MS, or PhD degree in Computer Science or related field, or equivalent practical experience.
6+ years of experience
Knowledgeable with Data Science tools and frameworks (i.e. Python, Scikit, NLTK, Numpy, Pandas, TensorFlow, Keras, R, Spark).
Basic knowledge of machine learning techniques (i.e. classification, regression, and clustering).
Understand machine learning principles (training, validation, etc.)
Knowledge of data query and data processing tools (i.e. SQL)
Computer science fundamentals: data structures, algorithms, performance complexity, and implications of computer architecture on software performance (e.g., I/O and memory tuning).
Software engineering fundamentals: version control systems (i.e. Git, Github) and workflows, and ability to write production-ready code.
Experience deploying highly scalable software supporting millions or more users
Experience with GPU acceleration (i.e. CUDA and cuDNN)
Experience with integrating applications and platforms with cloud technologies (i.e. AWS and GCP)
Strong oral and written communication skills. Ability to conduct meetings and make professional presentations, and to explain complex concepts and technical material to non-technical users

How you will lead
Discover data sources, get access to them, import them, clean them up, and make them machine learning ready.
Work with data scientists to create and refine features from the underlying data and build pipelines to train and deploy models.
Partner with data scientists to understand, implement, refine and design machine learning and other algorithms.
Run regular A/B tests, gather data, perform statistical analysis, draw conclusions on the impact of your models.
Work cross functionally with product managers, data scientists and product engineers, and communicate results to peers and leaders.
Explore new technology shifts in order to determine how they might connect with the customer benefits we wish to deliver.",4.3,"Intuit - Data
4.3","Mountain View, CA",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1983,Company - Public,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$5 to $10 billion (USD),-1
216,Senior Software Design Engineer,$69k-$141k (Glassdoor Est.),"Introduction

ASML US brings together the most creative minds in science and technology to develop lithography machines that are key to producing faster, cheaper, more energy-efficient microchips. We design, develop, integrate, market and service these advanced machines, which enable our customers - the world’s leading chipmakers - to reduce the size and increase the functionality of their microchips, which in turn leads to smaller, more powerful consumer electronics. Our headquarters are in Veldhoven, the Netherlands, and we have 18 office locations around the United States including main offices in Chandler, Arizona, San Jose and San Diego, California, Wilton, Connecticut, and Hillsboro, Oregon.

Job Mission

Are you the hands-on/experienced data engineer that can implement and maintain complex Big Data architectures? Are you able to apply the cutting-edge technologies and tools to build Big Data pipelines? Do you have the drive to exceed customer expectations, then read on!

This position requires access to controlled technology, as defined in the Export Administration Regulations (15 C.F.R. § 730, et seq.). Qualified candidates must be legally authorized to access such controlled technology prior to beginning work. Business demands may require ASML to proceed with applicants who are immediately eligible to access controlled technology.

Job Description

As a Sr Software Design Engineer your responsibility includes:
working in a team of highly skilled software engineers responsible for developing software that enables the ever increasing miniaturization of semiconductor technology.
Using Agile methodology to develop the software using C and/or C++.
Creating architecture and designs that are modular, scalable, robust and meet customer requirements.
Perform unit testing and on target testing to ensure the software meets the high quality standards our customers expect.

You will also participate in continuous process improvement activities aimed at ensuring the processes and tools used throughout software development lifecycle are increasing the team’s ability to develop high quality software in the most efficient manner.

Education

Undergraduate or graduate degree in Computer or Electrical Engineering or Computer Science.

Experience
At least eight years of experience in C and/or C++
Experience working on the Linux and/or Solaris platforms
Good understanding of statistics, software system design and distributed architectures.
Extensive experience in embedded software development
Thinks creative, out of the box, self-starting, fast learner, good coder and designer.
Personal skills

Can observe and respond to people and situations and interact with others encountered in the course of work.
Can learn and apply new information or skills.
Must be able to read and interpret data, information, and documents.
Strong customer focus and commitment to customer satisfaction through prioritization, quality, efficiency and professionalism.
Ability to complete assignments with attention to detail and high degree of accuracy.
Proven ability to perform effectively in a demanding environment with changing workloads and deadlines.
Result driven-demonstrate ownership and accountability.
Identifies bottlenecks and drives improvements.
Work independently or as part of a team and follow through on assignments with minimal supervision.
Demonstrate open, clear, concise and professional communication.
Ability to establish and maintain cooperative working relationships with manager, co-workers and customer.
Work according to a strict set of procedures within the provided timelines.

Other information

Responsibilities:

Routinely required to sit; walk; talk; hear; use hands to keyboard, finger, handle, and feel; stoop, kneel, crouch, twist, reach, and stretch. Occasionally required to move around the campus.

Occasionally lift and/or move up to 20 pounds.

May require travel dependent on business needs.

Specific vision abilities required by this job include close vision, color vision, peripheral vision, depth perception, and ability to adjust focus.

EOE AA M/F/Veteran/Disability",3.9,"ASML
3.9","Wilton, CT",-1,10000+ Employees,1984,Company - Public,Electrical & Electronic Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$5 to $10 billion (USD),-1
217,Tool Designer Engineer,$51k-$82k (Glassdoor Est.),"Summary: Create and develop fixture and tooling utilizing CAD software to meet or exceed our customer and quality requirements.

Essential Duties and Responsibilities
Create and maintain tooling and fixturing designs used for production. Studies specifications, blueprints, shop data, and consults with engineering and shop personnel to resolve design problems related to dimensional requirements, service requirements, manufacturing procedures, and cost.
Develops and maintains models and drawings for all custom tools and fixtures.
Works to resolve issues with operations to maintain high productivity. Assist with training operators with machining fundamentals.
Works with New Product and Sustaining engineering teams to identify best practices, stable processes, and implement continuous improvement projects.
Supports New Product and Sustaining engineering teams on projects as needed.
Comply with all policies and procedures.
Other duties as assigned.


Qualifications

Strong understanding of machining and assembly processes.

Experience with process excellence and process improvements concepts, organized, quality-minded attitude and determination to be “Best in Class”. Willingness to lead by example.

Engineering degree preferred.

Computer Skills

To perform this job successfully, an individual should have a working knowledge, operation and maintenance of CAD/CAM software and a working knowledge of Microsoft Office applications.

Work Environment

Working conditions are normal for a manufacturing environment. Work may require weekends and/or evening work. Dress is consistent with floor management in a manufacturing environment. Facility and grounds are tobacco free.

What You Won’t Do:
Feel stuck – we offer great opportunities to advance and learn
Get bored – we make custom products, so no day is the same
Feel like a number – we’re a close-knit bunch and always have each other’s backs
Who You Are:
A self-starter who thrives in a fast-paced environment
A quick learner who is always ready to gain depth of knowledge in manufacturing processes
A reliable worker who knows the importance of showing up when it counts
Accept assignments with open, cooperative, positive and team-oriented attitudes
Able to plan and execute plans across teams
Effective communicator, both written and verbal
What You’ll Enjoy:
Competitive wage and benefits package
Vacation, make-up time, and immediate eligibility for paid holidays
Medical, dental, and vision insurance
Life and AD&D insurance, disability insurance
Great 401k Incentive
Temperature controlled environment
We are an equal opportunity employer and value diversity at our company. We do not discriminate on the basis of race, religion, color, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, age, marital status, veteran status, or disability status.",2.6,"Cutting Instruments
2.6","Warsaw, IN",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2005,Company - Private,Health Care Products Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
218,Senior Site Reliability Engineer - Network,-1,"About iRhythm:

iRhythm is a leading digital healthcare company focused on the way cardiac arrhythmias are clinically diagnosed by combining our wearable bio sensing technology with powerful cloud-based data analytics and machine- learning capabilities. Our goal is to be the leading provider of first-line ambulatory ECG monitoring for patients at risk for arrhythmias. iRhythm's continuous ambulatory monitoring has already put over 1 million patients and their doctors on a shorter path to what they both need – answers.

iRhythm is currently looking for a Senior Site Reliability Engineer - Network. The role can be based in our San Francisco headquarters or remotely in the United States.

About this role:
Work closely with customers and operations staff to design and build automated systems for managing our IPSEC VPN's and managed services
Provide automation and tools to help manage the lifecycle of our hosted solutions.
Troubleshoot systems issues, and facilitate resolution
Hands-on management of the continuous build, test and deployment processes
Maintain and enhance the automated continuous integration and continuous delivery environment
Evaluate and recommend new tools to improve build and release processes, with a goal of zero downtime releases
Communicate status frequently to all stakeholders
Document any new or changed processes
About you:
At least 5 years industry experience systems administration/engineering, platform automation, and infrastructure as code.
Experience managing, implementing and debugging IPSEC VPN tunnels.
Experience working with customers to help resolve VPN integration issues.
Strong Linux system administration skills are a must.
Experience with configuration management and automation tools (Terraform, Cloudformation, Consul, Vagrant).
Worked with container management technologies such as Amazon ECS, Vagrant, K8s.
Ability to writing code in Java, python or Go.
Supported and maintained scalable applications in public cloud (AWS/GCP).
Demonstrated ability in managing 24x7 systems.
Self-sufficient, self-managed, self-motivated; must be effective working both independently and as part of a team.
Must have good people and communication skills.
What's in it for you:

This is a full-time position with competitive compensation package, excellent benefits including medical, dental and vision insurance (all of which start on your first day), paid holidays, and PTO.

iRhythm also provides additional benefits including 401K (with company match), an Employee Stock Purchase Plan, paid parental leave, pet insurance discount, Cultural Committee/Charity events, and so much more!",3.2,"iRhythm
3.2",Remote,-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2008,Company - Public,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
219,"Software Engineer, Machine Learning",$105k-$177k (Glassdoor Est.),"Facebook's mission is to give people the power to build community and bring the world closer together. Through our family of apps and services, we're building a different kind of company that connects billions of people around the world, gives them ways to share what matters most to them, and helps bring people closer together. Whether we're creating new products or helping a small business expand its reach, people at Facebook are builders at heart. Our global teams are constantly iterating, solving problems, and working together to empower people around the world to build community and connect in meaningful ways. Together, we can help people build stronger communities - we're just getting started.

Facebook is seeking Software Engineers in Machine Learning Engineers to join our engineering team. The ideal candidate will have industry experience working on a range of classification and optimization problems, e.g. payment fraud, click-through rate prediction, click-fraud detection, search ranking, text/sentiment classification, collaborative filtering/recommendation, or spam detection. The position will involve taking these skills and applying them to some of the most exciting and massive social data and prediction problems that exist on the web.
Develop highly scalable classifiers and tools leveraging machine learning, data regression, and rules based models
Suggest, collect and synthesize requirements and create effective feature roadmap
Code deliverables in tandem with the engineering team
Adapt standard machine learning methods to best exploit modern parallel environments (e.g. distributed clusters, multicore SMP, and GPU)
5+ years experience in one or more of the following areas: machine learning, computer vision, natural language processing, recommendation systems, pattern recognition, data mining or artificial intelligence
Proven experience translating insights into business recommendations
Experience with Hadoop/Hbase/Pig or Mapreduce/Sawzall/Bigtable
Knowledge developing and debugging in C/C++ and Java
Experience with scripting languages such as Perl, Python, PHP, and shell scripts
Bachelors in Computer Science or related quantitative field
Experience with filesystems, server architectures, and distributed systems
Facebook is proud to be an Equal Opportunity and Affirmative Action employer. We do not discriminate based upon race, religion, color, national origin, sex (including pregnancy, childbirth, or related medical conditions), sexual orientation, gender, gender identity, gender expression, transgender status, sexual stereotypes, age, status as a protected veteran, status as an individual with a disability, or other applicable legally protected characteristics. We also consider qualified applicants with criminal histories, consistent with applicable federal, state and local law.Facebook is committed to providing reasonable accommodations for candidates with disabilities in our recruiting process. If you need any assistance or accommodations due to a disability, please let us know at accommodations-ext@fb.com.",4.5,"Facebook
4.5","Menlo Park, CA",-1,10000+ Employees,2004,Company - Public,Internet,Information Technology,$5 to $10 billion (USD),-1
220,SR. COMPUTER SCIENTIST - SR. RESEARCH ENGINEER - EMBEDDED SOFTWARE,$83k-$118k (Glassdoor Est.),"Job Summary:


Design and develop high-reliability embedded systems software for a variety of spacecraft control avionics, ADCS systems, and power control subsystems. Perform all phases of the system lifecycle including applied research, requirements generation, design, implementation, testing, integration, installation, and documentation. Interact and interface with clients including developing technical presentations. Field support may require travel to customer facilities.


Education/Experience:


Requires a BS degree in Electrical Engineering, Aerospace Engineering, Computer Science or related field with at least 7 years of experience. Must have at least a 3.0 GPA. Direct experience designing software for high reliability embedded systems is required. Must be an embedded systems designer/developer with strong software skills and networking/socket programming. An interest and/or experience in working with hardware a plus. Excellent verbal and written communication skills required. Must be able to work independently and in project team environments. Must have strong organizational skills and attention to detail. Must have an aptitude for continuous learning and leadership potential. Must be proficient in C/C++ and LabView. Familiarity with VxWorks, Linux, or RTEMS OS for embedded systems is a plus. Direct space flight design experience a plus. A valid/clear driver's license is required.


Special Requirements:


Work assignment is in Austin, Texas. Applicant selected will be subject to a government security investigation and must meet eligibility requirements for access to classified information. Applicant must be a U.S. citizen.

Job Locations: Austin, Texas


For more information about this division, visit the Space Science & Engineering home page.

An Equal Employment Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer
Race/Color/Religion/Sex/Sexual Orientation/Gender Identity/National Origin/Disabled/Veteran
Committed to Diversity in the Workplace
If you need assistance, please Contact Us",4.0,"Southwest Research Institute
4.0","Austin, TX",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1947,Nonprofit Organization,Research & Development,Business Services,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
221,Data Scientist - Genomics,$62k-$110k (Glassdoor Est.),"Qualifications & Competencies:

Required

- Ph.D. or completion within 6 months in Computer Science, Applied Math or Statistics, - Computational Biology or related field; or M.S. degree with three or more years experience.

- Proficiency in quantitative modeling techniques such as statistics, machine learning, optimization, and simulation

- Proficiency in predictive modeling including comprehension of theory, modeling/identification strategies and limitations/pitfalls

- Proficiency in at least one modern programming language (e.g. Python, Java, etc.)

- Strong communication including the ability to make presentations and deliver complex quantitative analyses in a clear, concise and manner

- Strong organizational, interpersonal, and written communication skills

Desired

- Knowledge of a biological domain such as genetics, molecular biology, or plant breeding

- Experience applying analytical techniques to genetic or genomic data

- Experience with Cloud Computing environments",4.5,"Envision LLC
4.5","Saint Louis, MO",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1994,Company - Private,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
222,Machine Learning Engineer (ML/AI Engineer),-1,"As a Machine Learning (ML) Engineer, you will design and build ML workflows to fuel analyses and inferences in collaboration with other technology teams to design and implement end-to-end solutions within a cloud-based analytic infrastructure. The ML-based insights will support theproduct management, marketing and content teams understand what makes our customers tick and how to target new ones.

Responsibilities
Collaborate with product owners, data scientists and engineering teams to evaluate the effectiveness of the deployed ML model.
Work with data scientists, data engineers, and solution analysts to design best-suited, robust and scalable ML endpoints for content discovery, personalization.
Design and develop robust and scalable experimentation approach for model evaluation.
Experience in writing production level-code and engage in code reviews.
Lead machine learning model deployment and production execution.
Experience of deploying ML models on big data volumes and optimize performance.
Extensive experience with ML frameworks and expertise with at least one.
Contribute in research, design, experimentation, development, deployment, monitoring and maintenance of ML model lifecycle.
Research and implement best practices to enhance existing machine learning infrastructure.
Design and implement data quality framework on content metadata pipeline.
Maintain and own all workflow documents up to date.
Requirements
Minimum 4 years of relevant and hands-on experience in machine learning with track record of processing, enriching and extracting value from large datasets.
Active Top Secret (TS) Clearance is required
Knowledge and experience in the following technologies and frameworks is critical:
Apache Spark, Apache MxNet, TensorFlow, Scikit-Learn, PyTorch
AWS, S3, EMR, Sagemaker, Personalize, Lambda, Step functions, Cloud Watch, etc.
Python, Spark, PySpark, SparkScala, SQL, Hadoop, Scala, Jupyter notebook.
Job Type: Full Time

Salary: $170,000 to 180,000 per year

An Active Top Secret (TS) Clearance is required

Powered by JazzHR",3.8,"Latitude, Inc.
3.8","McLean, VA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1
223,Data Scientist (Federal),$88k-$142k (Glassdoor Est.),"C3.ai is a leading enterprise AI software provider for accelerating digital transformation. The comprehensive and proven C3 AI Suite uses a model-driven abstraction layer to enable organizations to develop, deploy, and operate enterprise scale AI applications 40x to 100x faster than alternative approaches. www.c3.ai

C3.ai is looking for a Data Scientist (Federal) to solve challenging, novel, and large-scale enterprise problems for Federal clients. In this capacity you will represent C3.ai as a technical expert and help our team to frame problems, choose appropriate machine learning algorithms, and identify opportunities to leverage the C3.ai Suite.

Recent examples of successful engagements include predictive maintenance on oil and gas equipment and aircraft subsystems, supply chain optimization, manufacturing yield optimization, chronic disease prevention, customer spend prediction, and equipment lifetime optimization.

Qualified candidates will have an in-depth knowledge of most common machine learning techniques and their application. You will also understand the limitations of these algorithms and how to tweak them or derive from them to achieve results at large-scale.

This role requires US Citizenship or US Permanent Residence.

Your Responsibilities:
Become an expert in the C3.ai Suite and associated tools to teach, enable, and assist C3.ai customers to build their own applications.
Design and deploy machine learning pipelines for C3.ai's federal customers.
Collaborate with data and subject matter experts from C3.ai and its customer teams to seek, understand, validate, interpret, and correctly use new data elements.
Requirements:
US Citizenship or US Permanent Resident
Bachelor's degree
Strong understanding of machine learning algorithms & principles (regression analysis, time series, probabilistic models, supervised classification and unsupervised learning), and their application
Strong background in mathematics, statistics, and computer science
Excellent programming skills in Python
Ability to drive a project and work both independently and in a team
Smart, motivated, can do attitude, and seeks to make a difference
Excellent verbal and written communication
Preferred
MS or PhD in Computer Science, Electrical Engineering, Statistics, or equivalent fields. Specialization in machine learning preferred.
Active Department of Defense (DoD) security clearance (Secret or higher)
Excellent programming skills in JavaScript. Experience with Java and Scala is a plus.
Experience with deep learning, natural language processing, computer vision, or reinforcement learning
A portfolio of projects (GitHub, papers, etc.)
C3.ai provides a competitive compensation package and excellent benefits.

C3.ai is proud to be an Equal Opportunity and Affirmative Action Employer. We do not discriminate on the basis of any legally protected characteristics, including disabled and veteran status.",4.5,"C3.ai
4.5","Washington, DC",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2009,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
224,Industrial Production Engineer – PMO & CT Analyst,$48k-$89k (Glassdoor Est.),"Introduction

ASML US brings together the most creative minds in science and technology to develop lithography machines that are key to producing faster, cheaper, more energy-efficient microchips. We design, develop, integrate, market and service these advanced machines, which enable our customers - the world’s leading chipmakers - to reduce the size and increase the functionality of their microchips, which in turn leads to smaller, more powerful consumer electronics. Our headquarters are in Veldhoven, the Netherlands, and we have 18 office locations around the United States including main offices in Chandler, Arizona, San Jose and San Diego, California, Wilton, Connecticut, and Hillsboro, Oregon.

Job Mission

ASML is the world’s leading provider of lithography systems for the semiconductor industry, manufacturing complex machines that are critical to the production of integrated circuits or microchips. This position is for an engineering role in the Production Engineering department with innovative. Candidate will work with cross-sectors engineers to introduce new product to production floor and support output for existing product.

This position requires access to controlled technology, as defined in the Export Administration Regulations (15 C.F.R. § 730, et seq.). Qualified candidates must be legally authorized to access such controlled technology prior to beginning work. Business demands may require ASML to proceed with applicants who are immediately eligible to access controlled technology.

Job Description
Work with Optical, Mechanical, Electrical and Software Engineering staff to develop Cycle time and Labor Hours Roadmaps of Opto-Mechanical/Electrical Modules.
Collect Cycle time data for multiple modules using “ONE” SAP environment.
Chair cross-sector cycle time meetings to present and analyze cycle time data.
Generate and distribute cycle time reports for multiple modules on a weekly basis.
Drive cycle time reduction plans through cross-sector process improvements.
Support in-production quality issues by assisting Production Assembly and Test Engineers and Technicians with cross-sector communications and historical cycle time data and analysis.
Support new product introduction in an existing “Concurrent Engineering” environment.
Support project planning and tasks towards executing these plans.
Support capital equipment budget planning and purchases to ensure module moverates.
Support Bill of Process development for multiple modules.
Support AIR CCB meetings.
Support the development of manufacturing procedures and technical work instructions.
Evaluate, track, and disposition failed part material notifications with proposed solutions.
Review Failure Analysis Reports from suppliers and help validate the root-cause of the failure Interface with internal and external customers.
Create and direct equipment calibration, upkeep, and new equipment specification and procurement for all analytical instruments used in manufacturing.

The employee is required to work in a cleanroom environment:

Full gowning (full body coveralls, hood, CR safety shoes, face mask, nitrile gloves and safety glasses. Working under ISO 9000/14000 standards).
Working around overhead cranes, fork trucks and motorized pallet movers.
Working around lasers; working with ladders; working on platforms; and working around chemicals.
Education

BS/MS in Engineering (Preferred Business/Industrial) or equivalent experience.

Experience
1-3 years’ experience in an Engineering environment.
Experience in a production environment with high tech products and complex production process.
Experience in Lean Manufacturing.
Experience with engineering from an industrial and business mindset.
Able to read optical, mechanical and electrical drawings.
Strong MS Excel data management and presentation skills.
Experience developing VBA code.
Knowledge of MATLAB, LabVIEW and Pythonis a plus.
Working knowledge with Optical-Electrical sensors is a plus.
Experience in the field of technical Production Engineering and quality methodology such as statistical process control (SPC) and FMEA is a plus.
Working knowledge of NX, Teamcenter and SAP is a plus.
Capability to interface with multidisciplinary groups (including senior leadership), and be willing to take on responsibility and follow through.
Possess strong ownership characteristics – demonstrated commitment to achieving results on time.
Have strong written and oral communicative skills – ability to communicate effectively to your team and to senior management.
Focus on quality and continuous improvements.
Demonstrated “team player” with a quality orientation and interpersonal skills.
Personal skills
Can observe and respond to people and situations and interact with others encountered in the course of work.
Can learn and apply new information or skills.
Must be able to read and interpret data, information, and documents.
Strong customer focus and commitment to customer satisfaction through prioritization, quality, efficiency and professionalism.
Ability to complete assignments with attention to detail and high degree of accuracy.
Proven ability to perform effectively in a demanding environment with changing workloads and deadlines.
Result driven-demonstrate ownership and accountability.
Identifies bottlenecks and drives improvements.
Work independently or as part of a team and follow through on assignments with minimal supervision.
Demonstrate open, clear, concise and professional communication.
Ability to establish and maintain cooperative working relationships with manager, co-workers and customer.
Work according to a strict set of procedures within the provided timelines.
Other information

Role within Office

Responsibilities:

Routinely required to sit; walk; talk; hear; use hands to keyboard, finger, handle, and feel; stoop, kneel, crouch, twist, reach, and stretch. Occasionally required to move around the campus.
Occasionally lift and/or move up to 20 pounds.
May require travel dependent on business needs.
Specific vision abilities required by this job include close vision, color vision, peripheral vision, depth perception, and ability to adjust focus.

Role within the Factory

Responsibilities:

Must be willing to work in a clean room environment, wearing coveralls, hoods, booties, safety glasses and gloves for entire duration of shift.
While performing the duties of this job, the employee routinely is required to sit; walk; talk; hear; use hands to keyboard, finger, handle, and feel; stoop, kneel, crouch, twist, reach, and stretch.
The employee may occasionally lift and/or move up to 50 pounds.
Specific vision abilities required by this job include close vision, color vision, peripheral vision, depth perception, and ability to adjust focus.
Can work under deadlines.
The environment generally is moderate in temperature with moderate to high noise level.
Must be willing to work a compressed work week schedule – twelve-hour long shift and rotating from three to four days a week.
This must include references to day and night shifts for accommodation purposes.

Additional responsibilities for Wilton Factory:

The physical demands described here are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of this job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.

The employee is required to work in a cleanroom environment: full gowning (full body coveralls, hood, CR safety shoes, face mask, nitrile gloves and safety glasses. Working under ISO 9000/14000 standards).
Operating/working around overhead cranes, fork trucks and motorized pallet movers.
Working around lasers; working with ladders; working on platforms; and working around chemicals.
The employee is occasionally required to move around the campus.
The employee may occasionally lift and/or move up to 20 pounds.
May require travel dependent on company needs.
The environment generally is moderate in temperature and noise level.

EOE AA M/F/Veteran/Disability",3.9,"ASML
3.9","Wilton, CT",-1,10000+ Employees,1984,Company - Public,Electrical & Electronic Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$5 to $10 billion (USD),-1
225,Data Engineer,$76k-$130k (Glassdoor Est.),"Join our team dedicated to developing and executing innovative solutions in support of customer mission success.

Job Description:

Novetta is seeking multiple Data Engineers to support a new requirement in/around Springfield, VA. The selected candidates may be required to deploy forward up to 10% of the time into operational areas or other remote sites.

Responsibilities include:
Responsible for extracting, loading, and transforming a variety of data types, formats, and sources in order to cultivate accessible relational, document store, and graph databases
Develops logical and physical data models, database creation, data optimization, and implementation
Work side-by-side data scientist to make use of the collected data
Deploy sophisticated analytics programs, machine learning, and statistical models
Document all work in a code base, and other Install, Operations, and Maintenance artifacts per government direction
Basic Qualifications:
Requires in-depth knowledge of distributed systems, computer science, programming, and mathematics. Works with warehouses across multiple databases; responsible for developing table schemas
Ability to manage and organize data while identifying trends and inconsistencies that will impact government missions
Experience preparing data for predictive and prescriptive modeling; uses data to discover tasks that can be automated; delivers updates to stakeholders based on analytics
Experience/certifications in Mongo DB, Python, Cypher Query Language, R, Apache Spark / Hadoop, Linux, ETL, data warehouse, data modeling, and MS Azure, and Amazon Web Services
Experience adhering to Information Technology processes, polices, and procedures for entering changes and new products into the production environment
Experience in cloud, containerization, indexing, scaling databases, and graph analysis to build in automation, efficiency, and implementation of security controls
Desired Skills:
Prior experience supporting US Special Forces
Prior deployment to OCONUS locations
AWS and/or Azure certifications
Security Clearance Requirements:
Active TS/SCI security clearance required
Willing to undergo polygraph examination
Novetta, from complexity to clarity.

Novetta delivers highly scalable advanced analytics and secure technology solutions to address challenges of national and global significance. Focused on mission success, Novetta pioneers disruptive technologies in machine learning, data analytics, full-spectrum cyber, cloud engineering, open source analytics, and multi-INT fusion for Defense, Intelligence Community, and Federal Law Enforcement customers. Novetta is headquartered in McLean, VA with over 1,000 employees across the U.S.

Our culture is shaped by a commitment to our core values:

Integrity • We hold ourselves accountable to the highest standards of integrity and ethics.

Customer Success • We strive daily to exceed expectations and achieve customer mission success.

Employee Focus • We invest in our employees' professional development and training, respecting individuality and fostering a culture of diversity and inclusion.

Innovation • We know that discovering new and innovative ways to solve problems is critical to our success and makes us a great company.

Excellence in Execution • We take pride in flawless execution as we build a company that is best in class.

Earn a REFERRAL BONUS for the qualified people you know.

For more details, or to submit a referral: bit.ly/NovettaReferrals

Novetta is an equal opportunity/affirmative action employer.

All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to sex, gender identity, sexual orientation, race, color, religion, national origin, disability, protected veteran status, age, or any other characteristic protected by law.",4.6,"Novetta
4.6","Springfield, VA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2012,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
226,Principal Data Scientist,$113k-$182k (Glassdoor Est.),"Principal Data Scientist, Oncology
The Machine Learning and AI team in AstraZenecas Oncology Data Science group is where we develop and apply sophisticated algorithms and techniques to solve the hardest problems in oncology drug discovery and development. The team uses their scientific, quantitative, and problem-solving skills to work on a broad range of challenges across the whole oncology portfolio, working collaboratively with other scientists across a range of disciplines to scope, define, and deliver projects that both advance the state of the art in data science and accelerate the delivery of innovative medicines to patients.

NOTE: This position can be filled in either GAITHERSBURG MARYLAND OR WALTHAM, MASSACHUSETTS

As a Principal Data Scientist, you will play a key role on the front line in this rapidly growing team working to extract insight from complex biomedical data. You will develop your leadership skills and apply and develop your expertise in rigorous quantitative data science to provide solutions to a variety of data science problems, researching, recommending and delivering novel methodologies to solve the problems that matter to the oncology pipeline.

Examples of projects the team works on include developing machine learning models for digital biomarkers, patient risk stratification for clinical trials, new algorithms for survival analysis, approaches to quantitatively analyse wearable data, linking of medical imaging data with omics and longitudinal outcomes to identify and/or validate new drug targets, and much more!

Day-to-Day:
Developing novel data science and machine learning solutions where off-the-shelf methodologies do not fit.
Leading small (2-3 person) data science projects of defined scope.
Coaching/mentoring junior data scientists and others to drive the development of data science as an AZ capability.
What You'll Need:

Essential:
MSc degree in rigorous quantitative science (such as mathematics, computer science, engineering)
Extensive hands-on experience applying data science tools in practice.
Practical software development skills in standard data science tools (such as R or python)
Extensive knowledge of mathematical modelling and statistical modelling techniques and drive to continue to learn and develop these skills
Outstanding communication, business analysis and consultancy
Desirable:
PhD degree in rigorous quantitative science (such as mathematics, computer science, engineering).
Experience within the pharmaceutical industry.
In-depth experience of working in a global organization with complex/geographical context",4.1,"AstraZeneca
4.1","Gaithersburg, MD",-1,10000+ Employees,1913,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$10+ billion (USD),-1
227,Software Engineer - Full Stack,$44k-$80k (Glassdoor Est.),"IZEA was built to connect the worlds top brands with influential content creators and publishers to enable influencer marketing and content production at scale. With over 500,000 Creators reaching over 3 billion fans and followers around the globe, IZEA is unmatched in its industry experience, network diversity, and technology ecosystem. A career at IZEA offers countless ways to make an impact in a fast-growing organization!

IZEA is looking for a Full Stack Software Engineer to join our team.

This team member may be located in the Orlando area or be remote (US) as this is a remote position.

You will use the latest tools and technology to build and support IZEA's Creator and/or Customer focused efforts. This could include:
Integrating with the industry-leading Unity Workflow software, launching new features and tools to help Creators with their craft, and working in Web and Mobile applications.
Building novel solutions to recurring issues
Whether contributing to a set of JSON API powered services written in Ruby on Rails and NodeJS, or extending the user experience on top of EmberJS and Sass, you will help define what the future of Influencer and Content Marketing looks like.

You will have direct access to end-users and stakeholders, and you are encouraged to build and leverage these relationships in your work. You will write and test your code, and work with our QA team to get it deployed to production. With the help of a homegrown, bot-driven CI/CD pipeline, your code will be delivered to users daily. This cross-functional team leverages Amazon Web Services for everything from ECS for containerized virtualization and hosting, to S3 for durable object storage, RDS and DynamoDb for persistence, and Cloudfront for secure and scalable distribution of your work.

Aside from the day to day, we can offer you incredible benefits including an annual continuing education budget, a trust-focused development process, a flexible and collaborative work environment where balance matters, stock ownership, and an annual company retreat.

The team strives to be ego-free and motivated only by building amazing software for our users. We seek to understand the ""why"" behind the ""what"". We regularly break out into small teams to tackle problems, learn new technologies, or just share what we know with others. We test our code and invest in the health of our systems. We push each other, learn from each other, and strive to continually grow.

Primary Responsibilities

You will...
Work with stakeholders to define the solutions to development problems and business requirements
Develop and maintain features and capabilities for the IZEAx platform
Create unit and integration tests for your code
Reproduce and fix bugs reported by internal and external users
Set goals and communicate often about your progress toward them
Contribute to the ongoing improvement of the Engineering organization and our software
What Were Looking For

A problem solver at heart
Much of our work revolves around problems that have no existing off-the-shelf solution or consensus on best practices. You'll often need to break down large problems into smaller more manageable tasks and utilize critical thinking to come up with novel ideas.
3+ years of web development experience
The internet is a complicated place. A general understanding of what it means to develop software that is delivered over the web will serve you well and should include things like HTTP, CORS, DNS, and SSL. Ideally, you know what a load balancer is, understand stateless client-server application architecture, and can speak about the browser's DOM.
3+ years of professional development experience with Ruby and/or Javascript
This will be your day to day work. The services that compose the IZEAx platform are primarily written in these two languages. While we use frameworks like Ruby on Rails and NodeJS/ExpressJS to assist in the development of our applications, a foundational understanding of writing Ruby and Javascript code will be required.
Experience with a JavaScript Framework like AngularJS, React, Vue, or EmberJS
Modern, API-driven web applications are large and complex, and IZEAx is no different. To help developers stay sane, frameworks have emerged to keep code bases in check. At IZEA, we use EmberJS. If you haven't used EmberJS before, it's ok; we are confident you can pick it up (and like it) if you have used one of these other frameworks.
Direct experience with relational and NoSQL databases technologies
We use the best tool for the job around here. When it comes to storing and accessing data, we recognize that the technology decisions we make directly impact our ability to provide a performant customer experience, and our own costs.
Experience designing and building JSON based RESTful APIs
Because we are building our application with a front end framework, we carefully design and document the APIs to power it. To help us, we follow the JSON API spec, but any experience in building a RESTful API will be useful. Remember, the API is your contract with the front end!
Understanding of monolithic and micro-service based architectures
IZEAx still has some legacy monolithic characteristics. As we move more and more of our technology to a distributed set of services, there are new challenges to overcome. Understanding the differences between these two models will help you take those challenges head-on.
Basic Linux skills
In order to develop for IZEAx, you need to run it on your laptop. This means opening up some terminal windows, running some commands, and keeping the log output open. Additionally, some of our technology stack is better accessed through CLIs. Examples include the Ember CLI, the Rails CLI/console, Docker commands, Gradle, and our own gemstone architecture CLI. We'll walk you through it, but you should be comfy in a terminal.
Ability to multitask and prioritize multiple incoming requests
IZEA's Engineering team strives to provide a great experience and great service to our users. In order to do that, you may need to context switch into a support issue or drop what you are doing to start work on something else. This is part of what Agile means to us.
Excellent verbal and written communications skills
Regular and timely communication is the key to a trust based development process. You should be able to simply and concisely ask for feedback and direction in terms that your audience understands, and relay requested information in a timely fashion to your leaders. You should prioritize documentation of processes and code.
Demonstrated experience with the following will be highly valued

Front End Development experience
To be truly full-stack, you may need to sling some CSS from time to time. Being able to understand browser-based javascript, CSS, and semantic HTML will give you the confidence to truly go end-to-end.
Mobile Development experience
While this role specifically focuses on providing APIs to clients and some web client work, you will also be on a team with mobile developers and your APIs will be used by them to deliver our iOS app. And understanding of mobile development will help you keep this important channel in mind.
Amazon Web Services, or other cloud providers
IZEA's software is hosted on AWS, and you will need to acquire some familiarity with it. Previous experience in using a cloud provider, even if just for developer tooling, shows that you understand some of the nuances involved in working in the cloud.
Continuous Integration & Deployment
IZEA needs to get features and fixes out to customers as soon as we possibly can with as much confidence as possible. To facilitate this, we have developed a CI/CD pipeline (using 3rd party services). An understanding of what CI/CD is will help you understand how this pipeline works and how to make it even better.
GitHub
All of IZEA's code is source controlled on Github. We leverage Github Pull Requests for code reviews, Github integrations manage parts of our CI/CD pipeline, and Github releases define the code tags that ultimately get deployed. Much of our process documentation exists on Github pages. Familiarity with navigating Github's features will help you ramp up in our SDLC faster.
JIRA
IZEA uses JIRA to manage projects and report on progress to stakeholders inside and outside the company. While we strive to automate as much of JIRA as possible with bots, webhooks and reports, understanding how JIRA issues, links, attachments, and workflows work will help you understand our SDLC faster.
About IZEA:

We are IZEA: The Creator Marketplace. Our cloud-based technologies connect Brands and Publishers with content Creators who blog, tweet, pin, and post on their behalf.

Our driving belief is that the only way to thrive in our rapidly changing world is to change ahead of it. IZEA is in a constant state of evolution and reinvention. While we may have invented the industry, we still operate like an entrepreneurial, scrappy start-up. Your time here will be exciting, educational, and at times, a bit crazy.

With IZEA, you have the opportunity to join a non-traditional corporate culture, where creativity and productivity are valued over a suit and tie. We call it ""The IZEA Way.""

Why would you want to work here?

Our developers use the latest tools and technology to build the applications and services that make up the IZEA Exchange platform. We write in whatever language we need to get the job done including Ruby, Java, Python, PHP, Swift, and Javascript. We leverage the latest frameworks, such as Rails, and NodeJsfor iterating quickly on our technology.

Our code is deployed and operated by the people who write it, with the help of Amazon Web Services. We leverage everything from EC2 for virtualization and hosting, to Amazon EMR and Machine Learning for advanced analytics.

Aside from the day to day, we offer incredible benefits including an annual continuing education budget, a flexible trust-focused development process, and an open collaborative work environment.

Our team is ego-free and motivated to build great software. We regularly break out into small teams to tackle problems, learn new technologies, or just share what we know with others. We test our code and invest in the health of our systems. We push each other, learn from each other, and strive to continually grow as a team.

California residents, please follow this link to view the types of information we may gather from California residents who are applicants, employees, or contractors of IZEA, and how we use such information.

Powered by JazzHR",4.1,"IZEA, Inc
4.1","Orlando, FL",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2006,Company - Public,Advertising & Marketing,Business Services,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
228,Data Scientist - Intermediate,$62k-$110k (Glassdoor Est.),"Data Scientist, Intermediate level, St. Louis, MO

**No C2C or sponsorship, must be our W2 employee**

Required Qualifications:
PhD in Statistics, Biostatistics, Data Science, Applied Mathematics, or another highly quantitative discipline; or Masters degree plus two years of post-graduate experience.
Demonstrated ability to apply advanced statistical methodology and data science solutions to real-world problems
Strong proficiency in Python
Strong analytical and quantitative problem solving ability, with demonstrated ability to build, test, and iterate on a variety of model forms
Demonstrated ability to work in cross-functional environment
Preferred Qualifications:
Applied experience with agricultural science and/or agricultural datasets
At least 1 year of work experience applying statistics and data science to real-world problems
Machine learning experience
Experience in SQL, PySpark, or SparklyR/Spark
Ability to translate complex technical concepts to collaborations, decision makers, and non-technical audiences
Strong drive to learn new topics and skills and to develop innovative products for our customers
Excellent interpersonal and communication skills",4.5,"Envision LLC
4.5","Saint Louis, MO",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1994,Company - Private,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
229,Senior Data Engineer,$89k-$111k (Glassdoor Est.),"As a Senior Data Engineer at Guild, you'll work across teams to help us build the next generation of data products. You'll work with world class data engineers to design and build the scalable, robust, and high-quality data infrastructure and data pipelines needed to support growth of our education network and SaaS platform. Ultimately, you'll help change the landscape for how we think about delivering education products to learners across the country by building a digital solution that connects students, employers, and universities to deliver education at an affordable price to students.

A day in our open, collaborative workspace might look like:
Designing, building, and expanding Guild's backend data infrastructure, including data pipelines, ETL, data ingestion, data APIs, and data warehouses
Building APIs that can be used internally or externally to serve crucial information across systems, partners, and teams
Translating complex business requirements into usable, scalable data models and systems
Mentoring other engineers and analysts on the team and sharing technical knowledge to enable others to be more effective at their jobs
In this role, you'll expand your expertise by:
Evolving our data products now and in the future by contributing to our backend data architecture
Working in an agile team environment with a high performing engineering team
Taking on a cross-functional role that will expose you to the ins and outs of Guild (working with our Product, Design, Client Success, and Student Services teams)
Receiving feedback through our learning-focused, twice annual Structured Growth Conversations
You'll know if you're successful by:
Choosing and leveraging the latest technologies in data engineering to automate data integration and loading, such as, Amazon Redshift, Redis, Java, Scala, Spark, Kafka, Python, S3 and PostgreSQL
Leveraging your experience to design solutions that will be the backbone of a highly scalable, reusable, backend data infrastructure
Ensuring our data is clean, accurate, and secure
Thriving in fast-paced and scaling environment
You'll join a team:
From diverse backgrounds – from traditional higher education, to athletic coaches, to politicians, to mental health professionals (and more!)
Of learners & problem-solvers dedicated to our dual mission of changing education in America while building a successful, high-growth company
Committed to building a diverse, equitable, and inclusive environment that you'd support every day
What you'll add to Guild – as an individual and part of the broader team:
Experience building data pipelines, custom ETL processes and data warehouses
Experience with one or more programming languages such as Java, Python, or Scala
Expertise in database technologies such as Redshift, PostgreSQL, Redis, and working with large sets of data
Experience deploying solutions to cloud technology services such as Amazon Web Services
Experience improving software products through engineering best practices such as refactoring, reusability, TDD and continuous integration
A proven ability to thrive in changing environments by having a fast, flexible, cooperative work style
Strong communication skills and the ability to effectively explain technical concepts to other engineers, analysts, product managers, and stakeholders.
Experience with BI tools such as Looker, Tableau, Kibana, Chart.io, etc.
Basic experience in statistical analysis, text processing, and machine learning
Passion for higher education and our mission – Guild is pioneering a new path for education as a benefit in a complicated and regulated space – success means quickly and effectively adapting your expertise
A drive to work hard and plan for how you can refresh/recharge while working in a startup
Something else? Wonderful, we're curious to learn more about you!
About Guild:

Guild is increasing economic mobility for working adults by partnering with the largest employers in the country to offer education as a benefit to their employees via our marketplace of nonprofit universities and education institutions. Guild's proprietary technology platform facilitates the administration of this innovative benefit and our team of coaches helps each employee navigate the path back to school, providing individualized support from day one through program completion.

We also just became the latest female-led company to hit a $1billion valuation and the only B-corp with those qualifications. Our Series D round was led by Ken Chenault, General Catalyst Partners chairman and former CEO of AMEX, and joined by Emerson Collective, LeadEdge Capital, and Iconiq.

Guild Education is an equal opportunity employer. We celebrate diversity and are committed to creating an inclusive environment for all employees.",3.6,"Guild Education
3.6","Denver, CO",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2015,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
230,Manufacturing Engineer,-1,"Mobex Global, a leading CNC machining organization, located in Northeast Indiana has an immediate opening for a Manufacturing Engineer.*
Since the opening of its first plant in 1997, Mobex Global has become a national leader in CNC machining.*
Mobex Global – IN
Phone: (260) 636-7030
Summary*
Reporting to the Mobex Global Manufacturing Engineer Manager, the Manufacturing Engineer’s responsible for the process on the shop floor/new product lines.
Essential Duties and Responsibilities*
· Preparation of process sheets detailing tooling and setup requirements required for processes.

· Design and/or create CAD drawings for: tooling, gauges, gauge holders, and fixtures.

· Prepare tooling cost estimates for processes by conducting tool usage studies.

· Read and interpret part prints for rough castings and finished machined parts.

· Select new and improve existing tooling for machining processes.

· Provide technical support for production floor.

· Research and report the requirements (cost, labor, tooling, equipment) for implementing new production processes.

· Program and operate CNC machine tools.

· Manage all cost savings by department/ line

· Monthly reports

· Work with manufacturers on tooling improvements and problem resolution

· Vendor/Customer problem resolution

· Perform miscellaneous activities as requested by Management

· Travel to multiple plants may be required

· Travel between multiple plants as needed
Qualifications*
To perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to work with vendors, have problem-solving capability, be proficient with AutoCAD and windows-based programs, and familiar with engineering practices and processes. Good communication skills with people.
Benefits*
· Excellent wages based on experience!

· Competitive benefits offered!

_\*This is the opportunity to build a career, not just another job. Only motivated, serious candidates with a willingness to learn need apply._
Mobex Global is an Equal Opportunity Employer*
Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) Matching
Dental Insurance
Disability Insurance
Employee Assistance Program
Flexible Spending Account
Health Insurance
Life Insurance
Paid Time Off
Vision Insurance
Schedule:
Day shift
Monday to Friday
Weekends
COVID-19 considerations:
To keep our employees safe we are doing temperature checks, health screening questionnaires, and wearing masks. Visitors are restricted at the plants.

Education:
Bachelor's (Preferred)
Work Location:
Multiple locations
Company's website:
www.mobexglobal.com
Benefit Conditions:
Waiting period may apply
Work Remotely:
No",3.0,"Mobex Global
3.0","Edon, OH",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,-1,Company - Public,Industrial Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
231,Machine Learning Compiler Engineer (Senior Staff),$106k-$177k (Glassdoor Est.),"Company:
Qualcomm Technologies, Inc.
Job Area:
Engineering Group, Engineering Group > Machine Learning Engineering
Job Overview:


Qualcomm is a company of inventors that unlocked 5G ushering in an age of rapid acceleration in connectivity and new possibilities that will transform industries, create jobs, and enrich lives. But this is just the beginning. It takes inventive minds with diverse skills, backgrounds, and cultures to transform 5Gs potential into world-changing technologies and products. This is the Invention Age - and this is where you come in.

Qualcomm is a company of inventors that unlocked 5G - ushering in an age of rapid acceleration in connectivity and new possibilities that will transform industries, create jobs, and enrich lives. But this is just the beginning. It takes inventive minds with diverse skills, backgrounds, and cultures to transform 5Gs potential into world-changing technologies and products. This is the Invention Age - and this is where you come in. We are investing in several supporting technologies including 4G, 5G, Edge Computing, and Deep Learning.

The Qualcomm CR&D team is developing hardware and software for Machine Learning solutions spanning the data center, edge, infrastructure, automotive markets and beyond. We are seeking ambitious, bright and innovative engineers with experience in compiler technology, vectorization and optimization, and machine learning toolchains.

Job activities span the whole product life cycle from early R&D to commercial deployment. The environment is fast-paced and requires cross-functional interaction on a daily basis so good communication, planning and execution skills are a must.

We are looking to staff engineers at multiple levels in systems & software, integration and test. Details of one of the roles we are looking to staff are listed below.

Responsibilities:
Research, design, develop, enhance, and implement the different components of machine learning compiler based on performance and code-size needs of the customer workloads and benchmarks.
Analyze software requirements, determine the feasibility of design within the given constraints, consult with architecture and HW engineers, and implement software solutions best suited for Qualcomm's SOCs.
Analyze and identify system level integration issues, interface with the software development, integration and test teams.
Minimum Qualifications
Bachelor's degree in Engineering, Information SystemsPreferred Qualifications, Computer Science, or related field.
2+ years of academic or professional experience with compiler development required
3+ years Software Engineering or related work experience.
3+ years experience with Programming Language such as C/C++ and Python
Preferred Qualifications
LLVM or any industrial strength compiler development experience is a plus.
Knowledge of the structure and function of the compiler internals.
Hands on experience writing SIMD and/or multi-threaded high-performance code
Hands-on experience implementing DSP Kernels a plus
Hands-on Experience in C/C++, Python development (3+ years)
Hands-on Experience with Object Orientated Design, TDD development solutions such as GoogleTest etc. (2+ years)
Experience with Source Code and Configuration management tools, git knowledge is required
Willingness to work in a cohesive software development environment with ability to work on low level implementation (code & test) and interfacing with hardware and simulators
Experience in machine learning frameworks and neural network architectures + ML compiler workload synthesis, a plus
Prior working experience of hardware accelerators and hardware software co-design
Experience in using C++ 14/17 (advanced features)
Experience at both the firmware (RTOS) and system level (Linux) in SOC
Experience of profiling software and optimization techniques
Passion to drive to develop leading-edge ""deep learning"" framework and algorithms working on mobile and embedded platforms.
Applicants: If you are an individual with a disability and need an accommodation during the application/hiring process, please call Qualcomm’s toll-free number found here for assistance. Qualcomm will provide reasonable accommodations, upon request, to support individuals with disabilities to be able participate in the hiring process. Qualcomm is also committed to making our workplace accessible for individuals with disabilities. Qualcomm is an equal opportunity employer and supports workforce diversity.

To all Staffing and Recruiting Agencies: Our Careers Site is only for individuals seeking a job at Qualcomm. Staffing and recruiting agencies and individuals being represented by an agency are not authorized to use this site or to submit profiles, applications or resumes, and any such submissions will be considered unsolicited. Qualcomm does not accept unsolicited resumes or applications from agencies. Please do not forward resumes to our jobs alias, Qualcomm employees or any other company location. Qualcomm is not responsible for any fees related to unsolicited resumes/applications.

EEO Employer: Qualcomm is an equal opportunity employer; all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, Veteran status, or any other protected classification.",4.0,"Qualcomm Incorporated
4.0","Raleigh, NC",-1,10000+ Employees,1985,Company - Public,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),-1
232,Computer Vision SW Engineer intern (Medical device),-1,"The Company*
We are a fast-paced startup building the next generation surgical robot platform. We’re a diverse team dedicated to creating non-invasive solutions that provide clinical value for both patients and doctors. Working here means joining an experienced startup team that is excited and passionate about creating world class products. Founded by a serial entrepreneur with 2 successful exits, the team includes former engineers from top medical robotics companies. We are a well-funded startup and expect talented, motivated, ambitious and interesting co-workers.
Role and Responsibilities*
Work with full-time employees to contribute to the R&D of vision and imaging algorithms
Research, prototype, iterate algorithmic solutions to computer vision problems for surgical planning and navigation
Perform extensive testing and evaluation of the algorithms and document
Job / Skill Requirements*
A passion in translating knowledge to real-life products that benefit the lives of people
MS/PhD degree/candidacy in Computer Science, Electrical Engineering or other related programs (exceptional BS will be considered too)
Good foundation on mathematics and analytical skills
Training and hands-on experience in geometric computer vision including camera calibration, stereo reconstruction, pose estimation, robust estimation, numerical optimization, structure from motion, and/or SLAM
Training and hands-on experience in image processing
Strong implementation skills using C++, C#, Matlab and/or Python (and the desire to learn new techniques and tools)
Experience with volumetric medical image segmentation, registration or reconstruction is a plus
Experience working with C-arm machines / X-ray fluoroscopy is a plus
Familiarity with tools such as OpenCV (required) and ITK (preferred)
Being able to work full-time for at least 3 months; up to 20% time onsite otherwise working from home
Job Types: Internship, Contract

Pay: $34.00 per hour

Benefits:
Referral program
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
COVID-19 considerations:
company provides and requests masks in the office.

Education:
Master's (Required)
Experience:
Image processing: 2 years (Preferred)
C++: 2 years (Required)
C#: 2 years (Required)
Python: 1 year (Required)
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",-1,Stealth Mode Startup,"Redwood City, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
233,Project Engineer,-1,"Sales Engineer*
Perfecto Tool & Engineering Company is seeking a qualified and experienced Sales Engineer to join the Perfecto Sales Team.

This position will work with customers and our internal team to guide customers through the special machine design and build journey. You will develop and foster relationships with new and existing customers. You will provide the Perfecto team with the technical guidance needed to produce a finished product that exceeds customer expectations. The ideal candidate will have prior experience in technical sales and engineering. The ability to quickly gain a customer’s confidence while capturing their ideas is necessary for success in this role. Experience with manufacturing, alignment with Core Values, a passion for excellence, and an entrepreneurial spirit are also required.

If you possess the qualifications listed below, please apply for this position and we will contact you directly. Your information will remain confidential.
Responsibilities: *
Ø Build and expand customer relationships

Ø Work with existing customers to explore additional opportunities and expand product lines

Ø Quickly vet customer ideas during customer meetings

Ø Become knowledgeable about Perfecto’s production capabilities, advising leadership of opportunities to increase production efficiencies

Ø Participate in the quoting process for custom equipment with precise estimates of the cost, machinery, hours, and materials needed to complete the project

Ø Maintain and improve technical knowledge through continued education

Ø Some travel is necessary for this position (25-30%)
Qualifications: *
Ø Alignment with our Core Values

Ø Bachelor’s Degree in Engineering or equivalent relevant experience is preferred.

Ø A minimum of 4 years’ engineering experience

Ø Previous customer service experience is strongly desired, sales experience is a plus

Ø Ability to communicate technical information to technical and non-technical users via email, phone, or in person is essential to success in this position

Ø Strong sales, presentation, and negotiation skills

Ø Ability to quickly learn new systems and software is helpful

Ø Working knowledge of data analysis and performance/operation metrics

Ø Outstanding organizational and leadership abilities

Ø Excellent interpersonal and public speaking skills

Ø Skilled in decision-making and problem-solving

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: From $70,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Referral program
Vision insurance
Schedule:
8 hour shift
Day shift
Monday to Friday
Supplemental Pay:
Bonus pay
This Job Is Ideal for Someone Who Is:
People-oriented -- enjoys interacting with people and working on group projects
Detail-oriented -- would rather focus on the details of work than the bigger picture
Innovative -- prefers working in unconventional ways or on tasks that require creativity
Company's website:
www.perfecto.com
Company's Facebook page:
https://www.facebook.com/PerfectoToolEngineering
Benefit Conditions:
Waiting period may apply
Work Remotely:
No",-1,"Perfecto Tool & Engineering Co., Inc.","Anderson, IN",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
234,AI/ML Senior/Staff Software Engineer,$155k-$263k (Glassdoor Est.),"Title: AI/ML Senior/Staff Software Engineer

Company: Samsung Research America (SRA)

Lab: MPS

Location: Mountain View, CA

Summary:

We are looking for highly skilled individual in ML and Deep-Learning algorithms, frameworks and application development. This is a great opportunity to join Samsung Emoji team to build next generation AI based Avatars. The team is focused on building Samsung AR-Emoji platform with AI features. This is an exciting area for Samsung, especially the Mobile Graphics team that enables numerous applications in AI Avatar space. Come join the Mobile Communication Lab and help us build next generation avatars.

Responsibilities Include:
Design, implement and evolve data models for AI-based avatars with focus on face and body expressions for avatar while classifying audio segments
Extend AI-based avatars that interacts with virtual and real objects
Perform extensive research and analysis to make optimal architecture and design decisions that enhances the quality of Avatar SDK on PC/mobile
Collaborate with Android team for ML-model integration to mobile space.
Write large amounts of code and perform code reviews
Participate in new product concepts and create proof-of-concept prototypes
Actively participate and contribute in scrum meetings
Experience Requirements:
MS/PhD in Computer Science or equivalent experience
4+ years of industry experience with strong Computer Science fundamentals in Data Structures, Algorithm Design, and Complexity Analysis
Expert knowledge of Machine Learning / Deep Learning algorithms -- classification, clustering, regression, reinforcement learning, Bayesian modeling, algorithm design and theory of computation
Excellent working knowledge of at least one of the frameworks - Tensorflow/Keras/PyTorch
Proficiency in programming languages including but not limited to Python/C++
Experience with Machine Learning technologies for application to speech recognition is a plus
Hands-on experience with data analysis and building real-life data models using pandas, numpy, nltk, matplotlib etc.


Samsung is an EEO/Veterans/Disabled/LGBT employer. We welcome and encourage diversity as we strive to create an inclusive workplace.",3.8,"Samsung Research America
3.8","Mountain View, CA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1988,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
235,Software Engineer,$42k-$91k (Glassdoor Est.),"Overview


The Chick-fil-A Software Engineering role will give you the opportunity to grow in a fast-paced dynamic environment solving high-impact problems using code. In this particular role, you’ll serve on a team that develops and operates two vital financial products for Chick-fil-A that are utilized by other staff members to operate our business model. In the role, you’ll rotate through various aspects of the products cultivating skills in a team-oriented environment.

Responsibilities
Design and develop software solutions
Develop a high proficiency in infrastructure and deployment services like AWS and Kubernetes
Develop a high proficiency in programming languages like Java, JavaScript (Angular/React), Python, and Go
Grow into a subject matter expert in areas like application security, data analytics, machine learning, and site reliability engineering
Minimum Qualifications
Programming experience in Java, JavaScript, Python, Go, or other comparable language
Experience with SQL
Understanding of SDLC
Understanding of application security
Good interpersonal and team collaboration skills
Preferred Qualifications
Bachelor's degree, preferably in computer science or another applicable technical field
Experience with Unix/Linux
Experience with source control systems like Git or Subversion
Minimum Years of Experience
0
Travel Requirements
10%
Preferred Level of Education
Bachelors Degree
Major/Concentration
Computer Science / Computer Engineering",3.9,"Chick-fil-A
3.9","Atlanta, GA",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1946,Company - Private,Fast-Food & Quick-Service Restaurants,"Restaurants, Bars & Food Services",$5 to $10 billion (USD),-1
236,Support Engineer. 2nd Shift,-1,"Position Overview

Our customers are at the forefront of some of the most interesting data in the world, using SingleStore to push the boundaries every day. To do this well, they leverage the expertise of our Support Engineering Team, composed of technical subject matter experts on the frontlines of critical customer issues.

This Support Engineering role skews far more towards engineering than typical technical support as you will need to delve into database internals and memory allocators, investigate Linux and host related configurations, and diagnose SQL query behavior, all in the name of resolving complex database issues. Our Support Engineers are constantly learning a wide range of customer systems and technical concepts and are thrilled by the new and exciting challenges that they encounter on a regular basis.

To accurately identify the source and solution of an issue, this team will take the time to learn about the customer's business and systems while helping to improve their fundamental SingleStore and database operational knowledge. This often requires additional research and time spent on learning new technologies and tools outside of SingleStore while also being deeply engaged with multiple departments including development teams, query performance engineering, product management, infrastructure SREs, etc.

Role and Responsibilities
Working hours are 3PM PST to 12AM PST. Weekend availability a big plus.
Provide email and live technical support to our enterprise customers, acting as the first-line-of-defense for complex technical issues, bug diagnosis, or resolving critical outages.
Identify and reproduce product issues and submit formal bug reports or feature requests to the appropriate Engineering team.
Collaborate with software developers, sales engineers, and technical account managers to keep all teams up to date with current issues a customer may be facing.
Work to streamline and improve various Support and Engineering processes and tools, author new internal run-books or public documentation, and help the team continually improve efficiency and effectiveness.
Ensure customers have a positive support experience during every interaction.
Participate in our on-call rotation that may include weekends and holidays.
Required Skills and Experience
4+ years of previous customer-facing technical support experience, ideally at an advanced level.
Experience with SQL databases and advanced SQL Query Optimization. You should be familiar enough with at least one commercial or open source database to decipher its EXPLAIN plan and understand potential performance impact or ways to improve the query.
A solid devops/sysadmin skill set. That means you are hands-on with Linux and you know three ways to find a file, check utilization of system I/O, measure network throughput, and are comfortable navigating large log files. Bonus points for familiarity with Kubernetes.
Experience with a scripting or coding language. Whether it's Python, Bash, or Go, you should have a go-to solution for quick and dirty problem-solving and be able to navigate through our code base.
Familiarity with distributed systems and AWS/GCP. You understand how organizations deploy and maintain distributed applications and services across multiple machines Bonus points for knowing how to analyze them for performance bottlenecks and remove single points of failure.
Experience improving support processes regarding ticket triage, escalation, and reporting business metrics back to the organization.
Strong written and verbal English communication skills. Have the ability to explain technical concepts to a wide range of end-users.
SingleStore is one platform for all data, built so you can engage with insight in every moment. Trusted by industry leaders, SingleStore enables enterprises to adapt to change as it happens, embrace diverse data with ease, and accelerate the pace of innovation. SingleStore is venture-backed and headquartered in San Francisco with offices in Portland, Seattle, Boston, Bangalore, London, Lisbon, and Kyiv. Defining the future starts with The Database of Now™.

Consistent with our commitment to diversity & inclusion, we value individuals with the ability to work on diverse teams and with a diverse range of people.

To all recruitment agencies: SingleStore does not accept agency resumes. Please do not forward resumes to SingleStore employees. SingleStore is not responsible for any fees related to unsolicited resumes and will not pay fees to any third-party agency or company that does not have a signed agreement with the Company.",4.6,"SingleStore
4.6",Remote,-1,201 to 500 Employees,2011,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
237,Support Engineer,-1,"Position Overview

Our customers are at the forefront of some of the most interesting data in the world, using SingleStore to push the boundaries every day. To do this well, they leverage the expertise of our Support Engineering Team, composed of technical subject matter experts on the frontlines of critical customer issues.

This Support Engineering role skews far more towards engineering than typical technical support as you will need to delve into database internals and memory allocators, investigate Linux and host related configurations, and diagnose SQL query behavior, all in the name of resolving complex database issues. Our Support Engineers are constantly learning a wide range of customer systems and technical concepts and are thrilled by the new and exciting challenges that they encounter on a regular basis.

To accurately identify the source and solution of an issue, this team will take the time to learn about the customer's business and systems while helping to improve their fundamental SingleStore and database operational knowledge. This often requires additional research and time spent on learning new technologies and tools outside of SingleStore while also being deeply engaged with multiple departments including development teams, query performance engineering, product management, infrastructure SREs, etc.

Role and Responsibilities
Provide email and live technical support to our enterprise customers, acting as the first-line-of-defense for complex technical issues, bug diagnosis, or resolving critical outages.
Identify and reproduce product issues and submit formal bug reports or feature requests to the appropriate Engineering team.
Collaborate with software developers, sales engineers, and technical account managers to keep all teams up to date with current issues a customer may be facing.
Work to streamline and improve various Support and Engineering processes and tools, author new internal run-books or public documentation, and help the team continually improve efficiency and effectiveness.
Ensure customers have a positive support experience during every interaction.
Participate in our on-call rotation that includes weekends and holidays.
Required Skills and Experience
2+ years of previous customer-facing technical support experience, ideally at an advanced level.
Experience with SQL databases and advanced SQL Query Optimization. You should be familiar enough with at least one commercial or open source database to decipher its EXPLAIN plan and understand potential performance impact or ways to improve the query.
A solid devops/sysadmin skill set. That means you are hands-on with Linux and you know three ways to find a file, check utilization of system I/O, measure network throughput, and are comfortable navigating large log files. Bonus points for familiarity with Kubernetes.
Experience with a scripting or coding language. Whether it's Python, Bash, or Go, you should have a go-to solution for quick and dirty problem-solving and be able to navigate through our code base.
Familiarity with distributed systems and AWS/GCP. You understand how organizations deploy and maintain distributed applications and services across multiple machines Bonus points for knowing how to analyze them for performance bottlenecks and remove single points of failure.
Experience improving support processes regarding ticket triage, escalation, and reporting business metrics back to the organization.
Strong written and verbal English communication skills. Have the ability to explain technical concepts to a wide range of end-users.
Previous technical support experience.
Familiarity with Linux, databases, and distributed systems.
Ability to code.
SingleStore is one platform for all data, built so you can engage with insight in every moment. Trusted by industry leaders, SingleStore enables enterprises to adapt to change as it happens, embrace diverse data with ease, and accelerate the pace of innovation. SingleStore is venture-backed and headquartered in San Francisco with offices in Portland, Seattle, Boston, Bangalore, London, Lisbon, and Kyiv. Defining the future starts with The Database of Now™.

Consistent with our commitment to diversity & inclusion, we value individuals with the ability to work on diverse teams and with a diverse range of people.

To all recruitment agencies: SingleStore does not accept agency resumes. Please do not forward resumes to SingleStore employees. SingleStore is not responsible for any fees related to unsolicited resumes and will not pay fees to any third-party agency or company that does not have a signed agreement with the Company.",4.6,"SingleStore
4.6",Remote,-1,201 to 500 Employees,2011,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
238,Jr. Software Engineer,-1,"What if you could use your talent to have a positive impact on healthcare through the technical solutions you build? As a nonprofit, Utah Health Information Network, UHIN for short is a health information technology (HIT) company that is making a difference by bringing technically relevant solutions to the market. We offer affordable tools that allow providers, payers, and patients to safely exchange information electronically. We are looking for a skilled and energetic Engineers (All levels) to play an integral role on our team. If you’re passionate about building beautiful, intuitive and fluid designs, read on to see if you have what it takes to join the team!
Position Summary*
We are looking for a hardworking, motivated, deadline driven individual to join our team and help change healthcare. The Junior Software Engineer’s responsibilities include ensuring that the design, application, and maintenance of software meets UHIN’s quality standards. You should be a team player that has the ability to bring ideas to the table while supporting the overall goals of the engineering department.

Applicants should have experience in at least part of the full stack. A Junior Software Engineer should be able to write semantic, modular front-end code using a framework such as Vue.JS, Angular or React. Alternatively, a knowledge of PHP or other backend languages, specifically using frameworks such as Laravel, Lumen or Rails is acceptable. Interested? Read on to learn more!
Primary Expectations/Responsibilities: *
Forward Thinker: Promote design thinking, advocate design principles and best practices
Code: An engineer with experience in backend or frontend technology (PHP, C#, .NET Core, Java, and JavaScript frameworks such as Vue.js, Node.js, Angular.js or similar)
Integrate: A knowledge of API concepts (microservices, third party integrations, etc.)
Shoot for the cloud: Basic understanding of how to develop software that is cloud ready and redundant
Make it fast: Implementing and testing software for design, functionality, and performance
Other duties / Soft Skills: *
Be a team player
Must be analytical, detail oriented and able to translate functional requirements into your design
Design and develop applications using agile/SCRUM/Product development processes
Adhere to good development practices: documentation, code standards, code/design reviews, optimization and maintainability
Want to know more about the projects were working on? Come interview and find out all the cool software you could help us build!
Required Qualifications: *
· Bachelor’s Degree in Computer Science, related technical field or equivalent practical experience

· Development experience in PHP, JavaScript, C#, .NET Core, Node.js or Java

· Experience designing with client rich technologies such as Vue.js, AngularJS, React or similar

· Development experience designing object-oriented programming languages
Preferred Qualifications: *
· Knowledge of CSS frameworks (Bootstrap, Tailwind, Bulma etc.)

· Working knowledge of healthcare (HIPAA Regulations, PHI, X12, HL7, FHIR etc.)

· Working knowledge of modern PHP frameworks (Laravel, Symphony, etc.)

· Enterprise cloud experience (GCP, AWS, Azure etc.)

· Experience working with Product Development teams

· An understanding of the principles of accessibility and can build products that are accessible to users in healthcare
Comments*
This position may be exposed to PHI on a regular basis; however, only accesses the minimum necessary for completing tasks. In doing so, this position must comply with all UHIN Policies and Procedures with specific regard for PHI Privacy and Security sections and maintain confidentiality with regard to the information being processed, stored or accessed by the network.
Tools and Equipment Used*
Personal computer including; email, internet, word processing, spreadsheet and data base software; phone; copy machine; fax machine and other office machinery.
Physical Demands*
The physical demands described here are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of this job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.

While performing the duties of this job, the employee is frequently required to sit and talk or hear, use hands to finger, handle, feel or operate objects, tools, or controls; and reach with hands and arms. The employee is occasionally required to walk.

The employee must occasionally lift and/or move up to 25 pounds. Specific vision abilities required by this job include close vision and the ability to adjust focus.

The work environment is generally quiet.
Other*
The duties listed above are intended only as illustrations of the various types of work that may be performed. The omission of specific statements of duties does not exclude them from the position if the work is similar, related or a logical assignment to the position.

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $63,000.00 - $87,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Employee assistance program
Flexible schedule
Flexible spending account
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Vision insurance
Schedule:
8 hour shift
Day shift
Monday to Friday
Supplemental Pay:
Bonus pay
COVID-19 considerations:
Our employees will continue to work remote till June 2021 when we will reevaluate the COVID situation.

Education:
Bachelor's (Required)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Work Location:
One location
This Job Is Ideal for Someone Who Is:
Dependable -- more reliable than spontaneous
Achievement-oriented -- enjoys taking on challenges, even if they might fail
Innovative -- prefers working in unconventional ways or on tasks that require creativity
Company's website:
https://uhin.org
Benefit Conditions:
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",5.0,"UHIN
5.0","Salt Lake City, UT",-1,1 to 50 Employees,1993,Nonprofit Organization,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
239,Senior Mechanical Analysis Engineer @ ASML,$87k-$123k (Glassdoor Est.),"Introduction

ASML US brings together the most creative minds in science and technology to develop lithography machines that are key to producing faster, cheaper, more energy-efficient microchips. We design, develop, integrate, market and service these advanced machines, which enable our customers - the world’s leading chipmakers - to reduce the size and increase the functionality of their microchips, which in turn leads to smaller, more powerful consumer electronics. Our headquarters are in Veldhoven, the Netherlands, and we have 18 office locations around the United States including main offices in Chandler Arizona, San Jose and San Diego California, Wilton Connecticut, and Hillsboro Oregon.

Job Mission

ASML is seeking a Senior Mechanical Analysis Engineer with multidiscipline competencies to join the Wilton, CT development location. We are seeking an individual with a strong background in the finite element method, solid mechanics, and numerical methods. A background in both linear and nonlinear modeling, includingelastoplasticity,contact modeling, or fatigue modeling is desirable, as well as any experience in multiphysics (Thermal/CFD)analysis. Good complex mechanical system intuition is also highly desirable.

Job Description

Multiple Openings

Interact with ASML system architects leading the development effort ofcritical opto-mechanical (Silicon Litho) systems.
Support system optimization by addressing technical concerns,providing guidance, advice, and modeling assistance in a wide variety ofapplication areas, particularly those involving structuralmechanics, heat transfer, fluid dynamics, electromagnetics, optics andmultiphysics modeling.
Develop both analytic and numerical models that show technicalfeasibility in a cross discipline coupled environment.
Guide internal design engineers with supporting analysis throughfeasibility, concept, and detail design.
Develop and teach junior analysis engineers.
A challenging opportunity to expand your knowledge in a wide varietyof physics application areas and to work on problems spanning allengineering fields.
Highly creative and qualified teams with a diversity of experience.
Great career opportunities at a quickly growing high-tech company.
Casual atmosphere, with world class technical problems to solve.
Education

B.S. with minimum 5 years progressive experience in engineering,physical sciences, or life sciences required or equivalent experience.M.S. or Ph.D preferred.

Experience
Demonstrated experience with computational modeling & problemsolving.
Customer centric personal ethos.
Personal skills
Customer oriented and willing to work with high level problem solverson a daily basis.
Genuine interest in mathematical modeling, computational physics, andsoftware simulation.
Genuine interest in developing precision systems that can performreliably at customer sites
Strong written and verbal communication and presentation skills
High energy, self-motivated, quick study with flexible nature.
Can observe and respond to people and situations and interact with others encountered in the course of work.
Can learn and apply new information or skills.
Must be able to read and interpret data, information, and documents.
Strong customer focus and commitment to customer satisfaction through prioritization, quality, efficiency and professionalism.
Ability to complete assignments with attention to detail and high degree of accuracy.
Proven ability to perform effectively in a demanding environment with changing workloads and deadlines.
Result driven-demonstrate ownership and accountability.
Identifies bottlenecks and drives improvements.
Work independently or as part of a team and follow through on assignments with minimal supervision.
Demonstrate open, clear, concise and professional communication.
Ability to establish and maintain cooperative working relationships with manager, co-workers and customer.
Work according to a strict set of procedures within the provided timelines.

Other information

Role within Office
Responsibilities:

Routinely required to sit; walk; talk; hear; use hands to keyboard, finger, handle, and feel; stoop, kneel, crouch, twist, reach, and stretch. Occasionally required to move around the campus.

Occasionally lift and/or move up to 20 pounds.

May require travel dependent on business needs.

Specific vision abilities required by this job include close vision, color vision, peripheral vision, depth perception, and ability to adjust focus.

EOE AA M/F/Veteran/Disability",3.9,"ASML
3.9","Wilton, CT",-1,10000+ Employees,1984,Company - Public,Electrical & Electronic Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$5 to $10 billion (USD),-1
240,Data Scientist II (Remote Work Location Available),$68k-$121k (Glassdoor Est.),"Purpose of Job
We are currently seeking a talented Data Scientist II for San Antonio Home Office II/III or Remote Work Location Available.

This role is designated for a Data Scientist who has proficient knowledge with applying modern advanced analytics methods (predictive modeling, Machine Learning, and optimization), as well as a solid grasp of the mathematics used for each method and strong Python coding skills to develop numerical models. The Data Scientist is expected to demonstrate the ability to effectively communicate (written and oral) complex analytical and technical concepts to both technical and non-technical employees. The Data Scientist for this role is expected to have experience working with time series/forecasting models.

Within defined guidelines and framework, uses techniques that integrate traditional and non-traditional datasets and method to enable analytical solutions. Applies predictive analytics, machine learning, simulation, and optimization techniques to generate management insights and enable customer-facing applications; participates in building analytical solutions leveraging internal and external applications to deliver value and create competitive advantage. Translates complex analytical and technical concepts to non-technical employees.
Job Requirements
Identifies and manages existing and emerging risks that stem from business activities and the job role.
Ensures risks associated with business activities are effectively identified, measured, monitored, and controlled.
Follows written risk and compliance policies and procedures for business activities.
In partnership with SMEs, learns to define the business problem and works with experienced data scientists to select the appropriate model.
Extracts features from structured and unstructured data (internal and external).
With guidance, conducts advanced analytics: predictive modeling, Machine Learning, and optimization.
Works with Data Engineering/IT partners to develop architectures for new products, services and features.
Explains complex models and outcomes to colleagues who are not data scientists.
Minimum Education:
Bachelors degree in Computer Science, Applied Mathematics, Quantitative Economics, Statistics, or related field or 4 additional years of related experience beyond the minimum required may be substituted in lieu of a degree.
Minimum Experience:
2 years of related experience and accountability for complex tasks and/or projects.
Proficient knowledge of the function/discipline and demonstrated application of knowledge, skills and abilities towards work products.
Proficient level of business acumen in the areas of the business operations, industry practices and emerging trends.
Strong coding skills in the dominant scripting language (such as Python).
Deep academic understanding of model assumptions. Solid grasp of statistics and mathematics.
Proficient knowledge of Data Science principals and experience with data science methodologies.
*Qualifications may warrant placement in a different job level*

When you apply for this position, you will be required to answer some initial questions. This will take approximately 5 minutes. Once you begin the questions you will not be able to finish them at a later time and you will not able to change your responses.

Preferred Experience:
Proficient knowledge with applying modern advanced analytics methods (predictive modeling, Machine Learning, and optimization).
Experience with Time Series/Forecasting Modeling.
Solid grasp of mathematics, with a strong foundation in calculus, linear algebra, probability, and statistics.
Strong Python coding skills to develop numerical models.
Demonstrated ability to effectively communicate (written and oral) complex analytical and technical concepts to both technical and non-technical employees.
The above description reflects the details considered necessary to describe the principal functions of the job and should not be construed as a detailed description of all the work requirements that may be performed in the job.

At USAA our employees enjoy one of the best benefits package in the business, including a flexible business casual or casual dress environment, comprehensive medical, dental and vision plans, along with wellness and wealth building programs. Additionally, our career path planning and continuing education will assist you with your professional goals.

USAA also offers a variety of on-site services and conveniences to help you manage your work and personal life, including seven cafeterias, two company stores and three fitness centers.

Relocation assistance is not available for this position.

For Internal Candidates:

Must complete 12 months in current position (from date of hire or date of placement), or must have managers approval prior to posting.

Last day for internal candidates to apply to the opening is 11/03/20 by 11:59 pm CST time.",3.7,"USAA
3.7","San Antonio, TX",-1,10000+ Employees,1922,Company - Private,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,$10+ billion (USD),-1
241,"Data Science Engineering, Machine Learning",$115k-$198k (Glassdoor Est.),"To get the best candidate experience, please consider applying for a maximum of 3 roles within 12 months to ensure you are not duplicating efforts.
Data Science Engineering, Machine Learning

Teams include: Analytics, Commerce, Einstein, IoT, Mulesoft (Integration Cloud), Search Relevance, Security, Service, Service Protection team, Marketing Cloud
Location: US (Relocation candidates)

In school, or graduated within the last 12 months? Please visit FutureForce for opportunities

Salesforce is looking for an exceptional engineer ideally with a dual background in machine learning and software engineering to help us take on one of the world’s most extensive data sets and transform it into amazing products that feel like magic. You will work on cutting-edge AI applications and products. Brainstorming data product ideas with data scientists and engineers to build data products used by hundreds of millions people every day.

Depending on the team, responsibilities may include:
Developing data infrastructure that ingest and transforms data from different sources and customers at scale.
Creating machine/deep learning infrastructure that generalizes across hundreds of thousands of Salesforce customers, but is expressive enough to generate high lift.
Design, develop, bring to production at a large scale and support “intelligence” features on a world-class search service that serves millions of requests daily on a diverse corpus of data including structured, unstructured and social feeds.
Deploy models at scale and assess impact from A/B testing (including interpretation of results).
Develop new relevance features and techniques build upon the latest results from the research community.

What we care about:
You have industry experience with writing production level code (e.g., Python, Scala, PySpark, Java) and taking ML models/ algorithms to production. Preference for 5+ years of industry experience (without PhD); at least 4+ years of industry experience with PhD. This is not an entry level / new college graduate role.
Self-starter who can see the big picture, and prioritize their work to make the largest impact on the business’ and customer’s vision and requirements.
Excellent communication & leadership.
We develop real products. You need to be an expert in coding, including Java and Object-Oriented Programming. We also use Scala and Functional Programming principles.
We prioritize professional industry experience; advanced degrees alone do not replace real world experience.
We have massive scale. You need to have experience in distributed, scalable systems. Consistency / availability tradeoffs are made here. You’ve tinkered with modern data storage, messaging, and processing tools (Kafka, Spark, Hadoop, Cassandra, etc.) and demonstrated experience designing and coding in big-data components such as HBase, DynamoDB, or similar.

Required Qualifications:
At least 4 years of hands-on professional industry experience in engineering positions focused on Machine Learning, Information Retrieval, Recommendation systems or Data Mining, Natural Language Processing, Learning to Rank.
Strong programming skills in Java, Python or Scala.
Strong knowledge of Object Oriented design, advanced algorithms, data structures, etc.

Preferred Qualifications:
Master’s or PhD in a relevant field and/or experience in any of the following is highly regarded: Computer Science, Machine Learning, Data Science and Modeling techniques including classification, regression and Bayesian analysis.
Experience with Agile software development and Test Driven Development methodologies.
Experience working with large datasets, preferably using tools like Hadoop, Spark, Pig or Hive.
Experience building Software as a Service (SaaS) applications.

We have a public-facing website https://www.getsalesforcebenefits.com/en that explains our various benefits, including wellbeing reimbursement, generous parental leave, adoption assistance, fertility benefits, and more. Visit for the full breakdown!

About Salesforce:
Salesforce, the Customer Success Platform and world's #1 CRM, empowers companies to connect with their customers in a whole new way. The company was founded on three disruptive ideas: a new technology model in cloud computing, a pay-as-you-go business model, and a new integrated corporate philanthropy model. These founding principles have taken our company to great heights, including being named one of Forbes’s “World’s Most Innovative Company” seven years in a row and #1 on the FORTUNE ‘100 Best Companies to Work For®’ List. We are the fastest growing of the top 10 enterprise software companies, and this level of growth equals incredible opportunities to grow a career at Salesforce. Together, with our whole Ohana (Hawaiian for “family”) made up of our employees, customers, partners and communities, we are working to improve the state of the world.
Accommodations - If you require assistance due to a disability applying for open positions please submit a request via this Accommodations Request Form.
Posting Statement
At Salesforce we believe that the business of business is to improve the state of our world. Each of us has a responsibility to drive Equality in our communities and workplaces. We are committed to creating a workforce that reflects society through inclusive programs and initiatives such as equal pay, employee resource groups, inclusive benefits, and more. Learn more about Equality at Salesforce and explore our benefits.
Salesforce.com and Salesforce.org are Equal Employment Opportunity and Affirmative Action Employers. Qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender perception or identity, national origin, age, marital status, protected veteran status, or disability status. Salesforce.com and Salesforce.org do not accept unsolicited headhunter and agency resumes. Salesforce.com and Salesforce.org will not pay any third-party agency or company that does not have a signed agreement with Salesfore.com or Salesforce.org.
Salesforce welcomes all.
Pursuant to the San Francisco Fair Chance Ordinance and the Los Angeles Fair Chance Initiative for Hiring, Salesforce will consider for employment qualified applicants with arrest and conviction records.",4.4,"MuleSoft
4.4","Palo Alto, CA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2006,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
242,Sr Electron Optics Engineer,$116k-$178k (Glassdoor Est.),"Introduction

ASML US brings together the most creative minds in science and technology to develop lithography machines that are key to producing faster, cheaper, more energy-efficient microchips. We design, develop, integrate, market and service these advanced machines, which enable our customers - the world’s leading chipmakers - to reduce the size and increase the functionality of their microchips, which in turn leads to smaller, more powerful consumer electronics. Our headquarters are in Veldhoven, the Netherlands, and we have 18 office locations around the United States including main offices in Chandler Arizona, San Jose and San Diego California, Wilton Connecticut, and Hillsboro Oregon.

Job Mission

The mission of the job is to overcome the challenges of semiconductor metrology and inspection. As an Electron Optics Engineer, you will play a key role in concept design and evaluation of e-beam metrology and inspection systems.

Job Description

Make conceptual electron optical design of scanning electron microscope for next generation e-beam metrology and inspection systems.
Simulate electron optical properties and performances of electron optics systems, and optimize design to meet system performance requirements. This includes simulation of electron source and electron optics column. Make detailed simulation and design reports.
Define requirements for electronic modules controlling the electron optics system based on simulation.
Design control methods for electron optical component.
Evaluate electronic and mechanical tolerance of electron optics system.
Develop new ideas to overcome design bottlenecks limiting the electron optical performance of the system.
Provide support to system integration team in troubleshooting for root causes.
Provide support to application engineers in developing new applications, live demonstration and result analysis.
Designing experiments for evaluating electron optics performance in system platform. Analyze data and characterize resolution, probe current, distortion, and other optical characteristics.
Provide input to system specification, system error budget and interfaces.

Education

Master’s degree or PhD in physics, applied physics or engineering.

Experience

Strong analytical power/skill and critical thinking.
Strong English communication skills – both written and oral, ability to influence.
Preferred qualifications:
Knowledge of charged particle optics and electron source theory. Hands-on experience in electron optics simulation tools.
Hands-on experience in Python or Matlab.
Hands-on experience in 3D electrostatic and magnetic system simulation tools such as COMSOL.
Hands-on experience in scanning electron microscopy, detector, e-beam metrology and inspection systems, vacuum systems, high voltage.
Hands-on experience in Python or Matlab.

Context of the position

Routinely required to sit; walk; talk; hear; use hands to keyboard, finger, handle, and feel; stoop, kneel, crouch, twist, reach, and stretch. Occasionally required to move around the campus.
Occasionally lift and/or move up to 20 pounds.
May require travel (specify domestic and/or international) dependent on business needs – specify percentage of travel.
Specific vision abilities required by this job include close vision, color vision, peripheral vision, depth perception, and ability to adjust focus.
Can observe and respond to people and situations and interact with others encountered in the course of work.
Can learn and apply new information or skills.
Must be able to read and interpret data, information, and documents.
Strong customer focus and commitment to customer satisfaction through prioritization, quality, efficiency and professionalism.
Ability to complete assignments with attention to detail and high degree of accuracy.
Proven ability to perform effectively in a demanding environment with changing workloads and deadlines.
Result driven-demonstrate ownership and accountability.
Identifies bottlenecks and drives improvements.
Work independently or as part of a team and follow through on assignments with minimal supervision.
Demonstrate open, clear, concise and professional communication.
Ability to establish and maintain cooperative working relationships with manager, co-workers and customer.
Work according to a strict set of procedures within the provided timelines.

Other information

EOE AA M/F/Veteran/Disability",3.9,"ASML
3.9","San Jose, CA",-1,10000+ Employees,1984,Company - Public,Electrical & Electronic Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$5 to $10 billion (USD),-1
243,"Sr ML SW Engineer, flex US",$172k-$290k (Glassdoor Est.),"eBay is looking for a Senior Machine Learning Software Engineer, location flexible in US.

As a lead full-stack and data engineer in the platform team you have knowledge and ideas on how to develop innovative solutions smartly. The platform is being built by a team that has the culture and the environment technologists find at a startup. We would like to add outstanding software engineers with strong development experience in building scalable and geo-distributed solutions and experience in working with production infrastructure.

Responsibilities:

Partner with data scientists, sales, marketing, operation, and product teams to build and deploy machine learning models that unlock growth.

Build machine learning models to analyze user traffic patterns, perform path analysis and understand the reasons on exiting the site before completing the transactions.

Collaborate and Interface with cross-functional teams, Product Management, Technical Support, Documentation and various stakeholders Analyze/Refine Requirements with Product Management.

Design, implement, review and troubleshoot highly scalable software.

Join a group of passionate people committed to delivering “happiness” to our users and to each other.

Work with the leads to implement features, going from brain storming sessions to converging on a design and ultimately building a production-ready product usable by end customers.

Design and implement production-ready features in a fast-pace environment with focus on scalability, performance, geo distribution, and availability.

Rollout features at the pace of business changes and requirements, iterating to improve the quality and the robustness.

Passion to bring out innovative ideas and try out new solutions, while being open minded to feedback from the team.

Relentless focus on quality and automation, and provide support to customers of the platform.

Work with engineering management to scope and plan engineering efforts.

Design and implement core, high-performance, scalable software components.

Own and optimize eBay Traffic data architecture to address the data needs of our rapidly growing business.

Build custom integrations between cloud-based systems using APIs.

Write complex and efficient queries to transform raw data sources into easily accessible models by coding across several languages such as Java, Python, and SQL.

Architect, build, and launch new data models that provide intuitive analytics to the team

Build data expertise and own data quality for the pipelines you create.

Requirements:

Background in Computer Science, Math, Statistics, or a related field.

6 + years of industry experience leading and building ML infrastructure at scale.

Deep knowledge in infrastructure, systems, and good understanding of low-level Software concepts and scaling practices.

Proficiency in a programming language such as Java, NodeJS, Python, Kafka, strong foundations in Data structures and algorithms.

Solid understanding of Computer science fundamentals, interested in distributed in distributed systems, scalability and open sources systems.

Experience in Test-driven development, design and code reviews.

Strong understanding of Java concurrency and architecture.

Experience in triaging production issues and resolve diligently.

Hands-on experience in designing and developing front end website architecture.

Build rock-solid and scalable back-end infrastructure.

Seeing through a project from conception to finished product.

Designing and developing Back-end APIs.

Good problem-solving skills and attention to detail.

Proficiency with fundamental front-end languages such as HTML, CSS and JavaScript.

Efficiency with JavaScript frameworks such as Angular JS, React.

Nice to have:

Knowledge of machine learning (particularly hyperparameter tuning and debugging).

Experience serving models using a variety of ML model frameworks like Tensorflow, PyTorch, Sci-kit Learn, etc.

Good understanding in Elastic Search, Logstash, Grafana/Kibana to build dashboards.

Good experience in Machine Learning algorithms, No SQL concepts, CI, CD etc.,

Experience building Native Applications for IOS and Android.

Interacting with databases for functionality.

Ensuring cross-platform optimization for mobile phones.

eBay Inc. is an equal opportunity employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, national origin, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, veteran status, and disability, or other legally protected status. If you are unable to submit an application because of incompatible assistive technology or a disability, please contact us at talent@ebay.com . We will make every effort to respond to your request for disability assistance as soon as possible.
For more information see: EEO is the Law Poster and EEO is the Law Poster Supplement

This website uses cookies to enhance your experience. By continuing to browse the site, you agree to our use of cookies
View our privacy policy and accessibility info",3.8,"eBay Inc.
3.8","San Jose, CA",-1,10000+ Employees,1995,Company - Public,Internet,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),-1
244,Digital Signal Processing (DSP) Engineer 1,-1,"DSP Engineer 1

NSBU | Melbourne, FL, United States

Why Join Rincon Research Corporation (RRC)?

At Rincon Research Corporation, our primary business is innovating, developing, and fielding digital signal processing (DSP) products and services for the United States Defense and Intelligence Communities in support of national security.

Rincon Research Corporation seeks a candidate that has experience in radar, SAR, interferometry, or image processing. Candidate must be comfortable with algorithm development in both time and frequency domains.

Come join the team that is creating cutting edge signal processing, geolocation, and communication systems for the future!

What are the primary responsibilities in the DSP Engineer I position?

Candidate will be responsible for developing cutting edge algorithms within a heterogeneous software environment containing code in Python, MATLAB, C++ and Java. Machine Learning, Cloud Technology, and software skills are desired. Good communication skills, with ability to interact with remote co-workers are important. Looking for people able to find creative and cutting-edge solutions for government customers.

What required background will make you successful?
Bachelor’s degree in Electrical Engineering, Applied Math, or other equivalent field of discipline
Demonstrated capability in scientific programming of high-level language on Unix/Linux platforms
Ability to obtain and maintain TS/SCI security clearance
US CITIZENSHIP REQUIRED
Where is the position located?

This position is located at our Melbourne, FL office.

What benefits does RRC offer?
100% employer-paid premiums for family medical and dental insurance, employee life insurance, short-term and long-term disability (STD & LTD)
Flexible reimbursement spending accounts for medical expense and dependent care
Immediate participation and vesting in the company’s Employee Stock Ownership Plan (ESOP) and 401(k) Plan
Employer contributions to RRC’s ESOP
Employer matching contributions to the company’s 401( k) Plan
Employer discretionary contributions to the company’s 401(k) Plan
Rincon Research Corporation is an equal opportunity employer and considers qualified applicants for employment without regard to race, color, creed, religion, national origin, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity and expression, age, disability, veteran status, or any other protected factor.",4.1,"Rincon Research Corporation
4.1","Melbourne, FL",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1983,Company - Private,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
245,Mechanical Engineer,-1,"Job Summary*
Atmospheric Plasma Solutions (APS) offers a tremendous opportunity to join a fast-growing company bringing to market innovative and unique products using our patented plasma technologies. The APS management team is seeking a mid to senior level Mechanical Engineer. You will design and validate specialized equipment for industrial and government applications. This will include original designs and design improvements of plasma generating equipment used for surface etching, semiconductor fabrication, food processing, and environmental applications. You will work with other talented engineers designing equipment that produces high frequency and high voltages up to 80kV at power levels from 100W to 100kW. Thermal modeling and analysis will be used to guide the equipment designs as well as considerations to withstand vibrational and mechanical shocks delivered to the equipment. A good knowledge of thermal and vibrational analysis and design is required. Fluent knowledge of 3D CAD/CAM software and prototyping as well as design for manufacturing is required. Knowledge of basic packaging to effectively control component temperatures within specified limits and knowledge of design methodologies to control radiated and conducted EMI is a plus. Knowledge of designing equipment with considerations to the presence of high voltages, high frequencies, and high powers is a plus.

This opening offers valuable, hands-on experience to creatively develop unique plasma technologies within a nimble and diverse development team.
Senior Mechanical Engineer*
The Senior Mechanical Engineer is responsible for the design and development of mechatronic products according to customer requirements and internal guidelines while coordinating mechanical development between different.
Responsibilities
Perform requirements analysis and prepare mechanical and system specifications.
Support Systems Engineering by deriving system requirements.
Develop and design high quality, modifiable 2D and 3D models in SolidWorks 2020.
Utilize CAD/CAM software to generate toolpaths for Haas VF2 machining centers.
Understand and perform thermal FEA analyses on generated 3D models.
Perform and review tolerance calculations of designs.
Utilize design for manufacturing/assembly (DFM/A) practices
Correct and analyze existing drawings add to company database as needed.
Actively participate in the FMEA process.
3D modeling and optimization of printed circuit board (PCB) layouts and BOM generation
Contribute to 3P workshops, lessons learned, and design reviews.
Support the assigned projects by taking on responsibilities for planning activities.
Coordinate mechanical engineering with external and offshore resources and review work products to ensure they meet design requirements.
Perform new component introduction, dimension inspection review, and PPAP approval.
Perform testing and evaluation of theoretical designs; recommend modifications based on results.
Serve as technical resource for assigned new and existing products, equipment, and tooling.
Research solutions to technical problems and recommend cost effective resolution approaches.
Develop and assist in customer presentations related to new product development and/or product modifications and enhancements.
Other duties as assigned by manager.
Required Qualifications: *
Bachelor’s Degree in Mechanical Engineering (Electromechanical Engineering, Industrial Engineering, or other related engineering disciplines will also be considered)
6+ years of related experience in mechanical design engineering with understanding of mechanical development methods including 3D modeling, 2D creation, CAD analyses, GD&T, and tolerance calculations
Computer skills, including the use of CAD software – SolidWorks 2020 highly preferred
Understanding of manufacturing processes, manufacturing quality tools, the DFMEA process, and fabrication technologies
Strong analytical, numerical, and reasoning abilities
Experience with Agile PLM, SAP, and DOORS is preferred
Basic management skills, including planning and organization, decision making, problem solving, and project management
Advanced verbal communication skills, including group presentation
Ability to establish and maintain effective working relationships with managers, supervisors, and employees
Ability to prepare complex written reports and other documents
Ability to understand complex problems and collaborate with others to provide effective solutions
Ability to comprehend complex verbal and written instructions
Knowledge of government and industry certification is a plus
Demonstrate past use of basic office SW like spread sheets, text editors, lab data reduction
US Citizen or Permanent Resident to allow work on ITAR restricted projects
Travel: *
Ability to travel both domestically and internationally, mostly local, as needed required (~10%)
Physical Demands: *
Ability to sit for extended periods
Ability to stand and walk for extended periods
Ability to use close vision, color vision, and depth perception for extended periods
Ability to regularly lift and/or move objects weighing up to 10 lbs
Ability to occasionally lift and/or move objects weighing up to 50 lbs
Job Type: Full-time
Pay: $75,000.00 - $100,000.00 per year

Benefits:
Dental Insurance
Health Insurance
Paid Time Off
Vision Insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Experience:
3D modeling and optimization of PCB layouts: 5 years (Preferred)
CAD/CAM software: 5 years (Required)
Develop 2D and 3D models in SolidWorks 2020.: 5 years (Preferred)
Education:
Bachelor's (Required)
Work Location:
One location
Company's website:
www.apsplasma.com
Benefit Conditions:
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
No",-1,"Atmospheric Plasma Solutions, Inc.","Cary, NC",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
246,Data Scientist,-1,"At Acxiom, our vision is to transform data into value for everyone. Our data products and analytical services enable marketers to recognize, better understand, and then deliver highly applicable messages to consumers across any available channel. The Audience Solutions division is responsible for enabling true people-based marketing with identity resolution and rich descriptive and predictive audience segmentation. We are seeking an experienced Data Scientist with a versatile skill set to undertake data science supporting the development of next-generation products for Acxiom’s business. As part of the Audience Solutions Analytic COE, the Data Scientist will work hands-on with Machine Learning and Big Data technologies and build scalable machine learning data products and solutions for our domestic and global businesses. The Data Scientist’s responsibilities include collaborating with internal and external stakeholders to identify insight requirements and applying creativity to test hypotheses, prepare data, build models, analyze and visualize results and integrate the solution into innovative data products. The Data Scientist will be a champion of the latest and greatest Machine Learning and Artificial Intelligence technologies.

This role can be homebased in the US>

At Acxiom, our vision is to transform data into value for everyone. Our data products and analytical services enable marketers to recognize, better understand, and then deliver highly applicable messages to consumers across any available channel. The Audience Solutions division is responsible for enabling true people-based marketing with identity resolution and rich descriptive and predictive audience segmentation. We are seeking an experienced Data Scientist with a versatile skill set to undertake data science supporting the development of next-generation products for Acxiom’s business.

As part of the Audience Solutions Analytic COE, the Data Scientist will work hands-on with Machine Learning and Big Data technologies and build scalable machine learning data products and solutions for our domestic and global businesses. The Data Scientist’s responsibilities include collaborating with internal and external stakeholders to identify insight requirements and applying creativity to test hypotheses, prepare data, build models, analyze and visualize results and integrate the solution into innovative data products. The Data Scientist will be a champion of the latest and greatest Machine Learning and Artificial Intelligence technologies.

What You Will Do:
Apply state-of-the-art algorithms relying on knowledge of statistical modeling, machine learning, and optimization to develop new data products or improve the performance/quality of existing products
Build, evaluate and optimize models which incorporate machine learning and artificial intelligence
Collaborate with internal and external stakeholders to understand business and insight goals, define a learning agenda, and identify relevant KPIs and diagnostics to pursue
Collaborate with other data scientists and team leads to define project requirements including data sources, algorithms, and implementation
Build expert knowledge of the various data sources brought together for audience segmentation solutions – survey/panel data, 3rd-party data (demographics, psychographics, lifestyle segments), media content activity (TV, Digital, Mobile), and product purchase or transaction data
Work with Product and Engineering teams to transition development projects to production systems
Prepare and present compelling analytical presentations and effectively communicate complex concepts to marketing and business audiences
Provide mentorship and guidance to data scientists where necessary
What You Will Need:
Experience with applying statistics and data science tools on large datasets
Deep knowledge of supervised vs. unsupervised learning algorithms, including neural networks/deep learning, SVM, decision trees (bagging, random forests, boosting), clustering, regression, and dimensionality reduction techniques
Expert at model training approaches, hyperparameter tuning, tuning learning rates, and model evaluation approaches
Extensive experience with data preparation (normalization, scaling, etc.) for modeling
Exposure to Python or R libraries for machine learning
Exposure to Spark/ PySpark systems in a distributed computing environment
SQL mastery, including techniques for writing efficient code over large datasets
Experience using Hadoop stack, including Hive and Impala. Knowledge of Apache-based open source technologies such as Storm, Cassandra, Ruby, etc. a plus
Ability to leverage critical data-driven thinking and enthusiasm for translating data into actionable insight to generate consistently accurate and useful analysis and models
Balances desire for quantitative rigor with realities of inconsistent business data
Attention to detail and time management delivering high-quality work for multiple projects across several engagements while meeting deadlines
Bachelor's Degree in a quantitative field (Data Science, Statistics, Math) or related degree programs and 8+ years of relevant work experience OR Master's Degree in a quantitative field and 6+ years of relevant work experience
#GD17


Primary Location City/State:

Homebased - Conway, Arkansas

Additional Locations (if applicable):

Acxiom is an affirmative action and equal opportunity employer (AA/EOE/W/M/Vet/Disabled) and does not discriminate in recruiting, hiring, training, promotion or other employment of associates or the awarding of subcontracts because of a person's race, color, sex, age, religion, national origin, protected veteran, disability, sexual orientation, gender identity, genetics or other protected status.",3.9,"Acxiom
3.9",Remote,-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1969,Subsidiary or Business Segment,IT Services,Information Technology,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
247,Senior Data Scientist,$112k-$182k (Glassdoor Est.),"Join our team dedicated to developing and executing innovative solutions in support of customer mission success.

Job Description:

Novetta is seeking a Senior Data Scientist to develop innovative solutions for customers and internal product teams. We look to rapidly prototype solutions and deploy the most promising of them. We identify and leverage the latest techniques (fast.ai is a team favorite) so that our customers can stay one step ahead. On every project you'll learn something new (and likely teach us something as well).

Responsibilities include:
Develop solutions spanning multiple subject areas, from NLP to image and video.
Maintain awareness of state-of-the-art machine learning and techniques, methods and platforms, including commercial and open source.
Implement, configure and test machine learning and deep learning libraries and platforms (e.g. fast.ai, TensorFlow, Keras, XGBoost, LightGBM).
Test solutions on AWS using services such as SageMaker, EC2, and Snowball Edge.
Write blog posts and presentations that clearly communicate complex machine learning concepts to both technical and non-technical audiences.
Contribute to visually-appealing, web-enabled prototype applications that illustrate relevant machine learning capabilities.
Basic Qualifications:
Experience with Python (2+ years).
Experience with machine learning or statistics (2+ years).
Ability to work both independently and collaboratively.
High levels of curiosity, creativity, and problem-solving capabilities.
Strong written and verbal communication skills.
Comfortable navigating the command line.
Desired Skills:
Research experience in machine learning specific to natural language processing, computer vision, or deep learning.
Experience with managing data and creating algorithms using AWS.
Experience with R, Java, or other programming languages.
Security Clearance:
Active TS/SCI with polygraph required.
Novetta, from complexity to clarity.

Novetta delivers highly scalable advanced analytics and secure technology solutions to address challenges of national and global significance. Focused on mission success, Novetta pioneers disruptive technologies in machine learning, data analytics, full-spectrum cyber, cloud engineering, open source analytics, and multi-INT fusion for Defense, Intelligence Community, and Federal Law Enforcement customers. Novetta is headquartered in McLean, VA with over 1,000 employees across the U.S.

Our culture is shaped by a commitment to our core values:

Integrity • We hold ourselves accountable to the highest standards of integrity and ethics.

Customer Success • We strive daily to exceed expectations and achieve customer mission success.

Employee Focus • We invest in our employees' professional development and training, respecting individuality and fostering a culture of diversity and inclusion.

Innovation • We know that discovering new and innovative ways to solve problems is critical to our success and makes us a great company.

Excellence in Execution • We take pride in flawless execution as we build a company that is best in class.


Earn a REFERRAL BONUS for the qualified people you know.
For more details or to submit a referral, visit bit.ly/NovettaReferrals.

Novetta is an equal opportunity/affirmative action employer.
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to sex, gender identity, sexual orientation, race, color, religion, national origin, disability, protected veteran status, age, or any other characteristic protected by law.",4.6,"Novetta
4.6","Herndon, VA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2012,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
248,Software Engineer - Machine Learning,-1,"Our customers are inundated with information from news articles, video feeds, social media and more. We're looking to help them parse through it faster and focus on the information that's most important that allows them to make better decisions. We're in the process of building a next-generation analysis and exploitation platform for video, audio, documents, and social media data. This platform will help users identify, discover and triage information via a UI that leverages best in class speech-to-text, machine translation, image recognition, OCR, and entity extraction services.

We're looking for software engineers with experience in machine learning tools and techniques. They will be expected to work in a collaborative environment, able to communicate well with their teammates and customers. This is a great opportunity to work with a high-performing team in a fun environment.

At BTI360, we're passionate about building great software and developing our people. Software doesn't build itself; teams of people do. That's why our primary focus is on developing better engineers, better teammates, and better leaders. By putting people first, we give our teammates more opportunities to grow and raise the bar of the software we develop.

Interested in learning more? Apply today! We promise to review your application within one week and let you know where you stand.

Required Skills/Experience:
U.S. Citizenship - Must have or be able to obtain a security clearance
Bachelors Degree in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, Electrical Engineering or related field
Experience with Java, Kotlin, or Scala
Experience with scripting languages (Python, Bash, etc.)
Experience with object-oriented software development
Experience working within a UNIX/Linux environment
Experience with data analytics and Machine Learning
Experience with Data and Natural Language Processing tools (e.g. Spark, Sci-kit Learn, OpenNLP, TensorFlow)
Experience with analysis of algorithms, software, and software architectures
Works well in a team environment
Strong communication skills
Desired Skills:
Experience with massively parallel processing systems like Spark or Hadoop
Familiarity in the AWS ecosystem of services (EMR, EKS, RDS, Kinesis, EC2, Lambda, CloudWatch)
Experience working with recommendation engines (Spark MLlib, Apache Mahout, etc.)
Experience building custom machine learning models with TensorFlow
Experience with Kubernetes and/or Docker container environment
Experience with search technologies (Solr, ElasticSearch, Lucene)Experience with massively parallel processing systems like Spark or Hadoop

BTI360 is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or veteran status, or any other protected class.",4.9,"BTI360
4.9","Ashburn, VA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2004,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
249,Sr. Systems Engineer,$62k-$125k (Glassdoor Est.),"Job Title: Sr. Systems Engineer
Location: Wilsonville, OR
Department: Engineering
Job Type: Full-Time

DWFritz

DWFritz Automation has been engineering and building precision automation solutions for over 45 years. In the last 10 years, we have grown our global footprint with employees and clients in the U.S., Asia, and Europe, while diversifying the industries we serve.

What’s our secret to success?
We're the company that can solve the challenges that nobody else can. We do so by hiring incredibly talented employees who innovate through team-work.

Why would you want to work here?
We are a progressive company that continually strives towards being world-class in our practices, cutting-edge with our technology, and empowering with our leadership. We believe in big things, because we believe in our employees who impress us every day with their ideas and their execution.

Our World Headquarters operates from a modern, state-of-the-art facility located in Wilsonville, Oregon. Our employees enjoy standing desks, a recreation room, a fitness room, and a hearty oatmeal breakfast to start each day. Our spacious lunch room is the venue for weekly All Staff meetings and our frequent “Lunch and Learns.”

We also know how to have fun at DWFritz. From ping-pong tournaments and monthly socials to working with our community through our RISE program and paid volunteer day, we know well how to work and play together. We hope you get the chance to visit our building and experience a culture that is unlike any other.

Your Challenge

To lead cross-functional technical teams responsible for the design and performance of complex custom automation equipment from concept through release, manufacturing, customer acceptance, installation and customer follow-up.

Your Responsibilities
Prepare innovative design concepts and/or analysis critical to success of projects through application of modeling techniques to support system requirements, design, analysis, verification and validation activities beginning in the conceptual design phase and continuing throughout development and later life cycle phases.
Coordinate mechanical, electrical, software, controls, and applications engineering disciplines for the execution of custom automation projects to meet the technical requirements.
First responder for customer facing electro-mechanical automation machines, with minimal notice for international travel as needed. Sometimes lasting 3-4 weeks or longer as needed.
Excellent root cause analysis and problem solving with minimal direction and customer interaction.
Self-motivated and pace setter for rapid resolution and customer satisfaction.
Business acumen when it comes to solution based decision making and issue resolution.
Able to lead technical teams of up to 10 technicians and engineers through issue resolution and root cause determination, and maintain customer facing relations and updates as frequently as required.
Provide technical guidance for preventative actions to reduce and eliminate issues that take away from sustaining manufacturing with extremely high machine uptime and process capability.
Create test plans for acceptance testing (i.e. IAT, FAT, and SAT) to optimize and satisfy customer based requirements, while meeting functional and performance requirements.

Your Qualifications
Familiarity and competency with statistical analysis, including a deep knowledge and application of gage R&R and process capability.
Familiarity with cameras, optics, and lighting for challenging vision applications.
Demonstrated track record of success throughout the full project life cycle (definition, development, validation, and manufacturing).
Solidworks and PDM proficiency preferred.
Strong sense of personal accountability and performance orientation.
Strong work ethic, highly results oriented and high tolerance for ambiguity.
Excellent problem solving skills that incorporate data and statistics to determine corrective and preventative actions.
Must be able to work with and lead technical teams through influence rather than position.
Demonstrated customer focus and orientation to creating value for the customer.
Organizationally nimble, able to navigate the customer and internal organizations.
Excellent verbal and written communication skills, questioning/listening skills, and presentation skills.
Ability to communicate complex and technical concepts to non-experts.
Willingness to travel internationally up to 20% of time, for durations of 3-4 weeks or as needed, occasionally with little advanced notice. Must possess a valid passport.

Your Education and Experience
Bachelor’s degree Engineering required, advanced degree desirable.
Recent 10+ years engineering experience with 5+ years' experience as a systems engineer in the machine design / automation industry with combination of design, debug, and production support.
Technical expert in at least one of the following disciplines, direct experience with 3+, and working knowledge 5+:
Precision Mechanical Design
Stepper and Servo motor (position encoder) debug and problem resolution
Motion control
Robotics
Conveyance
Algorithm design
EE analog circuit design
EE mixed signal design
EE digital design
Optical systems
Machine vision and vision tools -- Cognex a plus
Metrology
Firmware development
Object Oriented SW development
GAMP 5 or equivalent experience

Equal Opportunity

DWFritz is an equal opportunity employer. In accordance with applicable law, the company prohibits discrimination based on race, color, religion, creed, gender, pregnancy or related medical conditions, age, national origin or ancestry, physical or mental disability, sexual orientation, genetic information, uniformed service or any other consideration protected by federal state and local laws. Our commitment to equal opportunity employment applies to all persons involved in our operations and prohibits unlawful discrimination by any employee.

DWFritz is not currently sponsoring work visas for this role. Authorization to work in the U.S. is required to be considered.",3.4,"DWFritz
3.4","Wilsonville, OR",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1973,Company - Private,Electrical & Electronic Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
250,System Integrator & Performance Analyst Design Engineer,$61k-$92k (Glassdoor Est.),"Introduction

ASML US brings together the most creative minds in science and technology to develop lithography machines that are key to producing faster, cheaper, more energy-efficient microchips. We design, develop, integrate, market and service these advanced machines, which enable our customers - the world’s leading chipmakers - to reduce the size and increase the functionality of their microchips, which in turn leads to smaller, more powerful consumer electronics. Our headquarters are in Veldhoven, the Netherlands, and we have 18 office locations around the United States including main offices in Chandler Arizona, San Jose and San Diego California, Wilton Connecticut, and Hillsboro Oregon.

Job Mission

ASML’s Wafer Alignment Sensor department, Functional group in Wilton CT is seeking a Physicist/Engineer to support and develop optical / photonic sensor systems used within ASML’s photolithography tools. These systems typically include light sources, detectors, optical and electro-optical components, fiber optics, electronics and signal processing software functioning in close collaboration with the rest of the lithography system. Understanding the components in their relation to the sensor system and understanding the interaction with the rest of the lithography tool and the measurement process is of fundamental importance.

ASML has multiple positions available for this role.The job description below defines the ideal set of qualifications for the position.

This position requires access to controlled technology, as defined in the Export Administration Regulations (15 C.F.R. § 730, et seq.). Qualified candidates must be legally authorized to access such controlled technology prior to beginning work. Business demands may require ASML to proceed with applicants who are immediately eligible to access controlled technology.

Job Description

Key components of this position are:

Using Physics, Mathematics, Electronics, Mechanics, and Software knowledge and an understanding of the sensor systems and the lithography tool to model, design and de-bug new and existing sensors in complex environments (lithography equipment integrated in a wafer fab):

Physical and geometric modelling.
Simulation in Matlab and other suitable languages and design tools.
Complex algorithm development.
Test planning and experimental setup.
Dataanalysis and visualization including FFT, PSD’s and correlation investigations.
Optimization routines for system improvement.
Design of calibration algorithms and associated software.
Statistical process control.
Image processing and pattern recognition.
Sensor and camera calibration.
Signal processing.
Coordinate transformations and geometric compensation.
Tolerance analysis and Monte Carlo methods.
Error budgeting.
Systems engineering.
Leadership:
the candidate must have the capacity to lead engineers and technicians in executing activities related to complex tests, data gathering, and effectively communicate results to managers and customers.
Problem Solving:

the candidate must demonstrate ability of independent thinking and skills of problem solving; must have expertise at troubleshooting complex problems by analyzing various potential root causes, develop and debug algorithms;the candidate must have the ability to use analytical processes (8Ds, fault trees, Ishikawa diagrams, etc…) to develop test plans to determine problem root cause.
Communication:

The candidate must have the capability to clearly communicating progress and status of ongoing investigations to managers and to customers;Candidate will be required to write reports documenting investigations carried out.
Integration:

Previous experience in R&D and integration is not required, but a plus.
Software scripting:

MATLAB and Python.
Travel:

Nominal travel ( ~ 15%) to Europe, Asia, and within the US can be expected on a routine basis.
Education

Minimum:MS in Optical engineering, Physics,Applied Mathematics, Electrical Engineering or other Engineering discipline, with an emphasis on optical system, photonics, electronics or software design and analysis, or equivalent experience.

Experience
Dual degree in a second engineering discipline a plus.
Three to five years of experience required.
Experience in working with engineers across disciplines to solve complex problems in a timely manner.
Strong emphasis on creative problem solving and effective communication.
Candidate must:

Be able to break down complex problems with limited data to come to solutions – strong critical thinking capability.
Have strong written and oral communication skills and a commitment to achieving results while under time constraints.
Have high energy, high level of dedication.
Be willing to jump in on new issues, get to the bottom of the causes and propose practical solutions.
A working knowledge of MatLab and/or Labview for data collection and analysis to drive solutions.
Be competent in and/or have affinity with: optical design and electro-optical devices, detection electronics, electrical and SW data processing.
Be able to interface with multidisciplinary groups and work effectively in a team and be willing to take on responsibility, follow through and keep multiple simultaneous assignments on schedule.
Be able to quickly acquire technical knowledge from documentation and on-the-job training and be capable of thoroughly investigating technical issues (analytically and hands-on in a lab).
Personal skills
Can observe and respond to people and situations and interact with others encountered in the course of work.
Can learn and apply new information or skills.
Must be able to read and interpret data, information, and documents.
Strong customer focus and commitment to customer satisfaction through prioritization, quality, efficiency and professionalism.
Ability to complete assignments with attention to detail and high degree of accuracy.
Proven ability to perform effectively in a demanding environment with changing workloads and deadlines.
Result driven-demonstrate ownership and accountability.
Identifies bottlenecks and drives improvements.
Work independently or as part of a team and follow through on assignments with minimal supervision.
Demonstrate open, clear, concise and professional communication.
Ability to establish and maintain cooperative working relationships with manager, co-workers and customer.
Work according to a strict set of procedures within the provided timelines.
Other information

Role within Office

Responsibilities:

Routinely required to sit; walk; talk; hear; use hands to keyboard, finger, handle, and feel; stoop, kneel, crouch, twist, reach, and stretch. Occasionally required to move around the campus.
Occasionally lift and/or move up to 20 pounds.
May require travel dependent on business needs.
Specific vision abilities required by this job include close vision, color vision, peripheral vision, depth perception, and ability to adjust focus.

EOE AA M/F/Veteran/Disability

Internal Reference: #LI-KG1",3.9,"ASML
3.9","Wilton, CT",-1,10000+ Employees,1984,Company - Public,Electrical & Electronic Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$5 to $10 billion (USD),-1
251,Mechatronics Design Engineer @ASML,$64k-$96k (Glassdoor Est.),"Introduction

ASML US brings together the most creative minds in science and technology to develop lithography machines that are key to producing faster, cheaper, more energy-efficient microchips. We design, develop, integrate, market and service these advanced machines, which enable our customers - the world’s leading chipmakers - to reduce the size and increase the functionality of their microchips, which in turn leads to smaller, more powerful consumer electronics. Our headquarters are in Veldhoven, the Netherlands, and we have 18 office locations around the United States including main offices in Chandler Arizona, San Jose and San Diego California, Wilton Connecticut, and Hillsboro Oregon.

Job Mission

ASML is seeking a recent graduate to join our Mechatronics / Robotics Design Engineer to join the Wilton, CT development location as we break new ground in the emerging field photolithography. As ASML pushes the boundaries of Nano-technology beyond current state of the art, we have developed a need to develop high precision equipment while maintaining a focus on cost effectiveness and reliability. We are looking for someone to help pioneer knowledge in this developing area.

This position requires access to controlled technology, as defined in the Export Administration Regulations (15 C.F.R. § 730, et seq.). Qualified candidates must be legally authorized to access such controlled technology prior to beginning work. Business demands may require ASML to proceed with applicants who are immediately eligible to access controlled technology.

Job Description
Developing hardware with a cross sector team all related aspects such as dynamics,controls, translating stages, linear motors, sensors, etc.
Responsible for “sustaining engineering” tasks, resolving equipment design issues in a timely fashion as they arise at customer sites.
Participation of concept design studies for next generation equipment and subsystems.
Take direction from ASML System Architects and Senior Engineering mentors who are leading the development effort of critical large capital equipment.
Exposure to multi-disciplinary projects, such as imaging or optical systems preferred but not required.

Education

BS / MS / PhD in Mechatronics, Mechanical Engineering, Robotics, or a related field with 0 – 5 years of experience, or equivalent experience.

Experience
Recent graduate with a Mechatronics engineering background or specialization in closely related areas such as robotics or other fields.
Knowledge of “classical control theory” and “digital control theory” including frequency domain, stability (Nyquist / Bode plots), Velocity-Acceleration-Jerk (VAJ), feedback / feedforward, dynamics, gain and phase, transfer functions, continuous / discrete feedback control, real time controls, etc.
Experience with understanding and troubleshooting legacy designs to determine potential risks, failure modes, and corrective actions.
Basic experience with mechatronics behavior predictive modeling and methods in MATLAB / SIMULINK or similar tools, including “first principle” engineering equations and other techniques, particularly with their applications to control system simulation and implementation.
Strong skills in proof of concept development and design of experiments for a wide range of project needs.
Ability to run complex mechatronic systems for test and qualification of design changes.
Demonstrated ability to derive conclusions from analysis and to make practical recommendations.

Personal skills
Strong technical writing and communication skills, including the ability to present results based on strong statistical evidence to audiences of a wide range of technical abilities.
Customer oriented team player willing to work with high level problem solvers on a daily basis.
Genuine interest in mechatronics engineering, and analysis, as well as in developing precision systems that can perform reliably at customer sites.
High energy, self-motivated, quick study with flexible nature.
Customer-centric personal ethos.
Self-motivated team player with strong desire to learn and ability to handle multiple projects and tasks concurrently and with minimal guidance.
High potential to develop into a technical or personal leader in the organization.
Can observe and respond to people and situations and interact with others encountered in the course of work.
Can learn and apply new information or skills.
Must be able to read and interpret data, information, and documents.
Strong customer focus and commitment to customer satisfaction through prioritization, quality, efficiency and professionalism.
Ability to complete assignments with attention to detail and high degree of accuracy.
Proven ability to perform effectively in a demanding environment with changing workloads and deadlines.
Result driven-demonstrate ownership and accountability.
Identifies bottlenecks and drives improvements.
Work independently or as part of a team and follow through on assignments with minimal supervision.
Demonstrate open, clear, concise and professional communication.
Ability to establish and maintain cooperative working relationships with manager, co-workers and customer.
Work according to a strict set of procedures within the provided timelines.

Other information

ASML Offers:

A challenging opportunity to expand your knowledge in a wide variety of engineering application areas and to work on problems spanning all technical fields.
Highly creative and qualified teams with a diversity of experience.
Great career opportunities at a quickly growing high-tech company.
World class technical problems to solve.

Role within Office
Responsibilities:

Routinely required to sit; walk; talk; hear; use hands to keyboard, finger, handle, and feel; stoop, kneel, crouch, twist, reach, and stretch. Occasionally required to move around the campus.
Occasionally lift and/or move up to 20 pounds.
May require travel dependent on business needs.
Specific vision abilities required by this job include close vision, color vision, peripheral vision, depth perception, and ability to adjust focus.

EOE AA M/F/Veteran/Disability",3.9,"ASML
3.9","Wilton, CT",-1,10000+ Employees,1984,Company - Public,Electrical & Electronic Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$5 to $10 billion (USD),-1
252,Sr. Applications Engineer,$53k-$89k (Glassdoor Est.),"Introduction

ASML US brings together the most creative minds in science and technology to develop lithography machines that are key to producing faster, cheaper, more energy-efficient microchips. We design, develop, integrate, market and service these advanced machines, which enable our customers - the world’s leading chipmakers - to reduce the size and increase the functionality of their microchips, which in turn leads to smaller, more powerful consumer electronics. Our headquarters are in Veldhoven, the Netherlands, and we have 18 office locations around the United States including main offices in Chandler, Arizona, San Jose and San Diego, California, Wilton, Connecticut, and Hillsboro, Oregon.

Job Mission
You support ASML customers with their current and future challenges in process development to efficiently produce devices with ever shrinking features.
You identify strategies to stretch the lithography equipment and associated processes beyond its specification to deliver the customer the required on product performance.
You cooperate with and drive the applicable ASML organization in order to come up with a solution that meets customer’s need.
You are responsible for the organization of the project management activities and communication with Customer engineers as well as ASML engineers in the local offices.

Application Engineering is ASMLs department that support customers worldwide to enhance their cutting edge lithography technology in their state of the art semiconductor fab. If you want to work on the forefront of semiconductor manufacturing and deliver “fit for purpose” solutions the Application Engineering department is the department which can offer you this possibility.

This position requires access to controlled technology, as defined in the Export Administration Regulations (15 C.F.R. § 730, et seq.). Qualified candidates must be legally authorized to access such controlled technology prior to beginning work. Business demands may require ASML to proceed with applicants who are immediately eligible to access controlled technology.

Job Description
Interact with and develop a solid working relationship with the customer to help understand and develop valued solutions to their fabrication issues.
Working with account team and marketing organization in The Netherlands and at ASML World Wide (WW) local offices to define the package that meets customers’ requirements.
Demonstrate technical leadership through problem solving, training and presentation.
Own a broad technical knowledge of lithography and metrology.
You will give strategic guidance to junior engineers.
Own the day to day project management activities and drive a technical team towards product value demonstration and integration of solutions with the goal to meet customer requirements and achieve tool-of-record configuration.
Education

Master degree or PhD in Physics, Applied Mathematics, Chemistry or Engineering preferred with a background of (semiconductor) physics, statistics or mathematics, or equivalent experience.

Experience
5 years’ experience in a semiconductor environment (within the area of lithography, patterning and/or metrology).
Excellent process knowledge (able to provide insight in process information, front till back end processes).
Be able to perform in high pressure and high ambiguity (semiconductor) environment.
Ability to lead and steer small technical teams.
Technical background of ASML tools and products.
Knowledge of semi-conductor devices process and challenges.
Strong client focus and commitment to customer satisfaction.
Solution minded and able to see and develop the bigger picture.
Strong technical background and drive towards solutions.
Excellent multi-cultural communication skills in the English language (spoken and written).
Project management skills or willingness to learn.
Ability to create clear presentations with point analysis.
Creative and broad thinker.
Act decisively, be pro-active and taking responsibility.
Eagerness to learn and keep up-to-date with the latest technological developments.
Drive own technical development and learning.
Thrives in a large and dynamic organization with various stakeholders.
Acts as team-player in engineering teams, and able to motivate team members.
Personal skills
Can observe and respond to people and situations and interact with others encountered in the course of work.
Can learn and apply new information or skills.
Must be able to read and interpret data, information, and documents.
Strong customer focus and commitment to customer satisfaction through prioritization, quality, efficiency and professionalism.
Ability to complete assignments with attention to detail and high degree of accuracy.
Proven ability to perform effectively in a demanding environment with changing workloads and deadlines.
Result driven-demonstrate ownership and accountability.
Identifies bottlenecks and drives improvements.
Work independently or as part of a team and follow through on assignments with minimal supervision.
Demonstrate open, clear, concise and professional communication.
Ability to establish and maintain cooperative working relationships with manager, co-workers and customer.
Work according to a strict set of procedures within the provided timelines.
Other information
You will be located in the local ASML office, part of the US AE team (Application Engineering). Other teams you will interact with are diverse geographically (US/NL), as well as in skills and competencies.
Willingness to travel to ASML customers worldwide within the projects as needed (an average of 25 %).

Role within Office

Responsibilities:

Routinely required to sit; walk; talk; hear; use hands to keyboard, finger, handle, and feel; stoop, kneel, crouch, twist, reach, and stretch. Occasionally required to move around the campus.
Occasionally lift and/or move up to 20 pounds.
May require travel dependent on business needs.
Specific vision abilities required by this job include close vision, color vision, peripheral vision, depth perception, and ability to adjust focus.

EOE AA M/F/Veteran/Disability

Internal Reference: #LI-KG1",3.9,"ASML
3.9","Albuquerque, NM",-1,10000+ Employees,1984,Company - Public,Electrical & Electronic Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$5 to $10 billion (USD),-1
253,Resident Service Engineer (RSE),$9-$18 Per Hour(Glassdoor Est.),"Resident Services Engineer

We are looking for a highly skilled Field Service Engineer in the Memphis, TN, area. This Engineer will travel to one of our Key Customer's locations to install, maintain and support Packsize equipment as well as build and maintain customer relationships by effectively servicing the equipment. This individual must understand the needs of the customer, work proactively and efficiently to meet those needs, and provides 5-Star customer service by proactively visiting or calling the customer to ensure they are fully satisfied with the Packsize equipment, process flow, packaging designs, and service.

Primary Responsibilities

• 100% Travel

• Completes and successfully pass training courses

• Develops knowledge of Packaging Designs
• Learns and develops the customer support and technical skills necessary to perform high quality maintenance
• Performs preventive maintenance on machines, equipment and accessories

• Performs installation of new equipment and train Customer Personnel

• Learns and completes basic administration duties (assigned tasks, emails, etc.)
• Exposed to moving parts and electricity that require safety protocols
• Exposure to varied travel conditions either driving or flying

• Excellent work ethic and time management skills needed

• Must be accessible via telephone, and promptly return email and phone messages
• Travel by vehicle or airplane within assigned geography, overnight travel may be required

Essential Job Requirements

• Excellent Customer Service skills

• Basic Excel, Word skills

• Knowledge of Windows platforms

• Advanced mechanical skills

• Advanced troubleshooting skills to resolve equipment issues utilizing drawings, operational characteristics, and technical documentation

• Ability to learn troubleshooting and problem-solving procedures
• Able and willing to lift up to 50 lbs
• Ability to walk, climb, stand, carry materials, stoop, kneel, bend at waist
• Must be able to climb a ladder

• Exhibit mature, independent judgment with little or no direct supervision
• Effectively communicate through written and verbal reports to customer and direct supervision regarding worksite status

Associate degree or Vocational technical training is strongly desired, Bachelors in related area preferred

• Good mechanical and troubleshooting skills

• Clean driving record with a valid drivers license

Job Summary

Packsize is a disruptive, fast-growth pioneer in the On Demand Packaging space. We are ferociously focused on Sustainability, Saving Forests, and lowering the Carbon Footprint of our Client Partners. Imagine a world where every box shipped downstream in a supply chain is exactly the right size for the product inside it. We arm our customers with the technology to do exactly that. As leaders in the technology space, we serve as a critical ally to companies looking to right size their packaging.

Salary and Benefits

Packsize offers a competitive benefits package including paid time off, Medical, Dental, Vision, Short Term/Long Term Disability, Life, and 401(k) matching.

Packsize is an Equal Opportunity employer and is committed to diversity in its workforce. In compliance with applicable federal and state laws, Packsize policy of equal employment opportunity prohibits discrimination on the basis of race or ethnicity, religion, color, national origin, sex, age, sexual orientation, gender identity/expression, veterans status, status as a qualified person with a disability, or genetic information. Individuals from historically underrepresented groups, such as minorities, women, qualified persons with disabilities, and protected veterans are strongly encouraged to apply. Reasonable accommodations in the application process will be provided to qualified individuals with disabilities.

About Packsize

Founded in 2002 and headquartered in Salt Lake City, UT, Packsize is the worlds leading provider of lean packaging systems for businesses with complex corrugated packaging needs. Recognized by Inc. 5000, ranked by Deloittes Technology Fast 500, and listed by Forbes as One of Americas Most Promising Companies, Packsize delivers an alternative to the existing corrugated supply chain with On Demand Packaging®.",3.7,"Packsize
3.7","Memphis, TN",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2002,Company - Private,Industrial Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
254,Data Engineer,$48k-$95k (Glassdoor Est.),"IZEA was built to connect the worlds top brands with influential content creators and publishers to enable influencer marketing and content production at scale. With over 500,000 Creators reaching over 3 billion fans and followers around the globe, IZEA is unmatched in its industry experience, network diversity, and technology ecosystem. A career at IZEA offers countless ways to make an impact in a fast-growing organization!

IZEA is looking for a Data Engineer to join our Core Technology group.

This team member may be located in the Orlando area or remote.

You will use the latest tools and technology to build and support IZEA's industry-leading data initiatives. Whether contributing to our data pipelines that ingest millions of records per hour, distilling vast amounts of data into meaningful insights, or operating the services that surface those insights, you will help define what the future of Influencer and Content Marketing looks like.

You will have direct access to end-users and stakeholders, and you are encouraged to build and leverage these relationships in your work. You will write and test your code, and work with our QA team to get it deployed to production. With the help of a homegrown, bot-driven CI/CD pipeline, your code will be delivered to users daily. This cross-functional team leverages Amazon Web Services for everything from ECS for containerized virtualization and hosting, to S3 for durable object storage, RDS and DynamoDB for persistence, EMR for the batch processing of billions of records, and Lambda for distributed workloads and stream consumption.

Aside from the day to day, we can offer you incredible benefits including an annual continuing education budget, a trust-focused development process, a flexible and collaborative work environment where balance matters, stock ownership, and an annual company retreat.

The team strives to be ego-free and motivated only by building amazing software for our users. We seek to understand the ""why"" behind the ""what"". We regularly break out into small teams to tackle problems, learn new technologies, or just share what we know with others. We test our code and invest in the health of our systems. We push each other, learn from each other, and strive to continually grow.

Primary Responsibilities

You will...
Work with stakeholders to define the solutions to development problems and business requirements
Develop and maintain the features and capabilities of our data ingestion pipelines
Extract actionable and impactful insights from vast amounts of data
Develop and maintain the services that surface those insights and make them available for consumption in a performant manner
Create unit and integration tests for your code
Reproduce and fix bugs reported by internal and external users
Set goals and communicate often about your progress toward them
Contribute to the ongoing improvement of the engineering organization and our software
What Were Looking For

A problem solver at heart
Much of our work revolves around problems that have no existing off-the-shelf solution or consensus on best practices. You'll often need to break down large problems into smaller more manageable tasks and utilize critical thinking to come up with novel ideas.
3+ years of engineering experience
Things move quickly in the data group. Youll need to be comfortable and familiar with delivering highly scalable cloud based applications.
Professional experience with frameworks like Hadoop, Spark, or similar
This will be a significant component of your responsibilities. You will be working with large data sets in a distributed environment on a daily basis. Familiarity w/ the Hadoop/Spark ecosystem is a must.
Professional experience with Python data tools
Our data team uses PySpark and Jupyter notebooks extensively. Familiarity with these technologies will also serve you well.
Direct experience with relational and NoSQL databases technologies
We use the best tool for the job around here. When it comes to storing and accessing data, we recognize that the technology decisions we make directly impact our ability to provide a performant customer experience, and our own costs.
Experience designing and building JSON based RESTful APIs
Because we are building our application with a front end framework, we carefully design and document the APIs to power it. To help us, we follow the JSON API spec, but any experience in building a RESTful API will be useful. Remember, the API is your contract with the consumers of your data!
Understanding of monolithic and micro-service based architectures
IZEAx still has some legacy monolithic characteristics. We move more and more of our technology to a distributed set of services, there are new challenges to overcome. Understanding the differences between these two models will help you take those challenges head on.
Basic Linux skills
In order to develop our data pipelines and services, you need to run it on your laptop. This means opening up some terminal windows, running some commands, and keeping the log output open. Additionally, some of our technology stack is better accessed through CLIs. Examples include the Ember CLI, the Rails CLI/console, Docker commands, Gradle, and our own CLIs. We'll walk you through it, but you should be comfy in a terminal.
Ability to multitask and prioritize multiple incoming requests
IZEA's Engineering team strives to provide a great experience and great service to our users. In order to do that, you may need to context switch into a support issue or drop what you are doing to start work on something else. This is part of what Agile means to us.
Excellent verbal and written communications skills
Regular and timely communication is the key to a trust based development process. You should be able to simply and concisely ask for feedback and direction in terms that your audience understands, and relay requested information in a timely fashion to your leaders. You should prioritize documentation of processes and code.
Demonstrated experience with the following will be highly valued

Data Science Background
While not required, a fundamental understanding of statistics and modeling would be a great asset. Practical experience with Machine Learning and/or complex data pipelines would also be welcome.
Front End development experience
From time to time you may need to build visualization, or (lite) user facing experiences. Familiarity with modern web frameworks like Angular, React, Ember, or Vue would be helpful. Extra bonus points if you have familiarity w/ Javascript based visualization libraries like d3.js or Highcharts.
Amazon Web Services, or other cloud providers
IZEA's software is hosted on AWS, and you will need to acquire some familiarity with it. Previous experience in using a cloud provider, even if just for developer tooling, shows that you understand some of the nuances involved in working in the cloud. Familiarity with Amazons EMR would also be an asset.
Continuous Integration & Deployment
IZEA needs to get features and fixes out to customers as soon as we possibly can with as much confidence as possible. To facilitate this, we have developed a CI/CD pipeline (using 3rd party services). An understanding of what CI/CD is will help you understand how this pipeline works and how to make it even better.
GitHub
All of IZEA's code is source controlled on Github. We leverage Github Pull Requests for code reviews, Github integrations manage parts of our CI/CD pipeline, and Github releases define the code tags that ultimately get deployed. Much of our process documentation exists on Github pages. Familiarity with navigating Github's features will help you ramp up in our SDLC faster.
JIRA
IZEA uses JIRA to manage projects and report on progress to stakeholders inside and outside the company. While we strive to automate as much of JIRA as possible with bots, webhooks and reports, understanding how JIRA issues, links, attachments, and workflows work will help you understand our SDLC faster.
About IZEA:

We are IZEA: The Creator Marketplace. Our cloud-based technologies connect Brands and Publishers with content Creators who blog, tweet, pin, and post on their behalf.

Our driving belief is that the only way to thrive in our rapidly changing world is to change ahead of it. IZEA is in a constant state of evolution and reinvention. While we may have invented the industry, we still operate like an entrepreneurial, scrappy start-up. Your time here will be exciting, educational, and at times, a bit crazy.

With IZEA, you have the opportunity to join a non-traditional corporate culture, where creativity and productivity are valued over a suit and tie. We call it ""The IZEA Way.""

Why would you want to work here?

Our developers use the latest tools and technology to build the applications and services that make up the IZEA Exchange platform. We write in whatever language we need to get the job done including Ruby, Java, Python, PHP, Swift, and Javascript. We leverage the latest frameworks, such as Rails, Symphony2, and Drop Wizard for iterating quickly on our technology.

Our code is deployed and operated by the people who write it, with the help of Amazon Web Services. We leverage everything from EC2 for virtualization and hosting, to Amazon EMR and Machine Learning for advanced analytics.

Aside from the day to day, we offer incredible benefits including an annual continuing education budget, a flexible trust-focused development process, and an open collaborative work environment.

Our team is ego-free and motivated to build great software. We regularly break out into small teams to tackle problems, learn new technologies, or just share what we know with others. We test our code and invest in the health of our systems. We push each other, learn from each other, and strive to continually grow as a team.

California residents, please follow this link to view the types of information we may gather from California residents who are applicants, employees, or contractors of IZEA, and how we use such information.

Powered by JazzHR",4.1,"IZEA, Inc
4.1","Orlando, FL",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2006,Company - Public,Advertising & Marketing,Business Services,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
255,MTS 1 Software Engineer,$73k-$126k (Glassdoor Est.),"Do you want to be part of the team that builds and operates a world-class search engine that serves hundreds of millions of queries a day? Do you thrive on developing efficient data retrieval algorithms that process Gigabytes of data in milliseconds? Do you want to be part of team that owns eBay's largest deployed application of machine learning, tens of thousands of servers, billion unique listings, billions of backend queries a day, highly available (99.999%) and performant system?
We are passionate about building the best search platform for the world’s largest online marketplace and are looking for top-notch software engineers to join the eBay Search Backend team.

Responsibilities include:
Design and implement systems compatible with existing Search Infrastructure within eBay. Segment and design system layers to support componentized and layered application development, including business functionality and database access.Work with other engineers, managers, Product Management, QA, and Operations teams to develop innovative solutions that meet market needs with respect to functionality, performance, scalability, reliability, realistic implementation schedules, and adherence to development goals and principles. Estimate engineering effort, plan implementation, and rollout system changes. Must be able to independently design code and test major features, as well as work jointly with other team members to deliver complex changes. Identify technical areas for improvement and make detailed business cases for improvements or new areas of opportunities. Develop industry and product technical expertise.
MS/PhD in Computer Science or related discipline with experience in the areas of data mining, information retrieval, machine learning, and information extraction
Hands-on experience in product development of proven algorithmic ideas and concepts in classification, text mining, and information retrieval technologies.
Experience with large scale data-driven systems is highly desired.
Experience in the areas of web data analysis, (web) information retrieval, document search and information extraction.
Experience in object-oriented design methodology and application development in Java.
Experience with data-mining technologies (Classification, Clustering and other algorithms)
Experience in distributed events streaming platforms (Kafka)
Strong Software development skills (Java, J2EE, Scala, R, Perl, Web Services etc.). Expertise in Java preferred.
Good working knowledge of database schema design, performance tuning & SQL. Good exposure to NOSQL DB like MongoDB.
Experience in using Hadoop for development is desirable.
6 years’ experience in requirements analysis, design, coding and unit testing of scalable, distributed, fault-tolerant applications in Windows and Linux environments.

This website uses cookies to enhance your experience. By continuing to browse the site, you agree to our use of cookies

View our privacy policy

View our accessibility info
eBay Inc. is an equal opportunity employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, national origin, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, veteran status, and disability, or other legally protected status. If you are unable to submit an application because of incompatible assistive technology or a disability, please contact us at talent@ebay.com . We will make every effort to respond to your request for disability assistance as soon as possible.

For more information see:
EEO is the Law Poster
EEO is the Law Poster Supplement",3.8,"eBay Inc.
3.8","Los Altos, CA",-1,10000+ Employees,1995,Company - Public,Internet,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),-1
256,Mechatronics Lead Architect & Engineer,$60k-$107k (Glassdoor Est.),"Introduction

ASML US brings together the most creative minds in science and technology to develop lithography machines that are key to producing faster, cheaper, more energy-efficient microchips. We design, develop, integrate, market and service these advanced machines, which enable our customers - the world’s leading chipmakers - to reduce the size and increase the functionality of their microchips, which in turn leads to smaller, more powerful consumer electronics. Our headquarters are in Veldhoven, the Netherlands, and we have 18 office locations around the United States including main offices in Chandler, Arizona, San Jose and San Diego, California, Wilton, Connecticut, and Hillsboro, Oregon.

Job Mission

This position requires access to controlled technology, as defined in the Export Administration Regulations (15 C.F.R. § 730, et seq.). Qualified candidates must be legally authorized to access such controlled technology prior to beginning work. Business demands may require ASML to proceed with applicants who are immediately eligible to access controlled technology.

Job Description

Primary Responsibilities:

Primary role will be a Mechatronics Architect & Engineer in the New Product Design & Development Team for Reticle Handler.
Responsible for design and development of custom mechatronics systems, including industrial robots, translating stages, linear motors, sensors, servos, etc….
Primary job duties as the lead architect and owner will be on a product line which involves alignment with other engineers, functional diagrams, documentation, design, prototype, and development of the reticle handler subsystem.
Design quality products using six sigma and lean process techniques for robust designs both in atmosphere and vacuum environment.
Experience with understanding and troubleshooting legacy designs to determine potential new risks, failure modes, and corrective actions for new products.
Integration of industrial robotic systems into capital equipment, developing with the cross sector team all related aspects such as dynamics, end effector design, controls, etc….
Basic experience with mechatronics behavior predictive modeling and methods, including “first principle” engineering equations and other techniques.
Take direction and align with ASML System Architects who are leading the development effort of critical large capital equipment.
Work with external suppliers to define and develop certain aspects of new product design while creating documents and collaborating with internal cross discipline teams.
Education

BS, MS or PhD Degree with an Engineering Degree in Mechatronics, Mechanical, Electrical or similar, or equivalent experience.

Experience
5+ years of experience with an Engineering Degree in Mechatronics, Mechanical, Electrical or similar.
The ideal candidate needs to have a deep understanding of mechatronics, “classical control theory” and “digital control theory” including frequency domain, stability (Nyquist / Bode plots), Velocity-Acceleration-Jerk (VAJ), feedback / feedforward, dynamics, gain and phase, transfer functions, continuous / discrete feedback control, real time controls, etc.
Mechatronics engineering background or specialization in closely related areas such as robotics, or similar.
Strong skills in proof of concept development and design of experiments for a wide range of project needs.
Ability to run complex mechatronic systems for test and qualification of design changes.
Demonstrated ability to derive conclusions from analysis and to make practical recommendations.
Exposure to multi-disciplinary projects, such as imaging / optical systems, semiconductor, or lithography preferred but not required.
Strong technical writing and communication skills, including the ability to present results based on strong statistical evidence to audiences of a wide range of technical abilities.
Customer oriented team player willing to work with high level problem solvers on a daily basis.
Genuine interest in mechatronics engineering, and analysis, as well as in developing precision systems that can perform reliably at customer sites.
High energy, self-motivated, quick study with flexible nature.
Customer-centric personal ethos.
Self-motivated team player with strong desire to learn and ability to handle multiple projects and tasks concurrently and with minimal guidance.
High potential to develop into a technical or personal leader in the organization.
Personal skills
Can observe and respond to people and situations and interact with others encountered in the course of work.
Can learn and apply new information or skills.
Must be able to read and interpret data, information, and documents.
Strong customer focus and commitment to customer satisfaction through prioritization, quality, efficiency and professionalism.
Ability to complete assignments with attention to detail and high degree of accuracy.
Proven ability to perform effectively in a demanding environment with changing workloads and deadlines.
Result driven-demonstrate ownership and accountability.
Identifies bottlenecks and drives improvements.
Work independently or as part of a team and follow through on assignments with minimal supervision.
Demonstrate open, clear, concise and professional communication.
Ability to establish and maintain cooperative working relationships with manager, co-workers and customer.
Work according to a strict set of procedures within the provided timelines.
Other information

ASML Offers:

A challenging opportunity to expand your knowledge in a wide variety of engineering application areas and to work on problems spanning all technical fields.
Highly creative and qualified teams with a diversity of experience.
Great career opportunities at a quickly growing high-tech company.
World class technical problems to solve.

Role within Office

Responsibilities:

Routinely required to sit; walk; talk; hear; use hands to keyboard, finger, handle, and feel; stoop, kneel, crouch, twist, reach, and stretch. Occasionally required to move around the campus.
Occasionally lift and/or move up to 20 pounds.
May require travel dependent on business needs.
Specific vision abilities required by this job include close vision, color vision, peripheral vision, depth perception, and ability to adjust focus.

EOE AA M/F/Veteran/Disability

Internal Reference: #LI-KG1",3.9,"ASML
3.9","Wilton, CT",-1,10000+ Employees,1984,Company - Public,Electrical & Electronic Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$5 to $10 billion (USD),-1
257,Sr. Systems Engineer,$48k-$100k (Glassdoor Est.),"Fresh Consulting is a design-led, software development and hardware engineering company, offering end-to-end digital services to help companies innovate. We bring together amazing UX designers, sophisticated developers, digital strategists, and top-notch engineers to help companies create fresh experiences that connect humans, systems, and machines. Weve been growing fast and need someone to help us continue to manage the delivery of high quality work in a fast-paced environment. See more at freshconsulting.com

Fresh Consulting is seeking a talented Systems Engineer to work cross functionally to help leverage the development, deployment, and improvement of our existing and future products. This exciting opportunity will give you the chance to work with a mix of cutting-edge design teams, as well as hands on electronics laboratory testing and product development.

Responsibilities
Collaborate with mechanical, electrical, firmware, hardware verification, and many other engineering and design disciplines to design and develop components and sub-systems, and optimize the overall system.
Architect, implement, test and document automated test solutions.
Lead technical development of automated test fixtures on a system level.
Develop maintainable LabVIEW code to implement customer projects including; test system, robotics, embedded control systems, measurement and control.
Maintain and expand existing test and control code.
Use industry tools for code reviews, source code control, documentation.
Lead design reviews and internal training on LabVIEW.
Manage client interaction on a technical level and work with project managers to ensure project success.
Minimum Qualifications
Bachelors degree in physics, electrical engineering, or mechanical engineering or equivalent work experience.
Deep understanding of complex automation and test solutions.
High level of project experience, agile and self-sufficient work approach to accommodate demanding project schedules.
Ability to tailor software design and development to requirements such as business needs and schedule.
Client and service-oriented mindset.
Willingness to travel is a requirement.
+10 years in test system automation design and maintenance.
+10 years of demonstrated experience developing complex systems in an R&D environment.
Proficient in LabVIEW, including basic and advanced architectures, the use of queues, state machine design, event structures and event handling.
Knowledge of Analog-to-Digital Signal conversion and implementation.
Knowledge of automated test hardware and software design.
Preferred Qualifications
Advanced degrees are preferred such as MBA/MS.
National Instruments certification in LabVIEW highly desirable. LabVIEW CLD or higher.
Proficient with C/C++, Python or other text-based languages.
Test Automation experience preferred.
Robotics, machine learning, control systems highly desired.
*Fresh Consulting is a participating E-Verify company.

Powered by JazzHR",4.4,"Fresh Consulting
4.4","Bellevue, WA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2007,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
258,"Machine Learning Engineer, Growth",$130k-$213k (Glassdoor Est.),"Company Description Square builds common business tools in unconventional ways so more people can start, run, and grow their businesses. When Square started, it was difficult and expensive (or just plain impossible) for some businesses to take credit cards. Square made credit card payments possible for all by turning a mobile phone into a credit card reader. Since then Square has been building an entire business toolkit of both hardware and software products including Square Capital, Square Terminal, Square Payroll, and more. We’re working to find new and better ways to help businesses succeed on their own terms—and we’re looking for people like you to help shape tomorrow at Square. Job Description As a MLE within the Growth Data Science team, you will lead projects that help with Square’s growth. The team exists to surface the right messages to the right sellers at the right time across all our go-to-market channels (web app, in-app, notifications, sms, email, mail, sales) and product surfaces. We provide sellers with remarkable personalized experiences using machine learning/deep learning to power the best product/feature/content recommendations. Our algorithms obtain value from our unique, rich, and growing data. We partner with business, product, operations and engineering teams to guide better decisions, automated and human, using machine learning. We’re a passionate team of specialists, statisticians, and optimizers who are resourceful in distilling questions, wrangling data, and driving impactful business decisions. You Will: Lead design and develop scalable systems for improving the core infrastructure required by the Machine Learning applications for our rapidly growing customer base. Collaborate with data scientists, engineers to train, deploy, and test machine learning models using state-of-the-at techniques. Help build the next generation of data products at Square Qualifications You Have: 4-5 years of relevant industry experience A graduate degree in software engineering, computer science, machine learning, artificial intelligence, or a similar technical field. Experience with cloud computing platforms, such as AWS, Google Cloud or Azure. Ability to produce scalable and robust production-quality code incorporating testing, evaluation, and monitoring. Experience in designing and productionizing large-scale distributed systems built around machine learned models and big data. Knowledge about real time recommendation systems is a plus. Technologies we use: Java, Python, Google Cloud Platform, AWS, Snowflake Python (numpy, pandas, sklearn, xgboost, TensorFlow, etc.) Additional Information At Square, we value diversity and always treat all employees and job applicants based on merit, qualifications, competence, and talent. We do not discriminate on the basis of race, religion, color, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, age, marital status, veteran status, or disability status. We will consider for employment qualified applicants with criminal histories in a manner consistent with the requirements of the San Francisco Fair Chance Ordinance. Applicants in need of special assistance or accommodation during the interview process or in accessing our website may contact us by sending an email to assistance(at)squareup.com. We will treat your request as confidentially as possible. In your email, please include your name and preferred method of contact, and we will respond as soon as possible. Perks At Square, we want you to be well and thrive. Our global benefits package includes: Healthcare coverage Retirement Plans Employee Stock Purchase Program Wellness perks Paid parental leave Flexible time off Learning and Development resources",4.0,"Square
4.0","San Francisco, CA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2009,Company - Public,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
259,Optical Production Engineer,$70k-$109k (Glassdoor Est.),"Introduction

ASML US brings together the most creative minds in science and technology to develop lithography machines that are key to producing faster, cheaper, more energy-efficient microchips. We design, develop, integrate, market and service these advanced machines, which enable our customers - the world’s leading chipmakers - to reduce the size and increase the functionality of their microchips, which in turn leads to smaller, more powerful consumer electronics. Our headquarters are in Veldhoven, the Netherlands, and we have 18 office locations around the United States including main offices in Chandler, Arizona, San Jose and San Diego, California, Wilton, Connecticut, and Hillsboro, Oregon.

Job Mission

This position requires access to controlled technology, as defined in the Export Administration Regulations (15 C.F.R. § 730, et seq.). Qualified candidates must be legally authorized to access such controlled technology prior to beginning work. Business demands may require ASML to proceed with applicants who are immediately eligible to access controlled technology.

Job Description
Work with Optical Assembly technicians and provide hands-on support for daily production work.
Support in-production issues by assisting Optical Assembly technicians with concise troubleshooting of Opto-Mechanical modules.
Work with Optical, Mechanical, Electrical and Software Engineering staff to develop new production assembly and test equipment.
Proficient in the use of interferometers, autocollimators, CMM, microscopes.
Develop Manufacturing procedures; create technical work instructions, production sequences and routings.
Monitor SPC data to anticipate negative trends and take corrective action.
Evaluate and disposition failed parts with proposed solutions.
Review Failure Analysis Reports and help determine the root-cause.
Create and direct equipment calibration, upkeep, and new equipment specification and procurement for all analytical instruments used in production.
Able to read optical and mechanical drawings.
Able to review drawings/solid models in CAD (Unigraphics).
Embrace the Lean Manufacturing philosophy and look for opportunities for continuous improvement in all areas of the production processes.
Contribute to the good spirit of cooperation by finding solutions, execution of all kind of tasks and good communication.
Education

BS in Optical Engineering, Physics, or equivalent experience.

Experience
At least 3-7 years’ experience in an manufacturing environment as an Production Engineer.
Experience in a production environment with high tech products and complex processes is desirable.
Working knowledge with SAP is a plus.
Experience in Microsoft programs, Excel, Word, Power Point.
Strong analytical mind and abstract thinker.
Get it done mentality.
Energetic with plenty of initiative.
Knowledge of process time and motion studies.
Knowledge of Lean Mfg. Principles.
Knowledge of process improvements, statistics, and data analysis.
Curiosity and creativity.
Result focused.
Focus on quality, continuous improvement.
Demonstrate social and communication skills.
Good English language skills in speech and writing. (oral and written).
Personal skills
Can observe and respond to people and situations and interact with others encountered in the course of work.
Can learn and apply new information or skills.
Must be able to read and interpret data, information, and documents.
Strong customer focus and commitment to customer satisfaction through prioritization, quality, efficiency and professionalism.
Ability to complete assignments with attention to detail and high degree of accuracy.
Proven ability to perform effectively in a demanding environment with changing workloads and deadlines.
Result driven-demonstrate ownership and accountability.
Identifies bottlenecks and drives improvements.
Work independently or as part of a team and follow through on assignments with minimal supervision.
Demonstrate open, clear, concise and professional communication.
Ability to establish and maintain cooperative working relationships with manager, co-workers and customer.
Work according to a strict set of procedures within the provided timelines.
Other information

Role within Office

Responsibilities:

Routinely required to sit; walk; talk; hear; use hands to keyboard, finger, handle, and feel; stoop, kneel, crouch, twist, reach, and stretch. Occasionally required to move around the campus.
Occasionally lift and/or move up to 20 pounds.
May require travel dependent on business needs.
Specific vision abilities required by this job include close vision, color vision, peripheral vision, depth perception, and ability to adjust focus.

Role within the Factory

Responsibilities:

Must be willing to work in a clean room environment, wearing coveralls, hoods, booties, safety glasses and gloves for entire duration of shift.
While performing the duties of this job, the employee routinely is required to sit; walk; talk; hear; use hands to keyboard, finger, handle, and feel; stoop, kneel, crouch, twist, reach, and stretch.
The employee may occasionally lift and/or move up to 50 pounds.
Specific vision abilities required by this job include close vision, color vision, peripheral vision, depth perception, and ability to adjust focus.
Can work under deadlines.
The environment generally is moderate in temperature with moderate to high noise level.
Must be willing to work a compressed work week schedule – twelve-hour long shift and rotating from three to four days a week.
This must include references to day and night shifts for accommodation purposes.

Additional responsibilities for Wilton Factory:

The physical demands described here are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of this job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.

The employee is required to work in a cleanroom environment: full gowning (full body coveralls, hood, CR safety shoes, face mask, nitrile gloves and safety glasses. Working under ISO 9000/14000 standards).
Operating/working around overhead cranes, fork trucks and motorized pallet movers.
Working around lasers; working with ladders; working on platforms; and working around chemicals.
The employee is occasionally required to move around the campus.
The employee may occasionally lift and/or move up to 20 pounds.
May require travel dependent on company needs.
The environment generally is moderate in temperature and noise level.

EOE AA M/F/Veteran/Disability",3.9,"ASML
3.9","Wilton, CT",-1,10000+ Employees,1984,Company - Public,Electrical & Electronic Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$5 to $10 billion (USD),-1
260,Opto-Mechanical Production Engineer,$61k-$97k (Glassdoor Est.),"multiple positions available
Introduction

ASML US brings together the most creative minds in science and technology to develop lithography machines that are key to producing faster, cheaper, more energy-efficient microchips. We design, develop, integrate, market and service these advanced machines, which enable our customers - the world’s leading chipmakers - to reduce the size and increase the functionality of their microchips, which in turn leads to smaller, more powerful consumer electronics. Our headquarters are in Veldhoven, the Netherlands, and we have 18 office locations around the United States including main offices in Chandler Arizona, San Jose and San Diego California, Wilton Connecticut, and Hillsboro Oregon.

Job Mission

This position is for a Senior Electrical Engineer with innovative attitude to work in Manufacturing Test Engineering. Candidate will work with development engineers to implement comprehensive production test that incorporates a high level of performance verification and troubleshooting diagnostics.
ASML is a world leader in the manufacture of advanced technology systems for the semiconductor industry.ASML’s corporate headquarters is in Veldhoven, the Netherlands. Manufacturing sites and research and development facilities are located in Connecticut, California and the Netherlands. Technology development centers and training facilities are located in the United States, Japan, Korea, the Netherlands, and Taiwan. Additionally, ASML provides optimal service to its customers via over 50 sales and service organizations in 16 countries. Founded in the Netherlands in 1984, the company is publicly traded on Euronext Amsterdam and NASDAQ under the symbol ASML.

Job Description

-Develop Manufacturing specifications.
-Work with Optical, Mechanical, Electrical and Software Engineering staff to develop overall design of Opto-Mechanical/Electrical Modules.
-Develop assembly concepts and qualification tests for new product design.
-Introduce new products into production in an existing “Concurrent Engineering” environment.
-Support image analysis on data and derive conclusions.
-Develop production sequence and routings.
-Develop Manufacturing procedures and technical work instructions.
-Support in-production issues by assisting Production Assembly and Test Engineers and Technicians with concise troubleshooting of Opto-Mechanical/Electrical Modules and Sub-Modules.
-Evaluate and disposition failed parts with proposed solutions
-Review Failure Analysis Reports from suppliers and help validate the root-cause of the failure Interface with internal and external customers regarding contamination test result, testing methods, and control strategy.
-Create and direct equipment calibration, upkeep, and new equipment specification and procurement for all analytical instruments used in manufacturing.
-Able to read optical, mechanical and electrical drawings.
-Knowledge of Code-V and /or Zemax.
-Knowledge of MATLAB, LabVIEW and Python

Education

BS/MS in Mechanical Engineering, Optical Engineering, Physics or equivalent experience.

Experience

-1-3 years’ experience in an Engineering environment.
-Working knowledge of diverse optical metrology setups: Interferometers, Shack – Hartmann sensor, polarimetry/ellipsometry & Optical alignment.
-Working knowledge of geometric optics, wave optics, Gaussian propagation, and aberration theory.
-Working knowledge with epoxy application in opto-mechanical designs.
-Working knowledge with optical assy/ alignment/ test equipment/ tools.
-Working Knowledge in lasers, polarization, detectors, electro-optical devices and opto-mechanical constructions.
-Experience in a production environment with high tech products and complex production process.
-Experience in Lean Manufacturing.
-Working knowledge with Optical-Electrical sensors is a plus.
-Experience in the field of technical Production Engineering and quality methodology such as statistical process control and FMEA is a plus.
-Working knowledge of NX, Teamcenter and SAP is a plus.

Personal skills

-Capability to interface with multidisciplinary groups (including senior leadership), and be willing to take on responsibility and follow through.
-Possess strong ownership characteristics – demonstrated commitment to achieving results on time.
-Have strong written and oral communicative skills – ability to communicate effectively to your team and to senior management.
-Focus on quality and continuous improvements.
-Demonstrated “team player” with a quality orientation and interpersonal skills.

Context of the position

The physical demands described here are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of this job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.
-While performing the duties of this job, the employee routinely is required to sit; walk; talk; hear; use hands to keyboard, finger, handle, and feel; stoop, kneel, crouch, twist, reach, and stretch.
-The employee is occasionally required to move around the campus.
-The employee may occasionally lift and/or move up to 20 pounds.
-May require travel dependent on company needs.
-Specific vision abilities required by this job include close vision, color vision, peripheral vision, depth perception, and ability to adjust focus.
-Can work under deadlines.
-The environment generally is moderate in temperature and noise level.
-Must be able to read and interpret data, information, and documents.
-Can observe and respond to people and situations and interact with others encountered in the course of work.
-Can learn and apply new information or skills.

Other information

EEO/AA (W/M/Vets/Disability) Employer",3.9,"ASML
3.9","Wilton, CT",-1,10000+ Employees,1984,Company - Public,Electrical & Electronic Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$5 to $10 billion (USD),-1
261,"Software Engineer - Mobility, Payments, and Innovation",$55k-$116k (Glassdoor Est.),"Role Summary:

The Software
Engineer is a developer, capable of designing, coding, testing and implementing
applications systems. The person should be energetic, entrepreneurial mindset,
innovating - thinking about the “art of the possible” to become the Fin Tech
market leader. While partnering with our business colleagues, you are
responsible for advancing the tech stack to elevate our Customer satisfaction.

Role Responsibilities:

Strategic Work – 20% of time
Educate and inform
yourself and team members about technology opportunities
Participate
in strategic roadmap discussions to help guide the technology strategy
In
partnership with the Solutions Architect, Domain Architect complete annual
Application Rationalization activities
Responsible
for developing new service based architecture
Updates
job knowledge by studying state-of-the-art development tools, programming
techniques, and computing equipment; participating in educational
opportunities; reading professional publications; maintaining personal
networks; participating in professional organizations
Operational Work – 80% of time
Analyzing,
programming and implementing modifications to existing systems following
VCI standards and guidelines
Program well
designed testable and efficient code
Produce
non-functional specifications (eg secure, performance,
management/monitoring, audit/logging, etc…) and data mining operational
feasibility
Provide time and
cost estimates and be accountable for estimates provided
Escalate anticipated
risk to management promptly and properly
Partner with
Solutions Architect on design options
Identify
opportunities to use new technologies in the business together with the
different business divisions
Participate in the
creation of state-of-the-art ideas and developments into POCs, prototypes
and pilots
Troubleshoot problems with production
systems.
Ability to operate within both agile and
waterfall SDLC
Bring a passion to stay on top of tech trends,
experiment with and learn new technologies, participate in internal &
external technology communities, and mentor other members of the engineering
community
Work within and across teams (business partners,
architects, peer engineers and IT Operations) to design, develop, document, test,
implement, and support technical solutions across a full-stack of development
tools and technologies in the respective SDLC.
Conduct application
code reviews and suggest necessary changes as applicable.
Report on status of
systems and projects on a regular and timely basis.
Ensure the timely
resolution of issues.
Escalate anticipated
risk to management promptly and properly.
Keep up to date on technological
developments in systems and programming.
Participate in development projects as a
team member with staff from within the Information Technology department
and from external departments or vendors
Mentor and coach peer engineers
Presentations of
design, new technologies or product knowledge to various audiences
Experience:

Required –
7 -10 years
of experience in Software Development in languages like Java, Python, NodeJS,
JavaScript or similar
2+ years
of experience in frameworks like AngularJS, ReactJS
2+ years
of experience in Agile development methodologies
2+ years
of experience in both transactional as well Big Data
1+ years
of Software Development in Cloud (preferably in AWS)
1+ years
of experience of working in GITHUB or similar
Education:


Required –
B.S. in Computer Science or related
discipline or equivalent job experience.
Desired –
Master's or PhD in Computer Science (or
equivalent education)
General Skills:

Full Stack Development experience
Cloud Computing
DevOps, CI/CD
Experience with GIT, JIRA
Analytical
and conceptual thinking – using logic and reason, creative and strategic
Communication
skills – interpersonal, presentation and written
Problem solving
Excellent oral and written
communication skills
Specialized
Skills:
Required –
Full stack development experience
with below skill sets
Front-end technologies like HTML, CSS3, JavaScript.
Knowledge of third-party libraries like jQuery, Angular and React.js is
At least one server-side programming language like Java, C# or Nodejs.
REST or GraphQL API
creation experience
Knowledge of various
DBMS technology like MySQL, Oracle, SQLServer etc. and at least
one NoSQL Technology (e.g. Cassandra, MongoDB, Snowflake, DynamoDB etc.) and
experience writing queries
Design capabilities for basic prototypes and UI /UX design.
Exposure to provisioning
production
grade servers Windows / Linux is desirable.
Cloud Computing AWS.
Ability to rapidly prototype and
demonstrate potential product
Experience working on at least one production cloud based
application.
Experience with vendor integrations (hosted solutions)
Implement coding standards in partnership with Solutions
Architect, Domain Architect and Enterprise Architecture
Desired –
Modern development practices – e.g. DevOps
Data Mining/Machine Learning
Map Reduce (Hadoop etc.)
Mobile programming experience (iOS, Android)
TDD(Test
Driven Development)
Work Flexibility:

Travel 10% of the time
Onsite, remote work options dependent on team
operating model and initiative
Flexibility to work outside of core hours
(Monday – Friday) to support business demand
We are proud to
be an EEO employer M/F/D/V. We maintain a drug-free workplace and perform
pre-employment substance abuse testing.",3.6,"Volkswagen Group of America
3.6","Herndon, VA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1955,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Transportation Equipment Manufacturing,Manufacturing,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
262,DevOps Lead Engineer - TS/SCI Required,-1,"General Duties:
Lead a highly motivated engineering team to design and implement a new DevOps pipeline for the National Geospatial Intelligence Agency (NGA). This technical leadership role is responsible for the day-to-day execution of a contractor DevOps scrum team that provides a stable application environment for development, testing and operational activities. The objective is to fully automate the software processes that build, test, harden, package and deploy applications across multiple networks. Work will include researching new technologies, implementing new solutions, and providing recommendations to reduce program risk / cost.

Beyond the DevOps pipeline itself, the team will implement new functionality on an Amazon Web Services (AWS) platform using Container-based solutions. This functionality must operate over clusters of distributed servers (nodes) using parallelization techniques and modern data center practices.

Recurring responsibilities include:
Overseeing builds, deployments, packaging, integration, automation and releases
Continuously evaluating the Monitoring and Performance of the environment
Providing standards and practices around Infrastructure as Code
Ensuring automated processes for builds and deployments are streamlined
Participating in technology, architecture and design discussions
Developing the architecture and automation templates for infrastructure provisioning, and configuration / change management
Providing day-to-day technical leadership to the application engineers and being an expert of DevOps principles to the team
Building and optimizing an architecture for supporting production applications
Level-3 support for a production environment
Required Experience:
10+ years implementing DevOps (Continuous Integration, Build, Deployment)
5+ years administering Red Hat Enterprise Linux (master level expertise expected)
3+ years administering common Linux applications (e.g. Tomcat, PostgreSQL, Git)
3+ Experience with Agile (Scrum) processes and tools including Confluence and Jira.
2+ years with automation technologies such as Puppet, Ansible, Chef and Salt
2+ years with Git, Maven, Nexus and Jenkins
2+ years scripting or coding in BASH, Python, Ruby or Perl
1+ years working with containers (i.e. Docker) and orchestration (i.e. Kubernetes)
1+ years supporting operational environments on Amazon Web Services (AWS)
1+ years supporting AWS native services (S3, SQS, SNS, IAM)
Must possess ability to work independently in a fast-paced, dynamic environment
Must be a team player and a leader who understands the importance of teamwork, collaboration, and open communication, including a willingness to occasionally work in a pair-programming environment
Must possess strong analytical and technical documentation skills
Must possess ability to effectively present information and respond to questions
Must have hands-on experience with design and development best practices
Understanding of SDLC automation concepts such as CI / CD
Desired Skills:
Familiarity with the Defense Intelligence Information Enterprise (DI2E) DevTools
Familiarity with the DoD Risk Management Framework (RMF)
Familiarity with industry standard commodity hardware for information systems (servers, storage, network devices)
Familiarity with industry standard software products (operating systems, hypervisors, databases, and web servers)
Education/Experience Level:
Bachelors Degree in computer science, related field, or equivalent work experience
Certifications Required: None, but AWS certifications are highly desirable
Must have an active security clearance (TS/SCI with Polygraph) for this position
Clearance:
US Citizenship Required - TS/SCI with Polygraph

BENEFITS OFFERED:
Medical, Dental, Vision Insurance - 100% Company-Paid Premiums
STD, LTD, and Life Insurance - 100% company paid
401K Additional 10% salary contribution immediately vested
Performance-Based Bonuses
PTO - 4 weeks/year
Holidays - 10 paid/year
Birthdays off with pay
Upfront and Recurring Referral Bonuses
Education Reimbursement
Paid Parental Leave
ABOUT PHOENIX OPERATIONS GROUP:
Phoenix Operations Group is a high-end engineering services company dedicated to advancing our national intelligence, defense and scientific interests. As a small start-up operating out of the Washington DC area, we rely on innovation to continually advance our employees' skills and provide game-changing solutions to our customers.

Our technical competencies include Big Data analytics, Cloud Computing infrastructure, Machine Learning, Multi-INT visualization, and enterprise architectures. We believe in open-source initiatives, agile development processes, and arming analysts with amazing capabilities. For more information, visit us at: https://phoenix-opsgroup.com

Phoenix Operations Group is an Equal Opportunity Employer. Phoenix Operations Group does not discriminate on the basis of race, religion, color, sex, gender, gender identity, sexual orientation, age, non-disqualifying physical or mental disability, national origin, veteran status or any other basis covered by appropriate law. All employment is decided on the basis of qualifications, merit, and business need.",5.0,"Phoenix Operations Group
5.0","Springfield, VA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2011,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1
263,Senior Azure Cloud and Security Engineer,$139k-$215k (Glassdoor Est.),"Pharmaceutical Research and Manufacturers of America (PhRMA) is seeking a Senior Azure Cloud and Security Engineer to join its Information Technology team. The Senior Azure Cloud and Security Engineer will primarily be responsible for designing, implementing, maintaining and supporting all components of PhRMA’s Azure and auxiliary Office 365 environment. This role will serve as the subject matter expert for Office 365 and Azure.
The Senior Azure Cloud and Security Engineer:
Demonstrates knowledge of modern enterprise architectures, identity and authentication services, as well as security and compliance topics as they pertain to cloud infrastructure.
Exhibits strategic and technical experience focused on driving adoption of Microsoft cloud technologies available in Azure Public Cloud and Office 365.
Possesses a broad knowledge of key end-user scenarios and technical architecture for Azure& Office 365. This individual actively participates in projects to provide technical guidance on Microsoft Cloud offerings and capabilities as appropriate.
Tracks industry trends and maintains knowledge of new technologies to better serve the enterprise’s architecture needs and support of department standards.
Performs ongoing administration and account maintenance of the Office 365 tenant, reflecting the ability to solve problems quickly, develop workflow and processes for operation teams, and automate processes through writing and maintaining custom PowerShell scripts to remediate any open issues.
Key Success Factors
PhRMA seeks a proactive and action-oriented individual with a strong orientation toward customer service. Key success factors for this role include a strong team and collaborative focus, interpersonal skills and the ability to communicate effectively with technical and non‐technical colleagues. PhRMA operates a mixed Windows and Mac workstation environment with a focus on utilizing cloud technologies where feasible.

Professional Experience / Requirements
Bachelor’s degree in Information Systems or equivalent work experience
Seven or more years of experience in an infrastructure and or systems role
Strong knowledge of networks, operating systems, system monitoring, security and technology infrastructure
Familiar with operating under and implementing a zero-trust model.
A thorough understanding of operating in a hybrid identity model - Active Directory and Azure Active Directory (experience migrating to cloud identity a plus)
Working knowledge of Microsoft Cloud technologies, including:
Microsoft Endpoint Manager/Intune
Azure Identity and Access Management
Azure AD Privileged Identity Management
Azure AD Identity Protection (risk policies)
Password protection
Security& Compliance Center
Familiarity with email security gateways (Proofpoint preferred), DKIM/DMARC/SPF, anti-spam, anti-phishing, anti-spoofing, message tracking and message delivery troubleshooting
Familiarity with the purpose and functionality of the Cloud Access Security Broker (CASB) family of products (Microsoft Cloud App Security preferred)
Knowledge and experience supporting Azure Resource Manager IaaS virtual machines, virtual networks, gateways and routing.
Understanding of vulnerability assessment, prioritization and remediation.
Understanding of next-gen antivirus, advanced persistent threats, threat actors, campaigns
Experience with Enterprise Applications, Application Registrations, SSO (IDP/SP), SAML, SSL certificates, Azure AD Connect (and its associated user sign in methods)
Understanding of Conditional Access signals, custom controls and compliance evaluation.
Knowledge of implementing and managing Azure Rights Management Services and Information Rights Management policies inclusive of Azure Information Protection labels and conditions, templates, AIP scanner, RMS connector, tenant keys, integrating AIP with Microsoft Online Services.
Experience with data governance and retention (Retention policies/tags, data governance reports and dashboards, information holds, managing inactive mailboxes)
Experience with Search and investigation (content search and eDiscovery)
Familiarity with Multi-factor authentication (MFA)
Experience with utilizing OOBE tools to report on tenant activity as well as using this data to make recommended security changes to the environment (native auditing, Secure Score, Azure Security Center, alert policies in the Security and Compliance Center)
Experience with data privacy and compliance frameworks (ISO/IEC 27001 a plus)
Preferred Experience
Microsoft Certifications, such as Office 365 MCSA, MCSE; Cloud Platform and Infrastructure, Azure Administrator, Azure Security Engineer, Solutions Architect or equivalent.
Who we are
The Pharmaceutical Research and Manufacturers of America (PhRMA) represents the country’s leading innovative biopharmaceutical research companies, which are devoted to discovering and developing medicines that enable patients to live longer, healthier and more productive lives. Since 2000, PhRMA member companies have invested more than $900 billion in the search for new treatments and cures, including an estimated $79.6 billion in 2018 alone.

Connect with PhRMA
For information on how innovative medicines save lives, please visit:
www.PhRMA.org
www.Innovation.org

www.GoBoldly.com

www.Facebook.com/PhRMA
www.Twitter.com/PhRMA

What we offer
In addition to a highly competitive salary and bonus program, various opportunities for reward and recognition and a platform of extensive benefits, PhRMA is committed to the development and overall wellbeing of our team members. We offer traditional (medical, dental, vision, flexible spending, life, AD&D, LTD, STD, LTC) and enhanced benefits such as parental leave, a wellbeing program, back-up care, health advocate service, employee assistance program and commuting benefits. We also offer a robust 401k plan with employer contributions upon the first day of hire and immediate vesting, a generous paid time off plan, seven paid holidays (plus inauguration day), half day Fridays preceding holidays and a paid winter break.

We are committed to the growth and development of our team members and offer many learning opportunities including an integrated on-boarding program, best-in-class leadership programming, tuition reimbursement at both the undergraduate and graduate levels, industry on-site and off-site training, and other management/professional development programs. Corporate social responsibility is also important to us at PhRMA. Our team members participate in organization-wide community service activities, fundraising drives and charitable athletic events.

We are committed to supporting our family of professionals at PhRMA and strive to create programs that help our team members manage the challenges of balancing a fast-paced career with their own personal goals.

Equal Opportunity Employer

PhRMA provides equal employment opportunities to all applicants without regard to race, color, religion, national origin, sex, age, marital status, personal appearance, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, family responsibilities, genetic information, disability, matriculation, political affiliation or veteran status in accordance with applicable federal, state and local laws governing non-discrimination in employment.",4.0,"PhRMA
4.0","Washington, DC",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1958,Nonprofit Organization,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
264,Software Engineer - Customer Experience Technologies,$53k-$113k (Glassdoor Est.),"Role Summary:

The Software Engineer is a programmer, capable of designing, coding, testing and implementing applications systems. Our Software Engineer should be energetic, entrepreneurial mindset, innovating - thinking about the “art of the possible” to become the Fin Tech market leader. While partnering with our business colleagues, you are responsible for advancing the tech stack to elevate our service operations to the next level of Dealer and Customer satisfaction.
Role Responsibilities:
Strategic Work – 20% of time
Educate and inform yourself and team members about technology opportunities
Participate in strategic roadmap discussions to help guide the technology strategy for Servicing Operations
In partnership with the Solutions Architect, Domain Architect complete annual Application Rationalization activities
Responsible for developing new service-based architecture
Updates job knowledge by studying state-of-the-art development tools, programming techniques, and computing equipment; participating in educational opportunities; reading professional publications; maintaining personal networks; participating in professional organizations
Operational Work – 80% of time
Analyzing, programming and implementing modifications to existing systems following VCI standards and guidelines
Program well designed testable and efficient code
Produce non-functional specifications (e.g. secure, performance, management/monitoring, audit/logging, etc.) and data mining operational feasibility
Provide time and cost estimates and be accountable for estimates provided
Escalate anticipated risk to management promptly and properly
Partner with Servicing Operations Solutions Architect on design options
Identify opportunities to use new technologies in the business together with the different business divisions
Participate in the creation of state-of-the-art ideas and developments into POCs, prototypes and pilots
Troubleshoot problems with production systems.
Ability to operate within both agile and waterfall SDLC
Bring a passion to stay on top of tech trends, experiment with and learn new technologies, participate in internal & external technology communities, and mentor other members of the engineering community
Work within and across teams (business partners, architects, peer engineers and IT Operations) to design, develop, document, test, implement, and support technical solutions across a full stack of development tools and technologies in the respective SDLC.
Conduct application code reviews and suggest necessary changes as applicable.
Report on status of systems and projects on a regular and timely basis.
Ensure the timely resolution of issues.
Escalate anticipated risk to management promptly and properly.
Keep up to date on developments in technological systems and programming.
Participate in development projects as a team member with staff from within the Information Technology department and from external departments or vendors
Mentor and coach peer engineers
Presentations of design, new technologies or product knowledge to various audiences

Experience:
Required –
7 -10 years of experience in Software Development
Education:
Required –
B.S. in Computer Science or related discipline or equivalent job experience.
Desired –
Master's or PhD in Computer Science (or equivalent education)
General Skills:
Analytical and conceptual thinking – using logic and reason, creative and strategic
Communication skills – interpersonal, presentation and written
Computer savvy – skilled in the use of software
Integration – joining people, processes or systems
Influencing and negotiation skills
Problem solving
Specialized Skills:
Required –

Full stack experience with the below skillset

• Front-end technologies like HTML5, CSS3, SaaS, ES6, JavaScript App Development using opensource frameworks React, Bootstrap and jQuery.

• At least 5 years’ experience with Nodejs and Express to build Rest API’s.

• Experience implementing at least 2 projects with end to end server-side APIs using AWS stack S3, Cloud Front, CloudWatch, IAM, Serverless Lambda, API Gateway and CloudFormation (infra as code).(AWS certifications are plus)

• Linting frameworks (ES lint, TS lint) for coding standards and static code analysis tools like SonarQube, Code Climate or any demonstrable tool experience.

• TDD / BDD experience using Jest, Jasmine, Webpack and Cucumber.

• Must have CI/CD implementation experience using GitHub / Bitbucket / Jenkins or Concourse in any combination.

• Strong working knowledge with Json, Yaml and XML formatting and parsing.

• Database and cache - Knowledge of various RDBMS technology like MySQL, Oracle, SQL Server and Redis etc. and at least one NoSQL Technology (e.g. Cassandra, MongoDB, HBase, DynamoDB etc.) and experience writing queries

• Design capabilities for basic prototypes and UI /UX design.

• Server - Exposure to handling Windows servers. Linux is desirable.

• Container Technologies - Exposure to handling Docker containers and Kubernetes.

• Working with API (REST & SOAP) and Microservices

• API Management and Orchestration tools – BizTalk and Informatica is a plus.

• Experience with vendor integrations (hosted solutions)

• Experience implementing coding standards in partnership with Solutions Architect, Domain Architect and Enterprise Architecture
Desired –
Modern development practices – e.g. DevOps
Data Mining / Machine Learning
Map Reduce (Hadoop etc.)
Mobile programming experience (iOS, Android)
Embedded experience (QNX, Android etc.)
Experience with Agile is desirable - (Pair Programming, TDD (Test Driven Development), XP (Extreme Programming), CICD (Continuous Integration Continuous Delivery)
Work Flexibility:
Travel 10% of the time
Onsite, remote work options dependent on team operating model and initiative
Flexibility to work outside of core hours (Monday – Friday) to support business demand
We are proud to be an EEO employer M/F/D/V. We maintain a drug-free workplace and perform pre-employment substance abuse testing.",3.6,"Volkswagen Group of America
3.6","Libertyville, IL",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1955,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Transportation Equipment Manufacturing,Manufacturing,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
265,Senior Data Scientist,$140k-$225k (Glassdoor Est.),"Formation provides personalization for the largest enterprise businesses in the world. We work with high-volume data streams and apply Data Science to bring individualized multi-step promotions to customers. Our Data Science Team is transforming the relationships between Fortune 500 companies and their customers.

You'll work in small teams with a common goal: create excellent data science solutions anchored in a culture of quality, customer focus, and growth.

As a Senior Data Scientist at Formation you will work in an agile environment to prioritize and test hypotheses using principles of rigorous experimental design. You understand that Data Science is an expansive area and no line of code is written until you have clearly defined the problem, methods, and definition of done. Your guidance on causal inference, machine learning techniques, and work prioritization will be sought by other team members. You will contribute to process documentation, and methodology design and review. You will create platform architecture specifications as you work with Engineering and Product Management to integrate Data Science processes into the product platform.

You understand that bugs, inadequate processes, and less than ideal code are part of building a startup. You welcome the challenge of solving these kind of problems while building a great product with the Data Science team.
You will report to the Manager of Data Science.
Key Responsibilities:
Work with Solution Architects and Customer Success to determine how to best apply Formation's product to client use cases
Explore and understand unfamiliar data-sets with tools such as Apache Spark and AWS Athena
Determine metrics and conduct power analysis to determine the feasibility and design of experiments
Implement processing pipelines to clean and process source data
Present experimental methodology and results to Fortune 500 clients
Work with Engineering and Product to standardize and integrate DS workflows into Formation's product
Provide mentorship and prioritization of DS work to junior Data Scientists
Skills and Experience:
Minimum 5 years experience as a Data Scientist, or 3 years experience as a Data Scientist at a startup
Proficient with the Python scientific ecosystem, Apache Spark, and SQL
Have foundational software engineering skills such as bash scripting, version control, and continuous integration
Have worked with job schedulers such as Apache Airflow
Knowledge of experimental design and analysis of results
Understand common concepts related to e-commerce, e.g. lifetime value, net incremental revenue, and churn
Machine learning proficiency with a focus on recommender systems and supervised learning techniques
Experience with optimization techniques such as constrained linear optimization and contextual bandits
Experience in customer onboarding and long-term customer engagement
Experience participating in talent screening and interviewing
About Formation:

Formation distills complex customer data into uniquely tailored experiences; we orchestrate physical and digital exchanges into one seamless journey. Our business is building lasting, trusted relationships between people and brands—and making it look easy.

We're already reaching millions of people a day, and we're just getting started. Our founding leadership is equal parts business, design, and engineering—because we believe differing perspectives + passionate discourse achieve the greatest outcomes. We give our whole selves. We love learning new things.

Formation is committed to inclusion and diversity and is an equal opportunity employer. You will receive consideration without regard to race, color, religion, gender, gender identity, sexual orientation, national origin, disability, or veteran status.

If you're up for the challenge of a lifetime, we're looking for outstanding talent to join our team.

Benefits:
Among our many benefits:
- 100% medical, dental, and vision
- Discretionary PTO policy in addition to 11 paid holidays per year
- 401K
- Commuter Benefit",2.9,"Formation
2.9","San Francisco, CA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2015,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
266,"Software Engineer, ML Platform",$150k-$246k (Glassdoor Est.),"About Pinterest: Millions of people across the world come to Pinterest to find new ideas every day. It’s where they get inspiration, dream about new possibilities and plan for what matters most. Our mission is to help those people find their inspiration and create a life they love. As a Pinterest employee, you’ll be challenged to take on work that upholds this mission and pushes Pinterest forward. You’ll grow as a person and leader in your field, all the while helping users make their lives better in the positive corner of the internet. We're seeking a senior engineer to work on machine learning platforms and infrastructure, with past experience as an ML modeling practitioner. As part of the Machine Learning Platform team, you'll help build our platform for the end-to-end machine learning lifecycle: rapid prototyping; full-scale training; deploying, monitoring, maintaining models; and iterating on modeling ideas. The team's training platform is used for models on all major surface areas (Ads, Home Feed, Recommendations), which score tens of millions of pins every second. Comparable systems include Facebook FBLearner, Google TFX, Twitter Cortex, and Uber Michelangelo. What you'll do: Build tools to speed up the iteration cycle of machine learning engineers and data scientists, for example: A unified feature store for teams to share features about Pinterest entities (pins, users, boards). Model understanding and feature importance tools to understand failure cases and give modelers insights to improve models Model management, monitoring, and deployment tools. Optimize existing model training/feature engineering workflows to improve model training efficiency, e.g. by better leveraging distributed compute, GPUs, or incremental training. Work extensively with ML engineers across Pinterest to understand their requirements, pain points, and build generalized solutions. What we're looking for: Experience developing large-scale machine learning models in production. (Optional) Experience/familiarity with one of the mature ML platforms in the industry such as TFX, Michelangelo or Cortex. (Optional) Experience with feature engineering and feature understanding. Ability to drive cross-team projects; understand our internal customers (ML practitioners), their common usage patterns and pain points, and design solutions Flexibility to work across different areas: tool building, model optimization, infrastructure optimization, etc. One or more of the following: Hands on experience with building models, particularly deep neural networks with Tensorflow, PyTorch, or equivalent. Framework level development on Tensorflow or PyTorch, such as TF operator implementation and optimization. Experience with big data computation frameworks (e.g. Hadoop, Cascading/Scalding, or Spark). At least 5 years of professional experience in software engineering, but likely 8+ Fluency in Python and either Java or Scala. Strong software design skills. #LI-KL1",3.9,"Pinterest
3.9","San Francisco, CA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2010,Company - Public,Internet,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
267,Optical Metrology Production Engineer - Wafer Table,$61k-$97k (Glassdoor Est.),"Introduction

ASML US brings together the most creative minds in science and technology to develop lithography machines that are key to producing faster, cheaper, more energy-efficient microchips. We design, develop, integrate, market and service these advanced machines, which enable our customers - the world’s leading chipmakers - to reduce the size and increase the functionality of their microchips, which in turn leads to smaller, more powerful consumer electronics. Our headquarters are in Veldhoven, the Netherlands, and we have 18 office locations around the United States including main offices in Chandler, Arizona, San Jose and San Diego, California, Wilton, Connecticut, and Hillsboro, Oregon.

Job Mission

ASML is the world’s leading provider of lithography systems for the semiconductor industry, manufacturing complex machines that are critical to the production of integrated circuits or microchips. This position is for an engineering role in the Production Engineering department with innovative. Candidate will work with cross-sectors engineers to introduce new product to production floor and support output for existing product.

This position requires access to controlled technology, as defined in the Export Administration Regulations (15 C.F.R. § 730, et seq.). Qualified candidates must be legally authorized to access such controlled technology prior to beginning work. Business demands may require ASML to proceed with applicants who are immediately eligible to access controlled technology.

Job Description
Develop Manufacturing specifications.
Work with Optical, Mechanical, Electrical and Software Engineering staff to develop overall design of Opto-Mechanical/Electrical Modules.
Develop assembly concepts and qualification tests for new product design.
Introduce new products into production in an existing “Concurrent Engineering” environment.
Run image processing algorithm to extract nm flatness information from interferometer data.
Develop Matlab scripts to search analyze and plot data from Database.
Support query code to interrogate data for manufacturing needs.
Support image analysis on data and derive conclusions.
Develop production sequence and routings.
Develop Manufacturing procedures and technical work instructions.
Support in-production issues by assisting Production Assembly and Test Engineers and Technicians with concise troubleshooting of Opto-Mechanical/Electrical Modules and Sub-Modules.
Evaluate and disposition failed parts with proposed solutions.
Review Failure Analysis Reports from suppliers and help validate the root-cause of the failure Interface with internal and external customers regarding contamination test result, testing methods, and control strategy.
Create and direct equipment calibration, upkeep, and new equipment specification and procurement for all analytical instruments used in manufacturing.

The employee is required to work in a cleanroom environment:

Full gowning (full body coveralls, hood, CR safety shoes, face mask, nitrile gloves and safety glasses. Working under ISO 9000/14000 standards).
Working around overhead cranes, fork trucks and motorized pallet movers.
Working around lasers; working with ladders; working on platforms; and working around chemicals.
Education

BS/MS in Optical Engineering (Optical Metrology background preferred) or equivalent experience.

Experience
1-3 years’ experience in an Engineering environment.
Working knowledge of diverse optical metrology setups: Interferometers, Shack – Hartmann sensor, polarimetry/ellipsometry & Optical alignment.
Working knowledge of geometric optics, wave optics, Gaussian propagation, and aberration theory.
Working Knowledge in image/signal /data process algorithm, statisticsand software development.
Working knowledge with epoxy application in opto-mechanical designs.
Working knowledge with optical assy/ alignment/ test equipment/ tools.
Working Knowledge in lasers, polarization, detectors, electro-optical devices and opto-mechanical constructions.
Experience in a production environment with high tech products and complex production process.
Experience in Lean Manufacturing.
Working knowledge with Optical-Electrical sensors is a plus.
Experience in the field of technical Production Engineering and quality methodology such as statistical process control and FMEA is a plus.
Working knowledge of NX, Teamcenter and SAP is a plus.
Able to read optical, mechanical and electrical drawings.
Knowledge of Code-V and /or Zemax.
Knowledge of MATLAB, LabVIEW and Python.
Capability to interface with multidisciplinary groups (including senior leadership), and be willing to take on responsibility and follow through.
Possess strong ownership characteristics – demonstrated commitment to achieving results on time.
Have strong written and oral communicative skills – ability to communicate effectively to your team and to senior management.
Focus on quality and continuous improvements.
Demonstrated “team player” with a quality orientation and interpersonal skills.
Personal skills
Can observe and respond to people and situations and interact with others encountered in the course of work.
Can learn and apply new information or skills.
Must be able to read and interpret data, information, and documents.
Strong customer focus and commitment to customer satisfaction through prioritization, quality, efficiency and professionalism.
Ability to complete assignments with attention to detail and high degree of accuracy.
Proven ability to perform effectively in a demanding environment with changing workloads and deadlines.
Result driven-demonstrate ownership and accountability.
Identifies bottlenecks and drives improvements.
Work independently or as part of a team and follow through on assignments with minimal supervision.
Demonstrate open, clear, concise and professional communication.
Ability to establish and maintain cooperative working relationships with manager, co-workers and customer.
Work according to a strict set of procedures within the provided timelines.
Other information

Role within Office

Responsibilities:

Routinely required to sit; walk; talk; hear; use hands to keyboard, finger, handle, and feel; stoop, kneel, crouch, twist, reach, and stretch. Occasionally required to move around the campus.
Occasionally lift and/or move up to 20 pounds.
May require travel dependent on business needs.
Specific vision abilities required by this job include close vision, color vision, peripheral vision, depth perception, and ability to adjust focus.

Role within the Factory

Responsibilities:

Must be willing to work in a clean room environment, wearing coveralls, hoods, booties, safety glasses and gloves for entire duration of shift.
While performing the duties of this job, the employee routinely is required to sit; walk; talk; hear; use hands to keyboard, finger, handle, and feel; stoop, kneel, crouch, twist, reach, and stretch.
The employee may occasionally lift and/or move up to 50 pounds.
Specific vision abilities required by this job include close vision, color vision, peripheral vision, depth perception, and ability to adjust focus.
Can work under deadlines.
The environment generally is moderate in temperature with moderate to high noise level.
Must be willing to work a compressed work week schedule – twelve-hour long shift and rotating from three to four days a week.
This must include references to day and night shifts for accommodation purposes.

Additional responsibilities for Wilton Factory:

The physical demands described here are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of this job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.

The employee is required to work in a cleanroom environment: full gowning (full body coveralls, hood, CR safety shoes, face mask, nitrile gloves and safety glasses. Working under ISO 9000/14000 standards).
Operating/working around overhead cranes, fork trucks and motorized pallet movers.
Working around lasers; working with ladders; working on platforms; and working around chemicals.
The employee is occasionally required to move around the campus.
The employee may occasionally lift and/or move up to 20 pounds.
May require travel dependent on company needs.
The environment generally is moderate in temperature and noise level.

EOE AA M/F/Veteran/Disability",3.9,"ASML
3.9","Wilton, CT",-1,10000+ Employees,1984,Company - Public,Electrical & Electronic Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$5 to $10 billion (USD),-1
268,Machine Learning/Deep Learning Engineer,-1,"Requirements

Job Requirements:

· Strong background in parallel programming and image processing algorithm design;

· Strong background in Computer Vision, Machine Learning and data mining;

· Solid experience in C#, C/C++ programming; (it is an advantage)

· Experience in feature extraction/ selection, classifier design is essential;

· Knowledge in computer architecture or familiar with semiconductor equipment development is a plus.

*key skills*

*Machine Learning

*algorithm

experience in finance industry

experience : 9 to 14 years",4.2,"zealogics
4.2","New York, NY",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2012,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
269,Senior Software Engineer,$93k-$179k (Glassdoor Est.),"Requisition ID:

3410

Company:

Epson America, Inc

Do you want to be part of an exciting team driving innovative solutions? Do you love working with emerging technologies? We’re looking for a Senior Software Engineer with a passion for creating new innovative solutions to consumer and business problems to join Epson’s Digital Innovations Team.

What you will do:
The Senior Software Engineer performs research, prototyping, design, development, integration and/or sustaining of full stack applications, for both new and existing cloud environments.
Research and comprehend contemporary concepts in computer science in order to integrate full software for mobile devices, desktop computers and the cloud. Use this knowledge to design and develop proof of concept and production web applications that interface with Epson consumer electronics devices as well as algorithms that meet and exceed performance targets.
Analyze and engineer feature requests for business teams, contribute to roadmaps for specific technologies and propose new projects to management.
Recommend optimal approaches to design and efficient implementation based on practicality, best practices, and key technology trade off decisions.
Learn and/or evaluate new software technologies
Plan, estimate, schedule and develop software that interfaces with multi function printers, iOS/Android apps, third party reference designs (e.g. Raspberry Pi), multi modal interfaces and server platforms or libraries.
Integrate Epson source code with open source software, and software produced by both Epson affiliates and third party companies.
Investigate problem reports, perform troubleshooting and recommend remedies for multiple products. Also research, install, test, evaluate and document problems in released and pre-release software from vendors.
Review software designs, source code under development by colleagues as needed.
Perform unit and integration testing or create test code for features on various platforms.
Create or update documents explaining feature implementation and usage.
Re-engineer assigned software to improve the performance, scalability, stability, and maintainability.
Utilize agile project methodologies.
What you will bring:
5-7 years experience in designing and developing software for full stack deployments specializing in backend cloud environments that connect standalone products,
Completion of an undergraduate program required. (B.A. or B.S.).
Have a general understanding of approaches in Artificial Intelligence
Experience applying Machine Learning techniques preferred
Experience working with web applications and developing software in one or more server scripting languages
Knowledge of iOS and Android app development and common libraries, object oriented software development
Experience developing multi-threaded applications, and database formats
Working knowledge of backend server application development including Google/Azure/AWS Cloud services, Software as a Service (SaaS), Python, Java, JavaScript, Node.js, RESTful APIs, XML, JSON, HTTP, WebSockets and Socket.IO, SSH, SQL and NoSQL databases.
Working knowledge of RESTful architecture concepts, Docker containers, and design patterns, voice user interfaces, Python, Java, JavaScript, Node.js, Software as a Service (SaaS), MySQL or SQLite, one or more NoSQL databases, callback functions, software factories and common server frameworks and machine learning concepts are preferred.
Experience with personal assistant (Alexa, Google Assistant, Cortana, Siri) skill design capability is a plus.

Epson America, Inc. is an Equal Opportunity/ Affirmative Action Employer

All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, age, national origin, disability and protected veteran status, as well as any other characteristic protected by federal, state or local law.

IND1

Nearest Major Market: San Jose
Nearest Secondary Market: Palo Alto
Job Segment:
Developer, Electronics Engineer, Software Engineer, Engineer, Computer Science, Technology, Engineering",3.8,"Epson America
3.8","San Jose, CA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1975,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
270,Principal Systems Engineer,$82k-$162k (Glassdoor Est.),"JOB SUMMARY

ThePrincipal Systems Engineer is responsible for participating in the research, design and development of test instrumentation for the electric power generation, transmission and distribution industry. This person will be responsible for evaluating architectural choices based on product requirements and ensuring that the architecture works across hardware, firmware and software components. The Principal Systems Engineer must be able to participate in a team environment, while managing their own assigned responsibilities. Responsibilities also include providing system-level architectural leadership to a small team of engineers and participating in the selection and definition of hardware and software architectures for future products.

The ideal candidate would be someone that has past experience with hardware design and/or FPGA programming and currently working in the embedded real-time, multi-processor environment. This position will be located in ourMarlborough, MA corporate headquarters, reporting to the Director of Software Engineering

ESSENTIAL JOB FUNCTIONS
Help evaluate new technologies and leverage those into product architectures resulting in the implementation of requested product functions.
Innovate new product features based on your ability to realize product from technical possibilities.
Provide technical leadership in the realm of system design.
Design, develop, test and document firmware components and applications.
Design, Develop and Test embedded real-time, multi-processor systems.
Work with engineering project teams to provide architectural technical leadership.
Lead technical requirements gathering, estimating, and planning efforts.
Leverage internal component reusability and open source solutions to improve time to market.
Develop products to promote the ease of implementing automated test suites (Nice-to-have).
Develop clear metrics for testing status and progress monitoring dashboards.
Mentorship of more junior engineers and on-going professional development activities.
As a member of the Engineering team, interface with mechanical, electrical, systems, and test engineers.
Participate in project team meetings.
Identify and implement process and development environment improvements.
Work with Development and project managers to assist in technical decision making.
Ensure cross product implementation consistency.
Work with other product teams on solutions.
Travel requirement: less than 5%.
DECISION-MAKING LATITUDE

This employee will be a member of design teams and, as a Principal engineer, will be responsible for guiding these teams in system designs.

QUALIFICATIONS

EDUCATION:

Bachelor’s Degree in Electrical or Computer Engineering required.

REQUIRED EXPERIENCE:
15+ years of work experience in firmware and software development.
5+ years of work experience in a technical leadership role.
Ability to quickly prototype new concepts and ideas.
Ability to provide creativity while solving complex problems without known solutions.
Familiarity and experience working with Matlab, Linux, and scripting languages.
Knowledge of PC based applications.
Knowledge of FPGA programming.
Knowledge of hardware design Familiar with message bus technologies and implementations.
Team communication and collaboration experience (Such as a wiki).
Ability to assess new technologies via comprehensive reviews.
Experience working with hardware teams to isolate failure causes.
Proven track record of proactively working with the development and QA stakeholders.
Strong technical capabilities of a developer combined with a passion for assuring product quality.
DSP FPGA/CPLD implementations.
Project management skills, including planning, estimation and requirements management.
Expert level skills in one or more scripting languages such as TCL, Python and Perl.
Experience with embedded and host applications developed in C, C++, C# and .NET
PREFERRED EXPERIENCE (Not Required):
FPGA or DSP based digital loop control.
Simulation with PSpice, LTSpice, MATLAB, PSIM and/or Simulink.
Complete product life-cycle experience.
IEC61010-1 compliance experience.
Experience working in an agile engineering environment.
Experience working with Atlassian Jira, Confluence and Bitbucket products.
Experience or the desire to learn about utility power systems.
Experience with Protocol development and messaging systems.
Knowledge of equipment such as protectors, relays, transformers and power cable.


KNOWLEDGE, SKILLS& ABILITIES:
Ability to express ideas clearly in written and oral communications.
Willingness and excited to assume increased responsibility.
Expert knowledge of scripting and programming languages including C/C++ and Perl/Python/PHP.
Development experience Linux, Windows.
Expert knowledge of embedded multiprocessor systems, software/hardware test and validation, bug life cycle management, software development methodologies (waterfall and agile).
Strong communication skills that interweave presentation skills with the problem- solving process.
Strong interpersonal skill set.
Strong computer skills including network load flow software.
Well-developed technical writing skills.
PHYSICAL REQUIREMENTS:

While performing the duties of this job the employee is often required to stand, sit, use computers, read, write, type, use fax machines, use copy machines, file paperwork, use telephones, and utilize written and oral communication to interact with clients, co-workers and customers. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals to perform the essential functions of this job. Must be capable of lifting 30 pounds.

---

Equal Opportunity Employer/Protected Veterans/Individuals with Disabilities

We are an Equal Employment Opportunity employer that values the strength diversity brings to the workplace. All qualified applicants, regardless of race, color, religion, gender, sexual orientation, marital status, gender identity or expression, national origin, genetics, age, disability status, protected veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by applicable law, are strongly encouraged to apply.

The Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990 (ADA) prohibits discrimination by employers, in compensation and employment opportunities, against qualified individuals with disabilities who, with or without reasonable accommodation, can perform the“essential functions” of a job. A function may be essential for any of several reasons, including: the job exists to perform that function, the employee holding the job was hired for his/her expertise in performing the function, or only a limited number of employees are available to perform that function.",3.1,"Doble Engineering Company
3.1","Marlborough, MA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1920,Company - Public,Utilities,"Oil, Gas, Energy & Utilities",$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
271,Machine Learning Engineer,$70k-$123k (Glassdoor Est.),"Join a team recognized for leadership, innovation and diversity

Honeywell is a leading software industrial business, harnessing the power of cloud, mobile, data & analytics, IoT and design thinking. With the addition of our state-of-the-art software and innovation center in Midtown Atlanta, we will incubate, deploy and scale breakthrough offerings that will impact the lives of those around us and the world. There is no better time to join our team, showcase your skills and play a key part in advancing our offerings, market presence and culture.

As a ML/AI engineer with Honeywell, this is your opportunity to:

Develop relationships with business team members by being proactive, displaying a thorough understanding of the business processes and by recommending innovative solutions
Provide data modeling, mining, pattern analysis, data visualization and machine learning solutions to address customer needs
Work with our businesses and infrastructure teams to develop a strategy that will clearly outline how our enterprise platforms can enable business growth & productivity by seamlessly combining structured and unstructured data into a single, self-service analytical environment
Build fast data and machine learning solutions to address unique and complex problems in in the industrial services industry

YOU MUST HAVE

BS or MS in Computer Science, Engineering, Applied Mathematics or related field
At least 2+ years of modeling/development experience in (identify specific language)
At least 2+ years' practical experience in Machine Learning or AI Algorithm Development
At least 4+ years of experience programming in Python, Scala or Java
At least 2+ years of experience designing and building full stack solutions utilizing distributed computing or multi-node database paradigms
At least 2+ years of individual contributions (academic or professional) in Predictive Analytics,
Supervised/Unsupervised Machine Learning, Computer Vision, Deep Learning algorithms

WE VALUE

Master’s degree in Computer Science, Engineering, Applied Mathematics or related field
Experience with other programming languages, e.g. C, C#, Python, Java, Ruby, Torch etc.
Cross platform (Linux, Windows) software development experience
Hardware and software system integration experience/expertise
A strong understanding of big data concepts and knowledge of big data languages/tools
Exceptional AI skills, including strong understanding of statistics, probability, and algorithms that enable you to quickly come up with solutions that combine multiple information streams rationally, produce uncertainty estimates, or tailor standard techniques such as Conditional Random Fields or Deep Neural Nets to new domains.
Experience with Docker containers and orchestration platforms such as Kubernetes, ECS, or GKE.
Experience in automation and build infrastructure in large scale and distributed environment
Leverage expertise in Big Data techniques like Extract Transform and Load (ETL) processes
Demonstrate deep knowledge of database management systems, data platforms (e.g. Streaming Data Platform, Kafka, Logstash, Teradata, Hadoop, etc.), and data formats (e.g. SQL, NoSQL, AWS S3, JSON, Redis, neo4j, etc.) for efficient ML feature extraction and data transformations
Provide active mentorship/guidance to junior members of the Agile Tech team and participate in internal and external technology communities
Experience bringing prototypes to production on Hadoop and/or NoSQL platforms
Experience with visualization software (Tableau, Spotfire, Qlikview, d3.js)
Experience working with remote and global teams
Ability to work collaboratively with development/implementation staff through the design and build of new business processes and systems
Experience with data warehouses/SQL/ NoSQL, AWS S3, structured/unstructured data environments/Hadoop Stack, Impala, Apache Spark, Kafka, JSON, HDFS, or AWS cloud
Ability to stay abreast of current and emerging technologies in support of new concept development
Additional Information
JOB ID: HRD103235
Category: Engineering
Location: 13560 Morris Road, Suite 3500, 3rd Floor,Alpharetta,Georgia,30004,United States
Exempt

Honeywell is an equal opportunity employer. Qualified applicants will be considered without regard to age, race, creed, color, national origin, ancestry, marital status, affectional or sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, disability, nationality, sex, or veteran status.",3.7,"Honeywell
3.7","Alpharetta, GA",-1,10000+ Employees,1885,Company - Public,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),-1
272,Software Engineer III,$61k-$127k (Glassdoor Est.),"Konica Minolta Business Solutions U.S.A., Inc., a global Fortune 1000 company and one of Forbes 2017 America’s Best Large Employers, is transforming the way we all do business.

From smart office technology and information management to cloud, mobility and IT services, we have a rich history of creating the products and services necessary to drive innovation and make work possible from anywhere at any time. Our award-winning products and solutions help companies around the world move information faster, improve quality and productivity, enhance security and facilitate the sharing of information. We are proud that our portfolio leads the industry while exceeding environmental standards.

At Konica Minolta, you'll work for an amazing technology company with growth opportunities, great benefits and talented, passionate co-workers.

Position Description

The Senior Application Developer position is responsible for maintaining, enhancing, and growing applications developed by Konica Minolta's Solutions Engineering Center (SEC). Qualified candidates should have experience working with C, C++ on the latest Windows operating systems. In addition to a strong technical background, the ideal candidate should show the ability to think critically, gather information and problem solve in a team environment. This is a great opportunity for someone who wants to join a team that takes agile development seriously. As a member of a small team, the successful candidate will be able to play an important role in the evolution of Konica Minolta's Dispatcher Phoenix while working with the latest technologies.

Job Requirements

What we expect to see:

Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science, Software Engineering, or related degree concentration.
15+ years of Professional Software Development & programming experience in C/C++ with a focus on:
Design of long running server processes like event Loops / async scheduling, memory management and graceful termination.
Strong Knowledge of Networking Communication Protocols such as, HTTP, FTP, SMTP, TCP / IP and XMPP.
Experience with GNOME development tools and libraries such as, Glib, Gobject, Gio, Gmime, Pango and libsoup.
Experience with the Cairo, Windows Imagining Components (WIC), COM, DCOM and XmlLit.e
Working Knowledge of PowerShell, Lua, and/or SQL
Experience consuming Web APIs using JSON and SOAP.
Experience developing customer facing components and backend APIs.
Knowledge of TCP/IP networking.
Knowledge in .NET Framework 4.x, .NET Core Frameworks and C# programming language is plus.
Strong written and verbal communication skills.
Self-motivating and self-learning.

What we like to see:

Experience with Glib, GObject, GTK+, MinGW.
Experience in SQL, PowerShell, Node.js, Go, PHP.
Experience with Microsoft SQL Server, SQLite, Oracle, PostgreSQL, or MySQL.
Experience with Nuance OCR SDK or Abby OCR SDK is a plus.
Experience with GIT and Virtual Machines.
Knowledge of configuring and maintaining Microsoft Active Directory.
Knowledge of Printer Description Languages (PCL/PostScript).
Open source code you are proud of.

Konica Minolta Offers:

Outstanding benefits package (including medical, dental, vision, company-provided disability and life insurance)
401(k) plan with matching company contribution
Generous holiday and paid time off schedules
Tuition Assistance Program
Employee Referral Bonus Program
Ongoing professional development training
Visible, exciting work supporting sales of cutting edge technology and workflow solutions.

Join Konica Minolta and help drive innovation as we transform the Workplace of the Future.™

Konica Minolta is an equal opportunity and affirmative action employer. We consider all qualified applicants for employment without regard to race, color, religion, creed, national origin, sex, pregnancy, age, sexual orientation, transgender status, gender identity, disability, alienage or citizenship status, marital status or partnership status, genetic information, veteran status or any other characteristic protected under applicable law.",2.9,"Konica Minolta
2.9","Windsor, CT",-1,10000+ Employees,-1,Company - Public,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$5 to $10 billion (USD),-1
273,Machine Learning Engineer (Research),$66k-$127k (Glassdoor Est.),"Machine Learning Engineer (Research)

Machine Learning Engineers in our research group advance the frontier of what is possible in human-level Information Extraction, by conducting fundamental research in the areas of: natural language understanding, computer vision, representation learning, and knowledge graphs.

Responsibilities
Improve the accuracy of existing information extraction systems by advancing the current state-of-the-art
Experiment and validate for production new AI capabilities
Publish papers to share new discoveries with AI community
Implement your cutting edge research in the world's largest production knowledge graph
Collaborate with other Diffbot researchers as well as external AI labs
Requirements
PhD or MS in Computer Science or equivalent work experience
Published research in areas of Web information extraction, natural language processing, computer vision, entity linking, relation extraction, representation learning, deep learning, knowledge inference, and other related fields
Preferred and proficient in Java programming
Preferred Skills
Programming ability: Java, C++,C#
Experience in writing algorithms for speed and scalabilit",4.8,"Diffbot
4.8","Mountain View, CA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2011,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
274,"Software Engineer, Machine Learning (Places Data)",$85k-$149k (Glassdoor Est.),"Facebook's mission is to give people the power to build community and bring the world closer together. Through our family of apps and services, we're building a different kind of company that connects billions of people around the world, gives them ways to share what matters most to them, and helps bring people closer together. Whether we're creating new products or helping a small business expand its reach, people at Facebook are builders at heart. Our global teams are constantly iterating, solving problems, and working together to empower people around the world to build community and connect in meaningful ways. Together, we can help people build stronger communities - we're just getting started.

Facebook Reality Lab's mission is To give people the tools to feel connected anytime, anywhere. The teams working on augmented and virtual reality technologies at Facebook are on a mission to build the next computing platform centered around people. We continue to push the state-of-the-art with groundbreaking research into emerging technologies and hardware that will help bring this vision to life. We are building a team focused on building new products that support this mission.

The Places Data team is responsible for a graph of millions of location nodes and billions of edges connecting them. AR/VR products will be consuming the places data graph to power incredible experiences we havent seen in the world to date. As a Software Engineer, you will enable places search and discovery via new surfaces and interfaces. You will mentor and set direction for many ML engineers who look to you to identify what improvements the stack needs to make over the next several years in order to achieve Facebooks augmented and virtual reality goals. You will work across organizations to help build products that leverage the places graph.
Develop highly scalable classifiers and tools leveraging machine learning, data regression and rules based models
You are strong advocate for ML excellence, consistently advance the state of ML for your team and the broader org
Adapt standard machine learning methods to best exploit modern parallel environments (e.g. distributed clusters, multicore SMP and GPU)
Lead integrations of new products that ease peoples transition from 2D to 3D and generate crucial data for user and place modeling
Plan the teams multi-year roadmap in which shorter term projects ladder to the long term vision
Bachelors degree in Computer Science, Computer Engineering or equivalent combination of education and experience
8+ years of experience in programming languages (Python, C++, Java or R) with technical background
5+ years of experience in one or more of the following areas: machine learning, recommendation systems, pattern recognition, NLP, data mining or artificial intelligence
Experience in mentoring influencing senior engineers
Experience with Hadoop/HBase/Pig or MapReduce/Sawzall/Bigtable/Hive/Spark
Proficient with scripting languages such as Python, Perl, PHP, and/or shell scripts
Expertise in the geospatial domain
Facebook is proud to be an Equal Opportunity and Affirmative Action employer. We do not discriminate based upon race, religion, color, national origin, sex (including pregnancy, childbirth, or related medical conditions), sexual orientation, gender, gender identity, gender expression, transgender status, sexual stereotypes, age, status as a protected veteran, status as an individual with a disability, or other applicable legally protected characteristics. We also consider qualified applicants with criminal histories, consistent with applicable federal, state and local law.Facebook is committed to providing reasonable accommodations for candidates with disabilities in our recruiting process. If you need any assistance or accommodations due to a disability, please let us know at accommodations-ext@fb.com.",4.5,"Facebook
4.5","New York, NY",-1,10000+ Employees,2004,Company - Public,Internet,Information Technology,$5 to $10 billion (USD),-1
275,Mechanical Cost Engineer,$62k-$156k (Glassdoor Est.),"Introduction

ASML US brings together the most creative minds in science and technology to develop lithography machines that are key to producing faster, cheaper, more energy-efficient microchips. We design, develop, integrate, market and service these advanced machines, which enable our customers - the world’s leading chipmakers - to reduce the size and increase the functionality of their microchips, which in turn leads to smaller, more powerful consumer electronics. Our headquarters are in Veldhoven, the Netherlands, and we have 18 office locations around the United States including main offices in Chandler, Arizona, San Jose and San Diego, California, Wilton, Connecticut, and Hillsboro, Oregon.

Job Mission

As a Cost Engineer, you will create more value and drive down the cost of goods on parts and assemblies designed at ASML.

This position requires access to controlled technology, as defined in the Export Administration Regulations (15 C.F.R. § 730, et seq.). Qualified candidates must be legally authorized to access such controlled technology prior to beginning work. Business demands may require ASML to proceed with applicants who are immediately eligible to access controlled technology.

Job Description

Cost Engineer at ASML requires an individual to prepare cost estimates to support the development of new products in a fast paced, highly technical environment to ensure cost of goods remain in line with budget. The job entails virtually making parts on our software to determine the optimal cost of the parts and assemblies. You will also meet with Design Engineers and influence the design using your knowledge of optimal manufacturing practices. Finally, you will work with Purchasing to visit suppliers to negotiate technical costs.

Experience with manufacturing complex components and assemblies and a general understanding of costs.
Drive down Cost of parts and assemblies by influencing design on manufacturability & costs.
Creation of Manufacturing Process Flows for manufacturability and cost calculations based on those flows.
Collaborate with Development & Engineering competences, Sourcing and Supply Chain Engineering.
Comfortable negotiating technical cost with suppliers (i.e. milling times, setup analysis, tooling, …).

This is a technical job, not financial. You will be determining manufacturing set up time, milling time, turning time, EDM time, etc. You will be working on multiple projects and with other Cost Engineers, Purchasing, Design Engineers, Project Leads, Supplier Chain Engineers, etc.

Education

Mechanical Engineering degree, or equivalent experience.

Experience
Additional education in relevant engineering subjects are highly desirable.
8+ years of experience for practices of high end precision manufacturing of high precision mechanics & mechatronic assembly.
Thorough understanding and experience with the more advance manufacturing process’ like 5 Axis CNC Milling, CNC Turning, Laser/E-Beam welding, additive (3D printing) manufacturing, precision mechanics in vacuum, laser and waterjet cutting, EDM, manufacturing flow, etc.
Knowledge of manufacturability of raw material manufacturing like stainless steel, titanium, casting, extrusion, high end plastics, etc.
Understand supplier and supply chain (advanced) manufacturing capabilities and preferable their financial value stream and costs. Working in design teams,supplier account teams and suppliers.
Determine manufacturing strategies and create product costing of designs for high precision, low volume parts and complex modules based on optimum serial and volume manufacturing effects.
Experience with manufacturing complex components and assemblies and a general understanding of costs.
Able to drive down Cost of parts and assemblies by influencing design on manufacturability & costs.
Creation of Manufacturing Process Flows for manufacturability and cost calculations based on those flows.
Collaborate with: Development & Engineering competences, Sourcing and Supply Chain Engineering.
Understand high precision, low volume, high mix manufacturing strategies – this is not a high volume manufacturing environment.
Comfortable negotiating technical cost with suppliers (i.e. milling times, setup analysis, tooling, …).
Has excellent analytical and simulation skills for product costs and supplier Factory Standard Cost scenario’s.
Professional communication and convincing skills. Experiences on reporting cost validations, opportunities and risks.
Proactive member of design and supplier account teams.
Support and mentor designers with regard to design for manufacturing.
Personal skills
Can observe and respond to people and situations and interact with others encountered in the course of work.
Can learn and apply new information or skills.
Must be able to read and interpret data, information, and documents.
Strong customer focus and commitment to customer satisfaction through prioritization, quality, efficiency and professionalism.
Ability to complete assignments with attention to detail and high degree of accuracy.
Proven ability to perform effectively in a demanding environment with changing workloads and deadlines.
Result driven-demonstrate ownership and accountability.
Identifies bottlenecks and drives improvements.
Work independently or as part of a team and follow through on assignments with minimal supervision.
Demonstrate open, clear, concise and professional communication.
Ability to establish and maintain cooperative working relationships with manager, co-workers and customer.
Work according to a strict set of procedures within the provided timelines.
Other information

Role within Office

Responsibilities:

Routinely required to sit; walk; talk; hear; use hands to keyboard, finger, handle, and feel; stoop, kneel, crouch, twist, reach, and stretch. Occasionally required to move around the campus.
Occasionally lift and/or move up to 20 pounds.
May require travel dependent on business needs. Business demands will require travel (~20% but could be more during escalation situations and at with notice).
Specific vision abilities required by this job include close vision, color vision, peripheral vision, depth perception, and ability to adjust focus.

EOE AA M/F/Veteran/Disability

Internal Reference: #LI-KG1",3.9,"ASML
3.9","Wilton, CT",-1,10000+ Employees,1984,Company - Public,Electrical & Electronic Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$5 to $10 billion (USD),-1
276,Mechanical Engineer - Electronics Packaging,$60k-$149k (Glassdoor Est.),"Introduction

ASML US brings together the most creative minds in science and technology to develop lithography machines that are key to producing faster, cheaper, more energy-efficient microchips. We design, develop, integrate, market and service these advanced machines, which enable our customers - the world’s leading chipmakers - to reduce the size and increase the functionality of their microchips, which in turn leads to smaller, more powerful consumer electronics. Our headquarters are in Veldhoven, the Netherlands, and we have 18 office locations around the United States including main offices in Chandler, Arizona, San Jose and San Diego, California, Wilton, Connecticut, and Hillsboro, Oregon.

Job Mission

This position requires access to controlled technology, as defined in the Export Administration Regulations (15 C.F.R. § 730, et seq.). Qualified candidates must be legally authorized to access such controlled technology prior to beginning work. Business demands may require ASML to proceed with applicants who are immediately eligible to access controlled technology.

Job Description

ASML brings together the most creative minds in science and technology to develop lithography machines that are key to producing faster, cheaper, more energy-efficient microchips. As a Mechanical Engineer- Electronics Packaging specialist, you will be responsible for developing portions of the lithography system and/or associated tooling related to the electronics infrastructure.

As a Mechanical Engineer- Electronics Packaging Specialist you will:

Perform mechanical design and development associated with packaging electronic circuits including, assembly design, analysis, test, and manufacturing introduction support for both new and existing electronics design projects.
Understand and mitigate possible failure mechanisms associated with materials, interconnects, and environmental loads to develop a reliable design.
Communicate with a team of multi-disciplined engineers (Systems , Electrical, Mechanical, Manufacturing, New Product Logistics, and Product Information Management) for design and logistic release approval.
Investigate and edit product structures, generate CAD models, 2D/3D drawings and be responsible for the final technical data package.
Create, edit, review, and drive Engineering Changes to closure.

Self-Checking and Peer-Checking department designs and change notifications.
Education

BS Engineering with a major in any of the following, or equivalent experience:

Mechanical Engineering (with Electronics Packaging Experience preferred)
Industrial Engineering (taken under advisement based on work experience)
Experience
5 to 10 years of Mechanical design & logistics.
Ability to design and document all aspects of the electrical infrastructure including:

AC, DC, Main power distribution (panel boards, boxes and cabinets).
Interconnect cables, bundles and connectors (harnessing).
Electronic racks, cabinets, control consoles.
Interfacing with printed circuit board designs.

Modeling of flex and rigid PWB’s including volumes and critical part locations.
Experience designing electronic enclosure assemblies.
Experience in sheet metal design.
Experience designing for manufacturability (DFM) and developing assembly work instructions for low to medium volume products.
Experience with 3D solid modeling for design conceptualization and realization (preferred experience using NX).
Experience supporting design fit check during integration & testing of electrical & electronic systems at the module, sub-system & system level.
Knowledgeable of industry codes and standards ( i.e. NEC 70, NFPA 79, Machine Tool Standards).
Knowledge of FEA is a plus.
Working knowledge of wiring diagrams and schematic diagrams.
Working knowledge of design drafting best practices including geometric dimensioning:

Perform dimensional and tolerance analysis as needed.
Strong written and verbal communication skills required:

Ability to write assembly, test procedures, test specifications and test reports.
SOFTWARE:

3D CAD - NX preferred (currently using NX11), other 3D CAD programs acceptable.
DMS - TeamCenter preferred (currently using TC10), other DMS programs acceptable.
Master Data- SAP, other Master Data Management systems acceptable.
The position requires highly motivated, extremely organized and self-driven individuals.
Personal skills
Can observe and respond to people and situations and interact with others encountered in the course of work.
Can learn and apply new information or skills.
Must be able to read and interpret data, information, and documents.
Strong customer focus and commitment to customer satisfaction through prioritization, quality, efficiency and professionalism.
Ability to complete assignments with attention to detail and high degree of accuracy.
Proven ability to perform effectively in a demanding environment with changing workloads and deadlines.
Result driven-demonstrate ownership and accountability.
Identifies bottlenecks and drives improvements.
Work independently or as part of a team and follow through on assignments with minimal supervision.
Demonstrate open, clear, concise and professional communication.
Ability to establish and maintain cooperative working relationships with manager, co-workers and customer.
Work according to a strict set of procedures within the provided timelines.
Other information

Role within Office

Responsibilities:

Routinely required to sit; walk; talk; hear; use hands to keyboard, finger, handle, and feel; stoop, kneel, crouch, twist, reach, and stretch. Occasionally required to move around the campus.
Occasionally lift and/or move up to 20 pounds.
May require travel dependent on business needs.
Specific vision abilities required by this job include close vision, color vision, peripheral vision, depth perception, and ability to adjust focus.

EOE AA M/F/Veteran/Disability",3.9,"ASML
3.9","Wilton, CT",-1,10000+ Employees,1984,Company - Public,Electrical & Electronic Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$5 to $10 billion (USD),-1
277,Senior IT Infrastructure Systems Engineer,$72k-$143k (Glassdoor Est.),"About iRhythm:

iRhythm is a leading digital healthcare company focused on the way cardiac arrhythmias are clinically diagnosed by combining our wearable biosensing technology with powerful cloud-based data analytics and machine- learning capabilities. Our goal is to be the leading provider of first-line ambulatory ECG monitoring for patients at risk for arrhythmias. iRhythm's continuous ambulatory monitoring has already put over 1 million patients and their doctors on a shorter path to what they both need – answers.

Responsibilities:

The Senior IT Infrastructure and Systems Engineer is a critical member of the Corporate IT team, responsible for solutions engineering and operations of iRhythm's infrastructure and systems. Utilizing skills and experience, this person will work with peers on the Corporate IT team to design, test, build and productionalize our IT systems, including network, storage, compute, communication and collaboration services across our on-premise, co-location data centers, and cloud-based environments. This position can be based in our San Francisco or Chicago office.

What You'll Be Doing:

Duties in this role include:
Responsible for the design, build and support of corporate networks, servers, storage, telephony and other systems.
Implement secure and fault-tolerant solutions.
Provide technical leadership, support and architectural direction across multiple teams and domains
Plan and execute projects across the infrastructure landscape
Lead and participate in infrastructure and systems and application projects
Migrate systems from on-premise and co-location sites to cloud
Vendor management and interaction for hardware, software, and service troubleshooting and resolution.


What You Need for this Position
At least 7 years of hands engineering experience with enterprise local and wide area networks, servers and storage systems.
Hands-on experience with VMware products ESXi vSphere, vCenter.
Experience administering and managing Okta SSO / MFA
Extensive knowledge and hands-on experience with Microsoft Server operating Systems & Active Directory.
Experience with Linux a plus.
Routing and switching experience. Cisco Meraki a plus
Experience with cloud compute and storage (AWS and Azure)
Previous experience developing disaster recovery and business continuity solutions
Experience with Microsoft collaboration suite (Office 365 Mail, Teams, SharePoint, OneDrive)
High energy and ability to work independently in a very fast growth environment
Excellent interaction and communication skills; ability to communicate (both written and verbal) clearly and concisely
Self-sufficient, self-managed, self-motivated, must be effective working independently
A service-oriented mindset with a focus on creating value for our internal customers and business partners
Experience operating in a 24x7 international company
Previous experience in healthcare, life-science, pharma or biotech company a plus
Experience working in a SOX regulated company a must
Work schedule flexibility required as some work must be completed after business hours.
Education and Certifications
Minimum AA degree in Information Systems, related field, or equivalent experience
Cisco Certification a plus",3.2,"iRhythm
3.2","San Francisco, CA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2008,Company - Public,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
278,Machine Learning System Software Engineer,$66k-$115k (Glassdoor Est.),"Bachelor's degree in Computer Science or related field from a top-tier university
Advanced proficiency with C/C++ systems development in a Linux environment
Knowledge of networking protocols and hardware interrupts
In-depth understanding of modern compiler optimizations and assembly optimizations including Intel CPU intrinsics
In-depth understanding of GPU intrinsics and CUDA compiler optimizations with a focus on Machine Learning
Experience with CUDA kernels for optimal performance
Strong communication skills to effectively collaborate with machine learning researchers, traders, and other engineers
Have an interest and enthusiasm for learning about financial markets (previous experience not required)
Master distributed, parallel computing principles; know the recent advances in computing, storage, networking, and hardware technologies
Familiar with the state-of-the-art machine learning algorithms and mainstream platforms (e.g., Tensorflow, Pytorch, MxNet)
Powered by JazzHR",4.2,"IntelliPro Group Inc.
4.2","Bellevue, WA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,-1,Company - Private,-1,-1,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
279,Principal Software Design Engineer,$110k-$216k (Glassdoor Est.),"Introduction ASML US, including its affiliates and subsidiaries, bring together the most creative minds in science and technology to develop lithography machines that are key to producing faster, cheaper, more energy-efficient microchips. We design, develop, integrate, market and service these advanced machines, which enable our customers - the world’s leading chipmakers - to reduce the size and increase the functionality of their microchips, which in turn leads to smaller, more powerful consumer electronics. Our headquarters are in Veldhoven, Netherlands, and we have 18 office locations around the United States including main offices in Chandler, Arizona, San Jose and San Diego, California, Wilton, Connecticut, and Hillsboro, Oregon. Job Mission The mission of the Principal Software Engineer is to be part of the core software development team and contribute to cutting edge algorithms for E-beam inspection and metrology, focusing on machine learning, image processing, computer vision, defect detection and classification. This position may require access to controlled technology, as defined in the Export Administration Regulations (15 C.F.R. § 730, et seq.). Qualified candidates must be legally authorized to access such controlled technology prior to beginning work. Business demands may require the Company to proceed with candidates who are immediately eligible to access controlled technology. Job Description Develop and implement computer vision and machine learning algorithms to various SEM patterns/layers, help to build machine learning based image quality enhancement platform for E-beam tools. Lead the team to build and deploy groundbreaking AI models and work closely with product team to meet customer needs Conducting research and develop state-of-the-art algorithms for quality enhancement, segmentation and pattern recognition Partner with high performance computing team and DevOp team to establish the best strategies to achieve the highest performance and throughput Conduct independent research and provide solutions to challenge problems in industry. Improve performance for future projects / models. Using algorithms, investigate the use / different lay out in the wafer design, detect defects, and provide recommendations. Education Master’s Degree in Computer Science, Electrical Engineering, or relevant field of study.Ph.D. preferred. Experience 10+ years of relevant, work related experience, preferably in the semiconductor / large capital equipment industry. A minimum of 5 years of solid C++ development experience is required to implement deliverables and efficient algorithms in our E-Beam systems. Must have extensive knowledge about machine learning/ deep learning product developments and deployment strategies, created CNN, GAN, RNN models used in production environments Strong knowledge of the state-of-the-art in computer vision algorithms and techniques; deep understanding of machine learning and deep learning algorithms – classification, regression, Bayesian modeling, reinforcement learning Experienced using deep learning frameworks (Tensorflow, Pytorch, etc.) Familiar with CUDA, OpenCL and other heterogeneous computing languages is a plus Personal skills Can observe and respond to people and situations and interact with others encountered in the course of work. Can learn and apply new information or skills. Must be able to read and interpret data, information, and documents. Strong customer focus and commitment to customer satisfaction through prioritization, quality, efficiency and professionalism. Ability to complete assignments with attention to detail and high degree of accuracy. Proven ability to perform effectively in a demanding environment with changing workloads. Result driven-demonstrate ownership and accountability. Identifies bottlenecks and drives improvements. Work independently or as part of a team and follow through on assignments with minimal supervision. Demonstrate open, clear, concise and professional communication. Good organization skills. Ability to establish and maintain cooperative working relationships with co-workers and customer. Work according to a strict set of procedures within the provided timelines. Other information Routinely required to sit; walk; talk; hear; use hands to keyboard, finger, handle, and feel; stoop, kneel, crouch, twist, reach, and stretch. Occasionally required to move around the campus. Occasionally lift and/or move up to 20 pounds. May require travel (specify domestic and/or international) dependent on business needs – specify percentage of travel. Specific vision abilities required by this job include close vision, color vision, peripheral vision, depth perception, and ability to adjust focus. Can observe and respond to people and situations and interact with others encountered in the course of work. Can learn and apply new information or skills. Must be able to read and interpret data, information, and documents. Strong customer focus and commitment to customer satisfaction through prioritization, quality, efficiency and professionalism. Ability to complete assignments with attention to detail and high degree of accuracy. Proven ability to perform effectively in a demanding environment with changing workloads and deadlines. Result driven-demonstrate ownership and accountability. Identifies bottlenecks and drives improvements. Work independently or as part of a team and follow through on assignments with minimal supervision. Demonstrate open, clear, concise and professional communication. Ability to establish and maintain cooperative working relationships with manager, co-workers and customer. Work according to a strict set of procedures within the provided timelines. EOE AA M/F/Veteran/Disability",3.9,"ASML
3.9","San Jose, CA",-1,10000+ Employees,1984,Company - Public,Electrical & Electronic Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$5 to $10 billion (USD),-1
280,Data Engineer - Senior Level,$75k-$135k (Glassdoor Est.),"Purpose of Job
Data Engineer - Senior Level

We are currently seeking a talented Data Engineer - Senior Level for our Plano, TX facility. Data Engineers deliver quality reporting and data intelligence solutions to the organization and assist client teams with drawing insights to make informed, data driven decisions. Data Engineers (DEs) are engaged in all phases of the data management lifecycle; gather and analyze requirements, collect, process, store and secure, use, share and communicate, archive, reuse and repurpose data. Identify and manage existing and emerging risks that stem from business activities and ensure these risks are effectively identified and escalated to be measured, monitored and controlled.
Job Requirements


ABOUT USAA

USAA knows what it means to serve. We facilitate the financial security of millions of U.S. military members and their families. This singular mission requires a dedication to innovative thinking at every level.

In each of the past five years, we've been a top-40 Fortune 100 Best Companies to Work For®, and we've ranked among Victory Media's Top 10 Military Friendly® Employers 13 years straight. We embrace a robust veteran workforce and encourage veterans and veteran spouses to apply.

ABOUT USAA IT

Our most important qualification isn't technical, it's human. Here, we don't just sit in front of a screen. We stand behind our 12 million members who rely on us every day.

We are over 4,000 employees strong, a passionately supportive and collaborative team built on Agile principles. We've been in Computerworlds 100 Best Places to Work in IT and named a Top 50 Employer for Minority Engineers & IT by Workforce Diversity Magazine.

See what it's like to work for a company where your passion meets our purpose:
USAA Information Technology: A Realistic Preview

USAA Data Engineer Spotlight video: https://youtu.be/kVCnnaJUH_c

PRIMARY RESPONSIBILITIES
Identifies and manages existing and emerging risks that stem from business activities and the job role.
Ensures risks associated with business activities are effectively identified, measured, monitored, and controlled.
Follows written risk and compliance policies and procedures for business activities.
Design and implement complex technical solutions.
Design, build, manage and optimize data pipelines for data structures encompassing data transformation, data models, schemas, metadata, data quality, and workload management.
Participate in daily standups and lead design reviews.
Breakdown business features into technical stories and approaches.
Analyze data and enable machine learning.
Create proof of concepts and prototypes.
Implement efficient defect management, root cause analysis, and resolution processes.
Assist in setting technical direction for the team.
Mentor and coach junior engineers.
MINIMUM REQUIREMENTS
Bachelor's degree in related field of study, OR 4 additional years of related experience beyond the minimum required
6 years of data management experience implementing data solutions demonstrating depth of technical understanding within a specific discipline(s)/technology(s)
Deep knowledge of a technology or product line.
PREFERRED REQUIREMENTS
4 or more years of ETL/ELT Development in tools like DataStage or Informatica
2 or more years of Java or Python programming experience.
1 or more years of experience building streaming data pipelines (Kafka, NiFi, Spark, Hadoop)
4 or more years writing complex SQL including performance tuning on multiple platforms
Experience with predictive analytics implementations
Exposure to cloud-platforms and the journey from on-prem to cloud (AWS, GCP, Azure, Snowflake, ect)
Experience with Agile Development methodologies
DESIRED CHARACTERISTICS

USAA Data Engineers create innovative solutions that impact our members. Collectively, we are:
Curious and excited by new ideas
Energized by a fast-paced environment
Able to understand and translate business needs into leading-edge technology
Comfortable working as part of a connected team, but self-motivated
Community-focused, dependable and committed
Exceptionally detail-oriented
The above description reflects the details considered necessary to describe the principal functions of the job and should not be construed as a detailed description of all the work requirements that may be performed in the job.

At USAA our employees enjoy one of the best benefits packages in the business, including a flexible business casual or casual dress environment, comprehensive medical, dental and vision plans, along with wellness and wealth building programs. Additionally, our career path planning and continuing education will assist you with your professional goals.

Relocation assistance is notavailable for this position.",3.7,"USAA
3.7","Plano, TX",-1,10000+ Employees,1922,Company - Private,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,$10+ billion (USD),-1
281,Senior Data Scientist,$116k-$184k (Glassdoor Est.),"At Recursion, our mission is to decode biology to radically improve lives. To accomplish this bold goal, we have already generated one of the largest biological datasets in existence in our own labs— tens of billions of images of cells under millions of different biological and chemical perturbations.

With treatments for hundreds of diseases in our sights, Recursion has constructed a world-class team of specialists in biology, drug discovery, automation, engineering, management, and data science that work side by side. Our data science team is no less diverse. We bring together domain expertise in computer science, physics, biology, mathematics, applied statistics, and more. Together, we analyze experimental results, develop best-practice analytical methods for a field that has none, and build the computational tooling required to fuel Recursion's drug-discovery engine.

HOW YOU'LL CONTRIBUTE:

You will help us accomplish all of this by applying your domain expertise, technical experience, and years working on a data science team to deliver scalable solutions that immediately impact decisions— in whatever area that expertise may be:
Biologists just generated a novel dataset and need help developing a new analytical approach.
Our Chemistry team needs a new tool to register and recommend molecules with specific properties from an X-million compound registry.
Our analysis toolkit needs to level-up to support the growing needs of the company.
A production ML model is underperforming on new data, and needs both a redesign and additional experimental data to support the desired objectives.
You will identify and then own projects that suit your expertise— meaning conception, planning, development, implementation, and delivery— with the support of whatever other data science and cross-team expertise is required.

THE EXPERIENCE YOU'LL NEED:
Minimum of 4 years in industry setting on a data science team
Experience working with production repositories and developing deployable data-science products.
High fluency with the Python data stack (pandas, sklearn, etc).
Professional experience in project leadership and team mentorship
Curiosity and the professional skill-set to excel in an open, highly collaborative environment.
A track record of outstanding past projects, publications, or presentations.
NICE TO HAVE:
Experience developing computational analysis for imaging-based biological datasets or bioinformatics for sequencing-based datasets.
Code you can share. Send a link along with your email.
THE BENEFITS/PERKS YOU'LL ENJOY
100% Coverage of health, vision, and dental insurance premiums
401(k) with generous matching (immediate vesting)
Stock option grants
Two one-week paid company closures (summer and winter)
Flexible vacation/sick leave
Onsite daycare facility*
Commuter benefit and vehicle parking to ease your commute*
Complimentary chef-prepared lunches and well-stocked snack bars*
Generous paid parental leave (including adoptive)
Fully-paid gym membership to Metro Fitness, located just feet away from our headquarters*
One-of-a-kind 100,000 square foot headquarters complete with a 70-foot climbing wall, showers, lockers, and bike parking*
*Subject to change during the COVID-19 pandemic

More About Us

Recursion is a digital biology company industrializing drug discovery. Recursion does this by combining automation, artificial intelligence, machine learning, in vivo validation capabilities and a highly cross-functional team to discover novel medicines that expand our collective understanding of biology. Recursion's rich, relatable database of over 4 petabytes of biological images generated in-house on the company's robotics platform enables advanced machine learning approaches to reveal drug candidates, mechanisms of action, novel chemistry, and potential toxicity, with the eventual goal of decoding biology and advancing new therapeutics that radically improve people's lives. Recursion is proudly headquartered in Salt Lake City.

Check out what it is like to work at Recursion here

Recursion is an equal opportunity employer and complies with all applicable federal, state, and local fair employment practices laws. Recursion strictly prohibits and does not tolerate discrimination against applicants because of race, color, religion, creed, national origin or ancestry, ethnicity, sex, pregnancy, gender (including gender nonconformity and status as a transgender individual), age, physical or mental disability, citizenship, past, current, or prospective service in the uniformed services, or any other characteristic protected under applicable federal, state, or local law.",4.6,"Recursion Pharmaceuticals
4.6","Salt Lake City, UT",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2013,Company - Private,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1
282,Automation Sales Engineer,$47k-$134k (Glassdoor Est.),"Automation Sales Engineer- Minneapolis

Territory Includes: Minnesota, Wisconsin, North Dakota & South Dakota

SYNOPSIS:

Learn and maintain domain expertise, and execute strategic and tactical plans, which support the sales and marketing objectives of the US Subsidiary for specific products and technologies within the Industrial Electronics Business Units. Additionally, provide similar expertise and activity for the Control Systems Business Unit in Control and Industry Solutions division. Increase Phoenix Contacts brand awareness and market share through the education and promotion of these products and technologies to targeted ISE/ESE assigned accounts and the development of new accounts.

RESPONSIBILITIES:
Meet/exceed sales growth objectives as established by your Regional Sales Manager.
Be proficient in R3/BASE selling skills and implement to build strong customer relationships.
Focus on the opportunities with automation customers by averaging a minimum of 10 sales calls/Seminars per week.
Utilize Pivotal (CRM) as the primary customer planning, reporting, measurement and opportunity tracking tool.
Be proficient in, and drive the use of all sales tools provided to support local markets.
Active involvement in industry related associations, as well as distributor, and customer events.
Demonstrate technical competence on all products/solutions within area of focus.
Maintain all corporate policies, procedures, and programs including quotations, lead follow-up, and timely reporting.
Work independently to manage and develop channel partners through utilization of joint sales activities, trainings and mutual action plans.
Where applicable, work with Key Account Management and Harrisburg Marketing to implement global/national account strategies in order to achieve program objectives.
Assist in the sales promotion and technical support of packaged control systems and end to end solutions created by the Control and Industry Solutions division.
Demonstrate initiative by understanding what actions need to be taken and completing the required tasks while seeking the perspective of others as required.
Demonstrate an honest and forthright presence by taking responsibility for own mistakes and not blaming others, and by doing what he / she commits to doing.
Work as a team player to make a difference within the business and express gratitude and appreciation to others who have provided information, assistance or support.
Readily handle change through taking advantage of lifelong learning opportunities and being open minded and curious in the face of new challenges.
QUALIFICATIONS:
Four year degree required. Engineering degree preferred.
3+ years outside sales experience required.
Outstanding communication skills – written, verbal and listening.
Self-motivated with the ability to learn and adapt quickly.
Strong interpersonal and negotiation skills.
Electrical/electronic industry sales experience preferred.
Experience in working with distributors preferred.
Displays proficiency in the following global competencies:
o Initiative – the understanding of what action needs to be taken and completing these tasks while seeking the perspective of others.

o Comprehensive Thinking (Personal Credibility) – taking personal responsibility for mistakes; does what he/she commits to and is honest and forthright.

o Collaboration – works as a team player to make a difference within the business and expresses gratitude and appreciation to others who have provided information, assistance and support

o Willingness to Learn – handles change through taking advantage of lifelong learning opportunities and is open minded and curious to face new challenges.

ESSENTIAL JOB FUNCTIONS:
Must be able to travel via airplane.
Must have a valid driver’s license and be able to operate an automobile for up to six hours at a time.
Must be able to lift a minimum of 50 lbs (sample, demos, literature)
Must be able to travel overnight 35% + or as dictated by assigned territory.
Comply with company dress code guidelines.
Punctuality in all aspect is required.
Notice to Staffing Agencies, Placement Services, and Professional Recruiters:

Phoenix Contact has an internal Staffing Department. Recruiters are hereby specifically directed NOT to contact Phoenix Contact employees directly in an attempt to present candidates. Phoenix Contact will not accept unsolicited resumes from any source other than directly from a candidate. Any unsolicited resumes sent to Phoenix Contact, including unsolicited resumes sent to a Phoenix Contact mailing address, fax machine or email address, directly to Phoenix Contact employees, or to Phoenix Contact’s resume database will be considered Phoenix Contact property. Phoenix Contact will NOT pay a fee for any placement resulting from the receipt of an unsolicited resume. Phoenix Contact will consider any candidate for whom a Recruiter has submitted an unsolicited resume to have been referred by the Recruiter free of any charges or fees. Phoenix Contact will not pay a fee to any Recruiter that does not have a signed Phoenix Contact contract in place specific to the position for which the resume was submitted. Recruiting vendor agreements will only be valid if in writing and signed by Phoenix Contact's Director of Organization Development and Talent Acquisition or his or her designee. No other Phoenix Contact employee is authorized to bind Phoenix Contact to any agreement regarding the placement of candidates by Recruiters. By submitting a candidate to Phoenix Contact, recruiters agree to be bound and comply with this policy.",4.3,"Phoenix Contact USA
4.3","Minneapolis, MN",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1981,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Electrical & Electronic Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
283,Bilingual (Mandarin) Senior Full Stack Engineer,$63k-$113k (Glassdoor Est.),"Company Overview:
Age of Learning is a leading education technology innovator based in Glendale, California, with a talented team of more than 600 individuals comprised of nationally-renowned educators, curriculum experts, developers, artists, writers, designers, engineers, producers, product managers, analysts and marketing experts! Together we develop engaging, effective digital learning technology and content to help children build a strong academic foundation for lifelong success.
Our flagship product ABCmouse.com Early Learning Academy® is a comprehensive online curriculum and the #1 digital learning product for young children. To-date, more than 30 million children worldwide have completed over 7 billion Learning Activities on ABCmouse. We recently launched Adventure Academy, the first massively multiplayer online (MMO) game designed specifically to help elementary- and middle-school-aged children learn. It features thousands of engaging Learning Activities—including minigames, books, original animated and live action series, and more—in a fun and safe virtual world. Other Age of Learning programs include immersive English language learning products for children in China and Japan; ReadingIQ, a digital library and literacy platform; and a groundbreaking personalized, adaptive digital learning system that individualizes math instruction for every child through AI-driven technology.

We are committed to helping all children succeed. We provide our educational programs at no cost to teachers, Head Start programs, public libraries, and other community organizations, and have served millions of children through these initiatives. We recently established the Age of Learning Foundation to expand this work globally.
As we expand our global reach and increase the educational impact of our programs, we’re looking for passionate, ambitious, and collaborative leaders to become a part of our growing team.

Responsibilities:
Object-oriented development within Age of Learning Web Services platform
Development of web apps (admin tools) with Age of Learning JS.
Discover the Web Services needs on projects
Design static endpoints and agree on a contract with your consumers
Develop functional endpoints against a strong set of coding and documentation standards and conventions
Design and implement performant database schemas to support new and changed functionality
Solve complex problems with simple architectural solutions
Required Qualifications:
Great communication and collaboration skills in a team environment
Experience working with PHP 7, PHPUnit, Composer, Postman/Swagger.
Experience working with JavaScript ES2020, knowledge of web components a plus
Experience working with Docker, MySQL, Document Databases, HTML, CSS
Experience working with High traffic applications.
Master’s or equivalent in Computer Science or related field
Great communicator and collaborate in a team environment
Mandarin fluency required
Familiarity with golang is a plus
We Provide:
Medical, Dental, Vision + 401k
Highly competitive PTO policy
Casual Dress Code
Snacks + Drinks (Coca Cola Freestyle Machine)
Gaming room including an Arcade (2,000+ games)
Frequent team and company outings
Limitless opportunities for professional growth!",3.1,"Age of Learning
3.1","Glendale, CA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2007,Company - Private,K-12 Education,Education,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
284,Intern - Data Scientist - Summer,$68k-$112k (Glassdoor Est.),"Lumen’s internship program is a 10 week, fast-paced and exciting opportunity to gain professional experience within your field of study and career interest. Interns within the Strategic Planning and Transformation organization will be part of an accelerated learning experience, to challenge skills learned in the classroom and develop new skills while working on active Lumen work projects. Data Scientist interns will have the potential to work with Data Science, Advanced Analytics, Machine Learning, and Artificial Intelligence. The internship will take place in Broomfield, CO from 6/1/2021 - 8/13/2021.

In addition, interns will connect to our company culture through community outreach projects, engaging with our employee resource groups and developing their professional skills and business acumen through exposure to senior leadership, cutting-edge technology, groundbreaking projects, and a network of mentors and fellow interns. Launch your career with Lumen and be a part of something amazing!

Job Description
Develop and program methods, automated processes, and systems to cleanse
Integrate and analyze structured and unstructured, diverse big data sources
Identify solutions using machine learning and advanced analytics
Work cross functionally across the organization
Executive presentation of project findings/recommendation
Qualifications

Minimum Requirements:
Enrolled at a 4-year accredited college or university
Graduating between August 2021 – May 2023
In pursuit of bachelor’s or master’s in a machine learning, data science, or statistics related degree program
Intern is responsible for their travel to/from work location
Must be available to work 30 – 40 hours, during the specified 10-week timeframe
Experience with applications and statistical computer languages
Preferred Qualifications:
Strong technical knowledge in the areas of computer science, big data architecture, data processing, and machine learning.
Cumulative GPA of 3.0 or higher
Strong sense of urgency and ability to meet deadlines
Ability to demonstrate ownership and accountability
Ability to collaborate and have agility while making effective decisions
Strong written and verbal communication skills
Flexible and adapts well to change
Requisition #: 234772

EEO Statement
We are committed to providing equal employment opportunities to all persons regardless of race, color, ancestry, citizenship, national origin, religion, veteran status, disability, genetic characteristic or information, age, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity, marital status, family status, pregnancy, or other legally protected status (collectively, “protected statuses”). We do not tolerate unlawful discrimination in any employment decisions, including recruiting, hiring, compensation, promotion, benefits, discipline, termination, job assignments or training.

Disclaimer
The above job definition information has been designed to indicate the general nature and level of work performed by employees within this classification. It is not designed to contain or be interpreted as a comprehensive inventory of all duties, responsibilities, and qualifications required of employees assigned to this job. Job duties and responsibilities are subject to change based on changing business needs and conditions.",3.2,"Lumen
3.2","Broomfield, CO",-1,10000+ Employees,1930,Company - Public,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),-1
285,Controls and Instrumentation Engineer,-1,"Controls and Instrumentation Engineer
Function


Engineering

Location


United States - UT - Sandy

Apply Now

Job Brief


The Controls and Instrumentation Engineer is responsible for designing, developing, installing, managing and maintaining systems and equipment used to monitor and control our machinery and processes.

United States - UT - Sandy

POSITION SUMMARY:

The Controls and Instrumentation Engineer is responsible for designing, developing, installing, managing and maintaining systems and equipment used to monitor and control our machinery and processes. The Controls and Instrumentation Engineer ensures these systems and processes operate effectively, efficiently and safely. The Controls and Instrumentation Engineer position will require proven process knowledge in but not limited to: stone quarrying and sizing, grinding and drying process, lime calcining process, materials handling, sampling, testing, and quality standards, and in addition, analyze and identify continuous process improvement opportunities in these areas. The role is multidisciplinary, working closely with colleagues across a number of functions, such as process engineering, operations, project engineering and information systems (IS). The position will require this person to train and mentor other Controls and Instrumentation Engineers. This position will need to understand project concepts, flow sheets, equipment specifications and layouts that incorporate Graymont and industry wide best practices.

DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES :
Work safely and ensure appropriate safe guards are in place to mitigate hazards and prevent incidents
Act as Controls and Instrumentation Engineer lead in directing and interfacing with other I&C engineers as required
Design, develop and test new control systems as well as maintaining and modifying existing systems
Provide programming development, testing and support for expert control systems (ECS), programmable logic controllers (PLC), human machine interfaces (HMI) and process networks
Work collaboratively with design engineers, plant engineers, IS and other internal staff
Participate in the development, implementation and compliance of plant process network standards Liaison with consultants, contractors and suppliers
Engage appropriate support to ensure compliance with relevant health, safety and environmental regulations and quality standards
Purchase equipment specific to instrumentation, control and network systems
Analyze data and present findings in clear written reports
Learn plant operations and existing systems (control, network, data management, etc.)
Calibrate instrumentation, tune control loops and optimize advanced controls and expert control systems
Able to work irregular hours or be on-call occasionally to support project implementation to deal with faults which occur at the plant operations.
QUALIFICATIONS:
Degree in control and instrumentation engineering or other engineering curriculum with controls and instrumentation experience
Minimum 6 years’ experience controls and/or process engineering experience in lime or equivalent industry
Demonstrated skills in specific control disciplines such as:
advanced process control (APC)
multiple-input & multiple-output (MIMO) with model predictive control (MPC)
distributed control systems (DCS)
programmable logic controllers (PLC)
supervisory control and data acquisition (SCADA)
Frequent travel (up to 50% plus) including cross-border travel to Canada and Mexico.
Creative problem-solving and troubleshooting skills
Excellent critical thinking skills
Good communication and interpersonal skills
Strong team working skills, with an ability to motivate and engage others
Flexibility and an ability to compromise
Willingness to accept responsibility and make decisions
High level of attention to detail
Understanding of and ability to work with high-level computer technology",4.3,"Graymont
4.3",Utah,-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1948,Company - Private,Mining,Mining & Metals,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
286,Data Scientist Associate Part time,$67k-$117k (Glassdoor Est.),"Qualifications
Required:
• Currently pursuing a Master’s degree in Data Science, Computer Science, Information Systems, Business Analytics, or any other Quantitative discipline.
• Strong knowledge of and experience with databases (SQL, etc.) and strong programming knowledge in Python

Preferred:

• An interest in, and some exposure to, one or more of the following tools & techniques: SQL, Tableau, Alteryx, Natural Language Processing (NLP), Data processing and basic statistical methods
• Previous experience working with cloud-based data and analytics platforms, standard business intelligence dashboards, and data enrichment techniques
• Previous experience in developing and maintaining complex big data analytical solutions
• Proficiency in Machine Learning and Statistics algorithms and concepts (Mixed Models, Random Forest, Deep Learning, SVM, etc.)",4.5,"Envision LLC
4.5","Whippany, NJ",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1994,Company - Private,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
287,"Software Engineer, Machine Learning Infrastructure",$114k-$204k (Glassdoor Est.),"Who We Are Nuro is a robotics start-up whose mission is to accelerate the benefits of robotics for everyday life. We have an elite team of entrepreneurs and engineers, designers, and scientists. We believe AI and robotics are at the cusp of transforming daily life and we are dedicated to building meaningful products with this technology. Join us and play a critical role in our mission. About the Role Our software team is growing and we are looking for talented engineers to join us and contribute to 1 or more of the following areas: machine learning infrastructure, 3D modeling, simulation, firmware development, imaging data pipelines. We are hiring at all different levels for this team. About the Work Depending on your skillset and areas of interest you will work on some or all of the following: Engineer large-scale systems using big data and other techniques from the fields of Computer Science and Robotics including large-scale distributed systems and data processing systems Render large amount of data and perform tasks associated with the rendering process including projection, reconstruction, filtering, and estimation using advanced mathematics and computer science techniques Research and develop advanced algorithms to get real-time performance One or more of the following: Prototype/develop advanced algorithms using Python and implement algorithms using C++ utilizing libraries such as OpenCV, OpenGL, and using CUDA to interface with the GPU; multithreading programming; programming with x86 architecture Identify, troubleshoot, and resolve bugs and issues with software programming code that arise during field testing and provide ongoing Quality Assurance testing, software performance tuning and optimization Collaborate with engineering and product teams to understand customer needs, implement solutions, and deliver compelling robotic products About You You have experience in one or more of the following areas: large-scale distributed systems; data storage and processing systems; advanced algorithms using C++ and Python; machine learning infrastructure, multithreading; x86 architecture; and software performance tuning and optimization, robotics software frameworks, different compute modalities (CPU, GPU, FPGA) etc. You have strong problem solving and programming skills with advanced C++ skills. You are passionate about accelerating the benefits of robotics for everyday life. At Nuro, we celebrate differences and are committed to a diverse workplace that fosters inclusion and psychological safety for all employees. Nuro is proud to be an equal opportunity employer and expressly prohibits any form of workplace discrimination based on race, color, religion, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, national origin, age, genetic information, disability, veteran status, or any other legally protected characteristics.",4.3,"Nuro
4.3","Mountain View, CA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2016,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
288,Software Engineer - Machine Learning,$129k-$223k (Glassdoor Est.),"ABOUT THE JOB


As a Software Engineer on Polaris Radar, you will be working on Rubrik's cloud-based anomaly and ransomware detection SaaS product, which leverages machine learning to power its core detection algorithms (https://www.rubrik.com/en/products/polaris-overview/polaris-radar).

Responsibilities:
Analyze experimental data, communicate analysis results, and develop product improvements
Design, code, deploy, and support scalable machine learning pipelines within a business context
Work closely with the team to scale and improve the performance of core machine learning systems and increase the team’s machine learning productivity
Full stack ownership of projects from design to implementation and deployment
ABOUT YOU
Able to identify scalable & elegant solutions to complex problems that work at scale
Interest in working on machine learning systems; prior work or educational experience with machine learning is preferred
Experience with common machine learning techniques such as data pre-processing, feature engineering, and training/evaluation of classification and regression models
Experience with machine learning software packages (e.g. numpy/pandas, scikit-learn, TensorFlow)
Knowledge of OS internals, databases would be useful
Large distributed systems design and development experience is a bonus
ABOUT THE TEAM

Our team builds products to address Rubrik's holistic ransomware response strategy. We make it easier and faster to recover from security attacks while providing greater intelligence on how an incident impacted enterprises' global applications and data.

Our engineers are self-starters, driven and can manage themselves. We believe in giving engineers responsibility, not tasks. Our goal is to motivate and challenge you to do your best work. We encourage each engineer to try out new ideas. A lot of such ideas have become our products. All ideas, whether they are coming from newly graduated students or seasoned engineers, are all respected and valued the same way.

ABOUT RUBRIK

Rubrik is one of the fastest growing companies in Silicon Valley, revolutionizing data protection and management in the emerging multi-cloud world. We are the leader in cloud data management, delivering a single platform to manage and protect data in the cloud, at the edge, and on-premises. Enterprises choose Rubrik to simplify backup and recovery, accelerate cloud adoption, enable automation at scale, and secure against cyberthreats. We’ve been recognized as a Forbes Cloud 100 Company two years in a row and as a LinkedIn Top 10 startup.

Rubrik provides equal employment opportunities (EEO) to all employees and applicants for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, age, disability or genetics. In addition to federal law requirements, Rubrik complies with applicable state and local laws governing nondiscrimination in employment in every location in which the company has facilities. This policy applies to all terms and conditions of employment, including recruiting, hiring, placement, promotion, termination, layoff, recall, transfer, leaves of absence, compensation and training.

#LI-SK1",3.6,"Rubrik
3.6","Palo Alto, CA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2014,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
289,Software Development Engineer,$127k-$187k (Glassdoor Est.),"We are seeking passionate and driven Software Development Engineers who love solving big problems using well-designed and elegantly-written code. You’ll be working on cutting-edge technologies, including Big Data, Cloud Services, Analytics, Visualization, and Machine Learning to solve real-world problems for some of the biggest and most respected Fortune 500 companies in the world.
Responsibilities
Design and develop sophisticated on-premise and cloud-based software
Engage directly with major Adaptiva customers to help define the functionality of current and future Adaptiva products
Work collaboratively with product marketing, sales, solutions engineering, and support teams to ensure that Adaptiva products deliver outstanding experiences to all our customers
Requirements
Bachelors or Masters degree in Computer Science or Engineering
1-3 years of proven software development experience using C, C++, C#, or Java
Demonstrated ability to design and develop high quality code
Excellent knowledge of data structures, algorithms, and object oriented programming
Ability to develop multi-threaded, asynchronous code, using extensive synchronization mechanisms
Experience with high-volume, high-performance transaction processing systems or other high-performance client-server software
Willingness to write design documents and specifications
APPLY NOWAPAC Support ResourceBusiness Development RepresentativeMarketing Events ManagerProduct Marketing ManagerRecruiterSenior Product ManagerSoftware Development EngineerSr. Software Development EngineerSenior Solutions Architect, USHOW TO APPLY
Email your resume and cover letter to Company
Adaptiva is a leading, global enterprise systems management company headquartered in Bellevue, WA. Our breakthrough peer-to-peer distributed computing technology is trusted by hundreds of large enterprises around the world. Our environment and culture incorporate our four core values: Integrity, Excellence, Work Ethic, and Dignity of Labor. As an employer, we offer above-market compensation structures, industry-leading benefits packages, and incredible learning and growth opportunities, in a fast-paced and collaborative environment.
Job Summary
We are seeking passionate and driven Software Development Engineers who love solving big problems using well-designed and elegantly-written code. You’ll be working on cutting-edge technologies, including Big Data, Cloud Services, Analytics, Visualization, and Machine Learning to solve real-world problems for some of the biggest and most respected Fortune 500 companies in the world.
Responsibilities
Design and develop sophisticated on-premise and cloud-based software
Engage directly with major Adaptiva customers to help define the functionality of current and future Adaptiva products
Work collaboratively with product marketing, sales, solutions engineering, and support teams to ensure that Adaptiva products deliver outstanding experiences to all our customers
Requirements
Bachelors or Masters degree in Computer Science or Engineering
1-3 years of proven software development experience using C, C++, C#, or Java
Demonstrated ability to design and develop high quality code
Excellent knowledge of data structures, algorithms, and object oriented programming
Ability to develop multi-threaded, asynchronous code, using extensive synchronization mechanisms
Experience with high-volume, high-performance transaction processing systems or other high-performance client-server software
Willingness to write design documents and specifications",3.6,"Adaptiva
3.6","Kirkland, WA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2004,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
290,Senior Software Engineer - Computer Vision,$69k-$140k (Glassdoor Est.),"Kitware is currently hiring a Senior Software Engineer to join our Computer Vision team. If you are interested in working on cutting edge, real world problems in a setting that is a cross section between academia and industry, then this is a great opportunity for you.

By joining our team, you will be contributing your C++ expertise in the areas of computer vision or machine learning to develop robust solutions for real-world problems. Our projects focus on areas such as 3D reconstruction, object detection, image manipulation detection, and motion pattern learning and anomaly detection. Kitware’s employees have unique opportunities to interact and collaborate directly with customers, visit interesting customer sites, and participate in live field tests and demonstrations. Software Engineers at Kitware also have the opportunity to publish and maintain open source software packages.

In this position, you will help design and implement large scale C++ software frameworks that enable cutting edge research algorithms to run optimally across diverse environments from embedded systems and mobile platforms to desktop applications to cloud infrastructure. Senior engineers are expected to take a leadership role in working with the community to maintain quality open source software on platforms such as Github and Gitlab. Working closely with an experienced team of researchers and software developers, you will have opportunities to learn more about emerging topics in computer vision, machine learning, and artificial intelligence.
Qualifications
Minimum 3-5 years experience as a software engineer
Significant C++ experience
Experience integrating 3rd party libraries
Experience with distributed processing/computing
Experience designing and implementing complex software systems
Experience optimizing code
Some leadership experience reviewing and overseeing others code development
Some experience in other programming languages, especially Python
BS or MS degree in computer science or a related field
Due to contractual restrictions, only candidates that are US Persons (citizens, permanent residents, asylees or refugees) will be considered for this position.
Preferred Qualifications
Experience integrating other languages as necessary
Experience with GPU based development
Knowledge of Computer Vision applications
Knowledge of software development processes/environments including CMake/CDash, MS Visual Studio, gcc, make, and/or XCode
Ability to develop software for Unix, Linux, MacOS and/or Windows operating systems to large open-source projects and communities
Company Description
Founded in 1998, Kitware is a leader in the creation and support of open-source software and state-of-the-art technology, and is one of the fastest growing software companies in the country. Kitware leverages its diverse technical expertise to provide advanced custom solutions for a host of complex technical problems. Kitware’s mission is to advance the frontiers of understanding by developing innovative open-source software platforms and integrating them into research, processes, and products.

We partner with premier government R&D agencies such as DARPA, IARPA, AFRL, ONR, and NRL; branches of the US military; and members of the intelligence community on a range of efforts including prime contracts, SBIRs, and STTRs. In addition, we provide commercial services to companies ranging from tiny startups to Fortune 500 internet companies. By joining our team, you will be contributing your expertise to develop robust solutions for real-world, challenging problems that directly enhance our national security.
Kitware employs an open source business model to foster extended, collaborative communities, and to provide flexible, high-quality technical solutions. If you’ve used CMake, ITK, or VTK, you know our work and the impact it has on the communities we help build

Additional information
Kitware team members enjoy a small company environment, flexibility in work assignments, and high levels of independence and responsibility. Besides a great work environment, our comprehensive benefits package includes a generous compensation plan, tuition reimbursement program, flexible working hours, six weeks paid time off, 401(k), health insurance, life insurance, short- and long-term disability insurance, bonus plan, and free coffee, drinks and snacks.

Kitware actively subscribes to a policy of equal employment opportunity. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, national origin, sex, age, protected veteran status, uniformed service member status, or any other characteristics protected by applicable law.",4.1,"Kitware
4.1","Clifton Park, NY",-1,51 to 200 Employees,1998,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$5 to $10 million (USD),-1
291,R&D Mechanical Engineer,-1,"Pivotal Commware develops 5G communications platforms, systems and applications based on Holographic Beam Forming® , a patented breakthrough in electromagnetic physics. HBF allows Pivotal to create software-defined antennas that can harness, shape and direct radio waves with order-of magnitude advantages over legacy beamforming systems in cost, size, weight and power consumption (C-SWaP). HBF enables mobile network operators to maximize capacity, coverage and throughput on demand and is recognized as an essential element in the 5G ecosystem. 5G leadership is pivotal to the US economy, and 5G is Pivotal™.

Pivotal Commware is seeking a Research oriented Mechanical Engineer with experience in the co-design of RF/Microwave hardware to join our team. Expertise is needed for rationalizing high volume, low cost manufacturing techniques against demanding system requirements in the areas of custom RF interconnects, thermal management, and radome integration.
The candidate will be responsible for validating novel techniques sourced from both internal invention and external vendors. Execution skills in rapid prototyping and testing are critical. The candidate will be working in a very quick design cycle environment and should be willing and ready to work hands-on. This position embeds with the mechanical engineering team but reports directly to the CTO.
Responsibilities:
Work with RF, Mechanical and Production engineering teams to understand areas where innovative mechanical engineering solutions are critically needed
Formulate and execute strategies to triage, prototype, test and validate proposed solutions
Facilitate knowledge transfer between R&D, product design, test and production teams
Develop and Document resulting intellectual property
Propose and validate novel assembly techniques and processes
Required Qualifications:
Mechanical Engineering PhD with 2 years or Masters with 4 years post academic experience working on wireless products
Familiarity with 2D and 3D CAD tools such as Solid Works, AutoCAD, etc…
Experience with conventional metal and plastic manufacturing processes for low to high volume
Working knowledge of Design for Manufacturing techniques and practices
Thermal, stress/strain, and other analysis of PCB and device packaging
Desired Qualifications/Skills:
Understanding of modern Printed Circuit Board fabrication methods
Experience with cellular base station antenna and ODU packaging and mounting design
Experience working with commercial radome design
Understanding of basic RF metrology
Design for environmental and standards testing such as IP65-IP67 and DO-160
Experience with 3D Printing techniques
Pivotal was named among Washington’s Top 100 Places to Work in 2018, 2019 & 2020. At Pivotal you will join a team experienced in advanced communications, RAN system development and deployment, commercial antenna’s, RF design, cloud-based management software and machine learning. If you want to apply yourself to this fascinating endeavor, then we would like to hear from you!
Pivotal is an Equal Opportunity Employer. We respect and seek to empower each individual and support the diverse cultures, perspectives, skills, and experiences within our workforce.",5.0,"Pivotal Commware
5.0","Kirkland, WA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2016,Company - Private,Telecommunications Manufacturing,Telecommunications,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
292,Senior Staff Backend Engineer - Trust & Safety,$123k-$189k (Glassdoor Est.),"Tinder Trust & Safety is a cross-functional team of highly motivated engineers, data scientists, product managers, community moderators, and anti-fraud specialists. Our projects range from ML
experimentation and deployment, distributed signal processing, and building highly robust account review and moderation pipelines all the way to user-facing in-app safety features.

As Tinder continues to grow and create new and exciting experiences for our users, the challenge of maintaining a safe and protected experience grow ever-larger and more complicated – that’s where Tinder Trust comes in. Our team is responsible for creating a user experience free of abusive behavior such as spam, fake accounts, scams, and toxic behavior, using a combination of state-of-the-art machine learning, human analysis, distributed systems engineering, deep cross-team collaboration, and anything else in-between!
On this team, you will:
Work with signal Computation, Anti-abuse, Case Moderation, Rules Engines, Real-time stream
processing, complex transactional APIs, ML data pipelines, and End-user client API
Report directly to the head of the Trust & Safety engineering team, and will serve as a principal
technical player across all 4 Trust Engineering teams/lanes
Be the key steward of the Trust Platform, overseeing architecture, implementation, testing and
operation of the core systems
Oversee the architecture and integration of all Trust related backend systems and client APIs
Conceive, implement, monitor, and improve creative new ML based systems for detecting and
removing bad actors
Collaborate across various teams, including product, devops, platform, clients, community, etc.
Ensure that technical designs support our goals of quality, performance, scalability, reliability,
availability, maintainability, and security
Influence the roadmap and product development for the Trust & Safety roadmap
Guide, inspire, and mentor engineers across the Trust organization
Drive new technical initiatives that will ultimately improve the day-to-day efficiency of all users
of the internal Tools platform

We're looking for:

Excellent knowledge of Computer Science fundamentals, with strong competencies in data
structures, algorithms, software design and coding
Hands on experience building distributed backend systems handling high volumes of traffic
Experience in handling ambiguous business requirements with excellent prioritization, time
management abilities, and a focus on execution
Passion to solve complex problems and make continuous improvements
Experience working in a collaborative team environment
Hands-on experience with database technologies at scale (either SQL or NoSQL)
Strong Java/Scala skills and experience
Eagerness to keep learning and growing, and a passion for providing mentorship
Passionate about making high user impact and moving key metrics
A BS, MS, or PhD in Computer Science or Engineering from a top school, but a wonderful
project list is even better

Bonus points if you have:

Extensive experience using streaming technologies such as Flink, Spark, Beam
Experience with Kafka, ElasticSearch, Redis
Experience with Docker containers along with Kubernetes or ECS
Leadership experience
Implemented machine learning algorithms in production
NodeJS experience
AWS/Devops skills
As part of our team, you’ll enjoy:

· The hustle of a startup with the impact of a global business
· Tremendous opportunity to seek some of the industry’s most exciting problems
· Working with an outstanding team of creative, fun and highly motivated people
· Comprehensive health coverage, competitive salary, and 401(k) match

At Tinder, we don’t just accept difference — we celebrate it, we support it, and we thrive on it for the benefit of our employees, our products, and our community. Tinder is proud to be an equal opportunity workplace.",3.8,"Tinder
3.8","West Hollywood, CA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2012,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
293,"Systems Engineer/Architect, Mid-level - FAA",$53k-$110k (Glassdoor Est.),"Position: Systems Engineer/Architect, Mid-level - FAA

Job Summary

This position will provide systems engineering and systems architecture support to the Federal Aviation Administration (FAA) during the development, evaluation, and implementation of a major aviation and safety data analysis project. The position requires 5+ equivalent years of experience in systems engineering, program management, software analysis, and systems architecture. Specific experience with the FAA, Department of Defense, or other federal agencies is desired. A Master’s degree or PhD is desired and may count for additional years of experience.

Relevant Experience

The position requires five+ equivalent years of experience in systems engineering, systems architecture, data analysis, Agile software development, cloud services, and big data. The ideal candidate will possess most or all of the following critical skill sets and experience to meet the requirements of the job function:
Five+ years of recent and quantifiable experience in major systems architecture efforts.
Experience with AWS cloud services, Agile software development, and Big Data concepts is preferred.
Demonstrated ability to design and implement major IT/big data systems; broad experience with developing big data systems to collect, process, and analyze multiple varieties of data at scale, and understanding of component interactions and interfaces.
Broad expertise and knowledge of big data technologies and cloud computing, networking, storage, and security principles and operations
Experience in visualizing multi-dimensional data and application of various machine learning approaches, preferred
A solid track record of data management including knowledge of data mining, machine learning, natural language processing, and information retrieval
Demonstrated experience decomposing high-level requirements into actionable technical courses
Experience developing associated engineering artifacts that support system functional requirements, technical specifications, and performance standards.
Experience creating strategy and roadmaps to leverage advanced technology, artificial intelligence, and machine learning.
Experience evaluating big data techniques, such as hashing and encryption, to limit the exposure of sensitive information, while enhancing connectivity and interfaces
Experience balancing distribution of analysis outputs with protection of contributor identities
Demonstrated ability to manipulate datasets with modern languages, Python (scikit-learn, pandas, tensorflow), SAS, MATLAB, C++, R, PHP, or Java
Visualizing multi-dimensional data using business intelligence tools, Tableau, ggplot2, matplotlib, seaborn, PowerBI, GIS, or D3.js
Specific experience with the Federal Aviation Administration (FAA) is not required but is a plus. A Bachelor’s degree is required. A Master’s degree or Ph.D. may count for additional years of experience.

Essential Job Functions

The following duties are normal for this position. The omission of specific statements of duties does not exclude them from this position if the work is similar, related, and/or a logical assignment for this position. Other duties may be required and assigned.

The systems engineering candidate will serve a variety of job functions and responsibilities centered around system architecture, design, development, and implementation of a software and database-centered program initiative for the FAA.
The system architect will serve as technical/engineering expert for the new the program IT architecture platform, integrating advanced analytical tools (using artificial intelligence/machine learning technologies) into the next generation software and analysis system
Responsibilities include coordination of the design and collection/processing/analysis of multiple sources and varieties of data (digital, text and other) at scale.
Responsible for the architectural design, development, and deployment of the system technical infrastructure, working on advanced projects requiring state of the art technical knowledge. The infrastructure includes cloud automation, hardware, software, network, data fusion, visualization and analytical tools, web portals, associated servers and security, and other components.
Lead the program’s transition from legacy system to the next generation system that will be developed, incorporating advanced analytic capabilities and updating operating procedures based on business processes.
System architect will also develop and implement the transition plan to ensure a successful transition.
Advise and support the development and implementation of the system requirements, based on stakeholder needs and program office direction.
Individuals will be required to contribute effectively to working groups through oral and written communication and cooperative working relationships. Detail oriented, self-driven individuals sought.

Education Requirements

Bachelor’s degree required, preferably in quantitative field or STEM, such as Engineering, Computer Science, Mathematics, or a related area. Graduate and Post Graduate degrees are a plus and may count as additional years of experience.

Skills Requirements

Ability to coordinate and communicate in a fast-paced team environment with other technical personnel, the program office, and vendors during system development and implementation. Minimum proficiency with MS Excel and other MS Office Products. Strong organizational, communication, coordination, and interpersonal skills.

Security Requirements

Must be a US citizen or a legal resident for three of the past five years. Must meet eligibility requirements for a US Public Trust security clearance.

Travel

Occasional travel required as needed by client/s and/or company",4.8,"Cobec Consulting
4.8","Washington, DC",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2007,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
294,"Engineer, Manufacturing",$44k-$76k (Glassdoor Est.),"Telephonics employees are designing tomorrow's technology today! From advanced engineering to manufacturing, we are focused on the design and development of highly sophisticated surveillance, communications, analysis and integration solutions for military and commercial customer around the world. We offer a challenging career with competitive salary, medical and dental benefits, 401k, and a host of other perks. We are seeking top talent to fill positions in our new Elizabeth City, NC Facility.

SUMMARY:

Provides engineering support to the production area to maintain optimum levels of productivity in terms of cycle times and quality. Coordinates the introduction of new assembly processes on to the production floor by preparing operation sheets that describe specific production tasks. Partners with design engineers throughout the design process from concept to prototype in order to ensure that maximum production efficiency. Contributes to the preparation of the annual capital expenditure plan for the selection and purchase of new production equipment.

ESSENTIAL DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES: include the following, other duties may be assigned:
Provides an advanced level of engineering support to the production area on routine issues to maintain optimum levels of productivity in terms of cycle times and quality.
Identifies and defines specific problems based on direct observation, analysis of production reports, or verbal reports from production personnel.
Investigates the cause of problems by researching drawings, inspecting tools, reviewing operation sheets, and accounting for other variables such as operator training.
Resolves problems by taking appropriate action, such as issuing new engineering change notices, revising operation sheets, contacting vendors on sub-standard parts, or ordering new tools.
Prepares reports as required to document problems addressed.
Coordinates the introduction of new, routine assembly processes on to the production floor.
Prepares operation sheets that describe the sequence and tasks required to complete fairly routine steps in the production process.
Interprets engineering drawings of assemblies and sub-assemblies and organizes the production process into a logical and efficient series of tasks.
Defines the need for specialized tools and provides specifications to purchasing.
Designs jigs and holding fixtures and prepares drawings for these for the machine shop.
Maintains control of all specialized tools and keeps track of revisions.
Participates in continuous process improvement to maximize cost savings utilizing Lean Techniques.
Monitors Touch Labor Costs with respect to program budgets to achieve cost effectiveness and meet delivery schedule.
Updates and improves operation sheets based on feedback from the production floor and engineering change notices issued.
Generates computerized travel tags including operation sequence and standard time.
Partners with design engineers throughout the design process from concept to prototype in order to ensure that maximum production efficiency (produceability) is engineered into the product design.
Offers suggestions and recommendations on issues that will affect cycle time and quality.
Reviews and approves final engineering drawings.
Participates in presentations to customers.
Coordinates customer audits of production documentation and processes by conducting tours and producing records for auditors.
Composes, updates, and maintains standard operating procedures covering production floor processes.
Acts as a technical consultant to vendors to help them resolve manufacturing problems with regard to the parts they are producing for Telephonics. Analyzes and investigates problems, recommends solutions.
Contributes to the preparation of the annual capital expenditure plan, which involves reviewing projects in process, evaluating the age and condition of existing production equipment, and evaluating the value of new technologies.
Researches to estimate the cost of new equipment and develops options.
Assists management in the preparation of capital expense requests (CER) by defining specifications for the new equipment, identifying multiple sources for the equipment, providing details on available options with related costs, and completing a return-on-investment analysis.
Develops facilities layouts and provides these to the Facilities Department to support the installation of new equipment.
Conducts training classes on electro-static discharge protection, soldering, and other production skills. Evaluates trainees and takes action to resolve skill deficiencies. Develops and modifies the content of skill training. Determines the sequence and content of learning.
Attends professional seminars to maintain a professional awareness of emerging trends and technologies.
Performs other duties as directed.
Required Skills

EDUCATION: Bachelor’s degree – Industrial, Mechanical or Electrical Engineering or equivalent education and experience.

EXPERIENCE: 5-8 years related experience and/or training; or equivalent combination of education and experience., 5-10 years with BA/BS.

We are an Affirmative Action / Equal Employment Opportunity Employer (M/F/D/V). All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, gender, religion, sex, national origin, protected veteran status or any other protected characteristic. Reasonable accommodations may include but are not limited to, that which may enable individuals with disabilities and special disabled veterans to perform the essential functions of this position.

Must have a background that would permit the U.S. Department of Defense to issue a Secret Clearance, which includes US Citizenship.

Required Experience

Job Location
Elizabeth City, US-NC",2.5,"Telephonics
2.5","Elizabeth City, NC",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1933,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
295,Aviation Data Scientist,$81k-$132k (Glassdoor Est.),"Why choose between doing meaningful work and having a fulfilling life? At MITRE, you can have both. That's because MITRE people are committed to tackling our nation's toughest challenges—and we're committed to the long-term well-being of our employees. MITRE is different from most technology companies. We are a not-for-profit corporation chartered to work for the public interest, with no commercial conflicts to influence what we do. The R&D centers we operate for the government create lasting impact in fields as diverse as cybersecurity, healthcare, aviation, defense, and enterprise transformation. We're making a difference every day—working for a safer, healthier, and more secure nation and world. Our workplace reflects our values. We offer competitive benefits, exceptional professional development opportunities, and a culture of innovation that embraces diversity, inclusion, flexibility, collaboration, and career growth. If this sounds like the choice you want to make, then choose MITRE—and make a difference with us.

MITRE performs leading-edge research and development toward transformational solutions to our world’s most challenging problems. Our Center for Advanced Aviation Systems Development is a Federally-Funded Research and Development Center (FFRDC) established to serve as strategic partners to the federal government and various aviation groups around the world. Our engineers, analysts, technical and operational experts team to solve problems in the public interest that improve the safety and efficiency of the airspace system in the U.S. and abroad. The Aviation Operations, Procedures & Safety division is seeking a highly qualified engineer to work in one of the following areas: Airspace and Procedure Design and Analysis; Airport and Airspace Analysis, Modeling and Design; Performance-Based Navigation Standards and Tools; and Aviation Safety Analysis. The candidate will work with the FAA and international customers, leveraging the largest repository of aviation data to improve the capabilities, safety, and efficiency of the aviation system. Come join a globally recognized partner and resource for data driven solutions that impact public good. The candidate will be responsible for: - Contributing to various projects applying innovative analysis techniques across multiple challenging problems in the field of aviation. - Working closely with other engineers and scientists in the design of exploratory analyses or simulations pertaining to aviation issues. - Drawing conclusions from a wide range of aviation system data and articulating key findings in both written and verbal form. Developing data visualization products that simplify presentation of big data calculations. Qualifications: - Knowledge of programming/scripting languages (eg. Python, MATLAB, R, Perl) - Familiarity with statistical analysis packages (eg. SAS, JMP) - Familiarity with machine learning techniques and algorithm development. - Excellent written and verbal communication skills. In-person presentation and writing sample may be requested. - Experience with data visualization software (eg. Tableau, D3) - Knowledge of data processing capabilities (eg. Hadoop, Pig, Spark, SQL). Skill is desired, but not required - Experience working in the aviation domain: airport operation, air traffic control, airlines. Skill is desired, but not required BS or MS in Operations Research, Applied Mathematics/Statistics Computer Science, Systems Engineering, or other physical science/engineering

MITRE is proud to be an equal opportunity employer. MITRE recruits, employs, trains, compensates, and promotes regardless of race, religion, color, national origin, gender, gender expression, sexual identity, disability, age, veteran status, and other protected status.

MITRE intends to maintain a website that is fully accessible to all individuals. If you are unable to search or apply for jobs and would like to request a reasonable accommodation for any part of MITRE’s employment process, please contact MITRE’s Recruiting Help Line at 703-983-8226 or email at recruitinghelp@mitre.org.

Copyright © 1997-2020, The MITRE Corporation. All rights reserved. MITRE is a registered trademark of The MITRE Corporation. Material on this site may be copied and distributed with permission only.",3.4,"MITRE
3.4","McLean, VA",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1958,Nonprofit Organization,Federal Agencies,Government,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
296,IT Support Engineer,$44k-$84k (Glassdoor Est.),"About iRhythm:

iRhythm is a leading digital healthcare company focused on the way cardiac arrhythmias are clinically diagnosed by combining our wearable biosensing technology with powerful cloud-based data analytics and machine- learning capabilities. Our goal is to be the leading provider of first-line ambulatory ECG monitoring for patients at risk for arrhythmias. iRhythm's continuous ambulatory monitoring has already put over 1 million patients and their doctors on a shorter path to what they both need – answers.

About this Role:

The IT Support Analyst is a critical member of the IT team, responsible for supporting local and remote users in a fast growing company with 24/7 operations. This position will provide initial contact for internal company employees seeking assistance and support of computer hardware, software applications, and other various desktop devices. This hands-on position will support employees at 4 different office locations, plus users working out of their homes and in the field throughout the United States. This person will have the opportunity to make a positive impact on the department and organization since this role is very visible within the company.

Specific job responsibilities include:
On/Off-Boarding
Process new hire requests, image and deploy laptops to new hires and perform IT onboarding
Perform New Hire Orientations
Process off-boarding requests, asset recovery, and machine reimaging
Helpdesk
Monitor and triage incoming tickets in the IT Helpdesk Ticket Queue
Provide timely response to all issues, update internal customers on status, solicit additional information, if needed, and troubleshoot issue
Research technical solutions in department specific applications
Troubleshoot, diagnose, and repair desktop, laptop, and mobile issues
Follow up with end users, provide feedback, and see problems through to resolution
Support multiple iRhythm locations and must be versed in providing remote support
Participate in a rotation to provide after-hours/weekend on-call coverage
Adhere to service level agreements
Document procedures and develop end user instructions
Hardware Support
Install, configure, repair and maintain computers, desktop operating systems, software, and peripherals
Troubleshoot network and remote access connectivity issues
Knowledge of iPads, iPhones, Android a plus
Software and Application Support
Microsoft Office Suite (Word, Excel, Power Point, Outlook)
Adobe
AV
Remote control
Other workstation applications
Zoom & Collaboration Tools (Teams & Zoom)
Asset Management
Keep up-to-date records on all IT related hardware and maintain the inventory database and related records
Ensure license compliance
Smart Hands
Provide eyes/hands/feet support for remote Engineering teams
Comfortable with MDF/IDF rooms and equipment
Support 3rd party site techs as needed (telcos, workstation techs, other technical dispatches, etc.)
Project & New Technology Support
About you:
3-5 years of hands on IT Helpdesk & Desktop experience required
High energy and ability to work independently in a very fast growth environment
Extensive knowledge and hands-on experience with Microsoft operating systems, desktop/laptop deployment and imaging solutions, Microsoft Office Suite, Microsoft Office 365
Ability to effectively and efficiently troubleshoot hardware and software issues
Solid understanding of networking, and its use in a typical corporate environment (e.g. TCP/IP, DNS, DHCP, VPN)
Ability to support Executives and their Executive Admins
Be able to communicate articulately in both verbal and written communications
Must be confident in your technical abilities and be able to communicate effectively with a non-technical end user community
Excellent customer service skills
Self-sufficient, self-managed, self-motivated, must be effective working independently
Ability to work within a team of technicians
Must have good people skills, working directly with end users both in person and on the phone
Education and Certifications
Minimum AA degree in Information Systems, related field, or equivalent experience
Microsoft MCP, MCDST, MCSE or MCITP, HDI Support Center Analyst or HDI Desktop Support Technician are a plus
Microsoft certifications a plus
What's in it for you:

This is a full-time position with competitive compensation package, excellent benefits including medical, dental and vision insurance (all of which start on your first day), paid holidays, and PTO!

iRhythm also provides additional benefits including 401K (with company match), an Employee Stock Purchase Plan, paid parental leave, pet insurance discount, Cultural Committee/Charity events, and so much more!

FLSA Status: Exempt

As a part of our core values, we ensure a diverse and inclusive workforce. We welcome and celebrate people of all backgrounds, experiences, skills and perspectives. iRhythm Technologies, Inc. is an Equal Opportunity Employer (M/F/V/D). Pursuant to San Francisco Fair Chance Ordinance, we will consider for employment all qualified applicants with arrest and conviction records.

Make iRhythm your path forward.",3.2,"iRhythm
3.2","Lincolnshire, IL",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2008,Company - Public,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
297,Sr. Operations Quality Engineer,$58k-$103k (Glassdoor Est.),"Introduction

ASML US, including its affiliates and subsidiaries, bring together the most creative minds in science and technology to develop lithography machines that are key to producing faster, cheaper, more energy-efficient microchips. We design, develop, integrate, market and service these advanced machines, which enable our customers - the world’s leading chipmakers - to reduce the size and increase the functionality of their microchips, which in turn leads to smaller, more powerful consumer electronics. Our headquarters are in Veldhoven, Netherlands, and we have 18 office locations around the United States including main offices in Chandler, Arizona, San Jose and San Diego, California, Wilton, Connecticut, and Hillsboro, Oregon.

Job Mission

Support Wilton Factory in Quality metric reporting and advancement of defect prevention and variability reduction initiatives (SPC, pFMEA, 6-Sigma).

This position requires access to controlled technology, as defined in the Export Administration Regulations (15 C.F.R. § 730, et seq.). Qualified candidates must be legally authorized to access such controlled technology prior to beginning work. Business demands may require ASML to proceed with applicants who are immediately eligible to access controlled technology.

Job Description

This is an outstanding opportunity in our Wilton, Connecticut facility to join our Quality Operations Team. In this position you will manage key reporting and quality initiatives. You will interface with production, quality and development engineers on new or current manufacturing processes. You will be responsible for the following key duties:

Planning and execution of prevention activities (SPC, FMEA).
Provide clear periodic quality management reporting.
Facilitate and advance Wilton Factory Operations 6 Sigma.
Integrate quality assessment and defect prevention processes.
Education

Bachelor degree in Industrial, Production, Electrical, Mechanical, Optical or Chemical engineering, or equivalent experience.

Experience
10+ years relevant experience in hi tech manufacturing environment with a focus on quality engineering, planning, reporting, executing statistical process control and process FMEA.
Working in quality or manufacturing.
Previous team supervisory experience and a 6 Sigma Black Belt required.
ASQ-CQE a plus.
Broad knowledge of Quality tools (SPC, TQM, FMEA, 8-D, Gauge R&R etc.).
Proficient with Microsoft Office suite and Minitab.
SAP knowledge a plus.
Personal skills
Ability to independently manage a team.
Strong organization skills.
Excellent written and verbal communication skills.
Ability to summarize detail results and present in effective management summaries/reports.
Ability to plan and execute multiple project tasks.
Proactive mindset.
Effective meeting facilitation skills.
Excellent negotiation, problem solving skills.
Strong analytical ability with attention to detail.
Can observe and respond to people and situations and interact with others encountered in the course of work.
Can learn and apply new information or skills.
Must be able to read and interpret data, information, and documents.
Strong customer focus and commitment to customer satisfaction through prioritization, quality, efficiency and professionalism.
Ability to complete assignments with attention to detail and high degree of accuracy.
Proven ability to perform effectively in a demanding environment with changing workloads and deadlines.
Result driven-demonstrate ownership and accountability.
Identifies bottlenecks and drives improvements.
Work independently or as part of a team and follow through on assignments with minimal supervision.
Demonstrate open, clear, concise and professional communication.
Ability to establish and maintain cooperative working relationships with manager, co-workers and customer.
Work according to a strict set of procedures within the provided timelines.
Other information

Role within Office
Responsibilities:

Routinely required to sit; walk; talk; hear; use hands to keyboard, finger, handle, and feel; stoop, kneel, crouch, twist, reach, and stretch. Occasionally required to move around the campus.
Occasionally lift and/or move up to 20 pounds.
May require travel dependent on business needs.
Specific vision abilities required by this job include close vision, color vision, peripheral vision, depth perception, and ability to adjust focus.

Role within the Factory
Responsibilities:

Must be willing to work in a clean room environment, wearing coveralls, hoods, booties, safety glasses and gloves for entire duration of shift.
While performing the duties of this job, the employee routinely is required to sit; walk; talk; hear; use hands to keyboard, finger, handle, and feel; stoop, kneel, crouch, twist, reach, and stretch.
The employee may occasionally lift and/or move up to 50 pounds.
Specific vision abilities required by this job include close vision, color vision, peripheral vision, depth perception, and ability to adjust focus.
Can work under deadlines.
The environment generally is moderate in temperature with moderate to high noise level.
Must be willing to work a compressed work week schedule – twelve-hour long shift and rotating from three to four days a week.
This must include references to day and night shifts for accommodation purposes.

Additional responsibilities for Wilton Factory:

The physical demands described here are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of this job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.

The employee is required to work in a cleanroom environment: full gowning (full body coveralls, hood, CR safety shoes, face mask, nitrile gloves and safety glasses. Working under ISO 9000/14000 standards).
Operating/working around overhead cranes, fork trucks and motorized pallet movers.
Working around lasers; working with ladders; working on platforms; and working around chemicals.
The employee is occasionally required to move around the campus.
The employee may occasionally lift and/or move up to 20 pounds.
May require travel dependent on company needs.
The environment generally is moderate in temperature and noise level.

EOE AA M/F/Veteran/Disability

Internal Reference: #LI-KG1",3.9,"ASML
3.9","Wilton, CT",-1,10000+ Employees,1984,Company - Public,Electrical & Electronic Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$5 to $10 billion (USD),-1
298,Data Engineer - AWS,$93k-$165k (Glassdoor Est.),"sdg is a high performance software community. sdg consultants build and deliver custom software for some of the largest and most recognizable local and national brands. In this role you will be asked to leverage your current skills and learn new ones. Working in over 400 different technologies and continually learning together, you can expect a one-of-a-kind and award winning work experience.

If you have proven experience working with AWS in a handful of the following, we want to hear from you.

•Design and development of relational and non-relational databases, data warehouses and data lakes
oRDS
oAWS DynamoDB, AWS SimpleDB
oAmazon Redshift
oAWS DB Migration Service
•Development, monitoring and maintenance of data integration and processing tools and pipelines
oAWS Glue, AWS Data Pipeline
oAWS Data Pipeline, AWS Glue
•Design and testing of machine learning and data science tools, including the building and deployment of data models
oAmazon EMR
•Implementation of high-capacity, real-time data streaming technologies
o AWS Kinesis Analytics, AWS Lambda
•Data analysis and visualization tools
oAWS QuickSight
oAmazon Athena
•Leveraging non-database data storage alternatives to maximize performance, costs and data quality
oAWS S3
oAWS ElastiCache
oAWS CloudSearch
•Familiarity with security and security policies within AWS

bonus experience

Bachelor's Degree in related field or equivalent work experience
Success working on high performance teams
Delivered solutions in large scale enterprise environments
Prior consulting or professional services experience
Motivated to continually improve your craft, sharing and learning every day
Exceptional integrity with the desire to create the best possible customer outcomes

what's in it for you?

Full-time salaried position with sdg, a 10-time Best Place to Work
Engaged teammates who care about quality solutions
Challenging and rewarding work with great customers
Abundant opportunities to give back to the community
A company proven to make decisions based on its core values
A true stake in success as sdg is an ESOP, 100% employee owned
Year-round technology and social events to stay sharp and have fun
Membership in the best technology community in the Twin Cities",4.9,"Solution Design Group
4.9","Golden Valley, MN",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1989,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
299,Machine Learning Software Engineer,-1,"HEALTH[at]SCALE is a rapidly growing post-Series A Silicon Valley-based healthcare machine intelligence startup founded by machine learning and clinical faculty with strong ties to MIT, Stanford, Harvard and U-Michigan. The company was one of Forbes’ “25 Machine Learning Startups to Watch” for 2019. Our mission is to bring precision delivery to healthcare through cutting-edge machine learning and artificial intelligence that can predictively match the world's patients to the right treatments by the right providers at the right times. HEALTH[at]SCALE's machine intelligence platform and applications for care prediction are among the largest deployments to date of machine learning technologies for healthcare; helping leading organizations manage tens of millions of individuals in live production use. The company's software solutions service a broad range of use cases for managed care, accountable care and self-insured organizations, including: early targeted prediction and prevention of adverse outcomes, optimizing care planning and guiding effective treatment; refining and navigating provider networks; and reducing fraud, waste and abuse. For more information, please visit our website.

Responsibilities
Design and implement new predictive machine learning and artificial intelligence technologies
Engineer machine intelligence systems and infrastructure for real-world production use at scale
Improve the accuracy, runtime, scalability and reliability of machine intelligence systems
Develop and implement machine intelligence platform APIs for multiple use-cases
Drive architecture of platform and application capabilities embedding machine intelligence
Build and enhance data pipelines and data warehouses for machine intelligence
Work cross-functionally with other teams to provide engineering leadership to complex projects
Requirements

Minimum Qualifications
BS, MS or PhD in Computer Science or related technical field
2+ years of experience with data analytics and machine learning in academia or industry
Strong understanding of the foundational concepts of machine learning and artificial intelligence
Strong proficiency in Python and cloud computing environments
In-depth knowledge and experience with distributed systems, relational databases, NoSQL
Familiarity with data technology stack (e.g., Hadoop, Spark, Hive, HDFS, TensorFlow, PyTorch etc.)
Excellent communication skills
Preferred Qualifications
Experience working with healthcare datasets (e.g., EHR/claims/omics/device/notes/image data)
Benefits

HEALTH[at]SCALE offers competitive salary, stock options, 401k, high-quality health benefits (medical, dental and vision), parental leave benefits and flexible work hours. We are an equal opportunity employer and are committed to diversity in our hiring and business practices.

To all recruitment agencies: HEALTH[at]SCALE does not accept agency resumes. Please do not forward resumes to our jobs alias, HEALTH[at]SCALE employees or any organization location. HEALTH[at]SCALE is not responsible for any fees related to unsolicited resumes.",-1,Health at Scale Corporation,"San Jose, CA",-1,Unknown,-1,Company - Public,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
300,Machine Learning Data Scientist,$115k-$181k (Glassdoor Est.),"Job Description

The Knowledgeable AI (KAI) Program at Intel Labs is seeking a motivated senior researcher/developer with a focus on knowledge representation & reasoning and neuro-symbolic AI. This is a full-time position.

While the AI industry is primarily focusing on the efficiency and reach of DL technologies and products entering the market today, it is becoming clear that DL approaches have their limits. The next wave of AI will need to incorporate new innovations to acquire more human-like cognitive competencies and address real-world challenges like explainability, reasoning, out-of-distribution (OOD) data instances, extensibility to new domains with minimal additional data, system adaptation through continuous learning, and other limitations of current DL approaches.

To drive Intel's innovation at the intersection of machine intelligence and cognition, we have established the Knowledgeable AI (KAI) Program for Cognitive Computing Research at Intel Labs. Our efforts combine the latest in deep learning, with the integration of knowledge structures as well as logic-based reasoning and neuro-symbolic AI, in order to build self-learning AI that can make informed decisions in complex context-rich situations.

The ideal candidate will bring proven experience in the AI areas of knowledge representation and reasoning, natural language processing, computer vision/visual scene parsing, as well as neural networks and deep learning. Research or practice in the sub-fields of neuro-symbolic AI and knowledge graphs is an advantage.

In this position, the candidate will help flesh out the challenging goals of the KAI program and leverage their strong technical knowledge of the field to identify disruptive solutions for the market, collaborate with universities and startups that do cutting edge research and align with our internal research. This requires an in-depth knowledge of the state of the art across multiple fields.

The candidate must also possess strong verbal and written communication skills and a demonstrated ability to work in a team-oriented environment. The candidate is expected to keep up to date with the state-of-the-art in the relevant fields.

Candidates must possess the minimum qualifications below to be initially considered for this position. Preferred qualifications are in addition to the minimum requirements and are considered a plus factor in identifying top candidates.

Qualifications

10-12 years of research/hands-on experience with three or more of the following areas:
Natural language processing
Neuro-symbolic AI
Neural networks and deep learning
Knowledge representation and reasoning
Knowledge graphs
Intelligent systems
10-12 years' experience partnering and collaborating with world-leading technology teams in commercial & academic worlds
10-12 years' experience implementing Proof-of-Concept projects in AI, internally and in collaboration with commercial and academic partners

Preferred qualifications:

Knowledge of python and experience with python libraries for machine learning and deep learning frameworks

Proven track record in innovation and driving new cutting-edge technology initiatives
Experience with hardware optimization for AI acceleration is a plus

Inside this Business Group

Intel Labs is the company's world-class, industry leading research organization, responsible for driving Intel's technology pipeline and creating new opportunities. The mission of Intel Labs is to deliver breakthrough technologies to fuel Intel's growth. This includes identifying and exploring compelling new technologies and high risk opportunities ahead of business unit investment and demonstrating first-to-market technologies and innovative new usages for computing technology. Intel Labs engages the leading thinkers in academia and industry in addition to partnering closely with Intel business units.

Other Locations

Israel, Petah-Tikva;US, Oregon, Hillsboro

Posting Statement

All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, religious creed, sex, national origin, ancestry, age, physical or mental disability, medical condition, genetic information, military and veteran status, marital status, pregnancy, gender, gender expression, gender identity, sexual orientation, or any other characteristic protected by local law, regulation, or ordinance.

Position of Trust

This role is a Position of Trust. Should you accept this position, you must consent to and pass an extended Background Investigation, which includes (subject to country law), extended education, SEC sanctions, and additional criminal and civil checks. For internals, this investigation may or may not be completed prior to starting the position. For additional questions, please contact your Recruiter....",4.1,"Intel
4.1","Santa Clara, CA",-1,10000+ Employees,1968,Company - Public,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),-1
301,Data Scientist,$111k-$175k (Glassdoor Est.),"C3.ai is a leading enterprise AI software provider for accelerating digital transformation. The comprehensive and proven C3 AI Suite uses a model-driven abstraction layer to enable organizations to develop, deploy, and operate enterprise scale AI applications 40x to 100x faster than alternative approaches. www.c3.ai

As a Data Scientist, you will participate in the definition of new analytics capabilities able to provide our customers with the information they need to make proper decisions to support our customers in operating the internet of things (IoT). In addition, you will help find the appropriate machine learning / data mining algorithms to answer these questions. Finally, you will be responsible for implementing this into the product and making it available to our customers.

Qualified candidates will have an in-depth knowledge of most common machine learning techniques and their application. You will also understand the limitations of these algorithms and how to tweak them or derive from them to achieve similar results at large-scale.

Your Responsibilities:
Driving adoption of Deep Learning systems into next-generation of C3.ai products.
Designing and deploying Machine Learning algorithms for industrial applications such as fraud detection and predictive maintenance.
Collaborating with data and subject matter experts from C3.ai and its customer teams to seek, understand, validate, interpret, and correctly use new data elements.
Requirements:
MS or PhD in Computer Science, Electrical Engineering, Statistics, or equivalent fields.
Applied Machine Learning experience (regression and classification, supervised, and unsupervised learning).
Strong mathematical background (linear algebra, calculus, probability and statistics).
Experience with scalable ML (MapReduce, streaming).
Ability to drive a project and work both independently and in a team.
Smart, motivated, can do attitude, and seeks to make a difference.
Excellent verbal and written communication.
Preferred
Experience with JavaScript and prototyping languages such as Python and R. Experience with Java and Scala is a plus.
Knowledge in electrical engineering and cyber-physical systems is a plus.
A portfolio of projects (GitHub, papers, etc.) is a plus.
C3.ai provides a competitive compensation package and excellent benefits including:
Competitive salary, generous stock options, 401K, medical, dental, and vision benefits. At the office, we offer a fully stocked kitchen with catered breakfast and lunch, table tennis and pool table, free membership at our on-site gym, Friday evening social hours with food, drink and music and a fun team of great people.
C3.ai is proud to be an Equal Opportunity and Affirmative Action Employer. We do not discriminate on the basis of any legally protected characteristics, including disabled and veteran status.",4.5,"C3.ai
4.5","Redwood City, CA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2009,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
302,Cheminformatics Data Scientist,$86k-$143k (Glassdoor Est.),"250! That’s the number of data scientists leading a digital revolution at the Novartis Institutes for BioMedical Research.

We are looking for a highly motivated data scientist to leverage deep learning and cheminformatics to enable our early drug discovery portfolio. As a domain specialist, you will collaborate closely with an innovative global team of in silico drug hunters in the Chemical Biology & Therapeutics Data Science (CBT DS) group at Novartis Institutes for Biochemical Research (NIBR).

You will also be part of a larger, global Data Science team with expertise in bioinformatics, computational biology, screening analytics, data engineering and predictive modeling, that combine expertise to gain a molecular understanding of disease etiology, to identify novel targets and chemical matter, assess preclinical model translation relevance and patient population heterogeneity. The team’s mission is to impact early stage drug discovery and advance biomedical research using innovative computational approaches with emphasis on data stewardship for predictive science. Together we are the brokers between data and the next wet-lab experiment.
This is a unique opportunity in an interdisciplinary environment at the intersection of chemical biology, genomics, biophysics, cheminformatics, and molecular modeling.

Your responsibilities will include:

• Champion in the group for current methods in deep learning.
• Develop novel deep learning workflows and apply them to lead discovery projects.
• Design, implement, and maintain robust methods, algorithms, and packages (python, R) that help the computational community solve old and new problems with ease.
• Ideate and implement visualizations, dashboards & webservices for data dissemination to computational peers as well as to non-computational collaborators.
• Engage as a collaborative member of the broader CBT Data Science community.

What You'll Bring to the Role:

• Background in Computational Science and either Chemistry or Chemical Biology
• Excellent scripting skills in both R and python, demonstrated ability to develop & deploy packages/modules for end users; proficiency in Linux, git, SQL and relevant software packages (such as RDKit) are essential.
• Algorithmic/computational understanding of efficiently dealing with small and large sets of heterogeneous data.
• Experience with sophisticated machine learning techniques (deep learning, generative chemistry, etc)
• Familiarity with biological data of relevance for drug discovery and an ability to communicate it with broad audiences
• Experience with cheminformatics (similarity searching, SAR analysis, chemogenomics data mining) and compound-protein structure modeling
• Excellent scientific communication skills and effective data visualization skills
• Proficiency in written and oral English with very strong presentation and ‘story-telling’ skills

Desirable requirements:

• Higher education degree in a relevant field, or equivalent years of experience (mathematics, computer science, bioinformatics, physics, biology, chemistry, etc.)
• A publication history demonstrating a track record of innovation in cheminformatics and deep learning
• Familiarity with Spotfire
• Familiarity with automated code testing and continuous integration/continuous deployment (CI/CD) platforms such as for example Jenkins
• Experience in developing web based user interfaces
• Experience with database design, query and administration
• Experience developing web service, API
• Good understanding of IT infrastructure and software lifecycle management

Why consider Novartis?

799 million. That’s how many lives our products touched in 2019. And while we’re proud of that fact, in this world of digital and technological transformation, we must also ask ourselves this: how can we continue to improve and extend even more people’s lives?

We believe the answers are found when curious, courageous and collaborative people like you are brought together in an inspiring environment. Where you’re given opportunities to explore the power of digital and data. Where you’re empowered to risk failure by taking smart risks, and where you’re surrounded by people who share your determination to tackle the world’s toughest medical challenges.

Imagine what you could do at Novartis!

Commitment to Diversity & Inclusion:

Novartis embraces diversity, equal opportunity and inclusion. We are committed to building diverse teams, representative of the patients and communities we serve, and we strive to create an inclusive workplace that cultivates bold innovation through collaboration, and empowers our people to unleash their full potential.

The Novartis Group of Companies are Equal Opportunity Employers and take pride in maintaining a diverse environment. We do not discriminate in recruitment, hiring, training, promotion or any other employment practices for reasons of race, color, religion, gender, national origin, age, sexual orientation, marital or veteran status, disability, or any other legally protected status.",4.0,"Novartis
4.0","Cambridge, MA",-1,10000+ Employees,1996,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$10+ billion (USD),-1
303,Deep Learning Engineer,-1,"Company Description

Focal Systems is the industry leader in retail AI solutions. We are a Silicon Valley based startup that has more than doubled in size every year since our founding. Our mission is to automate and optimize brick and mortar retail using deep learning computer vision. Focal has been deployed at scale with the top retailers in the world. We are looking for smart, creative and passionate people who love to learn, enjoy thinking critically, and want to build a great and enduring company.

Job Summary

We are looking for a versatile engineer who has demonstrated capabilities to develop, benchmark, and validate a wide variety of deep neural network architectures to extract knowledge and information from images in real-time.

Focal Systems is a Deep Learning first company. Join us in deploying Deep Learning to the world!

Responsibilities and Duties

Develop state-of-the-art and novel deep neural network architectures.
Develop training and testing pipelines to assess the performance of these architectures on relevant image processing tasks.
Keep up with deep learning literature and research publications in order to implement the latest techniques into our networks and pipelines.
Develop machine-learning algorithms on a breadth of software frameworks (Keras, TensorFlow, Torch) and deploy on a diversity of hardware platforms.

Qualifications and Skills

Have significant experience training Deep Networks, CNNs, LSTMS
Experience with Keras (Tensorflow) a plus
2+ years Researching CV
Masters or PhD in CS / EE or equivalent
Stellar academic performance
Published research in peer-reviewed journal a huge plus!

Benefits

We care deeply about the health, happiness, and wellbeing of all of our employees.

Competitive salary
Stock that will be actually worth something!
Health Insurance
Catered lunches
Paid Time Off
Quarterly Team Retreats
Education grants

Powered by JazzHR

HJXS8bhDjN",3.8,"Focal Systems
3.8","Burlingame, CA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2015,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1
304,Junior Python Developer / Data Scientist,$55k-$98k (Glassdoor Est.),"Junior Python Developer / Data Scientist
Valley Forge, PA · Computer/SoftwareApply Now
Are you interested in developing advanced software systems to support national security? At Stratagem, we work with the U.S. Government to solve some of the most challenging problems concerning critical national missions.

Who is Stratagem
Stratagem is a small high-end software technology company that delivers operational solutions and performs advanced R&D for the DoD and Intelligence Community. We are built around the idea that we can make a lasting impact for our customers and employees and believe in a culture of innovation, fun, empowerment, and family. We want you to learn new skills so you can become more fulfilled in both your personal and professional life.

At Stratagem, our goal is to make our company the last company you work for!

Stratagem is hiring passionate, creative, and uniquely talented individuals to join our growing team. We look for candidates with exceptional problem-solving skills, a high level of creativity, and the ability to quickly learn evaluate and deploy new technologies. We also seek out individuals that are clear communicators and support their teammates with a sense of positivity and open-mindedness.

** TS/SCI Clearance with SSBI REQUIRED**
* DOD TOP SECRET or SECRET will be CONSIDERED **
** US CITIZENSHIP REQUIRED **

This position, in either Aurora, CO or Valley Forge, PA, is for an early-career Data Scientist or a Python developer interested in transitioning into data science. You will support the development of cutting-edge predictive analytics by creating software tools and curating datasets containing adversarial behaviors (such as vehicle track data).

Responsibilities & Skills

Our ideal candidate is a software engineer or data scientist with experience creating software tools in Python and familiar with Python data science / machine learning libraries (e.g. Pandas, and scikit-learn).

As a Python Developer / Data Scientist, your responsibilities include:
Working with a small team consisting of developers and researchers to implement algorithms for tracking and fusion, and pattern of life software
Identifying statistically relevant features within big datasets to provide analysts with actionable data
Writing, evaluating, and integrating software into the existing architecture
Reviewing relevant publications in order to gain enough of an understanding of the underlying concepts in order to break down key ideas to government customers, and implement in software
Your core skills/experience include:
Experience with Python and any of the following Python data science / machine learning libraries: Pandas, and scikit-learn
Experience applying and/or developing algorithms based in statistical analysis
Experience with big data sets, preferably comprising of sensor data (e.g. GEOINT, and SIGINT)
Effective communicator with the ability to write and present technical reports
Experience writing technical documentation supporting code, program capabilities and user-guides
Experience with Gitlab, Github, Bitbucket, and/or Jenkins
Experience with Linux
2-5 years of experience, preferably in software development or as a data scientist
You are the proud owner of at least a DoD SECRET clearance
Bonus points if you have experience in any of the following:
Experience with implementing tracking and fusion, and pattern-of-life algorithms
Experience in application deployment, virtualization, and containerization
Experience with kinematics
You are the proud owner of a TS/SCI SSBI clearance",4.3,"Stratagem Group
4.3","Valley Forge, PA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2007,Company - Private,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
305,Production Engineer,$69k-$110k (Glassdoor Est.),"Introduction

ASML US, including its affiliates and subsidiaries, bring together the most creative minds in science and technology to develop lithography machines that are key to producing faster, cheaper, more energy-efficient microchips. We design, develop, integrate, market and service these advanced machines, which enable our customers - the world’s leading chipmakers - to reduce the size and increase the functionality of their microchips, which in turn leads to smaller, more powerful consumer electronics. Our headquarters are in Veldhoven, Netherlands, and we have 18 office locations around the United States including main offices in Chandler, Arizona, San Jose and San Diego, California, Wilton, Connecticut, and Hillsboro, Oregon.

Job Mission

ASML is the world’s leading provider of lithography systems for the semiconductor industry, manufacturing complex machines that are critical to the production of integrated circuits or microchips. This position is for a Production Engineering Project lead with innovative. Candidate will work with cross-sectors engineers to introduce new product to production floor.

This position requires access to controlled technology, as defined in the Export Administration Regulations (15 C.F.R. § 730, et seq.). Qualified candidates must be legally authorized to access such controlled technology prior to beginning work. Business demands may require ASML to proceed with applicants who are immediately eligible to access controlled technology.

Job Description
Responsible for leading production engineering to support development engineers to converge on an overall design solution that addresses comprehensive production manufacturability with high level of diagnostics for troubleshooting.
Develop Manufacturing readiness plans to introduce new products into Production. These plans include timelines and key milestones for proto readiness and ramp to pilot and volume.
Develop budgetary needs for facilities, capital equipment and headcount.
Communicate Manufacturing readiness plans to Business Line and Management.
Responsible for leading production engineering group developing and maintaining module manufacturing processes.
Responsible for leading production engineering group investigating technical issues both analytically using design documentation and physically with hands-on in a production environment.
Responsible for leading production engineering group supporting operations to deliver modules on time that meet high standards of quality.
Report production status, issues, gaps and barriers to Sr. Management. Timely escalate in case of issue that can’t be solved within the own circle of influence.
Drive cross-sector teams to achieve high standards of quality for both product and tooling.
Education

Minimum BS in Engineering with MS or MBA preferred, or equivalent experience.

Experience
Minimum 5 years of experience developing manufacturing processes for new products, including at least 3 years leading a group or a major project.
Experience in developing Manufacturing readiness plans to introduce new products into Production.
Experience in leading cross-sector teams to implement Manufacturing readiness plans for new product industrialization.
Experience in developing budgetary needs for facilities, capital equipment and headcount.
Experience in managing new product introduction and industrialization.
Background in optical metrology engineering is preferred.
Background in opto-mechanical metrology equipment/interface to data acquisition is preferred.
Personal skills
Ability to inspire and to coach individuals and groups to achieve career development and performance targets.
Possess strong leadership and ownership characteristics – demonstrated commitment to achieving results on time.
Have strong written and oral communicative skills – ability to communicate effectively to your team and to senior management.
Demonstrated “team player” with a quality orientation and interpersonal skills.
Capability to interface with multidisciplinary groups (including senior leadership), and be willing to take on responsibility, follow through and keep multiple simultaneous projects on schedule.
Can observe and respond to people and situations and interact with others encountered in the course of work.
Can learn and apply new information or skills.
Must be able to read and interpret data, information, and documents.
Strong customer focus and commitment to customer satisfaction through prioritization, quality, efficiency and professionalism.
Ability to complete assignments with attention to detail and high degree of accuracy.
Proven ability to perform effectively in a demanding environment with changing workloads and deadlines.
Result driven-demonstrate ownership and accountability.
Identifies bottlenecks and drives improvements.
Work independently or as part of a team and follow through on assignments with minimal supervision.
Demonstrate open, clear, concise and professional communication.
Ability to establish and maintain cooperative working relationships with manager, co-workers and customer.
Work according to a strict set of procedures within the provided timelines.
Other information

Role within Office
Responsibilities:

Routinely required to sit; walk; talk; hear; use hands to keyboard, finger, handle, and feel; stoop, kneel, crouch, twist, reach, and stretch. Occasionally required to move around the campus.
Occasionally lift and/or move up to 20 pounds.
May require travel dependent on business needs.
Specific vision abilities required by this job include close vision, color vision, peripheral vision, depth perception, and ability to adjust focus.

Role within the Factory
Responsibilities:

Must be willing to work in a clean room environment, wearing coveralls, hoods, booties, safety glasses and gloves for entire duration of shift.
While performing the duties of this job, the employee routinely is required to sit; walk; talk; hear; use hands to keyboard, finger, handle, and feel; stoop, kneel, crouch, twist, reach, and stretch.
The employee may occasionally lift and/or move up to 50 pounds.
Specific vision abilities required by this job include close vision, color vision, peripheral vision, depth perception, and ability to adjust focus.
Can work under deadlines.
The environment generally is moderate in temperature with moderate to high noise level.
Must be willing to work a compressed work week schedule – twelve-hour long shift and rotating from three to four days a week.
This must include references to day and night shifts for accommodation purposes.

Additional responsibilities for Wilton Factory:

The physical demands described here are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of this job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.

The employee is required to work in a cleanroom environment: full gowning (full body coveralls, hood, CR safety shoes, face mask, nitrile gloves and safety glasses. Working under ISO 9000/14000 standards).
Operating/working around overhead cranes, fork trucks and motorized pallet movers.
Working around lasers; working with ladders; working on platforms; and working around chemicals.
The employee is occasionally required to move around the campus.
The employee may occasionally lift and/or move up to 20 pounds.
May require travel dependent on company needs.
The environment generally is moderate in temperature and noise level.

EOE AA M/F/Veteran/Disability",3.9,"ASML
3.9","Wilton, CT",-1,10000+ Employees,1984,Company - Public,Electrical & Electronic Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$5 to $10 billion (USD),-1
306,Electronics Systems Engineer,$61k-$125k (Glassdoor Est.),"Introduction

ASML US brings together the most creative minds in science and technology to develop lithography machines that are key to producing faster, cheaper, more energy-efficient microchips. We design, develop, integrate, market and service these advanced machines, which enable our customers - the world’s leading chipmakers - to reduce the size and increase the functionality of their microchips, which in turn leads to smaller, more powerful consumer electronics. Our headquarters are in Veldhoven, the Netherlands, and we have 18 office locations around the United States including main offices in Chandler, Arizona, San Jose and San Diego, California, Wilton, Connecticut, and Hillsboro, Oregon.

Job Mission

This position requires access to controlled technology, as defined in the Export Administration Regulations (15 C.F.R. § 730, et seq.). Qualified candidates must be legally authorized to access such controlled technology prior to beginning work. Business demands may require ASML to proceed with applicants who are immediately eligible to access controlled technology.

Job Description

ASML is the world's leading provider of lithography systems for the semiconductor industry, manufacturing complex machines critical to the production of integrated circuits or chips. The Electronics Systems Engineer is responsible for specification, conceptual design, planning, and development of electronic systems in areas of considerable scope and complexity for the industry’s leading micro-lithography systems.

Additional responsibilities include:.

Act as the Electronic Development representative in a multidisciplinary design team.
Interact intensively with colleagues from the Mechatronics Systems and Software Development.
Define, document and maintain specifications of the electrical architecture, electrical modules and electrical infrastructure.
Perform trade-off studies to determine the preferred implementation scenario for new or changed functions. Get agreement with stakeholders.
Make work breakdown and effort estimation for the various electronics products, adjusted with other stakeholders.
Conducting system and subsystem level integration/testing, data collection, and analyzing the effectiveness of the resulting data.
Manage the outsourcing of development activities at co-developers.
Solve problems during first system integration.
Maintain knowledge and roadmap concerning the control electronics within the ASML products. Contribute to the multidisciplinary roadmap.
Act as a technical coach for designers and other team members.
Education

Bachelor or Master (preferred) of Science degree with major in any/several of the following, or equivalent experience:

Electrical Engineering Technology
Digital Signal Processing (DSP)
High-Speed architectures
Experience
10-12 years of Electronics Systems Development including 5-10 years designing electronics systems.
Multiple years of experience as designer of electronic functions and sub-systems, including experience with working in multidisciplinary design teams to establish agreement on specifications.
Broad technical knowledge of electronics with basic knowledge of physics, mechanics, mechatronics and software.
Knowledge and experience with electronic systems design and specification. Also knowledge and experience of computer systems is preferred.
System understanding of DSP implementations (both hardware and software).
Understanding and knowledge of key aspects of motion control systems.
Experience in developing and modeling real-time signal processing algorithms with working knowledge of Matlab or similar modeling software.
Ability to support the testing & troubleshooting of electrical & electronic systems to component level using standard test equipment (oscilloscopes, spectrum.
Ownership mentality – desire to deliver top quality at right cost, right time.
Quality focus.
Good written and oral communications skills – ability to provide technical arguments to influence direction.
The position requires highly motivated, extremely organized and self-driven individuals.
Personal skills
Can observe and respond to people and situations and interact with others encountered in the course of work.
Can learn and apply new information or skills.
Must be able to read and interpret data, information, and documents.
Strong customer focus and commitment to customer satisfaction through prioritization, quality, efficiency and professionalism.
Ability to complete assignments with attention to detail and high degree of accuracy.
Proven ability to perform effectively in a demanding environment with changing workloads and deadlines.
Result driven-demonstrate ownership and accountability.
Identifies bottlenecks and drives improvements.
Work independently or as part of a team and follow through on assignments with minimal supervision.
Demonstrate open, clear, concise and professional communication.
Ability to establish and maintain cooperative working relationships with manager, co-workers and customer.
Work according to a strict set of procedures within the provided timelines.
Other information

Role within Office

Responsibilities:

Routinely required to sit; walk; talk; hear; use hands to keyboard, finger, handle, and feel; stoop, kneel, crouch, twist, reach, and stretch. Occasionally required to move around the campus.
Occasionally lift and/or move up to 20 pounds.
May require travel dependent on business needs.
Specific vision abilities required by this job include close vision, color vision, peripheral vision, depth perception, and ability to adjust focus.

EOE AA M/F/Veteran/Disability",3.9,"ASML
3.9","Wilton, CT",-1,10000+ Employees,1984,Company - Public,Electrical & Electronic Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$5 to $10 billion (USD),-1
307,"Software Engineering, Machine Learning",-1,"We are hiring a software engineer for our ML Engineering team to work closely with research scientists to turn proof-of-concept deep learning projects into high-performance, scalable, production-grade software. This is an opportunity to own critical components of our computer vision stack and develop robust, generalizable models for activity recognition, gesture recognition, person detection, and person tracking. In this role, you'll be taking research code and leveraging our data collection pipelines to build well-distributed datasets, optimize and train deep learning models, and build inference engines to deploy them to edge and cloud platforms. You will be working closely with our infrastructure and cloud engineering teams to drive data management and tooling, and you'll get exposure to state-of-the-art ML technology and be part of a team that celebrates continuous learning and innovation. Responsibilities Implementing, training, and optimizing models developed by our ML Science team Developing high-performance, scalable, and maintainable inference services that communicate with the rest of our tech stack Working with Infra teams to build data collection pipelines, manage data QA, and develop code for data visualization and data cleansing to build robust datasets Turning unfamiliar research code into bulletproof, production-ready software Working with edge hardware to test and tune the latency and performance of our services Building pipelines for continuous model improvement Qualifications Strong grasp of statistical machine learning, linear algebra, and deep learning for computer vision Excellent C++11/14/17 and Python skills; familiarity with TensorFlow Ability to rapidly learn and work with unfamiliar code Understanding of CI/CD patterns and best practices Ability to write well-tested code Highly flexible and capable of working across the stack Great communication skills Nice-to-Haves Working knowledge of Bayesian state estimation, geometric computer vision, and linear programming Prior exposure to database management and SQL Experience with heterogeneous compute pipelines (CPU/TPU/GPU) and embedded software Knowledge of Docker and Kubernetes Zippin is an artificial intelligence company that provides the next generation of checkout-free technology to every retailer. Our mission is to use machine learning, computer vision and sensor fusion technology to banish checkout lines and self-scanners for good, so shoppers can zip in and out with their purchases. Zippin's solution enables every retailer to provide a checkout-free experience to their customers. Zippin’s headquarters are in San Francisco, CA, with offices in San Carlos, CA, Toronto, ON, and India. Industry veterans from Amazon, Apple, VMWare, and SRI founded the company and raised over $15M in funding from Evolv, NTT Docomo, SAP, and Maven Ventures. We're growing fast and want you to help us meet customer demand!",5.0,"Zippin
5.0","San Carlos, CA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2018,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
308,Data Scientist,$75k-$131k (Glassdoor Est.),"Overview


Data Scientist

Locations US-MA-Boston | CA-QC-Montreal

Category

Data Science

Overview

Analysis Group is one of the largest international economics consulting firms, with more than 1,000 professionals across 14 offices in North America, Europe, and Asia. Since 1981, we have provided expertise in economics, finance, health care analytics, and strategy to top law firms, Fortune Global 500 companies, and government agencies worldwide. Our internal experts, together with our network of affiliated experts from academia, industry, and government, offer our clients exceptional breadth and depth of expertise.

We are currently seeking a Data Scientist to join our team. The ideal candidate should be passionate about working on cutting edge research and analytical services for Fortune 500 companies, global pharma/biotech firms and leaders in industries such as finance, energy and life sciences. The Data Scientist will be a contributing member to client engagements and have the opportunity to work with our network of world-class experts and thought leaders.

Job Functions and Responsibilities

The candidate Data Scientist will help develop, maintain and teach new tools and methodologies related to data science and high performance computing. This position will also help Analysis Group in maintaining our leadership position in terms of advancing methodology and data analytics. The Data Scientist will be responsible for staying abreast of new developments in technology relating to data science, to share more broadly with Analysis Group.

Key responsibilities for this position will include:
Working with project teams to address data science/computing challenges
Identifying opportunities for technology to enhance service offerings
Acting as a resource and participating in client engagements and research as part of the project team
Maintaining up-to-date knowledge of computing tools, providing technical training and helping to grow the in-house knowledge base, specifically in a Linux environment
Presenting research at selected conferences
Examples of activities for the Data Scientist will include:
Developing data engineering and machine learning production systems for full stack data science projects
Using natural language processing methodologies to work with EMR data, social media data and other unstructured data
Optimizing procedures for managing and accessing large databases (e.g., insurance claims, electronic health records, financial transactions)
Creating interactive analytics portals and data visualizations (e.g., using R/Shiny, Python/Flask, D3)
Building and maintaining high performance computing (HPC) tools on grid and cloud computing environments
Developing and reviewing software and packages in R, Python and other Object Oriented Languages
Establishing optimized procedures for repetitive or computationally intensive tasks (C, C++, Cuda-C)
Qualifications
Significant experience working within a Linux environment required, experience with Docker and front-end development using a Javascript framework (e.g., Vue.js, Angular) is highly preferred.
Strong credentials and experience in database management and/or data visualization is preferred.
Bachelor’s degree required. Advanced degree, ideally PhD in Computer Science, Mathematics, Statistics, Economics or other relevant scientific degree with relevant experience, is preferred. Other candidates with at least one year of experience in the field may also be considered.
Demonstrates strong interpersonal, written, and oral communication skills.
Project experience with Python and/or R is preferred.
Familiar with online/cloud computing/storage (e.g. Azure, AWS) is preferred.
Demonstrated experience working on project teams and collaborating with others.
At Groupe d’analyse we believe that a diverse workforce directly supports our goal to provide the highest quality work for our clients, which drives our commitment to ensure equal opportunities regardless of gender, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, age, race, color, or religion. We encourage all qualified candidates to apply.

Scientifique des données – Boston - Montréal

*Le masculin est utilisé ici en tant que genre neutre et sert uniquement à alléger le texte.

A propos de Groupe d’analyse :

Groupe d’analyse est l’une des plus grandes sociétés de conseil en économie, avec plus de 1000 professionnels répartis dans 14 bureaux en Amérique du Nord, en Europe et en Asie. Depuis 1981, nous fournissons une expertise en analyse et en stratégie dans les domaines de l’économie, de la finance et de la santé, à des cabinets d’avocats de premier ordre, des entreprises du Fortune Global 500 et des organismes gouvernementaux du monde entier. Nos experts internes, en collaboration avec notre réseau d’experts affiliés issus du monde universitaire, de l’industrie et des entités publiques, offrent à nos clients un éventail de connaissances d’une étendue et d’une profondeur exceptionnelles.

Nous recherchons actuellement pour notre équipe un scientifique des données (« Data Scientist »). Enthousiaste à l’idée de travailler sur des projets à la pointe de la recherche et d’offrir des services analytiques aux sociétés classées au Fortune 500, aux entreprises pharmaceutiques et biotechnologiques d’envergure internationale ainsi qu’à celles de premier plan dans les secteurs de la finance, de l'énergie et des sciences de la vie, le scientifique des données contribuera à l’activité de nos clients tout en ayant la chance de travailler avec notre réseau d'experts et de leaders d'opinion de classe mondiale.

Le poste de scientifique des données :

En tant que scientifique des données, vous contribuerez à développer, alimenter et enseigner de nouveaux outils et méthodologies liés à la science des données et au calcul haute performance (HPC). Ceci permettra notamment à Groupe d'analyse de continuer à être un moteur de progrès aussi bien méthodologiques que dans l'analyse des données. Le titulaire du poste devra en outre se tenir au courant des nouvelles avancées technologiques en science des données, afin de les partager avec toute l’entreprise. Les principales responsabilités et tâches dévolues au scientifique des données peuvent inclure, sans s’y limiter, les éléments suivants :

Collaborer avec les équipes de projet pour relever les défis informatiques et liés à la science des données
Identifier des façons dont la technologie peut améliorer l’offre de services
Contribuer à l’activité et à la recherche du client en tant que spécialiste et membre de l'équipe de projet
Maintenir les connaissances sur les outils informatiques à jour, former le personnel sur des points techniques et aider à développer la base de connaissances interne, en particulier dans un environnement Linux
Présenter les recherches lors de certaines conférences
Développer des systèmes de production en ingénierie des données et apprentissage automatique pour des projets de science des données full-stack
Utiliser des méthodologies de traitement automatique du langage pour travailler avec les données des DME et des médias sociaux et d’autres données non structurées
Optimiser les procédures de gestion et d'accès aux grandes bases de données (déclarations de sinistre, dossiers de santé électroniques, transactions financières, etc.)
Créer des portails d'analyse interactifs et des visualisations de données (en utilisant par exemple R/Shiny, Python/Flask, D3)
Construire et alimenter des outils de HPC sur la grille informatique et l’informatique en nuage
Développer et réviser des logiciels codés en R, Python et autres langages orientés objet
Mettre en place des procédures optimisées pour les tâches répétitives ou gourmandes en calcul (C, C++, Cuda-C)
Qualifications requises :
Expérience de travail significative dans un environnement Linux exigée ; une expérience du logiciel Docker et en développement frontal en JavaScript (Vue.js, Angular, etc.) est fortement souhaitée.
Solides références et expérience dans la gestion de bases de données et/ou de la visualisation de données souhaitées.
Diplôme de niveau licence exigé. Dans l’idéal, le candidat possède un doctorat en informatique, mathématiques, statistiques, économie ou un autre diplôme scientifique pertinent accompagné d’une expérience professionnelle concordante. La candidature d’autres personnes possédant au moins un an d'expérience dans le domaine sera éventuellement étudiée.
Excellentes aptitudes pour les relations interpersonnelles, la communication orale et écrite.
Expérience de projets utilisant Python et/ou R souhaitée.
Bonne connaissance de l'informatique en ligne/en nuage et du stockage (sur Azure ou AWS par exemple) souhaitée.
Expérience avérée de travail au sein d'équipes de projet et de collaboration avec des tiers.
Chez Groupe d’analyse, nous croyons qu’une main-d’œuvre diversifiée soutient directement notre objectif d’offrir un résultat de la plus haute qualité à nos clients, ce qui motive notre engagement à assurer l’égalité des chances, peu importe le sexe, l’orientation sexuelle, l’identité ou l’expression sexuelle, l’âge, la race, la couleur ou la religion. Nous encourageons tous les candidats qualifiés à postuler.

Groupe d’analyse est une entreprise équitable en matière d’emploi et respectueuse de la loi américaine portant sur la protection des anciens combattants et des personnes handicapées.

Vous pouvez consulter les brochures (en anglais) de l’OFCCP, bureau rattaché au Ministère du Travail des Etats-Unis et relatives à l’égalité des chances professionnelles ici.

L’entreprise s’engage à ne pas licencier ni discriminer, de quelque manière que ce soit, tout employé ou candidat qui se serait renseigné sur, aurait discuté de ou révélé son propre salaire ou celui d’un autre employé ou candidat. Néanmoins, les employés ayant accès, dans le cadre de leurs fonctions, aux informations relatives à la rémunération d’autres employés ou candidats ne sont autorisés à révéler ladite rémunération à des tiers – qui n’auraient, autrement, pas accès à ces informations – que dans les cas suivants : (a) en réponse à une plainte ou accusation en bonne et due forme, (b) dans le cadre d’une enquête, de poursuites judiciaires, d’une audience ou d’une action en justice, dont toute enquête à l’initiative de l’employeur ou (c) conformément aux obligations légales de l’entreprise en matière de transparence (Article 41, paragraphe 60-1.35(c) du Code de la règlementation fédérale des Etats-Unis (CFR)).

­
Equal Opportunity Employer/Protected Veterans/Individuals with Disabilities.
Please view Equal Employment Opportunity Posters provided by OFCCP here.
The contractor will not discharge or in any other manner discriminate against employees or applicants because they have inquired about, discussed, or disclosed their own pay or the pay of another employee or applicant. However, employees who have access to the compensation information of other employees or applicants as a part of their essential job functions cannot disclose the pay of other employees or applicants to individuals who do not otherwise have access to compensation information, unless the disclosure is (a) in response to a formal complaint or charge, (b) in furtherance of an investigation, proceeding, hearing, or action, including an investigation conducted by the employer, or (c) consistent with the contractor's legal duty to furnish information. 41 CFR 60-1.35(c)",3.9,"Analysis Group
3.9","Boston, MA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1981,Private Practice / Firm,Consulting,Business Services,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
309,"Machine Learning Engineer, Deep Learning & NLP",-1,"At Forethought, we're solving the world's hardest problems in Natural Language Understanding to build an ""answer engine"" for the enterprise. Customers use our answer engine to give employees and customers access to the right information at the right time. Our mission is to ""enable everyone to become a genius at their job"". Founded in 2017, Forethought is funded by some of the top VC's and Angel Investors in Silicon Valley. (Hint: We're backed by some of the same investors as Twilio, Lyft, and Front) We're looking for world-class Deep Learning and Natural Language Processing ML Engineers to come join our team! We're looking for folks with a growth mindset, who love to solve the world's hardest problems, and want to have an impact on the world. You will be responsible for researching and implementing state-of-the-art algorithms in Question Answering, Machine Reading Comprehension, Recognizing Textual Entailment, Document Classification, Text Analytics, Sentiment Analysis, and Automated Knowledge Graph Extraction. What a typical week may look like at Forethought: • Improve our core Question Answering algorithm • Reading and researching state-of-the-art papers in NLU problems • Inventing new NLU algorithms • Working with a unique dataset of 1M+ customer documents, support tickets, and natural / unstructured data sources • Build Deep Learning models in TensorFlow for GPUs and CPUs • Work with Backend Engineers to ship your models to production • Work to publish new research in top papers (e.g.: NIPS) and Arxiv What we require in a Deep Learning & NLP ML Engineer: • MSc or PhD in Computer Science, Mathematics, or a related technical field, or equivalent work experience • 2+ years industry experience in Machine Learning teams • Proficiency in Python, R, or Java and a framework like tensorflow, pytorch or keras • Experience in modern Deep Learning and Natural Language Processing / Natural Language Understanding (NLP, NLU), including Neural Networks, RNNs, seq2seq+attention models, and real world machine learning in TensorFlow (incl. regularization, cross-validation, dropout) • Experience building production-ready NLP systems • Familiarity with non-standard machine intelligence models (Reinforcement Learning, Hierarchical Temporal Memory, Capsule Networks) is a plus • Familiarity with Distributed systems (Docker, Kubernetes, Kafka, Spark, Redis, AWS S3/EC2/RDS/KMS, MongoDB, or Lucene) is a plus • Adaptable, humble, and interested in pushing the boundaries of what's possible What you get: • A fast-paced and collaborative environment • Work with world class talent (our team has experience from Facebook, Palantir, and LinkedIn Data Science; we have 2 ACM ICPC World Finalists; and Researchers from Harvard, Waterloo, EPFL, and University of Alberta) • A chance to be a defining/founding member of the team, with equity to match • A chance to work on the edge of research • A mix between research and industry, at a startup! • Medical, dental and vision coverage • Unlimited PTO policy",5.0,"Forethought
5.0","San Francisco, CA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2017,Company - Public,-1,-1,$5 to $10 million (USD),-1
310,"Software Engineer, AI Experience Development",$49k-$104k (Glassdoor Est.),"Who We Are

We started Clinc in 2015 with the mission to use the best advancements in academic research, science and technology to create a meaningful and tangible impact on the world. Since then, we have seen exponential growth delivering cutting-edge technology at global scale, and empowering people to lead more enjoyable lives with conversational AI. We are a passionate group of change-makers inspired by the world’s most difficult challenges and a gritty resolve to take them on. If you want to influence the future of AI and make our world a better place to live, join us.

What AI Experience Development team does

Clinc designs and builds conversational AI experience products for common use cases, and AI Experience Development (AIXD) is the team that leverages our own platform to deliver them. To create the conversational AI experiences, the team uses our platform as the “programming language” to craft conversational designs, curate data, train Machine Learning models and develop business logic.

There are two different roles in the AIXD team:
- Data Curation: masters the training data curation and conversation design.
- Software Engineer: designs and develops web application logic to fulfill business objectives leveraging the insights extracted from the ML models.
What you'll do as part of our team
Fulfill the software engineer role on the AIXD team.
Design and develop complex business logic for specific business use cases (e.g., providing spending advice, make credit card payments), and work closely with other team members to build conversational AI-enabled end-to-end user experiences.
Conduct design and code reviews.
Gain insights through project execution and drive technical initiatives and visions that contribute to the long-term success of the product and priorities of the team.
What you should bring to the table
BS degree in Computer Science, similar technical field of study or equivalent practical experience.
3 years of professional software engineering experience in one or more general purpose programming languages like Python on UNIX/Linux-based environments.
Excellent communication skills.
Able to thrive in a dynamic environment where goals and requirements may change frequently.
What will make you stand out from everyone else
Experience with API design and development using web application development frameworks such as Django, Tornado, and Node.js.
Experience with relational databases and Object-Relational Mapping (ORM).
Experience with event-driven programming paradigm.
Experience with Docker-based containerization and Docker orchestration software.
Experience with Natural Language Processing or Data Science.
Culture, Diversity and Inclusivity

Clinc has a proven commitment to diversity and inclusion. We strive to create a hiring environment in which all people feel they are equally respected and valued, irrespective of gender identity or expression, sexual orientation, ethnicity, age, religion, citizenship or any other characteristic.",3.3,"Clinc
3.3","Ann Arbor, MI",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2015,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
311,Lead Data Engineer,$49k-$92k (Glassdoor Est.),"GURU-BOOST is currently seeking a talented Lead Cloud Data Engineer to join our team. The GURU-BOOST team is made up of an enthusiastic group of devoted teammates who push for improving data-centric applications. Our culture is devoted to helping one another bring out the best through camaraderie, mentoring, training/learning, and of course, challenging projects. We focus on a fine balance between beauty and function without letting one compromise the other.

We are looking for an individual to support the development of a data analytics platform for one of our enterprise clients. In this role, the candidate will work to leverage open source tools for extract, transform, and loading data between databases and provide interactive visualizations/ data insights powered by Machine Learning Models. We are looking for an individual who can quickly learn the stack and deliver innovative solutions.

You'll work with several cutting-edge technologies to funnel assorted data sources into industrial-strength pipelines that feed the full portfolio of services we offer to the industry.

The ideal candidate will encompass the following:

You are an individual who thrives in a team atmosphere. You believe in agile development and continuous delivery. You are a self-motivated and intellectually curious with superb problem solving and analytical skills. You have a willingness to learn, adapt, teach, and pitch in wherever possible to help the team achieve its goals

What We Are Looking For:
Ability to solve problems with data & superb attention to data accuracy
Experience with AWS Big Data solutions & tools
Proficiency with AWS environments and implementation of AWS data tools (RedShift, Dynamo, RDS, Migration Services)
Hands-on experience working with a variety of data repository models including Data Marts, Data Warehouses and Data Lakes
Experience integrating data across many different systems & data sources including both structured and unstructured data
Demonstrated experience with both SQL and NoSQL database tools
Hands-on experience in all aspects of data warehousing and schema
Proficiency in designing efficient and robust ETL workflows
Working with cloud computing environments and tune solutions to improve performance and end-user experience
Experience working collaboratively with cross-functional agile teams
Contribute to group knowledge sharing platforms and best practices
Critical thinking, willingness to ask questions and help determine the best course for solutions
Ability to complete tasks independently
Strong interpersonal skills to build relationships and communicate effectively with multiple personality types
Demonstrated ability to work effectively in a fast-paced, complex, and dynamic business environment
Enjoy being challenged and to solve complex problems daily
Proven ability to support a strong member/customer service culture
Demonstrated and dynamic analytical/ problem-solving skills
What we would like to see:
Continuous improvement mindset
Ability to understand the big picture
BA/BS data analytics/computer science/information or similar degree
Four years of job-related experience is preferred
Building reporting semantic layers and BI dashboards are preferred
SQL Server Integration Services is preferred
Experience with AWS, DOMO, Tableau, Microsoft Power BI, Alteryx Designer, and Microsoft Azure preferred
Brownie Points for:
Musical Background
Love of Video Games
Love of Sushi
Sense of Humor
Ping Pong skills
Compensation: Highly competitive and depended on on experience

We are an equal opportunity employer and value diversity at our company. We do not discriminate based on race, religion, color, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, age, marital status, veteran status, or disability status.",3.9,"Guru
3.9","Gaithersburg, MD",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1
312,Sr Data Scientist,$80k-$129k (Glassdoor Est.),"This role will use AI and machine learning technique to drive the main purpose of increasing HouseCalls program member engagement and penetration through leveraging internal enterprise data sources including member medical history and behavior information and external information.

As HouseCalls enabling operation continues to grow, there are specific skills sets that are needed to help us achieve the financial goal and member experience satisfaction. Strategic solution team is seeking a director role of outreach strategy with advanced technical expertise, marketing background and great healthcare industry experience. We are looking for an innovative individual who is not only able to strategize via data, but also able to implement the strategy through the end.

You’ll enjoy the flexibility to telecommute* from anywhere within the U.S. as you take on some tough challenges.

Primary Responsibilities:

The Sr. Data Scientist will play an analytical role researching, designing, implementing and deploying full-stack scalable machine learning solutions to support house call member engagements
Develop intelligent solutions to drive increase in HouseCalls penetration rate by using unstructured data like voice and text
Consolidate internal and external data to establish member journey line across different programs
Establish analytic machine learning models to increase member outbound reach experience and NPS scores, implement the solutions into applications or operation
Drive inbound scheduling through text mining in scripting and NLP

You’ll be rewarded and recognized for your performance in an environment that will challenge you and give you clear direction on what it takes to succeed in your role as well as provide development for other roles you may be interested in.

Required Qualifications:
Bachelor’s degree in Applied Mathematics, Statistics, Computer Sciences, Information Management, Actuarial Science or a related technical field; MS or PhD strongly preferred
Minimum 5 years’ experience in data analytics and machine learning modeling
Minimum 5 years’ experience working with large databases to create meaningful, usable data structures to extract information out of application transactional data
Minimum 5 years’ experience leading technical and non-technical resources in the area of Information Management, Data Strategy, Business Intelligence development, data mining and predictive analytics with machine learning/statistical modeling techniques
Minimum 3 years' experience in Python
Strong ability to communicate highly technical issues/results to a diverse audience both verbally and in written
Experience working for a large enterprise with fragmented data sources, lack of documentation, unstructured requirements and ambiguity
Experience working with business stakeholders and senior leaders in understanding data analytics and information needs, and executing on transformation of high-level, abstract data needs into meaningful data management solutions, information and analysis
Experience understanding and managing business data and information, and the ability to correlate business processes to data
Experience converting raw data into processed, actionable, insightful information is required
Strong execution mentality
Preferred Qualifications:
MS in Applied Mathematics, Physics, Computer Sciences, Information Management, Statistics, Actuarial Science or a related technical field
Minimum 3 years of Speech Recognition modeling and/or NLP preferred
Minimum 5 years’ experience in correlating business processes and front-end applications to back-end databases and systems

Careers with Optum. Here's the idea. We built an entire organization around one giant objective; make health care work better for everyone. So when it comes to how we use the world's large accumulation of health-related information, or guide health and lifestyle choices or manage pharmacy benefits for millions, our first goal is to leap beyond the status quo and uncover new ways to serve. Optum, part of the UnitedHealth Group family of businesses, brings together some of the greatest minds and most advanced ideas on where health care has to go in order to reach its fullest potential. For you, that means working on high performance teams against sophisticated challenges that matter. Optum, incredible ideas in one incredible company and a singular opportunity to do your life's best work.(sm)

OptumCare is committed to creating an environment where physicians focus on what they do best: care for their patients. To do so, OptumCare provides administrative and business support services to both owned and affiliated medical practices which are part of OptumCare. Each medical practice part and their physician employees have complete authority with regards to all medical decision-making and patient care. OptumCare’s support services do not interfere with or control the practice of medicine by the medical practices or any of their physicians.
All Telecommuters will be required to adhere to UnitedHealth Group’s Telecommuter Policy.
Diversity creates a healthier atmosphere: OptumCare is an Equal Employment Opportunity/Affirmative Action employers and all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, age, national origin, protected veteran status, disability status, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, marital status, genetic information, or any other characteristic protected by law.

OptumCare is a drug-free workplace. Candidates are required to pass a drug test before beginning employment.",3.4,"UnitedHealth Group
3.4","Eden Prairie, MN",-1,10000+ Employees,1977,Company - Public,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$10+ billion (USD),-1
313,Principal Data Scientist - Manufacturing Technology,$123k-$195k (Glassdoor Est.),"Climb to new heights on your journey when you start Defining Possible with Northrop Grumman. Enjoy a purposeful career in aeronautics that is crucial to the way we connect and protect our world across land, sea, and air. Bring your experience and take advantage of this opportunity to discover how you can start to push past possible and achieve your goals today. Enjoy a diverse, collaborative environment with professionals across the nation ready to help launch your career.

Our Aeronautics Systems sector is seeking a Principal Data Scientist to join our team of qualified, diverse individuals. This position will support our Advanced Manufacturing Technology & Innovation development team and will be located in Palmdale, CA.

Our organization is currently working to build a revolutionary kind of production factory, an IIoT Smart Factory, and we need your help to shape the foundation! As a member of the Advanced Manufacturing Technology & Innovation team, you will identify, develop and implement data analytics, and machine learning technologies for production within our Advanced Manufacturing Technology & Innovation organization. The role will define, develop, and design manufacturing concepts and processes for production applications of manufacturing technologies with a focus on digital manufacturing technologies and applications including, but not limited to, point of use work instructions, industrial internet of things (IIoT), and data analytics solutions for manufacturing processes.

The position requires a strong understanding of computer and database systems as well as data analytics workflows. You will need to be familiar with data ETL processes and standard machine learning techniques. The position requires strong experience using a variety of data mining/data analysis methods, using a variety of data tools, building and implementing models, using/creating algorithms and creating/running simulations. Strong written and oral communication skills are required as the position involves extensive interfacing with internal and external customers, program offices, engineering disciplines, and industry suppliers. You must have a proven ability to drive business results with your data-based insights. The role will require the individual to be comfortable working with a wide range of stakeholders and functional teams. The desired candidate will have a passion for discovering solutions hidden in large data sets and working with stakeholders to improve business outcomes.

Essential Job Functions:
Develop analytical models to support manufacturing operations
Perform in-depth data analysis and report findings
Build and support dashboards / visuals
Support ETL Pipelines as needed
Assess new technologies and software platforms to assist in development of IIoT capability
Support project management and planning as required
Communicate advanced concepts and information in an understandable manner for audiences of varying levels of competency. Continuous interface with stakeholders and customers is required.
Support and enforce the Agile methodology and framework used by the project team
Keeps current on advances in the field of IIoT with demonstrating strategic big picture thinking.

Qualifications:

Basic Qualifications:
Bachelor's Degree in STEM (Science, Technology, Engineering, Math) with 5 years' experience with information systems, data analytics and/or computer programming; OR Master's Degree in STEM with 3 years' experience with information systems, data analytics and/or computer programming; OR PhD STEM
Bachelor's Degree (non-STEM) with 7 years' of experience with information system, data analytics and/or computer programming; OR Master's Degree (non-STEM) with 5 years' experience with information systems, data analytics and/or computer programming; OR PhD (non-STEM) with 2 years' experience with information systems, data analytics and/or computer programming;
Experience with one or more: Python, R, C, C++, Java, JavaScript
Experience with querying databases and defining schemas (MS SQL)
Experience with high volume production ETL pipelines
Strong problem solving skills with an emphasis on production environments
Experience working with and creating data architectures
Experience manipulating data using pandas, NumPy, or similar
Experience building analytical models using scikit, SciPy, or similar
Experience with version control software such as Git
Experience with data visualization tools using Tableau or similar
Experience with Command Line / Terminal scripting
Ability to perform data analysis and report findings
Proven ability to learn and master new technologies and techniques
Extensive knowledge of MS Office Products
Self-starter who is able to work with minimal direction
This position requires the ability to obtain and maintain a DOD Secret or Top Secret Clearance as well as Program Special access within a reasonable period of time, as determined by the company to meet its business needs
Ability to travel 10-15% of the time
Preferred Qualifications:
STEM Degree (Science, Technical, Engineering, or Mathematical)
Experience in a fabrication and/or assembly manufacturing environment
Knowledge of a variety of machine learning techniques (clustering, decision tree learning, artificial neural networks, etc.) and their real-world advantages/drawbacks
Experience using Kepware and/or Thingworx to develop IIoT technologies
Experience with Javascript, HTML / CSS to support IIoT dashboards and visuals
Experience with machine communication protocols such as MQTT, MTConnect, OPC
Experience with modern ETL / Big Data tools such as Kafka, Nifi, and Spark
Experience building system architectures using visual tools such as Visio
Experience working in an Agile environment
Experience in the development, capture, and/or execution of R&D technology initiatives and experience in Digital Manufacturing technology applications
Familiarity with DFARS-NIST-800-171 specification for cyber security
Current active Secret or Top Secret clearance preferred
Northrop Grumman is committed to hiring and retaining a diverse workforce. We are proud to be an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer, making decisions without regard to race, color, religion, creed, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, marital status, national origin, age, veteran status, disability, or any other protected class. For our complete EEO/AA and Pay Transparency statement, please visit www.northropgrumman.com/EEO. U.S. Citizenship is required for most positions.",3.9,"Northrop Grumman
3.9","Palmdale, CA",-1,10000+ Employees,1939,Company - Public,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$10+ billion (USD),-1
314,"Data Science Engineering, Machine Learning",$123k-$203k (Glassdoor Est.),"To get the best candidate experience, please consider applying for a maximum of 3 roles within 12 months to ensure you are not duplicating efforts.
Data Science Engineering, Machine Learning

Teams include: Analytics, Commerce, Einstein, IoT, Mulesoft (Integration Cloud), Search Relevance, Security, Service, Service Protection team, Marketing Cloud
Location: US (Relocation candidates)

In school, or graduated within the last 12 months? Please visit FutureForce for opportunities

Salesforce is looking for an exceptional engineer ideally with a dual background in machine learning and software engineering to help us take on one of the world’s most extensive data sets and transform it into amazing products that feel like magic. You will work on cutting-edge AI applications and products. Brainstorming data product ideas with data scientists and engineers to build data products used by hundreds of millions people every day.

Depending on the team, responsibilities may include:
Developing data infrastructure that ingest and transforms data from different sources and customers at scale.
Creating machine/deep learning infrastructure that generalizes across hundreds of thousands of Salesforce customers, but is expressive enough to generate high lift.
Design, develop, bring to production at a large scale and support “intelligence” features on a world-class search service that serves millions of requests daily on a diverse corpus of data including structured, unstructured and social feeds.
Deploy models at scale and assess impact from A/B testing (including interpretation of results).
Develop new relevance features and techniques build upon the latest results from the research community.

What we care about:
You have industry experience with writing production level code (e.g., Python, Scala, PySpark, Java) and taking ML models/ algorithms to production. Preference for 5+ years of industry experience (without PhD); at least 4+ years of industry experience with PhD. This is not an entry level / new college graduate role.
Self-starter who can see the big picture, and prioritize their work to make the largest impact on the business’ and customer’s vision and requirements.
Excellent communication & leadership.
We develop real products. You need to be an expert in coding, including Java and Object-Oriented Programming. We also use Scala and Functional Programming principles.
We prioritize professional industry experience; advanced degrees alone do not replace real world experience.
We have massive scale. You need to have experience in distributed, scalable systems. Consistency / availability tradeoffs are made here. You’ve tinkered with modern data storage, messaging, and processing tools (Kafka, Spark, Hadoop, Cassandra, etc.) and demonstrated experience designing and coding in big-data components such as HBase, DynamoDB, or similar.

Required Qualifications:
At least 4 years of hands-on professional industry experience in engineering positions focused on Machine Learning, Information Retrieval, Recommendation systems or Data Mining, Natural Language Processing, Learning to Rank.
Strong programming skills in Java, Python or Scala.
Strong knowledge of Object Oriented design, advanced algorithms, data structures, etc.

Preferred Qualifications:
Master’s or PhD in a relevant field and/or experience in any of the following is highly regarded: Computer Science, Machine Learning, Data Science and Modeling techniques including classification, regression and Bayesian analysis.
Experience with Agile software development and Test Driven Development methodologies.
Experience working with large datasets, preferably using tools like Hadoop, Spark, Pig or Hive.
Experience building Software as a Service (SaaS) applications.

We have a public-facing website https://www.getsalesforcebenefits.com/en that explains our various benefits, including wellbeing reimbursement, generous parental leave, adoption assistance, fertility benefits, and more. Visit for the full breakdown!

About Salesforce:
Salesforce, the Customer Success Platform and world's #1 CRM, empowers companies to connect with their customers in a whole new way. The company was founded on three disruptive ideas: a new technology model in cloud computing, a pay-as-you-go business model, and a new integrated corporate philanthropy model. These founding principles have taken our company to great heights, including being named one of Forbes’s “World’s Most Innovative Company” seven years in a row and #1 on the FORTUNE ‘100 Best Companies to Work For®’ List. We are the fastest growing of the top 10 enterprise software companies, and this level of growth equals incredible opportunities to grow a career at Salesforce. Together, with our whole Ohana (Hawaiian for “family”) made up of our employees, customers, partners and communities, we are working to improve the state of the world.
Accommodations - If you require assistance due to a disability applying for open positions please submit a request via this Accommodations Request Form.
Posting Statement
At Salesforce we believe that the business of business is to improve the state of our world. Each of us has a responsibility to drive Equality in our communities and workplaces. We are committed to creating a workforce that reflects society through inclusive programs and initiatives such as equal pay, employee resource groups, inclusive benefits, and more. Learn more about Equality at Salesforce and explore our benefits.
Salesforce.com and Salesforce.org are Equal Employment Opportunity and Affirmative Action Employers. Qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender perception or identity, national origin, age, marital status, protected veteran status, or disability status. Salesforce.com and Salesforce.org do not accept unsolicited headhunter and agency resumes. Salesforce.com and Salesforce.org will not pay any third-party agency or company that does not have a signed agreement with Salesfore.com or Salesforce.org.
Salesforce welcomes all.
Pursuant to the San Francisco Fair Chance Ordinance and the Los Angeles Fair Chance Initiative for Hiring, Salesforce will consider for employment qualified applicants with arrest and conviction records.",4.4,"Salesforce
4.4","San Francisco, CA",-1,10000+ Employees,1999,Company - Public,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),-1
315,"Software Engineer, Machine Learning Platform",$122k-$202k (Glassdoor Est.),"Grammarly is continuing to grow our team during the COVID-19 pandemic, conducting fully remote hiring and onboarding processes. All Grammarly team members can work remotely until August 2021. Read more about how we’re supporting our team and communities. The opportunity Grammarly empowers people to thrive and connect, whenever and wherever they communicate. 30 million people around the world use our AI-powered writing assistant every day. All of this begins with our team collaborating in a values-driven and learning-oriented environment. To achieve our ambitious goals, we’re looking for a Software Engineer to join our Mobile team. Affecting how people communicate is extremely challenging and requires flawless execution of memory- and CPU-intensive tasks on mobile devices. The Mobile team works with language models and machine learning models that power Grammarly’s iOS and Android keyboard apps. Engineers on this team convert product ideas into implementations that impact millions of users every day. Grammarly’s engineers and researchers have the freedom to innovate and uncover breakthroughs—and, in turn, influence our product roadmap. The complexity of our technical challenges is growing rapidly as we scale our interfaces, algorithms, and infrastructure. Read more about our stack or hear from our team on our technical blog. Your impact The Mobile team designs and implements features that form the core of our mobile products. You will implement solutions that are fast and that fit in the constraints of a mobile device. Over time, your contributions will help shape the product roadmap and create delightful experiences for our users. Working on this team will require you to research industry practices for natural language processing (NLP) and adopt them in the team's work. You will also collaborate with researchers to solve problems that require building new language models and machine learning (ML) models. We’re looking for someone who Embodies our EAGER values—is ethical, adaptable, gritty, empathetic, and remarkable Has experience with C++ in a production environment Can design data structures and algorithms to process large amounts of text on mobile devices Can design modules with good APIs Has experience in NLP and/or ML Is comfortable writing Python code Is interested in solving complex math problems Has experience with performance tuning and memory optimization It’s an added bonus if you have experience with on-device usage of TensorFlow models Support for you, professionally and personally Professional growth: We hire people we trust, and we give team members autonomy to do their best work. We also support professional development with training, coaching, and regular feedback. A connected team: Grammarly builds products that help people connect, and we apply this mindset to our own team. We have a highly collaborative culture supported by our EAGER values. We also take time to celebrate our colleagues and accomplishments with global, local, and team-specific events and programs. Comprehensive benefits: Grammarly offers all team members competitive pay along with a benefits package that includes superior health care. We also offer ample and defined time off, catered lunches, gym and recreation stipends, admission discounts, and more. We encourage you to apply At Grammarly, we value our differences, and we encourage all—especially those whose identities are traditionally underrepresented in tech organizations—to apply. We do not discriminate on the basis of ancestry, race, place of origin, political belief, religion, marital status, family status, physical or mental disability, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, age, or any other characteristic protected by law. Grammarly is an equal opportunity employer and abides by the Employment Equity Act.",4.9,"Grammarly, Inc.
4.9","San Francisco, CA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2009,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
316,Jr. Software Engineer - Machine Learning,$77k-$133k (Glassdoor Est.),"If you are a current Motorola Solutions employee, please click this link to apply through your Workday account.

Company Overview

At Motorola Solutions, we create technologies our customers refer to as their lifeline. Our technology platforms in communications, software, video and services help our customers work safely and more efficiently. Whether it’s helping firefighters see through smoke, enabling police officers to see around street corners, or reliably keeping the lights on in homes and businesses around the world, our work supports those who put their lives on the line to keep us safe. Bring your passion, potential and talents to Motorola Solutions, and help us usher in a new era in public safety and security.

Department Overview
Applied Technology is a prototyping center within Motorola Solutions. We create proof-of-concept and low-volume specialty communications products for government and private industry using such technologies as GSM, GPRS, UMTS, LTE, Android, and Linux. Our customer-centric, team-based environment provides an excellent growth opportunity for engineers and developers in enterprise markets where innovation is the primary focus.

Job Description

Candidates for this position are software engineers with strong programming skills who demonstrate curiosity, continuous learning, and an ability to adapt. Ideal candidates have a background in Artificial Intelligence / Machine Learning along with diverse knowledge and a wide variety of interests, especially in cellular / wireless communications. Hands on experience in embedded software development is also beneficial. Our products are developed to very high standards of quality and reliability and you will be expected to learn and conform to the department’s software process during all development activities. You will have the opportunity to create proof-of-concept and low-volume specialty communications products for government and private industry.

Daily Responsibilities:

Participate in cutting edge artificial intelligence (AI) research and product development, focused on embedded, edge device wireless communication systems.

Develop solutions for real world systems, leveraging AI/ML algorithms for standalone products and to enhance existing Applied Technology offerings.

Collaborate with multi-disciplinary product development teams to identify performance improvement opportunities and integrate trained models.

Perform duties in all areas of development (i.e. requirements analysis, high and low-level design, coding, model training and evaluation, documentation, real world testing, and validation).

Hands-on interaction with product hardware for developing and debugging.

Preferred Qualifications:

Experience with GPU programming with CUDA, OpenCL and/or GPU-based software acceleration libraries

Flexible, results-oriented problem-solver who requires minimal supervision. Projects can vary greatly from one to the next, so you must thrive on variety and enjoy taking on new challenges.

Willingness to learn one or more wireless communication standards (GSM, CDMA, UMTS, LTE, TETRA, etc.).

Ability to meaningfully communicate with members of all engineering disciplines (Hardware, RF, Software, FPGA, etc), as well as management.

Excellent verbal and written communication skills.

Excellent understanding of real-time embedded software design and be proficient in Linux, C, C++, Python and other software languages and operating systems.

Agile software development and/or Git/JIRA experience is a plus.

Basic Requirements

Bachelor's (BS) or Master's (MS) degree, preferably in Computer Science or related technical field.

Experience programming in C, C++, Python or Java

Experience with AI/ML frameworks (TensorFlow, PyTorch, Caffe, or MXNet) and knowledge of neural network fundamentals.

Must be a U.S. citizen with ability to obtain necessary security clearance as required by government contract. Some contracts may have higher-level clearance requirements.

Travel Requirements

Relocation Provided

Position Type

Referral Payment Plan
Yes

EEO Statement

Motorola Solutions is an Equal Opportunity Employer and all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, veteran's status, or, any other protected characteristic.",3.6,"Motorola Solutions
3.6","Schaumburg, IL",-1,10000+ Employees,1928,Company - Public,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$5 to $10 billion (USD),-1
317,Optical Design Engineer,$61k-$92k (Glassdoor Est.),"Introduction

ASML US brings together the most creative minds in science and technology to develop lithography machines that are key to producing faster, cheaper, more energy-efficient microchips. We design, develop, integrate, market and service these advanced machines, which enable our customers - the world’s leading chipmakers - to reduce the size and increase the functionality of their microchips, which in turn leads to smaller, more powerful consumer electronics. Our headquarters are in Veldhoven, the Netherlands, and we have 18 office locations around the United States including main offices in Chandler, Arizona, San Jose and San Diego, California, Wilton, Connecticut, and Hillsboro, Oregon.

Job Mission

ASML’s YieldStarSensor Group in Wilton CT is seeking a Physicist/Engineer with preference to optical engineering to support and develop optical / photonic sensor systems used within ASML’s photolithography tools. These systems typically include light sources, detectors, optical and electro-optical components, fiber optics, electronics and signal processing software functioning as a key sub-system in ASML optical metrology tool. Understanding the components in their relation to the sensor system and understanding the interaction with the rest of the metrology tool and the measurement process is of fundamental importance.

The job description below defines the ideal set of qualifications for the position.

This position requires access to controlled technology, as defined in the Export Administration Regulations (15 C.F.R. § 730, et seq.). Qualified candidates must be legally authorized to access such controlled technology prior to beginning work. Business demands may require ASML to proceed with applicants who are immediately eligible to access controlled technology.

Job Description

Key components of this position are:

Using Physics, Mathematics, Electronics, Mechanics, and Software knowledge and an understanding of the sensor systems and the lithography tool to model, design and de-bug new and existing sensors in complex environments.

Desired skills in the candidate are:

Optical modeling and data analysis and evaluation:

Expertise with design, optical and Opto-mechanical tolerancing and modeling with CodeV and/or Zemax.
Wave propagation and diffraction modeling.Use of FRED for this modeling is a plus.
Polarization optics and polarization modeling.
Image processing and pattern recognition.
Optical and physics Simulation in Matlab and other suitable languages and design tools.
Data processing and trending with MATLAB.
And/or hands-on optical alignment, testing and qualification.

Building and aligning complex sensors using diverse mechanical, collimation and interferometry.
Test stand design and build: concept, error budget, realization.
Optical sensors Hardware build and debugging.
Working knowledge with diverse optical devices and sensors: objectives, collimation and relay optics, fibers, cameras and detectors.
Matlab for data processing, correlation and trending, and visualization.
Leadership:

The candidate must have the capacity to lead engineers and technicians in executing activities related to complex tests, data gathering, and effectively communicate results to managers and customers.
Problem Solving:

The candidate must have expertise at troubleshooting complex problems on complex systems, develop and debug algorithms; the candidate must have the ability to use analytical processes (8Ds, fault trees, Ishikawa diagrams, etc…) to develop test plans to determine problem root cause.
Communication:

The candidate must have the capability to clearly communicating progress and status of ongoing investigations to managers and to customers; Candidate will be required to write reports documenting investigations carried out.
Travel:

Nominal travel might be required ( ~ 15%) to Europe, Asia, and within the US can be expected on a routine basis.
Education

BS in Optics (preferred) Physics (PhD preferred), Applied Mathematics, Electrical Engineering or Opto-mechanical discipline, with an emphasis on optical system, photonics and data analysis and trending, or equivalent experience.

Experience
Dual degree in a second engineering discipline a plus.
Three to five years of experience required.
Experience in working with engineers across disciplines to solve complex problems in a timely manner.
Strong emphasis on creative problem solving and effective communication.

Candidate must:

Be able to break down complex problems with limited data to come to solutions – strong critical thinking capability.
Have strong written and oral communication skills and a commitment to achieving results while under time constraints;High energy, high level of dedication.
Be willing to jump in on new issues, get to the bottom of the causes and propose practical solutions.
Be able to interface with multidisciplinary groups and work effectively in a team and be willing to take on responsibility, follow through and keep multiple simultaneous assignments on schedule.
Be able to quickly acquire technical knowledge from documentation and on-the-job training and be capable of thoroughly investigating technical issues (analytically and hands-on in a lab).
Personal skills
Can observe and respond to people and situations and interact with others encountered in the course of work.
Can learn and apply new information or skills.
Must be able to read and interpret data, information, and documents.
Strong customer focus and commitment to customer satisfaction through prioritization, quality, efficiency and professionalism.
Ability to complete assignments with attention to detail and high degree of accuracy.
Proven ability to perform effectively in a demanding environment with changing workloads and deadlines.
Result driven-demonstrate ownership and accountability.
Identifies bottlenecks and drives improvements.
Work independently or as part of a team and follow through on assignments with minimal supervision.
Demonstrate open, clear, concise and professional communication.
Ability to establish and maintain cooperative working relationships with manager, co-workers and customer.
Work according to a strict set of procedures within the provided timelines.
Other information

Role within Office

Responsibilities:

Routinely required to sit; walk; talk; hear; use hands to keyboard, finger, handle, and feel; stoop, kneel, crouch, twist, reach, and stretch. Occasionally required to move around the campus.
Occasionally lift and/or move up to 20 pounds.
May require travel dependent on business needs.
Specific vision abilities required by this job include close vision, color vision, peripheral vision, depth perception, and ability to adjust focus.

EOE AA M/F/Veteran/Disability",3.9,"ASML
3.9","Wilton, CT",-1,10000+ Employees,1984,Company - Public,Electrical & Electronic Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$5 to $10 billion (USD),-1
318,Data Engineer,-1,"Marathon is seeking a Data Engineer to support the data pipeline for the development and integration of Artificial Intelligence and Big Data/Cloud Solutions.

The candidate will have experience in managing, manipulating, storing and parsing data in a data pipeline for variety of computer vision and other AI applications. The work is performed in a multidisciplinary team environment in an agile project framework. The candidate must be highly motivated and enthusiastic about implementing new technologies in a small team environment where deadlines are important to national security.

Position Responsibilities:
Work closely with data engineers and architects to engineer ETL solutions to prepare for ingest into machine learning development environments
Design, develop and maintain data services and/or pipelines as part of an Agile/Scrum team
Code, test and implement ETL logic
Support continuous process automation for data ingest
Support the development and integration of Client algorithms for testing and operational deployment
Perform data analysis to assist in decision-making
Work with program management and engineers to implement and document complex and evolving requirements
Perform multiple tasks simultaneously and successful perform under changing requirements and deadlines
Help cultivate an environment that promotes customer service excellence, innovation, collaboration, and teamwork
Required Skills:
Must be a US Citizen and Secret Clearance eligible
A Bachelor's Degree in Data Science, Math, Finance, Statistics, Information Management, Computer Science, Engineering, or equivalent field
2-7+ years of hands-on work experience in one of the related areas: Data Science, Computer Science or Computer Engineering
Proficient parsing / ETL-ing data into a variety of formats for Client applications, Test & Validation, metrics derivation
Proficiency with Python, Linux shell and scripting languages
Technical proficiency with transforming structured and unstructured data sets
Excellent communication, and presentation skills with the demonstrated ability to communicate across all levels of the organization and communicate technical terms to non-technical audiences with an impeccable attention to detail
Desired Skills:
Secret Clearance and eligible to obtain Top Secret
Advanced degree (Masters) in a technical discipline
Experience working with cloud technologies (Amazon Web Services, Microsoft Azure, etc.)
Experience working with Department of Defense (DoD) organizations or performers
Experience with PySpark, Pandas
Experience with Palantir Foundry
Experience with NoSQL databases such as MongoDB
Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $120,000.00 - $150,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Flexible schedule
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Tuition reimbursement
Vision insurance
Schedule:
8 hour shift
Experience:
python & pyspark: 1 year (Preferred)
hadoop, hive, impala: 1 year (Preferred)
hadoop: 1 year (Preferred)
big data: 1 year (Preferred)
python: 1 year (Preferred)
Application Question:
Do you have a SECRET CLEARANCE?
This Job Is:
A job for which military experienced candidates are encouraged to apply
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",4.5,"Marathon TS
4.5","Fairfax, VA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
319,Unity Engineer,-1,"We are looking for a Unity Engineer with experience in either game development or machine learning to join our Tracking Team in San Francisco.

What you need:
Experience with fundamentals in Unity C# programming
Familiarity with linear algebra concepts in practice
Demonstrated interest in data-side programming
Bonus points for:
Strong math fundamentals
Deep, practical experience programming render pipelines and/or real-time physics
Developer tooling in real-time simulation or game development
General information
You must be authorized to work in the United States
This position is based in Silicon Valley, California
Occasional international travel may be required
Ultraleap is an equal opportunity employer and prohibits discrimination based on race, color, religion, national origin, age, disability, veteran status, marital status, pregnancy, gender expression or identity, sexual orientation or any other legally protected status
About Ultraleap

Ultraleap was formed when Ultrahaptics and Leap Motion came together in May 2019.

We’ve brought together the world’s most powerful 3D hand tracking with the only mid-air haptics technology to change the way humans and machines interact, solving some of the most challenging and practical problems on the way.

Our team is spread across the world, with locations in Silicon Valley and Bristol, UK and includes world-leading experts in interface design, acoustics, machine learning and computer vision.

Ultraleap Values

Our company culture is strong and one that we are proud of; the ideal candidate will reflect our Values

Passion for Excellence: We value quality over speed. Our products stand out for being the best in their fields and we are known for delivering what we promise to each other, to customers and to investors. We believe that it is better to be a master in your field of excellence than to be average in many different fields.

Restless Innovators: Creativity and invention are key to our success. We are not satisfied with the status quo. We look for novel solutions that give us a competitive advantage. The “normal way” something is done is not always the right way for us.

Open and Fair: We strive to build an open and fair culture. We make decisions transparent where possible and ensure that they are fair in cases where transparency is not possible.

Winning Together: We recognise that individual success is built upon a team effort. We do not blame but rather look to find a solution to the root cause. We believe that diverse groups produce better solutions.",4.8,"Ultraleap Ltd.
4.8","San Francisco, CA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,-1,Company - Private,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
320,"Machine Learning Software Engineer, Cardio",$105k-$173k (Glassdoor Est.),"Passionate about precision medicine and advancing the healthcare industry?

Recent advancements in underlying technology have finally made it possible for AI to impact clinical care in a meaningful way. Tempus' proprietary platform connects an entire ecosystem of real-world evidence to deliver real-time, actionable insights to physicians, providing critical information about the right treatments for the right patients, at the right time.

Passionate about building great software products?

At Tempus, software products are owned and developed by small, autonomous teams composed of developers, designers, scientists, and product managers. Your team helps to set goals, build the software, deploy the code, and contribute to a growing software platform that will make a lasting impact in the field of cancer research and treatment. Tempus Insights is our business to develop, validate and launch new predictive tests, in oncology and new disease areas, by leveraging our clinical + molecular + imaging data to provide novel insights to clinicians and patients.

Tempus builds software as nimble as our teams. Our modern full-stack tech stack - React and Node.js on cloud infrastructure - allows our teams to iterate rapidly and lead our industry in innovation. Our decentralized, microservice architecture and emphasis on automation allow us to deliver advanced solutions with confidence, and at scale

This person makes core contributions to the FDA device builds for Cardio. Their core responsibility is to understand, test, and ship the models including production infra for retraining.
What you will do:

Tempus has access to unique data in cardiology that will allow us to develop insights that have only recently become possible. You will work with research data scientists to launch new AI-enabled smart tests based on EKGs and other underlying cardiology information, which will help patients receive early treatment and save lives.

What you bring:
Experience building complex distributed systems that handle large datasets and / or integrate with external APIs
Experience with building and deploying deep learning machine learning models. This team will be responsible for shipping research-grade models to production.
You are able to work in an ambiguous problem space with high uncertainty
You can communicate well and clearly document your process to comply with a tightly regulated industry",3.4,"Tempus Labs
3.4","Redwood City, CA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2015,Company - Private,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
321,"Senior Staff Software Engineer, Data",$109k-$214k (Glassdoor Est.),"Data influences all of the decisions we make at Tinder, and our data platform supports the backbone of business analysis by providing both near real-time and offline data used to derive insights into user behavior and application performance. You will play an integral role in supporting and leveraging the platform to drive data initiatives across the company, from architecture design to implementation.
In this role, you will:
Guide and oversee the architecture, implementation, testing, and operations of core data services
Collaborate with Engineering, Product, and Analytics on the expansion of our data serving layer
Drive and coordinate cross-team/company-wide initiatives
Be the steward for promoting data engineering best practices, from data governance to data ingestion, data storage, and data serving
Influence the roadmap and development for the Data Engineering team
Mentor and guide junior engineers

We’re looking for:

Excellent knowledge of Computer Science fundamentals, with strong competencies in data structures, algorithms, software design, and coding
Hands on experience building and maintaining large scale analytics systems in production
Hands on experience building streaming pipelines leveraging technologies such as Apache Kafka, Apache Spark, and Flink
Strong Scala/Java skills and experience
Eagerness and humility to keep learning and growing, and a passion for providing mentorship
Able to apply long-term and high-level thinking and problem solving skills to complex problems
A BS, MS, or PhD in Computer Science or Engineering from a top school, but a wonderful project list is even better
Bonus points for strong machine learning or stats knowledge
As part of our team, you’ll enjoy:

· The hustle of a startup with the impact of a global business
· Tremendous opportunity to seek some of the industry’s most exciting problems
· Working with an outstanding team of creative, fun and highly motivated people
· Comprehensive health coverage, competitive salary, and 401(k) match

At Tinder, we don’t just accept difference — we celebrate it, we support it, and we thrive on it for the benefit of our employees, our products, and our community. Tinder is proud to be an equal opportunity workplace.",3.8,"Tinder
3.8","West Hollywood, CA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2012,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
322,Software Engineer - Machine Learning,-1,"ABOUT THE JOB


As a Software Engineer on Polaris Radar, you will be working on Rubrik's cloud-based anomaly and ransomware detection SaaS product, which leverages machine learning to power its core detection algorithms (https://www.rubrik.com/en/products/polaris-overview/polaris-radar).

Responsibilities:
Analyze experimental data, communicate analysis results, and develop product improvements
Design, code, deploy, and support scalable machine learning pipelines within a business context
Work closely with the team to scale and improve the performance of core machine learning systems and increase the team's machine learning productivity
Full stack ownership of projects from design to implementation and deployment
ABOUT YOU
Able to identify scalable & elegant solutions to complex problems that work at scale
Interest in working on machine learning systems; prior work or educational experience with machine learning is preferred
Experience with common machine learning techniques such as data pre-processing, feature engineering, and training/evaluation of classification and regression models
Experience with machine learning software packages (e.g. numpy/pandas, scikit-learn, TensorFlow)
Knowledge of OS internals, databases would be useful
Large distributed systems design and development experience is a bonus
ABOUT THE TEAM

Our team builds products to address Rubrik's holistic ransomware response strategy. We make it easier and faster to recover from security attacks while providing greater intelligence on how an incident impacted enterprises' global applications and data.

Our engineers are self-starters, driven and can manage themselves. We believe in giving engineers responsibility, not tasks. Our goal is to motivate and challenge you to do your best work. We encourage each engineer to try out new ideas. A lot of such ideas have become our products. All ideas, whether they are coming from newly graduated students or seasoned engineers, are all respected and valued the same way.

ABOUT RUBRIK

Rubrik is one of the fastest growing companies in Silicon Valley, revolutionizing data protection and management in the emerging multi-cloud world. We are the leader in cloud data management, delivering a single platform to manage and protect data in the cloud, at the edge, and on-premises. Enterprises choose Rubrik to simplify backup and recovery, accelerate cloud adoption, enable automation at scale, and secure against cyberthreats. We've been recognized as a Forbes Cloud 100 Company two years in a row and as a LinkedIn Top 10 startup.

Rubrik provides equal employment opportunities (EEO) to all employees and applicants for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, age, disability or genetics. In addition to federal law requirements, Rubrik complies with applicable state and local laws governing nondiscrimination in employment in every location in which the company has facilities. This policy applies to all terms and conditions of employment, including recruiting, hiring, placement, promotion, termination, layoff, recall, transfer, leaves of absence, compensation and training.

#LI-SK1",-1,Rubrik Job Board,"Palo Alto, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
323,Sr. Algorithm Engineer,$61k-$140k (Glassdoor Est.),"Introduction

ASML US brings together the most creative minds in science and technology to develop lithography machines that are key to producing faster, cheaper, more energy-efficient microchips. We design, develop, integrate, market and service these advanced machines, which enable our customers - the world’s leading chipmakers - to reduce the size and increase the functionality of their microchips, which in turn leads to smaller, more powerful consumer electronics. Our headquarters are in Veldhoven, the Netherlands, and we have 18 office locations around the United States including main offices in Chandler Arizona, San Jose and San Diego California, Wilton Connecticut, and Hillsboro Oregon.

Job Mission

Needs to have experience and knowledge in machine learning, computer vision and image processing. The employee needs to be able to do independent research and provide solutions to challenge problems in industry. The employee needs to have at least 5 years of C++ development experience in order to implement deliverable and efficient algorithms in our EBeam systems.

Job Description

Develop and implement computer vision and machine learning algorithms to various SEM patterns/layers, help to build machine learning based image quality enhancement platform for Ebeam tools.

Education

Master with at least 5-7 years hands-on experience in computer vision or related fields of CS/EE; Ph.D with 2-3 years experience

Experience

Strong knowledge of the state-of-the-art in computer vision algorithms and techniques;

Capable of research and develop new image processing algorithms;

Capable of develop image quality metrics and tuning methods.

Solid skill in C++;

Deep understanding of machine learning and deep learning technologies;

Personal skills

Good communication and organizational skills.

Other information

EOE AA M/F/Veteran/Disability",3.9,"ASML
3.9","San Jose, CA",-1,10000+ Employees,1984,Company - Public,Electrical & Electronic Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$5 to $10 billion (USD),-1
324,Territory Sales Engineer,-1,"Job Summary*
Well established CNC machine tool dealer looking for a territory sales engineer for Mazak Machine tools along with other brands of machine tools in a set territory in West Central Ohio. Call on customers Monday through Friday, 7:00 to 5:00 and help them find solutions to their machining needs. Use CRM to keep customer information and work with the service and parts team to help customers and grow business. Mostly using phone, email, LinkedIn, and many face to face visits and meetings.
Responsibilities and Duties*
Sales engineers are tasked to develop a relationship with all businesses in the territory who can use our machines, parts, and service, and work with them to find solutions to fit their metal cutting manufacturing needs. Using phone, email, in person visits, and other platforms, you will need to learn about customers and use many resources to find solutions. There are weekly onsite sales meetings to go over projects, but most of the time is spent on the road working with customers. Sales engineers set up their own schedules and are responsible for producing quotes using the manufacture's software. It is important to understand metal cutting manufacturing and to systematically and continuously research and learn about the products available to your customers. Must be able to walk the customer's floor and understand what they do, bring customer's to the showroom or another customer's place for a demonstration, and present proposals to the customer and their staff.
Qualifications and Skills*
Must have at least *3 years' *experience in some form of metal cutting sales, (tooling, accessories, cnc machines, etc.), and/or have been in the metal cutting industry for 5 years. Any machining, print reading, and/or time estimating experience is a plus, but not mandatory. Please do not apply unless you plan to make at least a 5 year commitment.
Benefits*
Almost all nights and weekends off. Some travel, but usually by vehicle only as we are a regional dealer and do not have national accounts. Vehicle or vehicle reimbursement, gas card, laptop, cell phone, and uniforms are provided. Training time is provided and a training plan will be put together based on experience and need. Unlimited earning potential - there is no cap on commissions. Health insurance, dental insurance, IRA with company match, paid vacation, paid sick leave.

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $60,000.00 - $120,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Health insurance
Paid time off
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Supplemental Pay:
Bonus pay
Commission pay
Experience:
Manufacturing: 5 years (Required)
Industrial Sales: 3 years (Preferred)
Location:
Ohio (Preferred)
Work Location:
On the road
Paid Training:
Yes
Company's website:
www.knoxmachinery.com",5.0,"Knox Machinery, Inc
5.0",Ohio,-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
325,Development Lead at Vertica (Machine Learning) (US - REMOTE),$80k-$147k (Glassdoor Est.),"Development Lead at Vertica (Machine Learning) (US - REMOTE)

Job Description:
Title: Development Lead at Vertica (Machine Learning) (US - REMOTE)

Location: Remote Eligible

Vertica believes that each of us knows the work environment that makes us the most productive. Thats why we provide our employees with the ability to work how and where they will be the most successful. We enable a flexible approach to work location, meaning for roles where it makes sense, you can work from the office or from home, or a combination of both, but you make that choice including where you choose to live. Vertica invests in the best technologies and provides flexible benefits and collaborative work environments to empower employees to work productively in the setting that meets their personal needs. Thats why were so proud to have a highly productive and engaged team in every function of the company.

About your role

You will lead, mentor and develop a highly talented and growing team at Vertica.

You will design, implement and optimize innovative machine learning algorithms and features to help our customers uncover hidden patterns, correlations, and other valuable insights from massive amounts of data. To do this you'll need to design and implement ML algorithms including but not limited to XGBoost, KNN and ARIMA in Verticas MPP architecture to crunch petabytes of data.

You'll work on low-level systems code (C++) to make ML algorithms run orders of magnitude faster. And you'll enhance the Vertica Software Development Kit (SDK) and core infrastructure to integrate Vertica with ML frameworks.

It is an exciting time to join the team, as Vertica paves the way for scalable in-database machine learning on petabytes of data.

Required skills

· 5+ years of combined experience in software development and management of the development team.

· Customer focus with knowledge of major machine learning use cases in the industry.

· C/C++ or Java

· Essential algorithms and data structures.

· Experience with large scale distributed systems.

· Ability to work in a cross-functional team with PM, QA, Documentation, and others.

· Willingness and ability to hire and mentor team members and interns.

· Excellent communication and strong analytical thinking skills.

· Experience with Machine Learning tools/libraries like Apache Spark, H20, TensorFlow, PyTorch, or others.

Desired/Preferred skills

· MS or PhD in Machine Learning or Computer Science.

· Proficiency in Python and SQL.

· Advanced knowledge of algorithms and data structures.

· Knowledge/experience of putting machine learning models into production over distributed architecture with one or more of the following: classification, regression, recommendation systems, time-series, or ranking systems.

· Experience in the development of enterprise-grade ML platforms.

· Database fundamentals

About our team

The best ideas often come from fresh perspectives. At Vertica, our open-minded, diverse and inclusive team is always learning from each other. We approach intellectually challenging work with a ""get it done"" attitude. Vertica Engineers are given significant latitude and support to pursue what they are passionate about to make Vertica an even better place. If you are excited about building great technology with a proactive team, you will find yourself in good company at Vertica.

About our product

Vertica provides a state-of-the-art Big Data Analytics platform that handles petabytes of data. It is a commercially successful, high performance, distributed database. Every industry is finding ways to benefit from data analytics. We continue to engineer our product to be flexible so that it supports all of them. Vertica is a recognized leader in analytics powering some of the worlds most data driven organizations like Uber, Wayfair, Intuit, Cerner, and more. Our columnar, MPP, distributed database delivers unprecedented speed, petabyte scale, with analytics and machine learning functions built into the core.

We believe the future belongs to the fast. Join us for the ride!

#LI-GC2

#DiceGC

Job:

Engineering

Micro Focus is proud to be an Equal Opportunity Employer. Prospective employees will receive consideration without discrimination because of race, colour, religion, creed, gender, national origin, age, disability, marital or veteran status, sexual orientation, genetic information, citizenship or any other legally protected status",3.3,"Micro Focus
3.3","Cambridge, MA",-1,10000+ Employees,1976,Company - Public,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
326,Machine Learning Engineer (New Grad),$79k-$139k (Glassdoor Est.),"Develop novel ML applications used by millions of language learners every day.

Our mission is to make language education free, fun and accessible for everyone in the world. With 300 million total users worldwide, Duolingo is the most popular way to learn a language online.

As an ML Engineer, you will apply your background in machine learning to develop state-of-the-art product features using classification, regression, and reinforcement learning for applications in personalization, natural language processing, anomaly detection, forecasting, and so on. In many cases, you'll have to invent new technologies to tackle unique Duolingo data! You will work with a fun and diverse team to build intelligent software used by millions of people, around the world, every day.

What you'll do...
Apply AI/ML methods to massive data sets
Prototype new models, evaluate with offline experiments, and then productionize solutions at scale to millions of daily users
Work with a cross-functional team of award-winning designers, researchers, engineers, and others to build new product features
A few past projects include:
Novel bandit algorithm for mobile notifications (KDD paper)
The Duolingo English Test (TACL paper)
Shared task on translation & paraphrasing (ACL paper)
Novel model of vocabulary forgetting (ACL paper)
Course content prioritization tool (blog post)
Multilingual language-proficiency alignment tool (blog post)
What we're looking for
MS or PhD in machine learning, natural language processing, or related field
Experience implementing ML systems in Python, Java, Scala, or C/C++ (i.e., not just R or MATLAB)
Excellent presentation and communication skills
Strong debugging and critical thinking skills
Ability to relocate to Pittsburgh, PA
Exceptional candidates will have...
2+ years industry experience as a software engineer (e.g., commercial products or government/industry research projects)
A portfolio of relevant publications or open-source projects
A desire to keep up with the field by attending or publishing at relevant conferences (ICML, NeurIPS, ACL, EMNLP, KDD, AAAI, ICLR, CVPR, etc.)
Why you'll love working here
Language learning opportunities
Catered in-house lunches, and breakfast and dinner options
Company-wide Hackathon
PTO and company holidays
Frequent company-wide dinners, monthly celebrations, social clubs, and so much more!",4.9,"Duolingo
4.9","Pittsburgh, PA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2011,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
327,Data Scientist,$65k-$114k (Glassdoor Est.),"Embark on a career putting innovative, reliable, and agile products and ideas into orbit, and beyond. Northrop Grumman has opportunities waiting for you that play a vital role in human space exploration, national defense, and scientific discovery, supporting multiple programs across the universe. With us, you'll discover a culture of curiosity and collaboration that will have you Defining Possible from the day you start. Our space systems connect and protect millions of people on earth every day, now and for the future. Explore your future and launch your career today.

Northrop Grumman Space Systems is seeking a Data Scientist This position will be located at Hill AFB, UT and will support the Ground Subsystems Support Contract (GSSC) program.

The successful applicant will:
Develop and implement artificial intelligence and machine learning models to solve complex data problems
Interpret large amounts of data using advanced visualization techniques and tools
Merge and transform big datasets to ensure data integrity and usability
Develop a process to maintain quality and performance of statistical models and quickly identify enhancements opportunities
Communicate advanced concepts and information in an understandable manner for audiences of varying levels of competency
Maintain an up-to-date knowledge of technology trends
Properly document code, artifact description, implementation, and use cases
Be an eager and fast learner
Work on a fast pasted collaborative team in an agile environment
As a full-time employee of Northrop Grumman Space Systems, you are eligible for our robust benefits package including:
Medical, Dental & Vision coverage
401k
Educational Assistance
Life Insurance
Employee Assistance Programs & Work/Life Solutions
Paid Time Off
Health & Wellness Resources
Employee Discounts
This position's standard work schedule is a 9/80. The 9/80 schedule allows employees who work a nine-hour day Monday through Thursday to take every other Friday off.

UTSpace

Qualifications:

Basic Qualifications:
Minimum of a Bachelor of Science in Data Science, Computer Science, Physics, Statistics, Mathematics, or related quantitative field
Minimum 2 years of relevant experience with a bachelor's degree; or 0 years with a Master's
Demonstrated experience with Programming in Python, R, or Node.js
Demonstrated experience manipulating dataframes through SQL, pandas, or tidyverse
U.S. Citizenship and the ability to obtain a Secret Security Clearance
Preferred Qualifications:
Active Secret Security Clearance or higher
Familiarity with any of the following: Tensorflow, Theano, Keras, PyTorch, NLTK, PyStan, PyMC3, Rstan, ElasticSearch, PyCuda
Familiarity with Graph, NoSQL, Hadoop, SMACK, or Neo4J/OWL
Northrop Grumman is committed to hiring and retaining a diverse workforce. We are proud to be an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer, making decisions without regard to race, color, religion, creed, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, marital status, national origin, age, veteran status, disability, or any other protected class. For our complete EEO/AA and Pay Transparency statement, please visit www.northropgrumman.com/EEO. U.S. Citizenship is required for most positions.",3.9,"Northrop Grumman
3.9","Hill AFB, UT",-1,10000+ Employees,1939,Company - Public,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$10+ billion (USD),-1
328,Data Scientist/Engineer,-1,"Columbus, Ohio Engineering - Full-Time

Seamless.AI delivers the world's best sales leads. Maximize revenue, increase sales and acquire your total addressable market instantly using artificial intelligence. Join us on our rocket ship to impact 1 billion people and add to our 20,000 companies and users who are generating hundreds of millions in sales for free at Seamless.AI . Request a demo here

The Data Scientist will be the 'go to person' on our rapidly expanding engineering team solving all our data science challenges for billions of data points related to the world's business contacts and company profiles. The primary role of the data scientist is to improve the accuracy of our data recommendations that predicts every professional's emails, phone numbers and websites with the highest level and degree of accuracy possible. This person will have an opportunity to solve significant data problems that are positively impacting millions of business professionals and helping the world connect to opportunity and each other faster than ever before.

Responsibilities

Develop the strategy and execution roadmap to improve our company records data set and make recommendations to improve our company profile data accuracy
Develop the strategy and execution roadmap to improve our contact records data set and make recommendations to improve our contact profile data accuracy
Build and release models that elevate our data quality and accuracy
Work with enormous data sets to find correlations and signals amongst all the noise to improve our contact profile and company profile prediction accuracy. Our database has billions of records extracted from the web.
Ensure data quality throughout all stages of acquisition and processing, including such areas as data sourcing/collection, ground truth generation, normalization, transformation, etc.
Collaborate with colleagues with engineering, QA and business backgrounds
Build, measure, analyze and optimize machine learning and statistical models that will have a direct impact on the Seamless.AI contact and company profiles.
Identify and communicate opportunities to apply data science and machine learning to product design and processes.
Identify, communicate, and create innovative solutions for product design, processes, and business problems by using advanced machine learning, statistical modeling and optimization techniques.
Test and evaluate the quality of algorithms using statistical methods.
Experiment, review, and improve the existing analytics and machine learning models as Seamless evolves.
Lead internal tactical and strategic projects and reports project progress for quality, deliverables and cost to VP of Operations.
Work together with engineers, technical project managers, and subject matter experts, to gather requirements and improve our customer experience using machine learning and data science.
Mentor and guide other team members and colleagues in the domain area as owner of data science projects end-to-end.

Minimum Qualifications:

3 - 5+ years of professional (not academic) experience in data science and/or big data.
Expert knowledge of data science, predictive modeling, statistics and machine learning in general.
Deep experience with algorithms, statistics, and data analytics.
A Data Geek - we're looking for people who love data, and who are comfortable working with numbers and patterns. If you like to solve puzzles in your free time, this is the right opportunity for you!
Experience/knowledge in our more major technical & programming languages and cloud computing ( Node.JS , PostgreSQL, AWS)
Strategic thinker and problem solver to develop data science strategies as a principal data scientist.
Background in making impactful data decisions with hundreds of millions of data points quickly and efficiently.
Analytical and detail oriented with the ability to prioritize, execute and deliver projects accurately and on time.
Committed leader and team player who can work autonomously in data science responsibilities, be proactive, take ownership over the success of their projects, and work hard to support those around them.
Drive and leadership skills to help build and manage team of data analysts.
Must be comfortable with unstructured, fast moving and constantly evolving high growth environment.
Solid communication and writing skills to effectively communicate with business and data science leaders on project status, timeline, strategy, ideas and technical results.
Self-motivated and able to work efficiently with both on-location and remote teams.
M.S. focused on Data Science or related field

Desired but not required:

Knowledge and experience in marketing channel optimization, customer behavior/journey modeling and prediction, product recommendation systems, online testing and etc. is highly desired.
Background in handling multi-terabyte size datasets in the cloud.
Proficient in computer software development, web development and engineering.
Experience working with distributed systems and grid computing.
Data security knowledge, risk, compliance (ie. GDPR, etc...).
Experience working in online products or SaaS based products.
Prior work at a fast paced early stage start up.

Disclaimer: This is a full-time position that ideally be located in our Columbus, Ohio office. We are open to assisting with relocation and willing to discuss US remote for the right candidate. Visa Sponsorship is not included in our hiring package. Applicants will need to be authorized to work in the US.

We are an equal opportunity employer and value diversity at our company. We do not discriminate on the basis of race, religion, color, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, age, marital status, veteran status, or disability status.

No Recruiters. This is an internal position our internal team is hiring for.

Pay, Perks & Such:

At Seamless, we love to celebrate our diverse group of hardworking employees and it shows. We're proud to say Seamless.AI was recognized as a one of the Top Most Promising and Fastest Growing Start up by VentureOhio. Our CEO, Brandon Bornancin, was also named 2018 Sales Development Thought Leader of the Year. We pride ourselves on our collaborative culture that pervasive throughout every step of a Seamless employee's journey. Starting with our interviews and continuing through Daily Standup sessions, collaboration is at the heart of working at Seamless.

We offer a full slate of benefits including competitive salaries, world-class health benefits, flexible vacation time, paid time off, remote flexibility and numerous other benefits to improve company culture/morale. And... we offer some not-so-standard, extra-fun benefits, including learning & development programs to improve your skills, an office ping-pong table, pool table, arcade basketball, DJ booth, and of course, fully stocked fridges and free coffee. :)

Take the chance to contribute to an upbeat, fully engaged culture that's addicted to winning. We value diversity and believe forming teams in which everyone can be their authentic self is key to our success. We encourage people from underrepresented backgrounds and different industries to apply. Come join us, and find out what the best work of your career could look like here at Seamless.

Disclaimer: This is a full-time position that ideally would be located in our Columbus, Ohio office but for the right candidate we would be open to full US remote. We are open to assisting with relocation and willing to discuss for some positions. Visa Sponsorship is not included in our hiring package. Applicants will need to be authorized to work in the US.

We are an equal opportunity employer and value diversity at our company. We do not discriminate on the basis of race, religion, color, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, age, marital status, veteran status, or disability status.

No Recruiters. This is an internal position our internal team is hiring for.

PI124278182",4.9,"Seamless AI
4.9","Columbus, OH",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2015,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
329,Software Engineer - Machine Learning,-1,"Lightmatter builds chips for artificial intelligence computing. Our architecture leverages unique properties of light to enable fast and efficient inference and training engines. If you're a collaborative engineer or scientist who has a passion for innovation, solving challenging technical problems and doing impactful work...work like building the world's first optical computers, consider joining the team at Lightmatter!
Job Description
Work closely with a Machine Learning Scientist to build state-of-the-art and novel machine learning algorithms that learn semantics of data (images, video, text, audio, and other modalities).
Understand and analyze the interplay between machine learning accelerator software and hardware.
Develop and maintain code repositories for training and visualizing neural network models.
Key Qualifications
Masters or PhD in computer science, physics, mathematics, or any related field.
>3 years experience in software engineering or a machine learning related field (preferred).
Highly proficient in scientific object-oriented programming languages, e.g. Python, Julia, C++, with good code hygiene.
Solid understanding of artificial intelligence, machine learning, and neural networks.
Experience in machine learning and deep learning programming languages and framework, e.g. Tensorflow, PyTorch, Caffe, Keras.",4.7,"Lightmatter
4.7","Boston, MA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
330,Data Engineer,$59k-$105k (Glassdoor Est.),"Do you want to get a foot in the door at an online Advertising and Media company that has seen tremendous growth? Do you want to work in the world of online video; one of the fastest growing advertising formats in the world? Then Playwire is the place for you…

Playwire Media is a full-service digital innovation partner that leverages online advertising and proprietary technologies to build publishing brands in the gaming and entertainment verticals.

To keep pace with our explosive growth, we are currently seeking a data engineer to extend our data collection, warehousing, and analysis capabilities. You’ll use your skills to facilitate objectives ranging from simple data pipelining and summarization for use in internal dashboards, to supporting our prediction initiatives by collecting and transforming data from a variety of sources and then crafting prediction algorithms to run at scale. As such, you’ll need to bring a variety of skills to bear, from pipelining to ETL to algorithmic manipulation of data.
Playwire’s services are responsible for delivering millions of ads daily to sites and apps that depend on our technology and expertise for their ad revenue. Data is central to our latest advances in this regard; if you want to participate in the early expansion of our data-related capabilities, and thrive in a fast-paced, rapid-development environment, then talk to us.
This position requires full-time employment; availability at our main office in Boca Raton, FL is preferred, but remote work is a possibility.

Essential functions:
Architect and maintain data pipelines, data lakes, and databases, both independently and as part of a data engineering team.
Work with the development team to support data-centric applications.
Design and deploy algorithms best suited for Playwire’s optimization and prediction needs.
Integrate data from external sources, gathered both via API and from email-based reports.
Identify bottlenecks and bugs, and devise solutions to these problems.
Help maintain data-related code and service quality, organization, and reliability.
Required qualifications:
Experience with Amazon AWS’s data-related services.
Knowledge of common data design patterns.
Experience with data pipelining.
Experience with ETL.
Experience using APIs to access data.
Knowledge of business intelligence tools, and the relationship between data and BI-type instrumentation.
An understanding of source control, particularly git and Github.
Comfort with big data principles and management.
Nice-to-haves:
Experience with digital ad servers, SSPs, or ad exchanges.
Experience with Amazon AWS, particularly RDS and S3.
Proficiency with one or more coding languages; Ruby, Go, and Javascript are all plusses.
Knowledge of machine learning principles and technologies.
Experience with digital advertising units, terminology and standards.
Experience working in a team using Agile development and project management practices.
A basic knowledge of CDNs and the role they fill, including edge computing capabilities.
Job Type: Full-time
Benefits:
401(k)
Dental insurance
Health insurance
Paid time off
Vision insurance
Schedule:
8 hour shift
Company's website:
https://www.playwire.com/
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",3.3,"Playwire Media
3.3","Boca Raton, FL",-1,51 to 200 Employees,-1,Company - Private,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
331,Lead Data Engineer,$126k-$209k (Glassdoor Est.),"Locations: VA - McLean, United States of America, McLean, Virginia

Lead Data Engineer

Do you love building and pioneering in the technology space? Do you enjoy solving complex business problems in a fast-paced, collaborative,inclusive, and iterative delivery environment? At Capital One, you'll be part of a big group of makers, breakers, doers and disruptors, who love to solve real problems and meet real customer needs.

We are seeking Data Engineers who will be a part of a team that’s building new analytical and machine learning tools and frameworks to exploit advantages in the latest developments in cloud computing. As aCapital One Data Engineer, you’ll have the opportunity to be on the forefront of driving a major transformation within Capital One. Learn more about#lifeatcapitalone and our commitment todiversity & inclusion by jumping to slides 76-91 on our Corporate Social Responsibility Report.

What You’ll Do:

Collaborate with and across Agile teams to design, develop, test, implement, and support technical solutions in full-stack development tools and technologies

Work with a team of developers with deep experience in machine learning, distributed microservices, and full stack systems

Utilize programming languages like Java, Scala, Python and Open Source RDBMS and NoSQL databases and Cloud based data warehousing services such as Snowflake

Share your passion for staying on top of tech trends, experimenting with and learning new technologies, participating in internal & external technology communities, and mentoring other members of the engineering community

Collaborate with digital product managers, and deliver robust cloud-based solutions that drive powerful experiences to help millions of Americans achieve financial empowerment

Perform unit tests and conducting reviews with other team members to make sure your code is rigorously designed, elegantly coded, and effectively tuned for performance

Basic Qualifications:

Bachelor’s Degree

At least 6 years of experience in application development

At least 2 years of experience in big data technologies (Cassandra, Accumulo, HBase, Spark, Hadoop, HDFS, AVRO, MongoDB, or Zookeeper)

Preferred Qualifications:

Master's Degree

8+ years of experience in application development

3+ year experience working on streaming data applications (Spark Streaming, Kafka, Kinesis, and Flink

1+ years of experience with Amazon Web Services (AWS), Microsoft Azure or another public cloud service

2+ years of experience with Ansible / Terraform

3+ years of experience with Agile engineering practices

3+ years in-depth experience with the Hadoop stack (MapReduce, Pig, Hive, Hbase)

3+ years of experience with NoSQL implementation (Mongo, Cassandra)

3+ years of experience developing Java based software solutions

5+ years of experience in at least one scripting language (Python, Perl, JavaScript, Shell)

5+ years of experience developing software solutions to solve complex business problems

3+ years of experience with UNIX/Linux including basic commands and shell scripting

Capital One will consider sponsoring a new qualified applicant for employment authorization for this position.",4.0,"Capital One
4.0","Richmond, VA",-1,10000+ Employees,1994,Company - Public,Banks & Credit Unions,Finance,$10+ billion (USD),-1
332,Coatings Process and Metrology Engineer,$50k-$93k (Glassdoor Est.),"Introduction

ASML US, including its affiliates and subsidiaries, bring together the most creative minds in science and technology to develop lithography machines that are key to producing faster, cheaper, more energy-efficient microchips. We design, develop, integrate, market and service these advanced machines, which enable our customers - the world’s leading chipmakers - to reduce the size and increase the functionality of their microchips, which in turn leads to smaller, more powerful consumer electronics. Our headquarters are in Veldhoven, Netherlands, and we have 18 office locations around the United States including main offices in Chandler, Arizona, San Jose and San Diego, California, Wilton, Connecticut, and Hillsboro, Oregon.

Job Mission

ASML is seeking an experienced material scientist/ process engineer with expertise in development of glass and ceramics processes to produce ultra-high precision systems. This person will join the Advanced Development Center in Wilton, Connecticut - A Research and development team focused on proto-typing of next generation wafer/reticle clamping systems. In this role you will help to develop new wafer table prototypes and processes utilizing PECVD / CVD coating, patterning, cleaning, polishing and etching systems and processes. These new prototypes and associated processes will be used to extend / improve capability and to solve challenging engineering problems associated with achieving nanometer scale precision.

This position may require access to controlled technology, as defined in the Export Administration Regulations (15 C.F.R. § 730, et seq.). Qualified candidates must be legally authorized to access such controlled technology prior to beginning work. Business demands may require the Company to proceed with candidates who are immediately eligible to access controlled technology.

Job Description

Without direct supervision you will prepare wafer table samples and prototypes for process development using a variety of process and metrology equipment. Troubleshooting and quick decision making are pre-requisites for this position. In this role you will :

Set-up and operate process equipment such as PECVD/CVD coating, cleaning and etching equipment for engineering experiments and process development.
Solve any engineering challenges that we encounter related to chemical and material aspects of design and manufacturing process of optical and ceramic substrates to achievethe precision and life time performanceat sub-nanometer scale.
Investigate, material and chemical issues in manufacturing process like bonding, gluing, coating and etching process.
Investigate material issues / challenges using appropriate material diagnostic toolslike SEM , AFM , WLI etc
Perform flatness, roughness and other metrology measurements using WLI, Interferometers and AFM.
Prepare engineer documentation such as Element Performance Specifications, Element Design Specifications, Test.
Performance Specification; Test Analysis Reports and release the documents by following change control processes.
Write engineering procedure and train technicians to efficiently transfer the build/ alignment & test process to manufacturing.
Effectively utilize various computer systems and applications to operate process equipment, collect and analyze data, use document control and logistics systems, prepare and give presentations.
Understanding and link the performance of the process effects to the performance of ASMLs systems in field.
Clearly communicate progress and status of ongoing technical activities to the team, project management and senior management.
Education

Minimum: BS with at least 2-4 years of industry experience in Material Sciences, Chemistry or other equivalent engineering disciplines or equivalent experience.

Preferred: BS with 5+ years of industry experience in Material Sciences, Chemistry or other equivalent engineering disciplines.

Experience
Experience working with various coating deposition equipment (e.g., Sputter, E-beam, ALD, PECVD etc.) preferred.
Experience using etching equipment like Reactive Ion Etch, wet etch and acid etching.
Hands on patterning or lithography and cleaning experience.
Knowledge of material and mechanical properties of coatings, ceramic structure and glasses.
Practical knowledge of MATLAB and/or LabVIEW for data collection and analysis to drive solutions.
Ability to work in the clean room environment knowledge in material and material interaction (especially glass, ceramics, thin film materials, gases, etc.); with understanding of the fundamentals of friction and wear processes of metallic, ceramic, and polymeric materials.
Generalunderstanding of optics and ceramic manufacturing methods beneficialincluding a basic understanding of manufacturing process optimization.
Goodunderstanding and experience in verification methods (white light interferometer,microscope, SEM, AFM, TOF-SIMS, XPS etc.) a plus.
Excellent analytical and experimental skills.
Personal skills

Candidate must:

Have excellent written and oral communication skills and a commitment to achieving results on time while under time constraints;High energy, high ownership, high level of dedication.
Be willing to jump in on new issues, get to the bottom of the causes and propose practical solutions.
Be able to break down complex problems with limited data to come to solutions – strong critical thinking capability.
Have demonstrated “team player” with a quality orientation and interpersonal skills.
Beable to interface with multidisciplinary groups and work effectively in ateam and be willing to take on responsibility.
Beable to quickly acquire technical knowledge from documentation andon-the-job training and be capable of thoroughly investigating technicalissues (analytically and hands-on in a lab).
Can observe and respond to people and situations and interact with others encountered in the course of work.
Can learn and apply new information or skills.
Must be able to read and interpret data, information, and documents.
Strong customer focus and commitment to customer satisfaction through prioritization, quality, efficiency and professionalism.
Ability to complete assignments with attention to detail and high degree of accuracy.
Proven ability to perform effectively in a demanding environment with changing workloads and deadlines.
Result driven-demonstrate ownership and accountability.
Identifies bottlenecks and drives improvements.
Work independently or as part of a team and follow through on assignments with minimal supervision.
Demonstrate open, clear, concise and professional communication.
Ability to establish and maintain cooperative working relationships with manager, co-workers and customer.
Work according to a strict set of procedures within the provided timelines.
Other information

The Advanced development center in ASML Wilton, Connecticut is seeking a process engineer with expertise in manufacturing processes of glass and ceramics. This R&D center in Wilton, Connecticut is a multi-disciplinary group of engineers and scientistsfocused on developing learning loop solutions, proto-typing of next generation wafer/reticle clamping systems and industrialization of proto-types that meet the system performance requirements.

Role within Office
Responsibilities:

Routinely required to sit; walk; talk; hear; use hands to keyboard, finger, handle, and feel; stoop, kneel, crouch, twist, reach, and stretch. Occasionally required to move around the campus.
Occasionally lift and/or move up to 20 pounds.
May require travel dependent on business needs.
Specific vision abilities required by this job include close vision, color vision, peripheral vision, depth perception, and ability to adjust focus.

EOE AA M/F/Veteran/Disability

Internal Reference: #LI-KG1",3.9,"ASML
3.9","Wilton, CT",-1,10000+ Employees,1984,Company - Public,Electrical & Electronic Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$5 to $10 billion (USD),-1
333,Software Development Engineer- Machine Learning,$107k-$168k (Glassdoor Est.),"Basic Qualifications:
· Have experience in building highly concurrent distributed systems for online services at scale
· 6+ years of work experience in software development
· Have project Lead experience
· Have knowledge of Object-Oriented Design, data structures, algorithm design, and complexity analysis
· Have strong proficiency in, at least, one modern programming language such as C, C++, C#, Java, Python, Scala or Perl
· Bachelor’s Degree or higher in Computer Science or related field
· Experience mentoring junior engineers

The Items and Offers platform (IOP) manages the global catalog at at the heart of the systems that support the world's largest e-Commerce platform. We serve as the gateway for the millions of merchants that offer the earth's largest selection of products to Amazon customers, at a rate of hundreds of billions of updates on billions of catalog items every single day.

The relationships between catalog items are a first class architectural concern at Amazon, which the Items and Offers Platform Relationships team in NYC have ownership of.

The Catalog Relationship team is working to innovate in the space of inferring, managing, and presenting relationships between items in the catalog to drive better product discovery and customer experience while navigating Amazon's large and ever-growing catalog. Work in this space ranges from building high performance large scale distributed real-time systems, data modeling to capture new relationship structures, machine-learning based inference systems, and experiment frameworks that enable continuous measurement, feedback and improvement.

As a Software Development Engineer- Machine Learning of this team, you will
· Build and own systems, services and tools for inference, automation and maintenance of catalog relationships.
· Translate high-level, ambiguous business goals into technical specifications and break down the technical specifications into concrete tasks.
· Partner with Applied Scientists and Machine Learning community to built highly scalable machine learning solutions for inferring and maintaining catalog relationships.
· Automate the ML model development life-cycle and accelerate the development, testing and deployment of ML models to production.
· Write a high quality distributed system software that harnesses the power of Machine Learning to make inference decisions.
· Be a technical partner for the leadership and guide their business and technical decisions.

Technologies used:
· AWS (i.e. SageMaker, Glue, SQS, Kinesis, EMR, Lambda etc.)
· Spark/Hadoop (big data)
· RDS and DynamoDB
· Machine Learning(SparkML, TensorFlow, Keras, Deep Learning)
· Jupyter and Zeppelin (ML notebooks)
· Java, Scala, Python, React.JS
· Distributed Real-Time Streaming Systems
· Elastic Computing
· Massively Distributed Systems
Every day we are working hard, having fun and making history - and we would love you to work with us. If you have what we are looking for, come join a strong team in a highly visible organization. Your impact on our software will be felt around the world.

· Experience building complex software systems that have been successfully delivered to customers
· Experience developing service oriented architectures and an understanding of design for scalability, performance and reliability.
· Experience working in ML and Big Data technologies.
· Experience defining system architectures and exploring technical feasibility tradeoffs.
· Knowledge of professional software engineering practices & best practices for the full software development life cycle, including coding standards, code reviews, source control management, build processes, testing, and operations
· Ability to take a project from scoping requirements through actual launch of the project
· Experience in communicating with users, other technical teams, and management to collect requirements, describe software product features, and technical designs.
· Have a strong sense of ownership, urgency and drive
· Be a strong leader with a desire to mentor and lead people

· BA/BS in computer science or equivalent experience
· 3+ years of work experience or relevant experience with a PhD in CS or related field
· 2+ years of work experience building large-scale production ML systems
· Experience with ML libraries/frameworks such as Keras, Tensorflow, AWS Sagemaker
· Experience of Software development in one or more of the general purpose programming languages: C/C++, Go, Python, Java
· Desire and ability to write production quality code

Amazon is an Equal Opportunity Employer.",3.9,"Amazon.com Services LLC
3.9","New York, NY",-1,10000+ Employees,1994,Company - Public,Internet,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),-1
334,Field Service Engineer - Night Shift,$44k-$72k (Glassdoor Est.),"Introduction

ASML US, including its affiliates and subsidiaries, bring together the most creative minds in science and technology to develop lithography machines that are key to producing faster, cheaper, more energy-efficient microchips. We design, develop, integrate, market and service these advanced machines, which enable our customers - the world’s leading chipmakers - to reduce the size and increase the functionality of their microchips, which in turn leads to smaller, more powerful consumer electronics. Our headquarters are in Veldhoven, Netherlands, and we have 18 office locations around the United States including main offices in Chandler, Arizona, San Jose and San Diego, California, Wilton, Connecticut, and Hillsboro, Oregon.

Job Mission

This role is on the Cymer (CLS) DUV division of ASML. The Field Service Engineer provides onsite field service support through the performance of installations, upgrades, repairs, and maintenance of complex capital equipment and systems.Troubleshoots either to resolve issues directly or through referring advanced issues to technical support resources.Acts as a customer service advocate, instructing customers in the operation and maintenance of the system.

This is a night shift position, 6pm to 6am, 3 – 4 – 4 – 3 compressed work week.Must be flexible to train during day shift for 3 – 6 months after scheduled new hire laser training.

This position may require access to controlled technology, as defined in the Export Administration Regulations (15 C.F.R. § 730, et seq.). Qualified candidates must be legally authorized to access such controlled technology prior to beginning work. Business demands may require the Company to proceed with candidates who are immediately eligible to access controlled technology.

Job Description
Analyzes, diagnoses, and troubleshoots Cymer equipment problems via telephone or at customer site.
Performs installation, repair, retrofits, upgrades and preventive maintenance on Cymer equipment installed at customer sites.
Maintains an assigned installation equipment base.This includes providing primary support, forecasting, conducting customer support meetings, and ensuring regular communication with the customer.
Assists customers in the receipt, installation, and testing of company equipment.
Conducts equipment troubleshooting, analysis, and debugging in support of installation or operating activities.
May provide service education to customer’s service and operations staff.
Ensures that parts are available and as specified for service requirements.
Maintains appropriate tools are on hand and as required.
Travels as required for the purposes of performing service activities at customer sites or backfilling for other Cymer Field Service Engineers.
Completes service, expense reports, and other administrative responsibilities in accordance with Cymer’s procedures and with supervisor’s approval.
Uses company technical documentation and provides feedback for improvement.
Performs other duties as assigned.
Education
High school diploma or equivalent.
Associates Degree or higher preferred or similar Military / vocational experiences.
Experience
Minimum of two (2) years of field service engineering experience required or relevant work related experience is required.
Minimum of one (1) year experience in optics, laser, and/or semiconductor manufacturing equipment experience is preferred.
Laser and vacuum experience preferred.
Has led one installation or significantly contributed to the successful installation of products at multiple sites.
Ability to analyze data and report problems, to complete accurate, comprehensive service reports, and to communicate technical issues to other technical staff.
Ability to collect, translate, and analyze data.
Intermediate level of technical knowledge of electronics.
Excellent customer service skills, with a solid foundation in and an understanding of the importance of relationship building.
Ability to facilitate resolution of technical challenges.
Ability to apply advanced knowledge of installation, maintenance/repair, and troubleshooting at both the module and system level, while seeking expertise of more senior field service engineers where required.
Ability to read and analyze opto-mechanical and electronic schematics.
Protocol, and Computer Networking.
Effective communication, perseverance, problem solving, customer support focus and team oriented.
Must be able to successfully meet customer site access requirements such as: background checks, safety training, and cleanroom access (gowning and breathing apparatus).
Excellent written and verbal communications skills.
Requires experience using the following software packages: MS Word, Excel, PowerPoint, and electronic e-mail systems, LabView, Internet.
For regions - oral and written English language skills preferred.
Context of the position
Onsite field service support, troubleshooting and resolving issues.Customer support advocate, guiding customers in operation and maintenance of the system.
Other information

The physical demands described here are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of this job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.

While performing the duties of this job, the employee routinely is required to sit; walk; talk; hear; use hands to keyboard, finger, handle, and feel; stoop, kneel, crouch, twist, reach, and stretch.
The employee is occasionally required to move around the campus.
The employee may occasionally lift and/or move up to 50 pounds.
May require travel dependent on business needs.
Specific vision abilities required by this job include close vision, color vision, peripheral vision, depth perception, and ability to adjust focus.
Can work under deadlines.
The environment generally is moderate in temperature and noise level.
Must be able to read and interpret data, information, and documents.
Can observe and respond to people and situations and interact with others encountered in the course of work.
Can learn and apply new information or skills.
Responsibilities include periodic travel to regional and overseas sites for product technical support and special support projects.
Work may include onsite technical support involving heavy lifting of equipment & modules.
Position will require technical work activity in a clean-room production environment and/or laboratory setting.
The environment generally is moderate in temperature and noise level.
Occasionally may be exposed to loud noise bursts and may be exposed to toxic gases (fluorine).
Must be able to work in small, confined spaces.

We offer competitive salaries and benefits including medical, dental, vision, 401(K), and FSAs. We are committed to leveraging the diverse backgrounds, perspectives, and experiences of our workforce to create opportunities for our people and the business.

EOE AA M/F/Veteran/Disability",3.9,"ASML
3.9","Chandler, AZ",-1,10000+ Employees,1984,Company - Public,Electrical & Electronic Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$5 to $10 billion (USD),-1
335,Premium Support Engineer (US Remote),$67k-$121k (Glassdoor Est.),"Company Description

Dear trailblazers, forward-thinkers, and doers - We want you.

DataStax is the company behind the massively scalable, highly available, cloud-native NoSQL platform built on Apache Cassandra. Every day, we're fulfilling our mission to connect every developer in the world to the power of Apache Cassandra, with the freedom to run data on any device and in any cloud.

We subscribe to a set of principles that guide how we collaboratively work together. We inspire each other with our values, obsessing over users and enterprises, taking action and focusing on results, innovating in technology, products, and everything we do, and defining success as the team winning.

We foster a diverse working environment that is respectful, generates new ideas, promotes ownership, and encourages highly motivated individuals to shape tomorrow. These form the foundation of DataStax's culture and help drive our decisions.

We are looking for a customer focussed, team player who is passionate about enabling customer success. As a Premium Engineer drawing upon your deep technical expertise of both traditional RDBMS and open source technologies, you will listen, guide and enable your customers in their usage of DataStax software. As well as having technical expertise, the Premium Engineer will have the ability to interact with both technical and non-technical audiences at all levels within our customers organizations.
Job Description

What you will do:
Serve as case manager for customers subscribed to the Premium program
Provide empirical-based guidance to allow your customers to make informed decisions for the long-term health of their distributed solutions leveraging DataStax software. Initiate and recommend consulting, training and on-site visits supporting customers needs and expectations
Provide oversight and guidance to the Worldwide Support Team working with your customers
Internal and external quarterback on Premium customer escalations. Ensure issues have the appropriate focus and are resolved as expediently as possible
Leverage strong triaging skills to reproduce, troubleshoot and solve highly challenging technical issues
Act as your customers advocate internally within Sales, Support, Product Management and Engineering
Proactive operational enablement and mentorship to your customers through an instructional approach
Your experience should include:
BA / BS / MS in Computer Science, or equivalent
7+ years in an application development or database administrative role
5+ years of experience with traditional RDBMS or NoSQL databases including data modeling, performance tuning and configuration
2+ years of experience with Apache Cassandra or DataStax Enterprise
5+ years of experience administering, configuring, or delivering solutions on Linux
3+ years of experience in a customer-facing support, application development, or consulting role
Experience with Java Virtual Machine (JVM) tuning and troubleshooting preferred
Experience with Apache Cassandra or DataStax Enterprise preferred
Experience with SOLR and Spark preferred
Experience with Java or Python preferred
Good knowledge of datacenter architecture and infrastructure, particularly multi-datacenter and global deployments in both on-prem and cloud environments
Ability to learn new technology quickly
Strong communication and presentation skills with an ability to present complex solutions concisely
Creative and adaptive approach with an ability to remove obstacles and accelerate customer health
Organized and analytical, able to thrive under pressure
Calm, composed and articulate when dealing with challenging situations
Autonomous and self-motivated
Ability to travel up to 5% of the time is required",3.8,"DataStax
3.8","Santa Clara, CA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2010,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
336,Senior Mechanical Design Engineer/Architect,$74k-$156k (Glassdoor Est.),"Introduction

ASML US, including its affiliates and subsidiaries, bring together the most creative minds in science and technology to develop lithography machines that are key to producing faster, cheaper, more energy-efficient microchips. We design, develop, integrate, market and service these advanced machines, which enable our customers - the world’s leading chipmakers - to reduce the size and increase the functionality of their microchips, which in turn leads to smaller, more powerful consumer electronics. Our headquarters are in Veldhoven, Netherlands, and we have 18 office locations around the United States including main offices in Chandler, Arizona, San Jose and San Diego, California, Wilton, Connecticut, and Hillsboro, Oregon.

Job Mission

Founded in 1984, ASML is the world’s leading provider of lithography systems for the semiconductor industry, manufacturing complex machines that are critical to the production of integrated circuits or microchips.ASML has its R&D and manufacturing operations in Wilton, CT and in Veldhoven, The Netherlands.This position will be based in Wilton.We are looking for a talented Mechanical Engineer to join the Development and Engineering department.You will design and develop mechanics for some of the highest precision products ever produced in the world.

This position requires access to controlled technology, as defined in the Export Administration Regulations (15 C.F.R. § 730, et seq.). Qualified candidates must be legally authorized to access such controlled technology prior to beginning work. Business demands may require ASML to proceed with applicants who are immediately eligible to access controlled technology.

Job Description

As a Senior Mechanical Design Engineer/Architect, you will be responsible for the development of portions of the lithography system and/or associated tooling.You will work on sub-systems involving robotics, mechatronics, precision mechanics, and/or opto-mechanics.You will need to consider kinematics, dynamics, material properties, and structural, dynamic, and thermal analysis.Precision machine design at ASML starts with understanding the functional requirements and deriving specifications.

You will provide the technical leadership and engineering foundation to produce high quality mechanical product designs that meet module-level mechanical specifications and volume constraints, negotiated as needed with the Functional Cluster or Module Architect.You will ensure the design Is optimized for trouble-free product life-cycle within the ASML design release, procurement, manufacturing, transportation, operation and customer service environments, and is achievable within schedule and cost constraints, negotiated as needed with the Project Leader.

Education

BSME / MSME / PhD or equivalent experience.

Experience

We are seeking an individual with a strong background in mechanical design and engineering, including taking responsibility of the full “art to part” development cycle. A background in mechanical design of mechatronics, precision design, or complex optical systems is required, as well as good complex mechanical system intuition.
7+ years’ experience in complex mechanical design environment.
Mechanical design experience in kinematics, dynamics, material properties and behavior, and structural analysis.
Solid working knowledge of mechanical analytical techniques, including “first principle” engineering equations and Finite Element Analysis such as stress / strain / deformation, modal response, etc.
Demonstrated ability to derive conclusions from analysis and make practical recommendations.
Strong technical writing, communication, and presentation skills with a capability for mentoring, coaching, and negotiation.
Personal skills
Capability to interface with multidisciplinary groups including senior leadership.
High energy self-motivated team player with strong desire to learn.
Customer oriented and willing to work with high level problem solvers on a daily basis.
Possess strong leadership and ownership characteristics with commitment to achieve results on time.
Potential to develop into a technical leader in the organization.
Can observe and respond to people and situations and interact with others encountered in the course of work.
Can learn and apply new information or skills.
Must be able to read and interpret data, information, and documents.
Strong customer focus and commitment to customer satisfaction through prioritization, quality, efficiency and professionalism.
Ability to complete assignments with attention to detail and high degree of accuracy.
Proven ability to perform effectively in a demanding environment with changing workloads and deadlines.
Result driven-demonstrate ownership and accountability.
Identifies bottlenecks and drives improvements.
Work independently or as part of a team and follow through on assignments with minimal supervision.
Demonstrate open, clear, concise and professional communication.
Ability to establish and maintain cooperative working relationships with manager, co-workers and customer.
Work according to a strict set of procedures within the provided timelines.
Other information

Role within Office

Responsibilities:

Routinely required to sit; walk; talk; hear; use hands to keyboard, finger, handle, and feel; stoop, kneel, crouch, twist, reach, and stretch. Occasionally required to move around the campus.
Occasionally lift and/or move up to 20 pounds.
May require travel dependent on business needs.
Specific vision abilities required by this job include close vision, color vision, peripheral vision, depth perception, and ability to adjust focus.

EOE AA M/F/Veteran/Disability",3.9,"ASML
3.9","Wilton, CT",-1,10000+ Employees,1984,Company - Public,Electrical & Electronic Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$5 to $10 billion (USD),-1
337,Spacecraft Machine Learning Engineer,$86k-$146k (Glassdoor Est.),"Spire Global is a space-to-cloud analytics company that owns and operates the largest multi-purpose constellation of satellites. Its proprietary data and algorithms provide the most advanced maritime, aviation, and weather tracking in the world. In addition to its constellation, Spire's data infrastructure includes a global ground station network and 24/7 operations that provide real-time global coverage of every point on Earth. The Role As part of the drive to better serve our customers and deliver higher volumes of more insightful, lower-latency data, Spire is continuously increasing the level of spacecraft autonomy and on-board processing of raw data. Spire has been launching various high-performance computing devices to enable this. This role will contribute to the development and implementation of machine learning models to run on these computing devices for a variety of applications, including data size reduction, RF signal detection and pattern recognition, image processing, autonomous operations, telemetry analysis etc. As an engineer at Spire, you'll move fast, iterate quickly, and solve global problems. You might be the right fit if you love exciting technical challenges, hate getting bored, and enjoy collaborating with engineers who are changing the way the world thinks about space, satellites, and data. Responsibilities of your role: Applying machine learning techniques to develop and evaluate models to improve the performance of satellite subsystems in various application areas (e.g. software defined radio, image processing, telemetry analysis, data size reduction) Contributing to the implementation of models on target computing hardware Integrating and improving 3rd party machine learning models Validating the on-orbit performance of the models and related subsystems and providing support to the operations of your systems Representing your work to internal and external reviewers and customers Basic Qualifications: 5+ years of work experience Experience and aptitude in developing hypotheses and machine learning solutions for problems interacting with physical systems (e.g. large noisy existing datasets, data collected directly from hardware platforms, sensor systems, imaging systems etc.) Experience with machine learning techniques as implemented on target hardware (e.g. ARM Linux systems, Xilinx FPGAs, Nvidia Jetson platforms, TPUs/VPUs). Knowledge of a variety of deep learning architectures like CNN, RNN/LSTM etc. Experience with common analysis tools available in Python (such as NumPy and scikit-learn) and deep learning frameworks (such as TensorFlow, PyTorch and Keras) with the ability to apply these frameworks towards real-world problems Degree or equivalent background in quantitative statistics, computer science, math or other technical fields Preferred Qualifications: Demonstrated working experience applying machine learning techniques and advanced data science techniques to problems Experience with machine learning algorithms specifically targeted for digital signal processing, Earth Observation or other geospatial products Familiarity with heterogeneous programming (CUDA, OpenCL) Experience developing software using a compiled language (such as C or /Python/Rust) Basic real-time programming/software design and development. Basic understanding of communications theory, digital radio communications, signal processing and signal property inference Basic understanding of computer vision, image processing and machine-learning based image classification Experience in a high-reliability industry (Automotive, Aerospace, Defense, Medical) or an embedded industry (e.g. IoT, Mobile Phones, Distributed Sensor Networks, Industrial Automation etc.) Experience working with geospatial datasets Experience in debugging complex software issues Spire is Global and our success draws upon the diverse viewpoints, skills and experiences of our employees. We are proud to be an equal opportunity employer and are committed to equal employment opportunity regardless of race, color, ancestry, religion, sex, national origin, sexual orientation, age, marital status, disability, gender identity or veteran status. #LI-SH1",3.5,"Spire
3.5","San Francisco, CA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1857,Company - Public,Oil & Gas Services,"Oil, Gas, Energy & Utilities",$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
338,"Engineer, Machine Learning",$63k-$114k (Glassdoor Est.),"Business Unit:
Comcast brings together the best in media and technology. We drive innovation to create the world’s best entertainment and online experiences. As a Fortune 40 leader, we set the pace in a variety of innovative and fascinating businesses and create career opportunities across a wide range of locations and disciplines. We are at the forefront of change and move at an amazing pace, thanks to our remarkable people, who bring cutting-edge products and services to life for millions of customers every day. If you share in our passion for teamwork, our vision to revolutionize industries and our goal to lead the future in media and technology, we want you to fast-forward your career at Comcast.
Job Summary:

In the Personalization team, we work on cutting-edge research in AI and machine learning to re-invent the customer experience. Using the large amount of data available to us, we build machine learning models that can help our customers find the content they love.

We are looking for a machine learning expert to join our personalization team. In this role, you will be working on machine learning models for recommendation, personalization, and ranking. You will have the opportunity to tackle exciting problems such as: how to balance exploration and exploitation in recommendation systems. How to address fairness and bias in recommendation systems. How to use different modalities of data to improve the recommendation models. How can reinforcement learning be used in recommendation systems to optimize long-term engagement metrics.

Employees at all levels are expected to:

Understand our Operating Principles; make them the guidelines for how you do your job
Own the customer experience - think and act in ways that put our customers first, give them seamless digital options at every touchpoint, and make them promoters of our products and services
Know your stuff - be enthusiastic learners, users and advocates of our game-changing technology, products and services, especially our digital tools and experiences
Win as a team - make big things happen by working together and being open to new ideas
Be an active part of the Net Promoter System - a way of working that brings more employee and customer feedback into the company - by joining huddles, making call backs and helping us elevate opportunities to do better for our customers
Drive results and growth
Respect and promote inclusion and diversity
Do what's right for each other, our customers, investors and our communities
Core Responsibilities:

Participate in groundbreaking research that has impact on our products and customers.
Apply your machine learning expertise to train models, validate the accuracy of those models, and deploy the validated models into production.
Contribute to the company by creating patents, Application Programming Interfaces (APIs) and other intellectual property.
Publishing scientific papers and giving external talks is encouraged.
Provides guidance and leadership to more junior engineers
Consistent exercise of independent judgment and discretion in matters of significance.
Regular, consistent and punctual attendance. Must be able to work nights and weekends, variable schedule(s) as necessary.
Other duties and responsibilities as assigned.
Job Specification:

Bachelor’s Degree
Computer Science, Engineering, Applied Mathematics, or Statistics
Generally requires 5-8 years related experience.
Nice to have:

PhD/MS in Computer Science, Computer Engineering or related technical field.
Strong background in machine learning.
Experience with recommendation systems is a plus, but not required.
Strong coding and software development skills.
Experience with at least one of the Deep Learning frameworks such as TensorFlow or PyTorch is preferred.

Comcast is an EOE/Veterans/Disabled/LGBT employer",3.7,"Comcast
3.7","Washington, DC",-1,10000+ Employees,1963,Company - Public,-1,-1,$10+ billion (USD),-1
339,"Machine Learning Engineer, Computational Chemistry",-1,"Orionis Biosciences is looking for a machine learning engineer to join our transatlantic, interdisciplinary research team and help advance our science, technology and drug discovery & development efforts. This position is based at our headquarters overlooking the Cambridge reservoir in Waltham, MA.

The integrated nature of our discovery approaches, and operating culture, requires uncompromised and well-organized teamwork between talented individuals with diverse skill sets. This applies to all positions across the company. You will be challenged to apply your individual skill sets in team settings to advance project objectives in a most efficient manner possible, and to effectively problem solve - while in the process having the opportunity to expanding your own skill sets, knowledge base, personal growth and career.

The main focus and responsibility of this position is to help advance the company’s numerical techniques and support the drug discovery and development projects and pipeline.

General responsibilities include:
Create and improve novel computational methods to support multivariate, genome-wide drug discovery, optimization, and development projects
Create and improve novel molecular descriptors integrating proprietary Orionis data, QM electronic structure calculations and other state-of-the-art cheminformatics toolboxes
Applying machine learning algorithms to the company internal programs and enabling colleagues to leverage these models in their operations
Communicating data analysis and modeling results to other team members
Requirements
PhD in Machine Learning, Computational Chemistry, Computer Science, Physics or other numerate discipline
3+ years of industry experience, or post-doctoral training, with hands-on analysis of OMICS data, especially genomics, transcriptomics and proteomics
Specific skill sets we are looking for in applicants include several among the following:
Strong knowledge of common classification and regression algorithms and techniques and modern neural network, with deep understanding of their statistical interpretation and limitations
Advanced knowledge of state-of-the-art chemo-informatic techniques, data formats and computational methods applied to chemistry and small-molecule/protein modeling
A plus is knowledge of QM/QC computational tools for electronic structure calculations
Advanced knowledge of Python and packages for machine learning and NN (statsmodels, scikit-learn, Tensorflow or Torch) and generally comfort with modern software development practices (git, Docker, etc)
Passion for drug design/development, personal projects accessible in Github/Gitlab are welcome in the application
Exceptional analytical and statistical skills, with passion for scientific rigor and healthy skepticism",-1,Orionis Biosciences,"Waltham, MA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
340,Data Scientist,Employer Provided Salary:$80k-$120k,"About ClearCut Analytics
ClearCut was founded in Chicago with the mission of revolutionizing strategic decision-making by the world's leading brands through data-powered business intelligence. With a focus on the Amazon marketplace, ClearCut provides a vast array of sales analytics to equip brands with the information they need to maximize their value.


Data Scientist Job Description
ClearCut Analytics is looking for an innovative, solutions-oriented Data Scientist to join our fast-paced company and growing Analytics & Product Development team. The Data Scientist will play a key role in our company’s growth through building a highly scalable infrastructure that allows our team to develop data-driven solutions to solve complex business challenges. The ideal candidate is passionate about technology, loves collaborating to solve a wide variety of challenges and interesting use cases. This role will report to ClearCut’s Chief Technology Officer.
Responsibilities
Helping to build and drive the Data Science and Analytics roadmap
Leveraging data to drive business solutions for clients that are presented through ClearCut’s SaaS platform
Performing data collection, as well as developing custom models and algorithms to apply to data sets
Using predictive modeling to increase and optimize business operations, customer experience, revenue generation, and other business outcomes
Processing, cleansing, and verifying the integrity of data used for modeling and analysis, while enhancing processes and tools used to monitor model performance and input data
Developing machine learning models and productizing AI-based solutions alongside product and development team
Ideating new data-related concepts and applications then overseeing projects through deployment
Taking end-to-end ownership of problem domains and continuously improving upon quantitative solutions
Requirements
MS or Bachelor’s Degree in Mathematics, Statistics, CS/Engineering, or similar field
4+ years of professional experience in an analytics and data science environment utilizing quantitative analytics methodologies, experience in a SaaS or eCommerce environment a plus
Experience writing programs/queries with data analysis tools and languages such as Python, R, SAS, AMPL, SQL, or Alteryx
Hands-on experience with multivariate analytic techniques: linear and logistic regression, decision tree, cluster and factor analysis, time-series forecasting methods, SVM models, and/or neural networks
Understanding of broad business principles and the ability to create solutions for real-world challenges
Ability to thrive in a fast-paced, entrepreneurial environment
Eagerness to learn and grow",4.8,"ClearCut Analytics
4.8","Chicago, IL",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2016,Company - Private,Research & Development,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
341,Staff Data Scientist,$142k-$225k (Glassdoor Est.),"Overview


Intuit is looking for innovative and hands-on Staff Data scientist to join the Intuit AI team.This team embeds artificial intelligence and machine learning into our product portfolio and business to create smarter products, improve anti-fraud and security, and enhance customer care. We aim to save our customers time (""Never enter data""), increase their prosperity by making actionable financial recommendations, and enable them to have complete confidence in our products
What you'll bring
4+ years of industry experience with data science
BS, MS or PhD in Statistics, Mathematics, Computer Science, Economics, Operations Research, or equivalent
4+ years of hands-on expertise with data mining and statistical modeling techniques such as clustering, classification, regression, tree-based methods, neural nets, support vector machines, anomaly detection, and natural language processing
Expertise in modern advanced analytical tools and programming languages such as Python, Scala, Java and/or R.
Efficient in SQL, Hive, SparkSQL, etc.
Comfortable working in a Linux environment
Experience with building end-to-end reusable pipelines from data acquisition to model output delivery
Quick learner, adaptable, with the ability to work independently in a fast-paced environment
Strong oral and written communication skills. Ability to conduct meetings and make professional presentations, and to explain complex concepts and technical material to non-technical users
community

How you will lead
Excellent leadership and communication skills to influence teams and to evangelize data science across the organization
Perform hands-on data analysis and modeling with huge data sets
Apply data mining, NLP, and machine learning (both supervised and unsupervised) to improve relevance and personalization algorithms
Work side-by-side with product managers, software engineers, and designers in designing experiments and minimum viable products
Discover data sources, get access to them, import them, clean them up, and make them model-ready. You need to be willing and able to do your own ETL
Create and refine features from the underlying data. Youll enjoy developing just enough subject matter expertise to have an intuition about what features might make your model perform better, and then youll lather, rinse and repeat
Run regular A/B tests, gather data, perform statistical analysis, draw conclusions on the impact of your optimizations and communicate results to peers and leaders
Explore new design or technology shifts in order to determine how they might connect with the customer benefits we wish to deliver
Communicate key analytic findings within the business and to senior stakeholders
Research, explore, and enable new quantitative techniques and technologies in data science",4.3,"Intuit - Data
4.3","Mountain View, CA",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1983,Company - Public,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$5 to $10 billion (USD),-1
342,Machine Learning Engineer,$119k-$202k (Glassdoor Est.),"Overview

As a Machine Learning Engineer, you will design, develop, and deploy algorithms used to optimize our trading activities at SIG. You will join a team of engineers and researchers that specialize in the application of machine learning techniques, particularly deep learning techniques. Combining cutting-edge research with real industry data, Machine Learning Engineers will build tools that ultimately have impact on the financial markets themselves.

This work will be challenging, fast-paced, and competitive. Whether the application is on time series modeling or natural language understanding, you will work with breakthrough results in deep learning and continually iterate upon new techniques. In addition, success in this role will rely on effective communication across several departments. SIG thrives in the collaboration between our quantitative researchers, developers and traders, and our Machine Learning team is no exception.

What we're looking for

Graduating PhD students or postdoctoral researchers in Machine Learning, Computer Science, Statistics, Physics, Applied Mathematics, or related field
Strong programming skills in Python and/or C++
Experience in writing production-level code
Solid, analytical problem-solving skills
Exceptional communication skills, both in the ability to understand others and to make yourself clearly understood
Demonstrated experience working with and drawing conclusions from large data sets
Visa sponsorship is available for this position

For more information, please contact Emily Selzam at Emily.Selzam@sig.com

We don’t post salary ranges externally so any salary estimate you see listed on a third party website was not provided by SIG and may not be accurate.

SIG is not accepting unsolicited resumes from search firms. All resumes submitted by search firms to any employee at SIG via-email, the Internet or directly without a valid written search agreement will be deemed the sole property of SIG, and no fee will be paid in the event the candidate is hired by SIG.",3.6,"Susquehanna International Group
3.6","Alameda, CA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1987,Company - Private,Stock Exchanges,Finance,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
343,Senior Data Scientist,-1,"Octane is a Fintech company whose mission is to connect people with their passions. The $21B powersports market is fast and fun, but the purchasing process is slow and frustrating. Octane is changing that through automated underwriting, innovative credit products, and financing through our in-house lender Roadrunner Financial. Octane reaches millions of riders through editorial brands like CycleWorld.com and helps consumers buy their favorite vehicles with instant, frictionless financing on Octane.co.

Octane is gaining traction quickly with customers, as evidenced by growth in originations through our platform of more than 3X year-over-year. Octane works with more than 3,500 dealers in the USA, provides financing coverage for most major powersports makes, and offers promotional financing with low rates for 40 OEM brands. Because we're the platform and the lender, we have both high growth and positive unit economics - rare for a fintech. We have raised more than $139M in venture capital from leading investors such as IA Ventures, Valar Ventures, and Contour Venture Partners.

We are seeking a talented data scientist to lead projects related to credit risk analytics and model development. You will be working with a versatile team of data scientists and financial professionals to design and implement models underlying the core functions of Octane's lending business and loan portfolios.

Responsibilities:
Lead and manage the development of machine learning powered predictive models for Octane's real-time credit and technology systems
Continuously drive improvements in Octane's modeling approach and architecture
Design and implement customer-facing experiments that improve our user experience and grow loan originations
Manage and mine large data sets of proprietary and third-party data to draw insights and recommendations for policy and strategy decisions
Implement statistical methods to solve specific business problems utilizing code (Python)
Champion data analytics and help advance our culture of data-driven decision-making
Requirements:
Knowledge of various data science disciplines including descriptive analytics, optimization, probability, hypothesis testing, regression, forecasting and machine learning
Understanding of end-to-end development of machine learning systems, especially feature engineering and feature selection
Experience with both model development and systems integration
Excellent Python and SQL skills and familiarity with AWS
A track record of taking initiative and driving results, and a passion to build, design and transform a young organization
Strong communication skills and experience working across teams
MS in a quantitative field, followed by 3+ years experience or BS in a quantitative field, followed by 5+ years experience
Industry experience within Consumer Credit, FinTech, Financial Services, or similar preferred
Benefits
Robust Health Care Plans (Medical, Dental & Vision)
Up to 5 weeks PTO (self-managed)
Generous Parental Leave
Retirement Plan (401k) with Company contribution
Educational Assistance/Tuition Reimbursement up to $3K/year
Powersports Safety Benefit: reimbursement of up to $500/year for the purchase of any powersports safety equipment
Life Insurance (Basic, Voluntary & AD&D)
Short Term / Long Term Disability & Life insurance
Team Activities (remotely)
Monthly company gift
Octane Lending is an equal opportunity employer committed to providing equal employment opportunity without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, disability, or any other protected status with respect to recruitment, hiring, promotion and other terms and conditions of employment.",4.1,"Octane
4.1","New York, NY",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2014,Company - Private,Lending,Finance,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
344,Machine Learning Engineer - Infrastructure,$127k-$208k (Glassdoor Est.),"#TeamNextdoor


Nextdoor is the neighborhood hub for trusted connections and the exchange of helpful information, goods, and services.

Building connections in the real world is a universal human need. That truth, and the reality that neighborhoods are one of the most important and useful communities in our lives have been guiding principles for Nextdoor. Today, neighbors rely on Nextdoor in neighborhoods around the world in the United States, the United Kingdom, Germany, France, the Netherlands, Italy, Spain, Sweden, Denmark, Australia and Canada, with many more to come.

Meet your Future Neighbors


At Nextdoor, machine learning is starting to transform our product through personalization, driving major impact across different parts of our platform including our newsfeed, our notifications, our advertising, and our local ecosystem. Our machine learning team is lean but hungry to drive even more impact and make Nextdoor the neighborhood hub for local exchange. We are scrappy and believe that ML will be an integral part of making Nextdoor valuable to our members. We also believe that ML should be ethical and encourage healthy habits and interaction. We are looking for great engineers who believe in the power of local community to empower our members to make their communities great places to live.

The Impact You'll Make


You will be part of a scrappy and impactful team building a scalable ML platform in a rapidly changing company. In this role, you will focus on developing the underlying data processing infrastructure to support the ML platform in collecting data, labeling data, and using data to monitor model performance. You will also build infrastructure to train, serve, and monitor ML models. Finally, you will be responsible for building platform-wide model features that the entire company can utilize in building ML models. As a result, you will be laying the foundation for a critical part of Nextdoor's mission.

What You'll Bring to The House
B.S. in Computer Science, Math, Statistics, or a related field.
5+ years of industry/academic experience building ML infrastructure at scale.
Proven engineering skills. Experience writing and maintaining high-quality production code.
Proficient in Python
Bonus Points
Experience using AWS to build data-intensive infrastructure: ECS, Kinesis, S3, Kafka, Spark, Druid, Flink
Experience building platforms around publically available ML platforms like Sagemaker, Kubeflow, MLflow, etc.
Experience serving models using a variety of ML model frameworks like Tensorflow, PyTorch, Sci-kit Learn, etc.
At Nextdoor, we empower our employees to build stronger local communities. To create a platform where all feel welcome, we want our workforce to reflect the diversity of the customers we seek to serve. We encourage everyone interested in our purpose to apply. We do not discriminate on the basis of race, gender, religion, sexual orientation, age, or any other trait that unfairly targets a group of people. In accordance with the San Francisco Fair Chance Ordinance, we always consider qualified applicants with arrest and conviction records.",4.6,"Nextdoor
4.6","San Francisco, CA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2010,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
345,Cybersecurity DevOps Engineer,-1,"ShorePoint is a cybersecurity services firm with a focus on high-profile, high-threat private and public-sector customers who demand experience and proven security models to protect their data. We are seeking a Cybersecurity DevOps Engineer who have experience producing solutions driven by data analysis from complex and high dimensional data sets in the federal market. This is a unique opportunity to shape the growth, development and culture of an exciting and emerging company in the cybersecurity market.

Roles and Responsibilities
Provides engineering support to analyze hardware systems, hardware design, architecture, network design
Developing and building Information Technology solutions, to include installation and configuration of solutions developed through requirements provided by the customer
Actively troubleshoot any issues that arise during testing and production, limiting errors in production and expedite correction of any bugs identified in production
Ability to work through Security requirements prior to deployment of Information Technology solutions
Specifying, documenting and developing new product features, and writing automating scripts
Hands on administration, implementation and configuration of security tools to enhance the risk posture of customer networks. Prepares specifications for hardware by analyzing documented and derived system requirements
Provide Tier 2/3 support for incidents relating to security tools/solutions
Working with customer teams and supporting current tasks and activities
Participation in technical meetings with customers’ technical specialists
Other project and corporate duties as assigned
Required Skills
Possess excellent knowledge of security assessment, vulnerability management and compliance auditing capabilities along with the drive to rapidly learn the newest technologies
Previous experience using R, Matlab, Python Scikit-learn or other statistical modeling packages, with a focus on machine learning; experience with NLP a plus
Previous experience developing production systems for processing large volumes of structured and unstructured data in Java, Python or similar technology stack
Previous experience with Hadoop technology stack (Map reduce, HIVE/PIG, etc)
Excellent verbal and written communication skills
Strong team player, capable of working collaboratively in customer teams
Knowledge of scripting languages such as Java, JavaScript, Perl, Ruby, Python, PHP, Groovy, Bash
Desired Skills
Knowledge of Checkpoint, Palo Alto, Cisco, Fortinet, ForcePoint, F5 Firewall appliances
Cloud Cyber strategy, engineer and deployment experience
The candidate should possess deep knowledge of Tenable’s entire product suite
Technical Writing experience for updating System Security Plan, Concept of Operations,
Privileged Users Guide, and other necessary documentation for Approval to Operate
Understanding of federal Cyber Security Guidance such as NIST SP 800-37 – Guide for
Applying the Risk Management Framework to Federal Information Systems and NIST 800-137 – Information Security Continuous Monitoring (ISCM) for Federal Information Systems and Organizations
Education Requirement
Bachelor's degree in Computer Science, Statistics, Applied Math or other STEM discipline
Years of Experience Requirement
5-7 years of experience administering Windows, Linux and/or virtual infrastructure to include installation, configuration and maintenance of enterprise networks, databases and servers
Certification Requirement
Must have or be willing to obtain IAT Level II certifications within 6 months of hire
Location
Chantilly, VA
Security Clearance
Must posses an active TS/SCI w/Polygraph",4.5,"ShorePoint
4.5","Chantilly, VA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2017,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
346,Data Scientist,$74k-$122k (Glassdoor Est.),"Unlock Your Career Potential: Technology at ADP. Do you enjoy exploring, identifying and inspiring the future of the workplace and the lives of millions of people? At ADP, the world's largest B2B cloud company, our Technology team is comprised of brilliant engineers, architects, data scientists, infrastructure experts, and more. We were first in our industry to offer a SaaS solution and continue to push the envelope utilizing the latest operating platforms to deliver the highly automated, intelligent and predictive solutions that are redefining what is possible. Named one of Forbes' ""Most Innovative Companies"" and one of Computerworld's ""100 Best Places to Work in IT"", we are committed to leading the way in product development and research, empowering you to bring to life the latest innovations that will forever change the way businesses manage their most vital asset, employees.

The SData Scientist will be responsible for deriving actionable insights and recommendations to measurably improve client experience and operational efficiency across the enterprise by leveraging various elements of data both internal and external to ADP and its clients. Their focus will be on the exploration and visualization of patterns within data obtained and assembled from multiple sources, including application of statistical modeling and leading edge analytical approaches including predictive modeling and machine learning, to identify key drivers of client experience related metrics.

This individual will be a core member of the Global Shared Services Analytics, a highly collaborative team, which provides data science and deep analytics expertise to solve the most challenging business problems here at ADP.

Qualifications:
1 year minimum of professional experience, not including internships or school programs, required.
1-3 years of progressive experience building statistical models, with preference to those with prior experience in client experience related roles.
Exceptional quantitative and data analysis skills
Must have deep expertise with Python for statistical programming
Data visualization platforms such as Tableau
Deep understanding of Excel and SQL for data extraction/transformation.
Hadoop or similar preferred, but not required
Python for text manipulation preferred, but not required
Results-oriented, self-starter with ability to learn quickly and adapt to changing business priorities
Bachelor's Degree in Statistics, Applied Mathematics, CS, Engineering or related.
Essential Duties and Responsibilities:
Apply appropriate data visualization and analytical methods to identify key drivers of client experience related metrics and to provide insightful, innovative and actionable recommendations to improve client experience and business outcomes.
Build deep partnership with business and technology stakeholders from across the enterprise to understand client experience concerns and existing available data sources
Establish credibility as a trusted advisor to key stakeholders across business units in order to promote and elevate statistical and predictive modeling standards.
Extract, merge, clean and normalize data sources as necessary for subsequent analytical studies using a combination of Excel, SQL, Oracle and Hadoop.
Use Python, R statistical platforms to design and build appropriate statistical and machine learning models, including but not limited to regression, clustering and decision trees, to identify main drivers of client experience related metrics.
Create appropriate data dashboards/visualizations (Tableau server) and presentations (PPT) to highlight findings and recommendations for both executive and technical audiences.
Use good business and financial acumen to assess business cases.
Implement appropriate tracking methods to measure business impacts of recommendations.
Business and Presentation skills
#LI-AS1

We're designing a better way to work, so you can achieve what you're working for. Consistently named one of the 'Most Admired Companies' by FORTUNE® Magazine, and recognized by DiversityInc® as one of the 'Top 50 Companies for Diversity,' ADP works with more than 740,000 organizations across the globe to help their people work smarter, embrace new challenges, and unleash their talent. ""Always Designing for People"" means we're creating platforms that will transform how great work gets done, so together we can unlock a world of opportunity.

At ADP, we believe that diversity fuels innovation. ADP is committed to equal employment opportunities regardless of race, color, genetic information, creed, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, lawful alien status, national origin, age, marital status, or protected veteran status. We support an inclusive workplace where associates excel based on personal merit, qualifications, experience, ability, and job performance.",3.8,"ADP
3.8","Parsippany, NJ",-1,10000+ Employees,1949,Company - Public,Consulting,Business Services,$10+ billion (USD),-1
347,Software or Machine Learning Engineer - Entry Level,$124k-$194k (Glassdoor Est.),"Posted: Oct 27, 2020
Role Number:
200189775
Imagine what you could do here. At Apple, extraordinary ideas have a way of becoming excellent products, services, and customer experiences very quickly. Bring passion and dedication to your job and there's no telling what you could accomplish. Apple is looking for entry level Software Engineers and Machine Learning Engineers and Researchers. Our Engineers and Researchers are the brains behind some of the industry’s biggest breakthroughs. OS X, Siri, Apple Maps, and iCloud — not to mention the system-level software for iPhone and Apple TV — all started here. These teams are on the front line of our constant charge toward innovation.
Key Qualifications
Software Roles:
Proficiency with C/C++/Java
Familiarity with Objective-C/Cocoa
Experience with UNIX and/or OS X preferred
Strong analytical and problem solving skills
Excellent written and verbal communication skills
Machine Learning Roles:
Experience in machine learning, deep learning, search, natural language processing, data science, or computer vision
Experience in one of the following languages: Python, Java, C++
Strong analytical and problem solving skills
Strong background in algorithms and data structures
Description
We are looking for Engineers and Researchers for a number of teams including Software, Internet Services & Software and Machine Learning & AI. Some of the areas that you may work in are listed below: *Software Engineering* - Core OS, Tools & Frameworks, Wireless Tech & Systems, Sensing & Connectivity, Software Operations, Internet Technologies, Interactive Media Group, Camera & Photos, Intelligent System Experience, Software Program Management *Internet Services & Software* - Apple Music, App Store, Apple Pay, iCloud, Apple Maps, TV+ *Machine Learning & AI* - Siri Experience, Siri Data, Siri Understanding, Siri Search Knowledge & Platform, Information Intelligence, Machine Intelligence, ML Platform & Technology, Health AI, Engineering Product/Program Management, Annotation Operations, Chief of Staff We have roles open across the globe, including: Cupertino, Seattle, San Francisco, New York, Culver City, London, and more.
Apple is an Equal Opportunity Employer that is committed to inclusion and diversity. We also take affirmative action to offer employment and advancement opportunities to all applicants, including minorities, women, protected veterans, and individuals with disabilities. Apple will not discriminate or retaliate against applicants who inquire about, disclose, or discuss their compensation or that of other applicants.
Education & Experience
Currently has, or is in the process of obtaining a Bachelors, Masters or PhD degree in Computer Science or a related field",4.2,"Apple
4.2","Santa Clara, CA",-1,10000+ Employees,1976,Company - Public,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),-1
348,"AI/ML- Applied ML Engineer, Health AI",$130k-$202k (Glassdoor Est.),"Summary
Posted: Oct 30, 2020
Weekly Hours: 40
Role Number:200160533
We are looking for applied scientists with a passion for using machine learning to transform intelligent user experiences. We are a close-knit team of highly accomplished, deeply technical research scientists and machine learning engineers focused on delivering cutting edge technologies that impact millions of users.

As a member of this team, you will use your practical knowledge and experience with machine learning, computer vision, NLP and/or artificial intelligence to take on meaningful technical problems, and collaborate with the most innovative product development teams in the world. You will play a key role in defining, designing, implementing and evaluating algorithms involving unique data and objectives. You will collaborate with highly innovative product teams across Apple, and see projects through to deployment on 1 billion Apple devices worldwide. You will have the opportunity to contribute to every cool project around Apple, and transfer your ideas into solutions for some of the most challenging technical problems in the next generation of Apple products.
Key Qualifications
5+ years of practical experience applying ML to tackle real-world problems.
Expertise in at least one area of deep learning, computer vision, NLP, or reinforcement learning.
Strong experience in building early stage products, and making them robust and scalable.
Ability to distill vague product experiences into concrete problem definitions.
Skilled in explaining and presenting analyses and machine learning concepts to a broad technical audience.
Creative, collaborative, and innovation focused.
Description
YOUR RESPONSIBILITIES INCLUDE:
Investigating innovative machine learning, computer vision, NLP, and artificial intelligence algorithms
Designing and implementing production-ready machine learning pipelines
Co-developing machine learning solutions product teams across Apple
Providing technical mentorship on transitioning prototypes to high-performance production models
Education & Experience
MS or PhD in Machine learning, Computer Vision, or related field
Additional Requirements
PREFERRED QUALIFICATION:
Consistent track record of building machine learning and/or computer vision systems
Proficiency training large scale models using modern machine learning frameworks (e.g. TensorFlow, PyTorch)
Strong fundamentals in problem solving, algorithm design, and model building
Deep understanding of probability and statistics, especially as relates to experiment analysis
Passion for adopting new technologies with high product impact
Excellent verbal and written communication and presentation skills",4.2,"Apple
4.2","Seattle, WA",-1,10000+ Employees,1976,Company - Public,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),-1
349,Machine Learning / Deep Learning Engineer,$121k-$208k (Glassdoor Est.),"At Toyota Research Institute (TRI), we’re working to build a future where everyone has the freedom to move, engage, and explore with a focus on reducing vehicle collisions, injuries, and fatalities. Join us in our mission to improve the quality of human life through advances in artificial intelligence, automated driving, robotics, and materials science. We’re dedicated to building a world of “mobility for all” where everyone, regardless of age or ability, can live in harmony with technology to enjoy a better life. Through innovations in AI, we’ll help… - Develop vehicles incapable of causing a crash, regardless of the actions of the driver. - Develop technology for vehicles and robots to help people enjoy new levels of independence, access, and mobility. - Bring advanced mobility technology to market faster. - Discover new materials that will make batteries and hydrogen fuel cells smaller, lighter, less expensive and more powerful. - Develop human-centered AI systems to augment (not replace) human decision making to increase the quality of decisions (e.g. mitigate cognitive biases) and/or to facilitate faster innovation cycles. Our work is guided by a dedication to safety – in both what we research and how we perform our research our goal is to benefit society. As a subsidiary of Toyota, TRI is fueled by a diverse and inclusive community of people who carry invaluable leadership, experience, and ideas from industry-leading companies. Over half of our technical team carries PhD degrees. We’re continually searching for the world’s best talent ‒ people who are ready to define the new world of mobility with us! We strive to build a company that helps our people thrive, achieve work-life balance, and bring their best selves to work. At TRI, you will have the opportunity to enjoy the best of both worlds ‒ a fun environment with forward-thinking people who enjoy solving tough problems and the financial backing to successfully achieve our goals. Come work with TRI if you’re interested in transforming mobility through designing technology for safer cars, enabling the elderly to age in place, or designing alternative fuel sources. Start your impossible with us. Our Machine Learning (ML) team is looking for world-class research scientists and engineers to turn Toyota's data advantage into an AI advantage. As the #1 car maker in the world with 100 million cars on the road today, we can learn from massive amounts of data to realize safe automated driving on a global scale. Our team's mission is to use all the data to identify and solve open research problems on the critical path to automated driving. We are working on some of the hardest challenges in the area of perception (e.g., scene understanding, 3D vision, tracking), prediction (e.g., handling uncertainty, predicting human behavior, trajectory forecasting), planning (e.g., understanding and reacting to human intent, multi-agent modeling), and general machine learning (e.g., self-supervised learning, imitation learning, active learning, multi-task learning, domain adaptation, robustness to the heavy tail of edge cases, efficient deep learning, large scale distributed training). We invent new Deep Learning algorithms that can leverage massive amounts of data (labeled or not), experimentally showing state-of-the-art performance (both in internal benchmarks and public ones, publishing at top Machine Learning and Computer Vision conferences and collaborating with our university partners). We work closely with other teams at TRI to transfer and ship our most successful algorithms and models towards world-scale long-term autonomy. As a Machine Learning Engineer, you will contribute to state-of-the-art machine learning infrastructure and relevant software (e.g. distributed training, continuous model integration, data management, and evaluation at unparalleled scale). You will implement cutting-edge deep learning models accelerating model training time, improving performance, and tackling open problems together with research scientists. Last but not least, you will deploy your algorithms and models in our self-driving test vehicles and beyond. Responsibilities and required qualifications are as follows: Responsibilities Build machine learning models using deep learning techniques for computer vision tasks such as semantic segmentation, object detection, video understanding, etc. Address large scale challenges in the machine learning development cycle, especially around distributed training in the cloud and data engineering. Manipulate high-volume, high-dimensionality, structured data from driving logs for training and testing deep networks. Produce high quality tested code that enables large scale research and can be transferred to physical robots deployed in the real world. Stay up to date on the state-of-the-art in Deep Learning ideas and software, in collaboration with our Research Scientists. Work in a multidisciplinary team and collaborate with other teams across the company. Present results in verbal and written communications, including potentially at top international conferences. Qualifications Bachelor's Degree in Computer Science, Math, Physics or related field. Proficient in Python and Unix is a minimum. Additional knowledge of C++ / CUDA is a plus, experience with AWS as well. Good software engineering skills, grounded in principled best practices. Clear grasp on basic Linear Algebra, Optimization, Statistics, and Algorithms. Deep Learning and Computer Vision expertise not required - but recommended. Familiarity with PyTorch or other deep learning frameworks is a bonus. You are passionate about ML, both large scale engineering and research challenges, especially in the space of Automated Driving. You are a reliable team-player. You like to think big and go deeper. You care about openness and delivering with integrity. Basic Requirements: Bachelors with at least 4-5 years of experience; Masters with at least 2 years of experience; PhD with at least 1 year of experience Strong software engineering practices in Python with machine learning experience in a production setting. Deep Learning Expertise: Experience training deep-learning models in an end-to-end fashion and writing custom layers/operations. Experience working with Pytorch, Tensorflow or other modern deep learning frameworks. Multi-view geometry and multi-modal reasoning: Familiar with multi-sensor geometry (sensor intrinsics, extrinsics), multi-modal sensor fusion, point cloud processing etc. Familiar with PyData eco-system including numpy, scipy, pandas, sklearn etc and comfortable with development in Linux. Bonus points: Written custom neural-network (NN) layers / CUDA operations that use Pytorch/TensorFlow (share snippets if you can). Implemented state-of-the-art models from research papers (share code/repos if you can). Experience with large-scale distributed training, NN optimization (distillation, quantization, compression). Experience with perception, prediction, and/or planning stacks for robotics/AVs. Publication in robotics/ML/CV conference (ICRA, IROS, IV, 3DV, CVPR, ECCV, ICCV, ICML, NeurIPS). Please reference this Candidate Privacy Notice to inform you of the categories of personal information that we collect from individuals who inquire about and/or apply to work for Toyota Research Institute, Inc. or its subsidiaries, including Toyota A.I. Ventures GP, L.P., and the purposes for which we use such personal information.",3.5,"Toyota Research Institute
3.5","Los Altos, CA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2016,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Research & Development,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
350,"Data Scientist, Operations",-1,"PicnicHealth is a San Francisco-based, venture-backed health tech startup with the mission of structuring the world's medical data to make it useful. Our business is two-sided: We give patients the first truly useful and complete personal health record by doing all the legwork to collect, digitize, and organize medical records from all of their providers. In addition, patients can support new medical breakthroughs if they choose to contribute their anonymized medical histories to studies PicnicHealth sponsors with leading researchers. Patients get the PicnicHealth service free of charge, life sciences researchers get critical data on how diseases look in the real world, and academic researchers get free access to data sets that drive cutting edge medical research.

It's an exciting time to join the PicnicHealth team - we just announced our Series B raise and are growing quickly in revenue, partnerships, and people. We 3x'd our ARR two years in a row now and on track to continue this trend, building partnerships with over a dozen Life Sciences groups, including 3 of the top 6 Biopharma firms in the US. We're going through a period of hyper-growth - we tripled the size of the team in the last 18 months and we're looking to at least double over the next year. We have a collaborative and engaged team culture that is mission driven and excited about the technology we're building and real solutions we're offering patients.

The Opportunity

At PicnicHealth, data science is at the core of how we cost-effectively retrieve and transform medical records into structured shareable data. Our teams recruit patients to partner's research studies, manage a large workforce of professionals who lend their expertise to the process of extracting clinical information, and build software tools to make these processes efficient. We are looking for a talented data scientist to arm these teams with data-driven insights so they can make informed operational and strategic decisions. This role provides a unique opportunity to work with continuous real-world operations data, to be tightly coupled to the actions taken based on one's analyses, and to drive significant impact within PicnicHealth's core business.

Our ideal team member will have equal parts communication, analytical, and leadership skills. You possess a strong sense of curiosity and a desire to contribute to a business that impacts the daily lives of chronic disease patients, as well as the doctors and scientists helping them. You ask analytical questions and possess the technical know-how to translate models into code, code into numbers, and numbers into operations decisions. You have prior experience analyzing networks, distribution, routing, or other dynamical operations scenarios. You have a strong desire to lead a growing team of data scientists as PicnicHealth scales to meet customer demand. You are a kind, passionate, and collaborative problem-solver who seeks and gives candid feedback.

As a Senior Data Scientist at PicnicHealth you will:
Work with a cross-functional team to model continually-evolving operations scenarios, drive analytical decision, and communicate actionable insights
Become an expert in the data we collect, understanding how to extract timely insights via SQL, and helping evolve our instrumentation to boost insight into company operations
Use PicnicHealth's data to optimize and shape the workflow of professionals tackling a hard problem: collecting and structuring medical histories to empower patients
Take a technical leadership role among a diverse, growing team of data scientists, while helping level up the sophistication of our analyses and processes
Help continue to build a world-class Data Science team, by helping attract, interview, and onboard your future team members during this exciting time of growth
You're a strong candidate if:
You hold a Master's degree with 4 years of industry experience or PhD in a quantitative discipline, such as operations research, applied math, applied statistics, health economics, or a related discipline
You love working with data and have experience exploring it with a critical eye
You are proficient in Python/SQL (or another programming language and are committed to becoming an expert in Python and SQL)
You are an excellent communicator, both oral and written, and can effectively adapt your tone, content, and approach to diverse audiences
You are self-motivated, flexible, proactive, and enjoy coming up with elegant and innovative solutions to challenging problems
You know how to balance attention to detail with execution against tight timelines
You are passionate about our grassroots patient-centric mission to improve healthcare through technology
You are an ideal candidate if you also have experience:
Analyzing efficiency and bottlenecks within real world networks, such as distribution, communications, or transportation networks
Why join PicnicHealth?

At PicnicHealth you get to solve real problems with real solutions, great tech, and great people.

You also get:
Competitive salary
Comprehensive benefits including Health, Dental, Vision
Flexible time off
401k plan
Parental leave
Free PicnicHealth account
Equipment and internet funds while we're working remotely during COVID-19
Due to COVID-19, currently all roles are remote until at least until January 2021. Once in-person work is safe for all team members, this role would be based out of our beautiful office in the Mission District of San Francisco.

Equal Opportunity Statement

PicnicHealth is committed to promoting an inclusive work environment free of discrimination and harassment. We value a diverse and balanced team where everyone can belong.",4.6,"PicnicHealth
4.6","San Francisco, CA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2014,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
351,Applied Machine Learning Engineer,$82k-$143k (Glassdoor Est.),"Applied Machine Learning Engineer
Mountain ViewR&D - Machine learningExperienced
Responsibilities
Founded in 2012, ByteDance is a technology company operating a range of content platforms that inform, educate, entertain and inspire people across languages, cultures and geographies.

With a suite of more than a dozen products, including TikTok, Douyin, Toutiao, Helo and Resso, ByteDance now has a portfolio of applications available in over 150 markets and 75 languages.

The mission of our AML team is to push next-generation recommendation-based algorithms and platform for the company. We also drive substantial impact for core businesses of the company. Currently we are looking for Applied Machine Learning engineers to join our team to support and advance that mission.

What You'll Do
Participate in the development of a large-scale recommendation system and machine learning platform.
Participate in the development and iteration of recommendation algorithms.
Qualifications
1. Proficient in C/C++, and have solid programming skills.
Familiar with at least one mainstream deep learning programming framework (TensorFlow/Caffe/MXNet), familiar with its architecture and implementation mechanism.
Familiar with deep learning algorithms (CNN/RNN/LSTM, etc.).
Ability to solve problems independently, good sense of teamwork and communication skills.
Has experience with open sourced deep learning framework.
Preferred Qualifications:
Familiar with the parallelization of Sparse LR, FFM, and deep models on large-scale data.
Experience in resource management and task scheduling with large scale distributed software (such as Spark and TensorFlow).
ByteDance is committed to creating an inclusive space where employees are valued for their skills, experiences, and unique perspectives. Our platform connects people from across the globe and so does our workplace. At ByteDance, our mission is to inspire creativity and enrich life. To achieve that goal, we are committed to celebrating our diverse voices and to creating an environment that reflects the many communities we reach. We believe individuals shouldn't be disadvantaged because of their background or identity, but instead should be considered based on their strengths and experience. We are passionate about this and hope you are too.

ByteDance is committed to providing reasonable accommodations during our recruitment process. If you need assistance or an accommodation, please reach out to us at usrc@bytedance.com.
Apply
Share to",3.9,"ByteDance
3.9","Mountain View, CA",-1,10000+ Employees,2012,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
352,"Senior Software Engineer, Data",$79k-$157k (Glassdoor Est.),"Company Overview:
Age of Learning is a leading education technology innovator based in Glendale, California, with a talented team of more than 600 individuals comprised of nationally-renowned educators, curriculum experts, developers, artists, writers, designers, engineers, producers, product managers, analysts and marketing experts! Together we develop engaging, effective digital learning technology and content to help children build a strong academic foundation for lifelong success.
Our flagship product ABCmouse.com Early Learning Academy® is a comprehensive online curriculum and the #1 digital learning product for young children. To-date, more than 30 million children worldwide have completed over 7 billion Learning Activities on ABCmouse. We recently launched Adventure Academy, the first massively multiplayer online (MMO) game designed specifically to help elementary- and middle-school-aged children learn. It features thousands of engaging Learning Activities—including minigames, books, original animated and live action series, and more—in a fun and safe virtual world. Other Age of Learning programs include immersive English language learning products for children in China and Japan; ReadingIQ, a digital library and literacy platform; and a groundbreaking personalized, adaptive digital learning system that individualizes math instruction for every child through AI-driven technology.

We are committed to helping all children succeed. We provide our educational programs at no cost to teachers, Head Start programs, public libraries, and other community organizations, and have served millions of children through these initiatives. We recently established the Age of Learning Foundation to expand this work globally.
As we expand our global reach and increase the educational impact of our programs, we’re looking for passionate, ambitious, and collaborative leaders to become a part of our growing team.


Summary:
We are seeking a full-time in-house Software Engineer to join our Data Engineering team. This person will be helping us develop high performance, high throughput services using modern technologies and techniques and act as a team technical leader who is recognized as the subject matter expert in team technologies and proficient in a variety of others.
Responsibilities:
Design, develop, test, implement, document and support Data & Analytics systems which adhere to software engineering best practices
Proactively identify and resolve operational issues with evolutionary recommendations
Ensure testing and validation mechanisms are in place so that data transformations are verified, complete, documented and meet SLAs
Execute projects on tight deadlines in a fast-paced matrixed organization collaborating with multiple product engineering teams
Advocate and participate in Agile/Scrum practice to ensure process health
Required Qualifications:
Approximately 7-10 years of data engineering experience
Able to leverage abstraction to solve complex problems
Experience designing and building scalable data systems
Excellent DevOps skills (preference for AWS experience)
Strong SQL skills
Knows dimensional modeling for data warehousing
Fluent in a general-purpose programming language (preference for Python)
Understands how to leverage both functional and object-oriented programming
Great at data mining
Extensive exposure to Agile workflows
Exemplary communication skills (both written and oral)
Good time management skills
Can work iteratively, defining requirements as needed
Preferred Qualifications:
Extensive experience with DBT
Extensive experience with columnar data formats
Extensive experience with Snowflake
Extensive experience with ML pipelines
Extensive experience with A/B Testing and related optimization across desktop and mobile
Extensive experience working in Educational Technology companies and competitive landscape
We Provide:
Medical, Dental, Vision + 401k
Highly competitive PTO policy
Casual Dress Code
Snacks + Drinks (Coca Cola Freestyle Machine)
Gaming room including an Arcade (2,000+ games)
Frequent team and company outings
Limitless opportunities for professional growth!",3.1,"Age of Learning
3.1","Glendale, CA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2007,Company - Private,K-12 Education,Education,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
353,Machine Learning / AI - Engineering- Remote,-1,"ThisWay Global is an Austin-based startup in the recruitment space and we are looking for engineering interns to work with large datasets that will help people find jobs.

We have a suite of products designed to streamline and reduce the headache of sourcing top qualified candidates.Our company builds artificial intelligence and automation technology for the HR tech space, servicing SME and enterprise customers. We are currently looking for a talented Engineering Intern to join the team. For this internship you must be living in the US and also be a US Citizen.This role will be a remote position

Due to the current hiring freeze this is an unpaid, volunteer intern position.

On a daily basis you may be asked to do any one of the following jobs :
Analyze datasets and determine best approaches for normalization
Define and perform comparative analysis to determine the best algorithms to use for each dataset
Propose and code/build (using Kotlin/Java and supporting libraries and systems) various ML/AI/computational algorithms for normalizing the datasets
Requirements
Currently pursuing BSc/MSc in CS or related major
Fluent in at least one JVM based programming language (Java/Kotlin – Kotlin preferred)
Conversant with Spring/SpringBoot and/or willing to learn
Experience with AI (ML, Deep Learning) and data science would be a plus, especially Java/Kotlin libraries like Smile, DeepLeaning4J, Jenetics, Krangle
Highly motivated to learn and be up-to-date with technology
You must be a self-starter with the ability to work autonomously.
You need to be able to stay calm and positive when solving a problem with a team.
Benefits
You will be developing products that will help people find jobs with great companies, without using outdated job search processes.
Tailor-made mentorship program - we are interested in hiring full-time after the internship.
Flexible in terms of working schedule.
Working with a top-level team that is experienced in building successful startups.
We have a great office located downtown Austin. close to restaurants, hike/bike and running trails.",4.6,"ThisWay
4.6","Austin, TX",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2016,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
354,Cloud Data Engineer,$93k-$165k (Glassdoor Est.),"sdg is a high performance software community. sdg consultants build and deliver custom software for some of the largest and most recognizable local and national brands. In this role you will be asked to leverage your current skills and learn new ones. Working in over 400 different technologies and continually learning together, you can expect a one-of-a-kind and award winning work experience.

If you have proven experience working with one or more Public Cloud Providers such as AWS and Microsoft Azure in a handful of the following, we want to hear from you.
Design and development of relational and non-relational databases, data warehouses and data lakes
RDS, Azure SQL DB, Azure DB for MySQL, Azure DB for PostgresSQL
AWS DynamoDB, AWS SimpleDB, Azure Cosmos DB
Amazon Redshift, Azure Data Lake Storage, Azure Synapse Analytics
AWS DB Migration Service, Azure DB Migration Service
Development, monitoring and maintenance of data integration and processing tools and pipelines
AWS Glue, AWS Data Pipeline, Azure Data Factory
AWS Data Pipeline, AWS Glue
Design and testing of machine learning and data science tools, including the building and deployment of data models
Amazon EMR, Azure Databricks, Azure HDInsight
Implementation of high-capacity, real-time data streaming technologies
AWS Kinesis Analytics, Azure Stream Analytics, Azure Data Lake Analytics, AWS Lambda
Data analysis and visualization tools
AWS QuickSight, Azure PowerBI
Amazon Athena, Azure Data Lake Analytics
Leveraging non-database data storage alternatives to maximize performance, costs and data quality
AWS S3, Azure Blob Storage
AWS ElastiCache, Azure Cache for Redis
AWS CloudSearch, Azure Search
Familiarity with security and security policies within AWS and Azure
Nice to have
Bachelor's degree in related field or equivalent work experience
Success working on high performance teams
Azure or AWS Certification
Delivered solutions in large scale enterprise environments
Prior consulting or professional services experience
Motivated to continually improve your craft, sharing and learning every day
Exceptional integrity with the desire to create the best possible customer outcomes
bonus experience

Bachelor's Degree in related field or equivalent work experience
Success working on high performance teams
Delivered solutions in large scale enterprise environments
Prior consulting or professional services experience
Motivated to continually improve your craft, sharing and learning every day
Exceptional integrity with the desire to create the best possible customer outcomes

what's in it for you?

Full-time salaried position with sdg, a 10-time Best Place to Work
Engaged teammates who care about quality solutions
Challenging and rewarding work with great customers
Abundant opportunities to give back to the community
A company proven to make decisions based on its core values
A true stake in success as sdg is an ESOP, 100% employee owned
Year-round technology and social events to stay sharp and have fun
Membership in the best technology community in the Twin Cities",4.9,"Solution Design Group
4.9","Golden Valley, MN",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1989,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
355,Senior Mechanical Engineer,$65k-$154k (Glassdoor Est.),"Who Are We?

QinetiQ Inc. is a leading innovator with over 25 years of experience rapidly developing advanced C5ISR sensor solutions and is a renowned world leader in robotics and autonomy.

The combined QinetiQ U.S. business unit brings capabilities across the full lifecycle of technology development from applied research and development to rapid prototyping, testing, fielding, and sustainment. Our expertise with unmanned platforms, broad sensing modalities, and cross-domain interoperability ensures that we deliver integrated solutions for Warfighter dominance in all phases of combat.

We are a world-class team of professionals who deliver next generation technology and products in robotic and autonomous platforms and systems, ground systems, soldier systems, maritime systems, airborne sensors and payloads, processing and exploitation capabilities, and integrated C2 solutions. Much of our work contributes to innovative research in ﬁelds such as sensor science, signal processing, data fusion, artiﬁcial intelligence (AI), machine learning (ML), and augmented reality (AR).

Our customers are always our number one priority and we consistently deliver Mission-Led Innovation to empower and protect our Defense and Security forces in the U.S. and abroad.

Your Contribution to Our Mission:
Design and development of Opto-Mechanical Sensor Systems for commercial and government applications.
Mechanical design, modeling, tolerancing, drawing generation, assembly procedures, part procurement, environmental analysis, and testing for systems and subassemblies.
To Land This Job, You Need:
BS or MS degree in Mechanical Engineering, Aerospace Engineering or equivalent.
Ability to work within, and often lead, a multi-disciplinary team consisting of Electrical, Optical, and Software Engineers.
To work closely with Program Management and Functional Management to ensure project technical performance requirements are met as well as schedule and budget.
Demonstrated performance developing a rugged product design from customer requirements to a fully tested/compliant system.
Ability to translate requirements and develop a top down system level design including all sub-assemblies and components.
Clearance Level Must Be Able to Obtain:

DOD Secret

Why QinetiQ Inc.?
Your work will contribute to the protection of American Warfighters and Security Forces.
Opportunity to work with cutting edge technology.
Extensive opportunities for continuous learning, professional growth and advancement.
We only hire the best! No matter if you are entry or senior level, you will have the opportunity learn from some of the best in the industry.
We have fun! We regularly have company events, from luncheons and costume contests to golf tournaments.
We care about YOU and YOUR FAMILY. We offer competitive benefits and health insurance options.
No One Has Time for Long Job Applications!

We completely understand. That is why we have made the application process easy. We promise. This will be simple.

Accessibility/Accommodation:

If because of a medical condition or disability, you need a reasonable accommodation for any part of the employment process, please send an e-mail to staffing@us.qinetiq.com or call (540) 658-2720 Opt 4 and let us know the nature of your request and your contact information.

QinetiQ Inc. is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, age, color, religion, creed, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or protected Veteran status.",2.9,"QinetiQ North America
2.9","Lorton, VA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1956,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
356,Application Development Engineer- Inspection,$59k-$96k (Glassdoor Est.),"Introduction ASML US brings together the most creative minds in science and technology to develop lithography machines that are key to producing faster, cheaper, more energy-efficient microchips. We design, develop, integrate, market and service these advanced machines, which enable our customers - the world’s leading chipmakers - to reduce the size and increase the functionality of their microchips, which in turn leads to smaller, more powerful consumer electronics. Our headquarters are in Veldhoven, the Netherlands, and we have 18 office locations around the United States including main offices in Chandler Arizona, San Jose and San Diego California, Wilton Connecticut, and Hillsboro Oregon. “This position requires access to controlled technology, as defined in the Export Administration Regulations (15 C.F.R. § 730, et seq.). Qualified candidates must be legally authorized to access such controlled technology prior to beginning work. Business demands may require ASML to proceed with applicants who are immediately eligible to access controlled technology.” Job Mission Develop application for world’s most advanced e-beam inspection systems to enhance their value. Provide application support to increase the utilization of high throughput e-beam system for customer’s yield enhancement in high volume manufacture environment. Working closely with customer and development engineering, application development engineer is responsible for developing application using high resolution, high throughput e-beam systems to provide monitor and control solution for advanced nodes in semi-conductor industries. Job Description Provide application support at customer site on evaluation of world’s most advanced single-beam (SBI), multi-beam inspection (MBI) system. Scope includes recipe setup, recipe optimization, defect classification, result analysis, report making, and issue escalation. Support application development activities for SBI and MBI systems, novel E-beam application adoption, and novel inspection methods. Involve in customer use case analysis, function demonstration, tool matching, and documentation. Identify gaps between system’s capability and customer’s inspection needs. Work with D&E and system engineers on feasibility studies to validate potential solutions. Document and transfer new applications to worldwide customer support team. Provide application training for customers and local field application engineers. Engage with customer on novel application products for new business opportunities. Up to 20% time travel to support other customer sites. Education M.S. and above in Electrical Engineering, Physics, Material Science or Chemical Engineering. Experience Minimum 3 years’ experience in related fields is a plus for candidates, including IC manufacturing, semiconductor process technology, ebeam inspection metrology or equivalent experience. Hands-on experience on semiconductor process or equipment is required Fast learner with strong self-motivation to grow technically; be able to perform job at high standard with minimum supervision, and demonstrated ability to thrive in a high pressure and fast paced environment. Personal skills Communication skill: Able to communicate with counterparts efficiently on project work. Team work: Good team player to drive product development with stakeholders. Context of the position PHYSICAL DEMANDS AND WORK ENVIRONMENT The physical demands described here are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of this job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions. While performingthe duties of this job, the employee routinely is required to sit; walk;talk; hear; use hands to keyboard, finger, handle, and feel; stoop, kneel,crouch, twist, reach, and stretch. The employee isoccasionally required to move around the campus. The employee mayoccasionally lift and/or move up to 50 pounds. May require traveldependent on business needs. Specific visionabilities required by this job include close vision, color vision,peripheral vision, depth perception, and ability to adjust focus. Can work underdeadlines. The environmentgenerally is moderate in temperature and noise level. Must be able toread and interpret data, information, and documents. Can observe andrespond to people and situations and interact with others encountered inthe course of work. Can learn andapply new information or skills. Responsibilitiesinclude periodic travel to regional and overseas sites for producttechnical support and special support projects. Work may includeonsite technical support involving heavy lifting of equipment &modules. Position willrequire technical work activity in a clean-room production environmentand/or laboratory setting. The environmentgenerally is moderate in temperature and noise level. Occasionally maybe exposed to loud noise bursts and may be exposed to toxic gases(fluorine). Must be able towork in small, confined spaces. We offer competitive salaries and benefits including medical, dental, vision, 401(K), and FSAs. Other information EOE AA M/F/Veteran/Disability",3.9,"ASML
3.9","San Jose, CA",-1,10000+ Employees,1984,Company - Public,Electrical & Electronic Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$5 to $10 billion (USD),-1
357,Customer Support Engineer,$59k-$160k (Glassdoor Est.),"Introduction

ASML US brings together the most creative minds in science and technology to develop lithography machines that are key to producing faster, cheaper, more energy-efficient microchips. We design, develop, integrate, market and service these advanced machines, which enable our customers - the world’s leading chipmakers - to reduce the size and increase the functionality of their microchips, which in turn leads to smaller, more powerful consumer electronics. Our headquarters are in Veldhoven, the Netherlands, and we have 18 office locations around the United States including main offices in Chandler, Arizona, San Jose and San Diego, California, Wilton, Connecticut, and Hillsboro, Oregon.

Job Mission

“Manage and keep track on complex field upgrades and activities, enabling the field teams to unlock the potential of ASML products for our customers”.

As an Engineer you introduce the newest EUV technology to our customers by hands on upgrading EUV machines. In all situations your first priority is to be an ambassador for safety and local way of working adherence.

Within ASML the Customer Support (CS) group is responsible for the maintenance, repair and continuous improvement of ASML systems at customer locations. One of the departments in this group is CS NXE Upgrades. This organization prepares and executes complex upgrades such as commercial upgrades and field swaps and “bring to spec packages”.

This position requires access to controlled technology, as defined in the Export Administration Regulations (15 C.F.R. § 730, et seq.). Qualified candidates must be legally authorized to access such controlled technology prior to beginning work. Business demands may require ASML to proceed with applicants who are immediately eligible to access controlled technology.

Job Description
Become and all round EUV upgrade Source engineer in Hardware, Co2 alignment and Plasma qualification to.
Be responsible to get familiar with New Product Introductions to gain more in-depth technical knowledge by reading/understanding KTs and completing CBT’s and training before deployment to an Upgrade.
Execute hardware installation and perform system setup/recovery for upgrade packages as well as support locally owned field swaps by working according to an up-to-date plan and following the sequence. (Source competence: Hardware, Co2 alignment, Plasma qualification)
Executing according to procedures and in case of issues knowing and following the escalation process.
Organize tooling before/after usage and return all tooling to its original location when complete with work to maintain a safe and organized work space at all times. Be responsible to follow the escalation process when tooling is NOK.
Provide feedback during execution in order to improve cycle time and performance in accordance with the “zero error repeat concept”.
Take ownership to reduce B3 issues by pro-actively checking the sequence for potential issues and critical steps. When B3 issues occur I take ownership to follow-up by adhering to the D12 method and inform line management about possible solutions.
Responsible to align with the Shift Lead to ensure that all required administration/actions/problem statements are noted in logbook.
Use the logbook and review logbook wrt the previous shift before start working.
Participate in the wrap-up phase of an upgrade by sharing feedback and comments which occurred during the execution phase.
Education

Up to BSc technical degree like Mathematics, Mechanical Engineering, Mechatronics, Electronics, (Applied) Physics or equivalent experience.

Experience
Experience in a challenging environment with high tech products and complex production processes as engineer, preferably with trouble-shooting: analyzing problem, finding root cause and solution.
Preferred 1-3 years’ work experience as engineer.
Open for cultural differences.
Pragmatic attitude, motivated, pro-active, self-driven and flexible.
High sense of responsibility and devotion.
Highly stress-resistant.
Broad technical and business knowledge.
Strong analytical ability and focus on problem solving.
Good documentation skills.
Good organizational skills.
Good team player who is committed to the success of ASML.
Good communication skills, verbal and written, in English.
Personal skills
Can observe and respond to people and situations and interact with others encountered in the course of work.
Can learn and apply new information or skills.
Must be able to read and interpret data, information, and documents.
Strong customer focus and commitment to customer satisfaction through prioritization, quality, efficiency and professionalism.
Ability to complete assignments with attention to detail and high degree of accuracy.
Proven ability to perform effectively in a demanding environment with changing workloads and deadlines.
Result driven-demonstrate ownership and accountability.
Identifies bottlenecks and drives improvements.
Work independently or as part of a team and follow through on assignments with minimal supervision.
Demonstrate open, clear, concise and professional communication.
Ability to establish and maintain cooperative working relationships with manager, co-workers and customer.
Work according to a strict set of procedures within the provided timelines.
Other information
In this role you will report to your Group Leader CS NXE Upgrades in Hillsboro.
In general work is scheduled at the INTEL HBO site however flexibility to travel to countries including Taiwan, Korea, USA), with short notice (if needed, with uninterrupted periods up to 3 weeks in a row).

Role within Office

Responsibilities:

Routinely required to sit; walk; talk; hear; use hands to keyboard, finger, handle, and feel; stoop, kneel, crouch, twist, reach, and stretch. Occasionally required to move around the campus.
Occasionally lift and/or move up to 20 pounds.
May require travel dependent on business needs.
Specific vision abilities required by this job include close vision, color vision, peripheral vision, depth perception, and ability to adjust focus.

EOE AA M/F/Veteran/Disability",3.9,"ASML
3.9","Hillsboro, OR",-1,10000+ Employees,1984,Company - Public,Electrical & Electronic Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$5 to $10 billion (USD),-1
358,Mechanical Supplier Quality Engineer,$61k-$101k (Glassdoor Est.),"Introduction

ASML US brings together the most creative minds in science and technology to develop lithography machines that are key to producing faster, cheaper, more energy-efficient microchips. We design, develop, integrate, market and service these advanced machines, which enable our customers - the world’s leading chipmakers - to reduce the size and increase the functionality of their microchips, which in turn leads to smaller, more powerful consumer electronics. Our headquarters are in Veldhoven, the Netherlands, and we have 18 office locations around the United States including main offices in Chandler, Arizona, San Jose and San Diego, California, Wilton, Connecticut, and Hillsboro, Oregon.

Job Mission

As a Supplier Quality Engineer (SQE) within Development & Engineering you will be operating in a fast paced and multidisciplinary development environment.

The SQE maintains and develops the relation with the suppliers with the purpose to create an optimal engineering collaboration between the suppliers and ASML designers. Using your personal and technical skills, you will work closely with the suppliers & ASML development teams to optimize the effectiveness and efficiency of the product generation process, in alignment with the ASML project plan. The main goal of this cross-sector activity is to secure the quality of parts delivered by our suppliers. You will drive industrialization during new product development by involving those who will manufacture it. This is accomplished by fostering engineering collaboration between suppliers and ASML development departments, and driving co-design activities at suppliers. You will also understand and leverage supplier technology and processes into ASML new product development projects.

This position requires access to controlled technology, as defined in the Export Administration Regulations (15 C.F.R. § 730, et seq.). Qualified candidates must be legally authorized to access such controlled technology prior to beginning work. Business demands may require ASML to proceed with applicants who are immediately eligible to access controlled technology.

Job Description

Within the D&E organization, the SQE is responsible for new product introduction from early supplier involvement until the product design and supplier process is mature enough to be released for volume. Using your in-depth technical knowledge, analytic thinking, and people skills, you work closely with suppliers to build up an intimate knowledge of their manufacturing and technological capabilities. NOTE: This is a technical position in a highly technical company and not a general Quality Assurance/Black Belt/Lean Manufacturing role. Those skills are necessary but not of primary concern.

As a Supplier Quality Engineer, your main tasks will include:

Ensure that part quality, manufacturability and serviceability aspects are covered during the early design phase, including implementation of lessons learned.
Work closely with the design team to provide manufacturability input during the early phases of the design. Provide input on optimal machining geometry, materials, finishes, treatments, joining methods, cleaning, and others.
Responsible for quality and process robustness at suppliers and with their second-tier suppliers.
Contribute to supplier development (e.g., help implement SPC, Lean Manufacturing, FMEA, and operational excellence at suppliers).
Reduce risk in supplier manufacturing processes by optimizing quality, testing and qualification infrastructure by using pFMEA’s and manufacturing flow analysis. Understand fabrication processes to estimate and drive manufacturing cost targets.
Analyze and drive technical solutions in material quality issues and escalations.
Monitor and drive supplier yield improvements and technical process improvements.Participate in supplier improvement projects when necessary (e.g., cycle-time reduction, cost reduction).
Contribute to supplier development to improve operational excellence by driving execution of existing agreements, improvement actions, and participation in supplier audits.
Coordinating role with respect to all SQE activities and deliverables including other cross sector colleagues within the allocated project.
Education

Bachelor’s degree in Mechanical or Manufacturing Engineering or a related field, or equivalent experience.

Experience
Additional education in relevant engineering subjects are highly desirable.
At least 8 years relevant work experience in a high-tech environment in the field of process development, design engineering, manufacturing or a combination including experience with:

Manufacturing techniques including 5 axis CNC machining, EDM, bonding and joining, materials, coatings, and precision measurement.
Experience in at least one of the following:Precision mechanics, opto-mechanics, electro-mechanics.
Supply chain processes in a new product introduction (NPI) environment.
Technical improvement projects in supply chain operations.
Value Engineering and cost-reduction projects.
Working closely with suppliers on technical aspects, process development, manufacturing flow.
Proactive approach, taking initiative.
Attention to detail.
Results-oriented with strong planning and prioritization skills.
Analytical, abstract thinker.
Able to function in a complex, fast-paced environment.
Team player, shares knowledge, while able to act independently.
Strong negotiation skills during interactions with suppliers and other ASML sectors. Ability to initiate, influence and steer without formal authority.
Excellent written and verbal communication skills in English.
Personal skills
Can observe and respond to people and situations and interact with others encountered in the course of work.
Can learn and apply new information or skills.
Must be able to read and interpret data, information, and documents.
Strong customer focus and commitment to customer satisfaction through prioritization, quality, efficiency and professionalism.
Ability to complete assignments with attention to detail and high degree of accuracy.
Proven ability to perform effectively in a demanding environment with changing workloads and deadlines.
Result driven-demonstrate ownership and accountability.
Identifies bottlenecks and drives improvements.
Work independently or as part of a team and follow through on assignments with minimal supervision.
Demonstrate open, clear, concise and professional communication.
Ability to establish and maintain cooperative working relationships with manager, co-workers and customer.
Work according to a strict set of procedures within the provided timelines.
Other information

Role within Office

Responsibilities:

Routinely required to sit; walk; talk; hear; use hands to keyboard, finger, handle, and feel; stoop, kneel, crouch, twist, reach, and stretch. Occasionally required to move around the campus.
Occasionally lift and/or move up to 20 pounds.
May require travel dependent on business needs. Business demands will require travel (~20% but could be more during escalation situations and at with notice).
Specific vision abilities required by this job include close vision, color vision, peripheral vision, depth perception, and ability to adjust focus.

EOE AA M/F/Veteran/Disability

Internal Reference: #LI-KG1",3.9,"ASML
3.9","Wilton, CT",-1,10000+ Employees,1984,Company - Public,Electrical & Electronic Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$5 to $10 billion (USD),-1
359,Software Engineer – Machine Learning,-1,"Location: San Diego

Experience Required: Hiring across all levels

ROLE AND RESPONSIBILITIES

You will help design, implement and commercialize driver monitoring and driver assistance algorithms. You will have access to very large datasets and will get to deploy new algorithms/models into thousands of vehicles. As a machine learning software engineer, you may

Design and commercialize algorithms characterizing driving behavior.
Design, implement and track key metrics; and architect data-driven solutions.
Improve machine learning infrastructure for scalable training and inference.
Innovate and develop proof of concept solutions showcasing novel capabilities.
Requirements
B. Tech, M. Tech or PhD in computer science, electrical engineering or a related area.
Excellent programming skills – Python (required) and C++ (desired).
Research or industry experience with machine learning models.
Ability to take abstract product concepts and turn them into reality.
Ability to innovate on cutting-edge problems without documented solutions.
Desired Skills
Experience with image, video and time-series data.
Experience with road scene understanding (objects, lanes, intersections, signs etc.)
Experience with person/driver scene understanding (pose, distracted, eye status etc.)
Experience with successfully applying machine learning to solve a real-world problem.
Experience with conducting successful statistical experiments.
Experience with predictive analytics.

Departments: Analytics
Experience: Across all levels
Locations: Any region in the US San Diego",3.7,"Netradyne
3.7","San Diego, CA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Contract,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
360,Software Engineer - Machine Learning,-1,"[As of June 2020, Quora has become a ""remote-first"" company. This position can be performed remotely from anywhere in the world, regardless of any location that might be specified above.]

About Quora:


The vast majority of human knowledge is still not on the internet. Most of it is trapped in the form of experience in people's heads, or buried in books and papers that only experts can access. More than a billion people use the internet, yet only a tiny fraction contribute their knowledge to it. We want to democratize access to knowledge of all kinds from politics to painting, cooking to coding, etymology to experiences so if someone out there knows something, anyone else can learn it. Our mission is to share and grow the world's knowledge, and we're building a world-class team to help us achieve this mission.

About the Team:


Our small engineering team works on challenging problems every day. We have a culture that's rooted in constantly learning and improving, and our engineers are encouraged to think big and experiment with new ideas. Using continuous deployment, we quickly see our changes in the product and make fast iterations. Our engineers focus on creating polished products and writing high quality code by designing APIs and abstractions that are extensible and maintainable. As a remote first company, our engineers have a high degree of flexibility and autonomy. Everyone on the engineering team has a huge impact on our product and our company.

About the Role:


We are looking for an experienced Machine Learning engineer to join our growing engineering team. At Quora, we use machine learning in almost every part of the product - feed ranking, monetization strategies, language modeling, notification optimization, spam detection, duplicate question identification, etc. As a machine learning expert, you will have a unique opportunity to have high impact by advancing these systems, as well as uncovering new opportunities to apply machine learning to the Quora product. You will also play a key role in developing tools and abstractions that our other developers would build on top of.

Responsibilities:
Improve our existing machine learning systems using your core coding skills and ML knowledge
Identify new opportunities to apply machine learning to different parts of the Quora product
Work with other machine learning engineers to implement algorithms and systems in an efficient way
Take end to end ownership of machine learning systems - from data pipelines, feature engineering, candidate extraction, model training, as well as integration into our production systems
Minimum Qualifications:


Ability to be available for meetings and impromptu communication during Quora's ""coordination hours"" (Mon-Fri: 9am-3pm Pacific Time). Learn why here
3+ years of professional software development experience in machine learning
Good understanding of mathematical foundations of machine learning algorithms
Previous experience building end to end machine learning systems
BS, MS or PhD in Computer Science, Engineering or a related technical field
Preferred Qualifications:


Strong communication and interpersonal skills
2+ years of experience writing Python or C++ code
Experience with leading large-scale multi-engineer projects
Flexible and positive team player with outstanding interpersonal skills.
Passion for Quora's mission and goals
We are an equal opportunity employer and value diversity at our company. We do not discriminate on the basis of race, religion, color, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, age, marital status, veteran status, or disability status.

California Consumer Privacy Act (CCPA) disclosure",4.1,"Quora
4.1",Remote,-1,201 to 500 Employees,2009,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
361,AI and Machine Learning Engineer,$120k-$149k (Glassdoor Est.),"We are looking for a Machine Learning (ML) Engineer to help us create artificial intelligence products. Machine Learning Engineer responsibilities include creating machine learning models and retraining systems. To do this job successfully, you need exceptional skills in statistics and programming. If you also have knowledge of data science and software engineering, we’d like to meet you. Your ultimate goal will be to shape and build efficient self-learning applications.

Responsibilities
Study and transform data science prototypes
Design machine learning systems
Research and implement appropriate ML algorithms and tools
Develop machine learning applications according to requirements
Select appropriate datasets and data representation methods
Run machine learning tests and experiments
Perform statistical analysis and fine-tuning using test results
Train and retrain systems when necessary
Extend existing ML libraries and frameworks
Keep abreast of developments in the field
Requirements
Proven experience as a Machine Learning Engineer or similar role
Understanding of data structures, data modeling and software architecture
Deep knowledge of math, probability, statistics and algorithms
Ability to write robust code in Python, Java and R
Familiarity with machine learning frameworks (like Keras or PyTorch) and libraries (like scikit-learn)
Excellent communication skills
Ability to work in a team
Outstanding analytical and problem-solving skills
BSc in Computer Science, Mathematics or similar field; Master’s degree is a plus
Benefits
401K
Pre-IPO stock
100% paid health coverage plans including medical, dental and vision
Vacation PTO (based on level/experience)
Perks – Meals/Snacks, Beer Wednesdays, Frequent Lunch-N-Learns
OnScale is an Equal Opportunity Employer
OnScale is an Equal Opportunity Employer. We are committed to equal treatment of all employees without regard to race, national origin, religion, gender, age, sexual orientation, veteran status, physical or mental disability or other basis protected by law.",5.0,"OnScale
5.0","Atlanta, GA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2018,Company - Public,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
362,Machine Learning Engineer - Data Science,$93k-$162k (Glassdoor Est.),"About the Team

STR’s Analytics division researches and develops advanced analytics and machine learning-based solutions to solve challenging problems related to national security. Our projects span multiple different data modalities and incorporate advanced algorithms, deep learning, and statistical techniques to uncover patterns in social media, structured and unstructured text, time series, geospatial, and imagery data. The tools and technologies we develop have real world impact and are used by analysts to extract and enrich intelligence information around the globe.

The Role

As a Machine Learning Engineer – Data Science, you will develop, implement, and evaluate statistical machine learning algorithms to uncover hidden information and patterns from a diverse collection of massive datasets. You will apply state of the art and novel techniques such as supervised and unsupervised learning, machine learning, and deep learning to problems such as classification, anomaly detection, and forecasting. You will develop cutting edge systems and work collaboratively with our software engineers to design and deploy models into production. You will interact with customers to understand requirements and apply iterative feedback to development.

Requirements

Who You Are
Degree in a scientific field such as Computer Science, Math, Statistics, Data Science, or Physics
Understanding of and experience with statistical and machine learning techniques
Proficiency with a one or more programming language such as Python, MATLAB, Java, or C++
Previous experience (internships and academic work included) working with complex datasets and building statistical, machine learning, or deep learning models
Motivated collaborator who’s comfortable communicating to both technical and non-technical audiences
A U.S. citizen and have ability to obtain and maintain a security clearance
Even Better
MS or PhD in a scientific field such as Computer Science, Statistics, Mathematics, or Physics
Track record of developing, implementing, and evaluating statistical algorithms against real datasets
Specialized expertise in a data-rich field such as time-series analysis, graph analytics, geospatial analysis, image processing, or Bayesian programming
Experience with one or more deep learning frameworks such as PyTorch or Tensorflow
Experience working with large datasets and familiarity with big data infrastructure, such as AWS, Hadoop, Spark, Dask, or MapReduce
Active TS or TS/SCI security clearance
Systems & Technology Research (STR) is a rapidly growing technology company with locations north of Boston, MA, Arlington, VA and near Dayton, OH. We specialize in advanced research and development for defense, intelligence, and national security, trying to understand how to protect our society: from stopping malicious botnet attacks, to understanding cyber vulnerabilities, providing next generation sensors, radar, sonar, communications, and electronic warfare to developing artificial intelligence algorithms and analytics to make sense of the complexity that is exploding around us.

STR is committed to creating a collaborative learning environment that supports deep technical understanding and recognizes the contributions and achievements of all team members. Our work is challenging, but you go home at night knowing that you pushed the forefront of technology and made the world a little safer. We recognize that the world is changing, that it is becoming more connected than ever before, making things change faster than before, and reshaping society in the process. We all want to understand this changing world and leave it better for our work.

We're not just any company. Our people, culture, and attitude along with their unique set of skills, experiences, and perspectives put us on a trajectory to change the world. We can't do it alone, though - we need fellow trailblazers. If you are one, join our team and help to keep our society safe!

STR is fully dedicated to hiring the most qualified candidate regardless of race, color, religion, sex (including gender identity, sexual orientation and pregnancy), marital status, national origin, age, veteran status, disability, genetic information or any other characteristic protected by federal, state or local laws.

If you need a reasonable accommodation for any portion of the employment process, email us at appassist@stresearch.com and provide your name, phone number and email address.

US Citizenship is required for all positions.",4.2,"Systems & Technology Research
4.2","Arlington, VA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2010,Company - Private,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
363,"Sr. Lab Engineer, R&D",$58k-$93k (Glassdoor Est.),"Sr. Lab Engineer, R&D, Scottsdale

Scottsdale

Arizona

Working at West means having an opportunity to work by the side of our patients and customers, our global team members and the communities in which we operate – which all help contribute to a Healthier World.

At West, we are by the side of patients. The work we do impacts patients’ lives each and every day – our products are a critical part of healthcare delivery and we are proud of the role we play to improve patient health. We work by the side of our team members. We come together as one global team to deliver for our customers and help them address their challenges. We are a diverse, close-knit community of professionals, where everyone has a voice and opportunity to learn and grow through mutual trust and respect. With a 95 year plus history, we have a track record for success, which includes reported sales of $1.84B in 2019. We serve by the side of our community. Giving back is in our DNA—our team members across more than 50 sites globally are involved with hundreds of charities that have special meaning to them through our West with Without Borders team member-led giving program.

Job Summary:

In this role, the Senior Lab Engineer will work under the direction of the Lab Supervisor to assist with test equipment qualifications, test fixture/jig design, test method development, and test method validations. This individual will bring excellent analytical and engineering skills, as well as leadership and mentoring talent to the execution of development projects at West. The essential duties and responsibilities are as follows:

Essential Duties and Responsibilities:
Provides subject matter expertise, leadership, and mentoring in the development of test methods, as well as the planning and coordination of test method validations (TMV) and Gage R&Rs for electromechanical medical devices.
Recognizes inefficiencies and takes initiative to improve processes and implement procedures to streamline workflows and increase effectiveness. Authors new and revises existing lab SOPs.
Assists in the designing, troubleshooting, and testing of laboratory figures and jigs as part of test method development activities.
Creates test programs on tensile/compression testing machines (Instron and Zwick).
Authors test method work instructions, TMV protocols/reports, Equipment qualification (IQ/OQ) protocols/reports.
Ensures lab equipment and environmental chambers receive the appropriate level of calibration and validation for their intended use.
Works closely with the Lab Supervisor, Verification Engineers, and Lab Technicians to plan, coordinate, and execute testing needs.
Performs data analysis (using Minitab), as needed, for technical reports.
Maintains a clean and tidy laboratory environment that is audit-ready at all times.
Exhibits regular, reliable, punctual and predictable attendance.
Demonstrates a “Customer Service” attitude when interacting with internal and external customers.
Conforms with and abides by all regulations, policies, work procedures, instruction, and all safety rules.
Basic Qualifications:
Required minimum education: Bachelor’s degree in engineering (mechanical engineering preferred)
Required minimum experience: 5-8 years of experience
Preferred Knowledge, Skills and Abilities:
Strong leadership qualities and mentorship to junior level engineers.
Subject matter expert in measurement system analysis, test method development, and test method validations (specifically Gage R&R) for electromechanical medical devices.
Subject matter expert in equipment qualifications and validations (IQ,OQ)
Experienced using and programming Instron and Zwick machines.
Excellent technical writing skills, with experience authoring SOPs, work instructions, protocols, and reports.
Experienced and proficient in Statistical data analysis using Minitab.
Proficient in CAD design and drafting in SolidWorks a plus
Proficient in MS Office suite including PowerPoint, Word, Excel and Outlook.
Excellent problem-solving skills as well as keen analytical abilities.
Excellent communication and interpersonal relations skills.
Knowledge of ISO 13485 – Quality Management Systems for Medical Devices.
Knowledge of 21 CFR 820.30 - Design Controls
Travel Requirements:
None


Physical & Mental Requirements:
Must be able to perform job duties as required with limited physical demands.


West is an equal opportunity employer and we value diversity at our company. We do not discriminate on the basis of race, religion, color, national origin, gender, sex, gender identity, sexual orientation, age, marital status, veteran status, or disability status. If you have a disability or special need that requires accommodation, please send an email to peggy.tayloe@westpharma.com. Where permitted by law, an offer of employment with West Pharmaceutical Services, or any of its subsidiary or affiliate companies, is contingent upon the satisfactory completion of background screening and/or a pre-employment drug screening.",3.1,"West Pharmaceutical Services
3.1","Scottsdale, AZ",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1923,Company - Public,Health Care Products Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
364,Territory Sales Engineer - CNC,$56k-$151k (Glassdoor Est.),"Overview


Why this role matters to you: Financial Empowerment! We empower our sales professionals to make decisions regarding how to grow your territory and we tie a strong compensation structure to the results of those decisions.

What’s more, you will have access to an extremely competent technical team that can support your needs on virtually any deal you may uncover Additionally, you will work in a very diverse market that is growing allowing you ample opportunities to “think out of the box"" when devising solutions that drive your clients’ business objectives.

The territory this role will cover ultimately will depend on a combination of the individual’s overall skill sets and experience, coupled with the business's needs as well as the candidate's geographical preference. However, in sum, it will focus on the Portland market.

(You can also see more about us at Glassdoor.com)

Responsibilities


- Generating projects/prospecting

- Managing profitability

- Maintaining current customers’ future business while simultaneously expanding new customer business in accordance with stated sales goals- Maintain electronic 30-60-90 day forecast- Follow Ellison Technologies sales training program- Utilize SalesForce.com and update client information in a timely fashion

Qualifications


So what are we looking for? Ideally, someone with a proven track record in sales, coupled with with machine cutting tool exposure, that will fit into our team oriented culture. We would also consider candidates with tooling, fixturing and CNC programming experience that would like to break into outside sales.

Someone with successful B2B sales and a desire to learn our highly sophisticated equipment may also be considered.

Ultimately the right candidate will pride themselves on being a hunter that is able to get through doors and “teach” prospective clients about their business and delivering creative, value added, solutions.

Our Mission: Equip manufacturers to compete and win, both locally and globally!

“The Ellison Way principles continue to drive our company forward. The Ellison Way principle of Adaptation will ensure that Ellison will evolve to further grow market share, strengthen our relationships with our key partners and our customers. The major focus moving forward must be on the development of Ellison’s most valuable resource – its people.""Graham Hooper (CEO)

""Ellison Technologies is an Equal Opportunity employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex including sexual orientation and gender identity, national origin, disability, protected Veteran Status, or any other characteristic protected by applicable federal, state, or local law.” #ZR *PM18",4.4,"ELLISON TECHNOLOGIES, INC.
4.4","Wilsonville, OR",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1955,Company - Private,Industrial Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
365,Junior Full Stack Engineer,$83k-$144k (Glassdoor Est.),"Join our team dedicated to developing and executing innovative solutions in support of customer mission success.

Job Description:

Our ideal candidate is an energetic technical practitioner with a broad based background that combines technical, problem solving, and customer service focus dedicated to the customer's mission. The customer's mission is at the forefront of national defense which offers the ideal candidate with the opportunity to help shape enhanced analytical capabilities with the customer's data fusion tool. The Junior Full Stack Engineer will lead a team to develop new features and capabilities based upon customer requirements and proofs of concept which will have an immediate impact with customers and end-users.

Basic Qualifications:
Experience with software/system development.
Experience working with front end technologies and backend web/service frameworks.
Technologies:
JavaScript Frameworks
Python
Java
Linux
Strong verbal and written communication skills. Must be able to engage with users in a professional manner and present technical concepts plainly to semi-technical customers.
Comfort with automation of non-routine tasks.
Desired Skills:
Highly motivated, interested in Big Data and Cloud environments; Amazon Web Services
Knowledge of microservice design methods and patterns.
Experience with:
Machine Learning Algorithms
Amazon Web Services
PostgreSQL
Robust, scalable data architecture
DevOps best practices
Agile development and methodologies
Security Clearance:
Must be eligible to obtain and maintain a security clearance
Novetta, from complexity to clarity.

Novetta delivers highly scalable advanced analytics and secure technology solutions to address challenges of national and global significance. Focused on mission success, Novetta pioneers disruptive technologies in machine learning, data analytics, full-spectrum cyber, cloud engineering, open source analytics, and multi-INT fusion for Defense, Intelligence Community, and Federal Law Enforcement customers. Novetta is headquartered in McLean, VA with over 1,000 employees across the U.S.

Our culture is shaped by a commitment to our core values:

Integrity • We hold ourselves accountable to the highest standards of integrity and ethics.

Customer Success • We strive daily to exceed expectations and achieve customer mission success.

Employee Focus • We invest in our employees' professional development and training, respecting individuality and fostering a culture of diversity and inclusion.

Innovation • We know that discovering new and innovative ways to solve problems is critical to our success and makes us a great company.

Excellence in Execution • We take pride in flawless execution as we build a company that is best in class.

Earn a REFERRAL BONUS for the qualified people you know.

For more details, or to submit a referral: bit.ly/NovettaReferrals

Novetta is an equal opportunity/affirmative action employer.

All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to sex, gender identity, sexual orientation, race, color, religion, national origin, disability, protected veteran status, age, or any other characteristic protected by law.",4.6,"Novetta
4.6","Crystal City, VA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2012,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
366,Machine Line Operator,$10-$19 Per Hour(Glassdoor Est.),"We are AAM. We have the POWER to move the world.

At AAM, we're looking for associates who push boundaries and drive solutions for the future. Innovators. Thinkers. Dreamers. Doers. No matter the role or function, every associate is a piece of what makes AAM great. Were growing and building #TeamAAM to be the best. Join us!

Job Posting Title

Machine Line Operator

Job Description Summary

Interact with Machining Line Production Supervisor/Team Leader for the purpose of safely operating equipment to make product that meets the Customers expectations while at levels of productivity that meet or exceed the established plan.

Job Description

Machining Line Specialists are required to learn and do the following skills:
Safety
Productivity
Proper Machine Operation
Conduct
Housekeeping/5S
Quality
Use the following documented procedures and instructions as required:
Standard Operating Procedures
Rework Instructions
Work Instructions
Preventive Maintenance Instructions
Inspection Instructions
Reaction Plans
Process Set-up Instructions
Associate Handbook
Police Housekeeping/5S
Posted Work Instructions
Review and verify the Quality of products at their assigned process and provide feedback to Leadership to keep everyone in aware of status of the process. Must fill out inspection log sheet for operation assigned.

Rotate to the appropriate operations when assigned by MLPS/TL

Facilitate communications between operations within assigned module, between modules, and between crews

Provide relief to other employees as required

Assist others with changeovers/setups as required

Complete Operation Productivity & Scrap Accountability Logsheets and verify the following for accuracy:
Total pcs. good and total pcs. scrap.
Feedback on process and operation.
Update area communication board.

Required Skills and Education
High School Diploma or GED preferred.
Manufacturing Machining preferred.
About American Axle & Manufacturing

For over 20 years, customers around the world have entrusted AAM to design, engineer, validate and manufacture driveline and metal forming technologies for automotive, commercial and industrial markets. Today, we are a premier global Tier 1 automotive supplier with broad capabilities across multiple product lines to deliver efficient, powerful and innovative solutions for our customers. Weve earned the trust of our suppliers and our customers through our steadfast commitments to quality, operational excellence and technology leadership.

AAM delivers power. We deliver power literally through vehicle components, systems and innovation, but we also deliver power in ways unseen. We power our associates, their families, and the communities in which we operate. Our global team of over 21,000 associates has a clear vision of where AAM is going and how we are going to get there. After all, they are the reason we are a leader in the automotive industry. We are powering the future. We are AAM. Move with us, and join #TeamAAM.

AAM will not discriminate against any Associate or applicant for employment because of age, race, color, gender, religion, weight, height, marital status, sexual orientation, genetic history or information, gender identity or expression, disability, protected veteran status, national origin, or other characteristic protected by law. AAM will take affirmative action to ensure that applicants are employed, and that Associates are treated equally during employment, without regard to their age, race, color, gender, religion, weight, height, marital status, sexual orientation, genetic history or information, gender identity or expression, disability, protected veteran status, national origin, or other characteristic protected by law. For the Disabled Job Seeker: We offer reasonable accommodations for qualified disabled individuals who are applicants for employment. To request assistance or accommodations, please e-mail aamhr@aam.com . AAM is an equal opportunity/affirmative action employer.

Unsolicited Resumes from Third-Party Recruiters

Please note that as per AAM policy, we do not accept unsolicited resumes from third-party recruiters unless such recruiters were engaged to provide candidates for a specified opening. Any employment agency, person or entity that submits an unsolicited resume does so with the understanding that AAM will have the right to hire that applicant at its discretion without any fee owed to the submitting employment agency, person or entity.",3.2,"American Axle & Manufacturing
3.2","North Vernon, IN",-1,10000+ Employees,1994,Company - Public,Transportation Equipment Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$5 to $10 billion (USD),-1
367,Machine Learning Engineer/Scientist,$143k-$166k (Glassdoor Est.),"About the Position


Jane Street is seeking exceptional candidates for the role of Senior Machine Learning Engineer/Scientist.

Responsibilities:
Help lead the effort to expand and improve Jane Street's ML infrastructure and data pipeline.
Collaborate with teams of researchers and traders in our offices around the world to design and train ML models.
Invent new techniques when necessary to deal with the specific problems Jane Street works on.
About You
At least three years experience building ML infrastructure and production models in an industrial setting.
Very strong coding skills, including experience developing and deploying large software projects.
Deep experience with applying one or more major ML packages (e.g. TensorFlow, PyTorch) to very large data sets.
A desire to push the boundaries of ML to better deal with the problems specific to financial data including low signal-to-noise ratios and non-stationarity.
No finance background is necessary.",4.8,"Jane Street
4.8","New York, NY",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2000,Company - Private,Investment Banking & Asset Management,Finance,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
368,Machine Learning / Computer Vision Engineer,$72k-$129k (Glassdoor Est.),"Description:The coolest jobs on this planet or any other are with Lockheed Martin Space!

At the dawn of a new space age, Lockheed Martin is a pioneer, partner, innovator and builder. Our amazing men and women are on a mission to make a difference in the world and every day we use our unique skills and experiences to create, design and build solutions to some of the worlds hardest engineering problems. Our culture encourages employees to dream big, perform with excellence and create incredible products. We provide the resources, inspiration and focus and if you have the passion and courage to dream big, we want to build a better tomorrow with you!

We are seeking engineers and scientists interested in a fast-paced design-test-learn life cycle for innovative computer vision projects for space. Utilizing world-class space development and test facilities, LM seeks to engineer the next generation of robust, autonomous space vehicle perception and visible navigation solutions across a variety of challenging missions. Desired experience in and/or knowledge of feature detection, tracking, matching, 3D reconstruction from multiple views, optimization for estimation problems, optical calibration, optical radiometry, image simulation, pose estimation, and algorithm implementation in embedded platforms is desired. With an appetite for accepting risk and a drive for innovation, this team intends to employ the latest advances in machine learning, autonomous driving, and deep learning research to meet exciting, emerging customer needs.

In this role, you can expect to be immersed within a talented team of engineers working across a variety of potential roles in a machine learning / computer vision leadership role. Maturation of simulation environments across a range of phenomenologys are utilized for synthetic image generation. Simulation based performance analysis within a closed-loop simulation environment, inclusive of vehicle guidance, navigation, and control (GNC) simulations, demonstrates end-to-end mission capability. Porting C/C++ code to space-industry leading avionics platforms run within real-time hardware-in-the-loop (HWIL) environments enables the team to demonstrate platform performance. Test environments involving multiple robots hosting rendezvous and proximity operation sensor platforms and space object mockups enables test-like-you flight autonomous demonstrations to retire risk prior to flight. Within this group, we value employees, their contributions, and work hard to build cohesive teams aligned to meet mission needs.

To promote the sharing of ideas, Lockheed Martin fosters an inclusive work environment that encourages differences and big-picture thinking.

Our employees play an active role in strengthening the quality of life where we live and work by volunteering more than 850,000 hours annually. Here are some of the benefits you can enjoy:
Medical
Dental
401k
Paid time off
Work/life balance
Career
Mentorship opportunities
Rewards & recognition
You can learn more about Lockheed Martins competitive and comprehensive benefits package by visiting this link. (https://www.lockheedmartinjobs.com/working-here#benefits)
Basic Qualifications:
• Minimum BS degree in a related technical discipline
• Experience in one or more of the following: Algorithm development, simulation, optical and software engineering
• Academic or demonstrated technical skills in at least one of the following areas: computer vision, machine learning and computer programming, development of flight vehicle GNC/FSW architectures
• Strong team collaboration, communication and presentation skills including experience in providing mentoring
• Possess an active DOD TS clearance or SCI
Desired Skills:
• C/C++ programming background
• Image Processing
• Strong fundamental understanding in Computer Vision
• Algorithm development
• Feature detection, matching, and estimation
• Experience with model based software development using Simulink (autocoding)
• Experience developing robust flight software from GNC algorithm prototypes
• Ability to work in a fast-paced, collaborative team environment
• Excellent written and verbal communication skills, strong social skills, and ability to build consensus among peers while building solid relationships with team members
• Active TS/SCI clearance with Poly
BASIC QUALIFICATIONS:
job.Qualifications

Lockheed Martin is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, pregnancy, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, protected veteran status, or disability status.
Join us at Lockheed Martin, where your mission is ours. Our customers tackle the hardest missions. Those that demand extraordinary amounts of courage, resilience and precision. Theyre dangerous. Critical. Sometimes they even provide an opportunity to change the world and save lives. Those are the missions we care about.

As a leading technology innovation company, Lockheed Martins vast team works with partners around the world to bring proven performance to our customers toughest challenges. Lockheed Martin has employees based in many states throughout the U.S., and Internationally, with business locations in many nations and territories.
EXPERIENCE LEVEL:
Experienced Professional",3.9,"Lockheed Martin
3.9","Littleton, CO",-1,10000+ Employees,1995,Company - Public,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$10+ billion (USD),-1
369,"Engineer, Machine Learning",$47k-$87k (Glassdoor Est.),"Job Summary:

Comcast Applied AI Research is an innovative research group within Comcast’s Technology & Product organization with offices in DC, Philadelphia, Denver, Chicago and Silicon Valley that engages in groundbreaking research to reinvent the customer experience for Comcast’s 22+ Million consumers using AI and machine learning!

As a lead researcher in the Natural Language Processing (NLP) group, you will be part of a team of researchers and engineers to build the core algorithms powering a voice platform used by millions of people every day. We use advanced Machine Learning (ML) to build a conversational NLP system that understands the user's intent, whether they are looking for the latest movies or trying to access their bill. You will join our rapidly growing Applied AI research and engineering team that is responsible for the full stack and operationalization of high-profile products and services at Comcast.

What you’ll do:
Apply scientific knowledge in NLP and ML to analyze and collect data, perform analyses, create hypotheses, design and implement solutions, as well as conduct experiments to evaluate these.
Develop novel approaches to problems such text classification, semantic parsing and dialog, applied to real-world applications in the entertainment, digital home and customer service domains, impacting millions of Xfinity customers.
Collaborate with other researchers, engineers, product managers across Comcast to design customer-centric solutions that consider fairness as well as business value.
Present your work both to internal stakeholders as well as to external audiences, including academic publications.
Be responsible for delivering a research project from end to end, defining the requirements, exploring alternatives, setting timelines, releasing the software and finally deploying to the end customer.
Consistent exercise of independent judgment and discretion in matters of significance.
Regular, consistent and punctual attendance. Must be able to work nights and weekends, variable schedule(s) as necessary.
Other duties and responsibilities as assigned.
Highly preferred:
You specialize in NLP, ML, deep learning, optimization techniques and evaluation methodologies.
You are good at researching ideas and formulating creative solutions to complex problems.
You have hands-on experience coding machine learning systems with common libraries like Tensorflow and PyTorch.
You are passionate about developing production-ready high-quality software.
You are comfortable communicating sophisticated ideas to broad audiences.
You have experience as a tech lead for small cross-functional teams.
Publications at top academic venues like EMNLP, *ACL, SIGIR, AAAI, NeurIPS, KDD, etc.
PhD in Computer Science, Linguistics or related field.
Employees at all levels are expected to:
Understand our Operating Principles; make them the guidelines for how you do your job
Own the customer experience - think and act in ways that put our customers first, give them seamless digital options at every touchpoint, and make them promoters of our products and services
Know your stuff - be enthusiastic learners, users and advocates of our game-changing technology, products and services, especially our digital
tools and experiences
Win as a team - make big things happen by working together and being open to new ideas
Be an active part of the Net Promoter System - a way of working that brings more employee and customer feedback into the company - by joining
huddles, making call backs and helping us elevate opportunities to do better for our customers
Drive results and growth
Respect and promote inclusion and diversity
Do what's right for each other, our customers, investors and our communities

Job Specification:
Bachelor’s Degree
Computer Science, Engineering, Applied Mathematics, or Statistics
Generally requires 7-11 years related experience.",3.1,"Contingent Network Services
3.1","Washington, DC",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1984,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
370,Machine Learning Platform Engineer,-1,"Aquabyte is seeking a Machine Learning Platform Engineer to drive the development, testing, and delivery of machine learning models that enable cutting-edge analytics and automation of fish farms around the world.

Watch our TV episode with Amazon's CTO at a Norwegian fish farm: https://youtu.be/YZ_qJ5JFD3I

Our mission

Aquabyte is on a mission to revolutionize the sustainability and efficiency of aquaculture. It is an audacious, and incredibly rewarding mission. By making fish farming cheaper and more viable than livestock production, we aim to mitigate one of the biggest causes of climate change and help prepare our planet for impending population growth. Aquaculture is the single fastest growing food-production sector in the world, and now is the time to define how technology is used to harvest the sea for generations to come.

We are a diverse, mission-driven team that is eager to work alongside kindred spirits. If this vision makes you smile, gives you goosebumps, or otherwise inspires you please get in touch.

Our product

We are currently focused on helping Norwegian salmon farmers better understand their fish populations and make environmentally-sound decisions. Through custom underwater cameras, computer vision, and machine learning we are able to quantify fish weights, detect sea lice infestations, and generate optimal feeding plans in real time. Our product operates at three levels: on-site hardware for image capture, cloud pipelines for data processing, and a user-facing web application. As a result, there are hundreds of moving pieces and no shortage of fascinating challenges across all levels of the stack.

Above all, Aquabyte is a customer-driven company. Our product development is dictated by the needs of fish farmers and we prioritize customer delight in everything we do. We are committed to build a global, collaborative team that creates value far beyond Silicon Valley.

The role

It is an exciting time for Aquabyte: we are on the verge of scaling our machine learning solutions to hundreds of fish farms across Norway and other geographies. A highly scalable machine learning product requires excellent infrastructure for monitoring algorithm performance, versioning production models, and visualizing data. We seek an engineer who can lead the charge on these initiatives, ideally one with vast experience in operating at the intersection of machine learning and software development.

As a Machine Learning Platform Engineer, you will be responsible for building out and maintaining a robust, scalable machine learning infrastructure for Aquabyte's research team. You will build continuous integration workflows to strengthen our codebase, build dashboards to extract visual insights from an ever-growing dataset, and bring the best software development practices to a small, world-class research team. Your work will directly help establish Aquabyte's machine learning product as the industry standard in aquaculture technology.

Job Responsibilities
Serve as the key engineer responsible for building out and maintaining a robust, scalable machine learning infrastructure for Aquabyte's research team
Build continuous automated retraining framework for models in production to enable online learning
Create infrastructure for versioning, deploying, and monitoring production models
Develop, test, and deploy entire machine learning production pipelines from ingest to visualization
Build testing and continuous integration workflows for an ever-growing ML research codebase
Maintain high-quality internal dashboards for data analysis and visualization
Work at the cutting-edge of the latest machine learning and computer vision research.

Qualifications
Masters or PhD in CS / EE or equivalent from a top research university.
5+ years of experience with building machine learning pipelines and infrastructure
5+ years of experience with cloud tools (AWS, GCP)
Intimate experience with relational databases (MySQL, Postgres)
Experience with creating analytics dashboards for machine learning products
Experience with maintaining large research code bases
Previous startup experience
Extremely strong coding abilities, especially in Python
Ability to work independently and efficiently on projects.
Bonus Qualifications
5-10 years of industry experience
Intimate experience with classical machine learning, deep learning, and data science
Knowledge in making inference faster / reducing weights in deep learning models
Knowledge in distributed training for deep learning models
Additional Information
Enjoy excellent benefits, including equity in the company, a 401k program and paid lunch every day
Evolve in a very fast-paced engineering environment with short development cycles
Be able to shape a revolutionary product in its early days
Get ideas, feedback, and suggestions from other best-in-their-field engineers
Travel between SF and Norway
For an overview of Aquabyte, watch this documentary by Amazon's CTO https://youtu.be/YZ_qJ5JFD3I

Aquabyte's mission is to revolutionize the sustainability of aquaculture, the fastest growing sector of food production. By helping fish farming overtake livestock production, we aim to mitigate one of the biggest causes of climate change and prepare our planet for increasing population growth. Our team is driven by this mission, and believes that problem solving has never been so important.

Aquabyte is a private company headquartered in San Francisco, and is supported by NEA, Costanoa Ventures, and many others.

At Aquabyte, we admire interesting people with unique backgrounds. We strongly encourage you to apply even if you don’t satisfy all the requirements. We will get back to you as soon as possible.",4.2,"Aquabyte
4.2","San Francisco, CA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2017,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
371,Embedded Software Engineer- Machine Learning,$54k-$100k (Glassdoor Est.),"The ideal candidate for this position will be able to reason about how to best implement services running on embedded systems which resource constraints while still developing solutions using modern tools. Having a focus on taking data and running inference/prediction algorithms with minimal latency. Work in a team with machine learning expertise, filling in gaps from the embedded engineering side.

JOB RESPONSIBILITIES:
Design and implement services to do ML inference (audio/video)
Messaging from ML output to appropriate services
Receive messages to change service and/or ML output according to user preference
Analyze inference speed and help identify areas to improve speed
Requirements

SKILLS:
C, C++
Strong understanding of linear algebra and numerical optimization
Experience with programming numerical algorithms (in machine learning or other fields) is desired
Experience developing large scale deployable software products
Experience working on large, complex codebases
Familiarity with version control tools (GIT)
Familiarity with CI/CD pipelines (ideally for cross-compiled projects)
HELPFUL SKILLS:
TensorFlow/TensorFlow Lite, Caffe
ARM Compute Library, ARMNN
Older ARM architectures (ARMv5)
Rust
DSP – Audio/Video
Gstreamer plugins
Benefits

Why Vivint:
Free catered lunch/snacks/drinks; new menu daily
Paid holidays and flexible paid time away
Your choice between Mac or PC
Employee pricing on smart home products
Casual dress code
Onsite gym
Onsite health clinic
Medical/dental/vision/life coverage
What We Stand For:

Honesty and Integrity Come First

Do the right thing

Customer Obsession is Our Advantage

A relentless passion to serve the customer

Innovation is Essential

Today’s innovation is tomorrow’s lifeblood

We Win Together

Individuals win games: teams win championships

Exceptional is Expected

Talk is cheap: create value, not just motion

We Give Back

Helping people is core to our DNA

Find out more about what it's like to work here:

Behind the big orange logo: an inside look at Vivint Smart Home

Why Vivint Smart Home is One of the Most Innovative Companies

Vivint's Culture",3.5,"Vivint, Inc.
3.5","Lehi, UT",-1,10000+ Employees,1998,Company - Public,Security Services,Business Services,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
372,"Software Engineer, Machine Learning Infrastructure",-1,"More than 100 million digital readers come to The New York Times every month. We use machine learning in the software we build and deploy to power content recommendations, personalization, subscription optimization and newsroom tools.

We are looking for a Software Engineer who will help develop machine learning pipelines and backend infrastructure. Some examples of projects where your skills are needed:

Enable batch and real-time algorithmic targeting capabilities

Build pipelines to train and test algorithms to provide real-time content recommendations

Build a platform to segment users in real-time

Since the team develops and operates their systems in production, you will have ownership of deploying, monitoring and supporting our apps at scale.

By joining our team, you will strengthen a company whose mission matters more than ever. You’ll help ensure that the journalism of a 1600 person newsroom reaches as many people as possible. We, in the technology organization, are always introspecting to improve our culture , understand how we work and be open about how we build things hoping to learn more from others . We believe in a diverse environment and we work very hard to make it happen . We value everyone’s ideas and encourage people to bring their ideas out .

Some of the questions we explore:

How can we production-ize machine learning solutions at scale across the company?

How can we design flexible and reliable pipelines and frameworks to respond to users in real time?

How can we best mix active and passive signals to create a more personalized experience for our readers?

How can we find the best possible audience for a news article?

Requirements:

2+ years of relevant experience, including a CS background with experience operating large systems in a production environment

Development skills in Python or Go

Experience with GCP or other cloud computing platforms

An understanding of data processing, validation, and scheduling requirements necessary in a ML production environment

Experience working on cross-functional projects

Interest in ML, NLP, or personalization

Desire to work with colleagues as a team

Desired:

Experience with machine learning in real-world applications

Experience writing and optimizing SQL queries

Visualization skills to provide insights on data

Open source work you can share with us

Published work (blogs count too)

You don't need to know it all and there will be many opportunities to learn.

The New York Times is committed to a diverse and inclusive workforce, one that reflects the varied global community we serve. Our journalism and the products we build in the service of that journalism greatly benefit from a range of perspectives, which can only come from diversity of all types, across our ranks, at all levels of the organization. Achieving true diversity and inclusion is the right thing to do. It is also the smart thing for our business. So we strongly encourage women, veterans, people with disabilities, people of color and gender nonconforming candidates to apply.

The New York Times Company is an Equal Opportunity Employer and does not discriminate on the basis of an individual's sex, age, race, color, creed, national origin, alienage, religion, marital status, pregnancy, sexual orientation or affectional preference, gender identity and expression, disability, genetic trait or predisposition, carrier status, citizenship, veteran or military status and other personal characteristics protected by law. All applications will receive consideration for employment without regard to legally protected characteristics. The New York Times Company will consider qualified applicants, including those with criminal histories, in a manner consistent with the requirements of applicable state and local ""Fair Chance"" laws.",3.0,"The New York Times
3.0","New York, NY",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
373,Deep Learning Engineer,-1,"Help us solve automated intelligence. Led by professors from Stanford, Berkeley, and MIT, we are focused on moving mature machine learning research into the hands of industry. Located in historic Palo Alto, right next to Stanford campus. Some benefits:
Tackle intellectually challenging problems
Free lunch, snacks, drinks, and caffeine every day
Gym membership with yoga and pilates classes next door
Health, dental, and vision insurance with 100% paid premiums
Free onsite parking for easy commute, also close to Caltrain
Budget for whatever hardware you want
Flexible hours
Competitive Salary and Equity
Responsibilities
Create new neural network architectures and integrate them into the Matroid platform.
Develop prototypes and execute experiments to help guide engineering efforts.
Explore new model families and machine learning algorithms.
Experience with Deep Learning and CNNs.
Minimum Requirements
Bachelors in Computer Science (AI/ML specialization), Statistics, Mathematics (Probability), or equivalent.
Strong foundations in probability, linear algebra, and optimization.
Background in machine learning.
Preferred Qualifications
Experience with large-scale industrial applications of statistical modeling and inference.
Experience with machine learning in computer vision.
PhD in Computer Science (AI/ML specialization), Statistics, Mathematics (Probability), or equivalent.",5.0,"Matroid
5.0","Palo Alto, CA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2016,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
374,"Software Engineer, Machine Learning",-1,"We are hiring a software engineer for our ML Engineering team to work closely with research scientists to turn proof-of-concept deep learning projects into high-performance, scalable, production-grade software. This is an opportunity to own critical components of our computer vision stack and develop robust, generalizable models for activity recognition, gesture recognition, person detection, and person tracking.

In this role, you'll be taking research code and leveraging our data collection pipelines to build well-distributed datasets, optimize and train deep learning models, and build inference engines to deploy them to edge and cloud platforms. You will be working closely with our infrastructure and cloud engineering teams to drive data management and tooling, and you'll get exposure to state-of-the-art ML technology and be part of a team that celebrates continuous learning and innovation.
Responsibilities
Implementing, training, and optimizing models developed by our ML Science team
Developing high-performance, scalable, and maintainable inference services that communicate with the rest of our tech stack
Working with Infra teams to build data collection pipelines, manage data QA, and develop code for data visualization and data cleansing to build robust datasets
Turning unfamiliar research code into bulletproof, production-ready software
Working with edge hardware to test and tune the latency and performance of our services
Building pipelines for continuous model improvement
Qualifications
Strong grasp of statistical machine learning, linear algebra, and deep learning for computer vision
Excellent C++11/14/17 and Python skills; familiarity with TensorFlow
Ability to rapidly learn and work with unfamiliar code
Understanding of CI/CD patterns and best practices
Ability to write well-tested code
Highly flexible and capable of working across the stack
Great communication skills
Nice-to-Haves
Working knowledge of Bayesian state estimation, geometric computer vision, and linear programming
Prior exposure to database management and SQL
Experience with heterogeneous compute pipelines (CPU/TPU/GPU) and embedded software
Knowledge of Docker and Kubernetes
Zippin is an artificial intelligence company that provides the next generation of checkout-free technology to every retailer. Our mission is to use machine learning, computer vision and sensor fusion technology to banish checkout lines and self-scanners for good, so shoppers can zip in and out with their purchases. Zippin's solution enables every retailer to provide a checkout-free experience to their customers.

Zippin’s headquarters are in San Francisco, CA, with offices in San Carlos, CA, Toronto, ON, and India. Industry veterans from Amazon, Apple, VMWare, and SRI founded the company and raised over $15M in funding from Evolv, NTT Docomo, SAP, and Maven Ventures. We're growing fast and want you to help us meet customer demand!",5.0,"Zippin
5.0","San Carlos, CA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2018,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
375,Sr Lead Information Security Engineer,$70k-$115k (Glassdoor Est.),"About Lumen
Lumen is guided by our belief that humanity is at its best when technology advances the way we live and work. With 450,000 route fiber miles serving customers in more than 60 countries, we deliver the fastest, most secure global platform for applications and data to help businesses, government and communities deliver amazing experiences. Learn more about Lumen’s network, edge cloud, security and communication and collaboration solutions and our purpose to further human progress through technology at news.lumen.com, LinkedIn: /lumentechnologies, Twitter: @lumentechco, Facebook: /lumentechnologies, Instagram: @lumentechnologies and YouTube: /lumentechnologies.

The Role

Lumen's Black Lotus Labs is looking for a Sr Lead Information Security Engineer. This team works on large data sets looking for security threats in the Internet. We need your skills to help understand, research, and find more risks. The type of person we are looking for is an established member of the threat intel community with a wide knowledge of security and a strong desire to learn even more. If you enjoy hunting threats and helping clean up the Internet, then this is the job for you.

The Main Responsibilities
Mentoring more junior members of the team in growing their analytical and security skillsets
An understanding of complex attack methods
Experience using OSINT methods for investigation
An ability to forensically analyze an attack
Setting priority of what threats to analyze and how long to spend on them to maximize the team's impact
Strong knowledge of systems architecture and security
An ability to automate investigation through light-weight software development
Building and maintaining trust relationships with other intelligence teams, law enforcement, and other outside groups
Deep network and application protocol knowledge
Knowledge of application security methodologies
An ability to understand malware’s behavior
Working collaboratively with closely partnered internal teams to accomplish work

Well experienced candidates may also have the following skills:

Experience penetration testing or participating in CTF contests
Comfort with cryptographic theory and application
Understanding of WAN networks and routing protocols
Familiarity with extracting data through SQL
Experience using statistical analysis methods
Development knowledge with Python, Java or Scala
Understanding of static or dynamic analysis of malware
Experience with Elasticsearch, Splunk, Tableau or other data visualization tools
What We Look For in a Candidate

Required (education / experience / skills / competencies)

Experience with tracking of threat actors
Ability to analyze large data sets and draw conclusions
Experience developing automation and analysis in python-based environments
Strong Unix knowledge
Deep knowledge of network-based threats and identifying behaviors without attack payloads
Ability to work with others in providing direction and assisting in learning new topics
Strong writing skills to assist in sharing our knowledge with the public

Preferred

Functional knowledge of machine learning and how it can be applied to data sets
Public speaking experience and a willingness to share technical topics in public forum

Requisition #: 232801

EEO Statement
We are committed to providing equal employment opportunities to all persons regardless of race, color, ancestry, citizenship, national origin, religion, veteran status, disability, genetic characteristic or information, age, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity, marital status, family status, pregnancy, or other legally protected status (collectively, “protected statuses”). We do not tolerate unlawful discrimination in any employment decisions, including recruiting, hiring, compensation, promotion, benefits, discipline, termination, job assignments or training.

Disclaimer
The above job definition information has been designed to indicate the general nature and level of work performed by employees within this classification. It is not designed to contain or be interpreted as a comprehensive inventory of all duties, responsibilities, and qualifications required of employees assigned to this job. Job duties and responsibilities are subject to change based on changing business needs and conditions.",3.2,"Lumen
3.2","Herndon, VA",-1,10000+ Employees,1930,Company - Public,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),-1
376,Machine Learning Engineer / AD,$90k-$133k (Glassdoor Est.),"Responsibilities:
Develop and tuning machine learning algorithms for ads ranking to boost organic business growth
Design and develop ads ranking strategies to boost organic business growth
Design and develop features for better click-through rate prediction
Work closely with application teams to ensure online delivery
Work with state-of-the-art deep-learning frameworks such as TensorFlow, Caffe and PyTorch
Basic Qualifications
MS/Ph.D in computer science or software engineering or equivalent
Relevant professional experience (1+ years) in tuning deep learning model, with understanding in deep cross network, and click-through rate prediction preferred
Experience with various ads ranking strategies in different scenarios
Experience/familiarity with large data and distributed systems
Experience/familiarity with one or more of the following languages: pig Latin, Scala, Spark, Python, C++
Experience/familiarity with ML packages such as TensorFlow, Scikit-learn, Caffe, Theano, and PyTorch
About JD-Business Growth

The Business Growth BU at JD.com was established in 2011. The engineering team is a group of dynamic geeks from world-class universities and industry-leading companies working in fields such as machine learning, analytics, statistics, NLP, information retrieval, system infrastructures, etc., based in Beijing and Mountain View, CA. We do battle every single day with some of the most significant, rewarding and fun problems in the technology industry, including but not limited to search/display, ads retrieval and recommendation, spam-traffic and click-farm detection, AI/machine learning infrastructure development, traffic and revenue prediction, ads pricing, audience expansion, etc., and we are looking to add great talent to our growing family!

JD.com is an Equal Opportunity Employer, making decisions without regard to race, color, religion, creed, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, marital status, national origin, age, veteran status, disability, or any other protected class.",3.6,"JD.com
3.6","Mountain View, CA",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,-1,Company - Public,"Department, Clothing, & Shoe Stores",Retail,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
377,Machine Learning Engineer,$118k-$201k (Glassdoor Est.),"With the continued impact of COVID-19 and social distancing measures, Kensho is conducting all interviews and on-boarding activities remotely. At the present time, all employees are working remotely, until further notice. When the time comes to open our offices, Kensho will fully support those employees who would like to continue working remotely and not ask anyone to return to the office until they are comfortable.

At Kensho, we hire talented people and give them the freedom, support, and resources needed to build cutting edge technology and products for our parent company, S&P Global. As a result, we produce technology that is scalable, robust, and solves the challenges of one of the world’s largest, most successful financial institutions.

As a Machine Learning Engineer, you will be responsible for tackling a wide range of problems from natural language processing to timeseries prediction. You will move beyond the theoretical confines of academia and apply your tradecraft to build machine learning systems on real world data. In this role, you will constantly collaborate and work with groups of engineers. Our Machine Learning team is responsible for delivering ML-based solutions from problem framing, to prototyping, and production application.
Are you looking to make impactful, scalable contributions that transform the way we think about data? If so, we would love to help you excel here at Kensho. We take pride in our tightly-knit, team-based community that provides our Kenshins with a collaborative, supportive environment to bring transparency to the biggest challenges in data.
What You’ll Do
You will conduct original research on large proprietary and open source data sets
Identify, research, prototype, and build predictive products
You will build cutting-edge models for understanding vast amounts of textual data
Write production code
You will write tests to ensure the robustness and reliability of your productionized models
You will work closely with software engineers to build incredible systems
Technologies You’ll Use
Python and specifically NumPy, SciPy, Pandas, SciKit-learn
Neural network packages like TensorFlow/Keras and pytorch
ML packages like LightGBM and XGBoost
OpenFST
Elasticsearch
Required Skills, Knowledge & Experience
You have 3+ years of experience being a major machine learning contributor at a top company, hedge fund, or university
You have at least one core programming expertise, such as Python (NumPy, SciPy, Pandas), MATLAB, or R
You have experience with advanced machine learning methods
You possess strong statistical knowledge, intuition, and experience modeling real data
You demonstrate effective coding, documentation, and communication habits
You have a strong research acumen and experiment design skills
You have the ability and credibility to lead a team
You have a stellar ability to communicate even the most complicated methods and results to a broad, often non-technical audience
Several of the following terms should hold deep meaning for you: LSTM, lookahead bias, bagging, boosting, stacking, information retrieval, batch norm, entity recognition, bootstrapping, Glorot initialization, Kullback-Leibler divergence, GLOVE, SMAPE, HMM, MAP, exponential family, VC dimension, EM, L1, TD(Lambda)
How to Really Get Our Attention
Your GitHub/Kaggle profile shows a project or problems you’ve tackled
You have relevant research or publications
You are a specialist in deep learning in an academic setting or production-grade machine learning


At Kensho, we pride ourselves on providing top-of-market benefits, including:
- Medical, Dental, and Vision insurance
- 100% company paid premiums
- Unlimited Paid Time Off
- 20 weeks of 100% paid Parental Leave (paternity and maternity)
- 401(k) plan with 6% employer matching
- Generous company matching on donations to non-profit charities
- Up to $20,000 tuition assistance toward degree programs, plus up to $4,000/year for ongoing professional education such as industry conferences
- Plentiful snacks, drinks, and regularly catered lunches
- Dog-friendly office (CAM office)
- In-office gyms and showers (CAM, DC) or Equinox membership (LA, NYC)
- Stipend towards commuter or gym reimbursement
- Bike sharing program memberships
- Compassion leave and elder care leave
- Mentoring and additional learning opportunities
- Opportunity to expand professional network and participate in conferences and events
About Kensho
Kensho uses machine learning, artificial intelligence, natural language processing and data visualization techniques to solve some of the hardest analytical problems and create breakthrough financial intelligence solutions for our parent company, S&P Global.
Kensho was founded in 2013 by Harvard & MIT alums and was acquired by S&P Global in 2018. Kensho continues to operate as a startup in order to maintain our distinct, independent brand and to promote our breakthrough, innovative culture. Our team of Kenshins enjoy a dynamic and collaborative work environment that runs autonomously from S&P, while leveraging the unparalleled breadth and depth of data and resources available as part of S&P Global. As Kenshins, we pride ourselves on maintaining an innovative culture that depends on diversity and inclusion.
We are an equal opportunity employer that welcomes future Kenshins with all experiences and perspectives. Kensho is headquartered in Cambridge, MA, with offices in New York City, Washington D.C. and Los Angeles. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, or national origin.",4.1,"Kensho
4.1","Cambridge, MA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2013,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
378,Data Scientist,$90k-$115k (Glassdoor Est.),"The Smule mission is to connect people all over the world through the joy of making music at massive social scale. Music is much more than just listening… it's about creating, sharing, discovering, participating, and connecting with people. It is a social network with the power to break down barriers, touch souls and bring people together from all over the world.

At Smule, your work will directly impact the product experience of millions of users. You will work collaboratively alongside a team of talented data scientists on cutting-edge projects that have high visibility. You will leverage our datasets that contain demographic, transactional, behavioral, social, text, and audio and video data. We offer a stable, collaborative, and a supportive work environment with a constant stream of new things to learn.

If you have a passion for quality data science and software engineering practices, and enjoy working in a fast-paced, iterative, and a highly rewarding development environment, then Smule is the place for you!

Responsibilities:
Build, validate, and deploy machine learning models and recommender systems in batch and real time pipeline
Have a customer first approach with a focus on improving user experience by optimizing functional and non-functional parameters such as performance, accessibility, and security.
Write technical specifications, document design approach and all findings, and share with the team
Show thought leadership and effectively incorporate machine learning into product features
Be a high-performing team player who enjoys collaborating with, learning from, and mentoring other team members to create a positive work environment.
Automate data cleaning, transformations, feature engineering, governance, and analysis.
Communicate findings clearly and succinctly to technical and non-technical audience.
Requirements
4+ years experience in a data scientist role with a proven track record of deploying machine learning models to production
Strong programming skills in Python and Scala and distributed technologies such as Spark, Kafka, and Hadoop
Ability to use machine learning frameworks such as scikit-learn, SparkML, or Tensorflow, and tools such as notebooks (Jupyter, Zepellin).
Experience with NoSQL and SQL databases, such as Cassandra and Snowflake, respectively.
Experience in building and deploying machine learning recommender systems a plus
MS/PhD in computer science, mathematics, statistics, or related fields, or equivalent industry experience.
There's one more, very important thing. We are an equal opportunity employer. We search for amazing people of diverse backgrounds, experiences, abilities, and perspectives. We take care of each other to create an inclusive work environment where we love to come to work every day.",4.0,"Smule
4.0","San Francisco, CA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2008,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
379,Machine Learning (ML) Engineer,-1,"What we are looking for

Job Description:

The client is looking for a Machine Learning (ML) Engineer who is well-versed in Machine Learning to be a part of a highly talented engineering team to help create new products and services from the ground up for next-generation connected vehicles. We are looking for team members that are required to be creative in solving problems, excited to work in new technology areas, and be ready to wear multiple hats to get things done in a highly-energized, fast-paced, innovative, and collaborative startup environment.

Responsibilities:

Design and develop solutions using Machine Learning and other advanced AI technologies to solve a variety of problems
Translate user stories and business requirements to technical solutions by building quick prototypes or proof of concepts with several business and technical stakeholder groups in both internal and external organizations
Convert the proof of concepts to production-grade solutions that can scale for hundreds of thousands of users
Be hands-on where required and lead by following best practices in development and CI/CD methods
Own delivery of features from top to bottom, from concept to code to production
Develop tools and libraries that will enable rapid and scalable development in the future

Qualifications:

You are smart and can demonstrate it

4+ years of experience in software development for high-tech products or services
2+ years of hands-on experience delivering products or solutions that utilized Machine Learning, Natural Language Processing or other forms of AI solutions like machine vision
Highly skilled in Python and preferably in one or more programming languages like C++, Java, Go, etc
Strong hands-on experience in one or more of the Machine Learning tools like TensorFlow, Keras, Theano, or Caffe and have solved several real-life problems using these
Experience in a variety of Deep Learning architectures and models including Residual Networks, RNN/CNN, Transformer, and/or Transfer Learning in a production environment
Experience in one or more NLP libraries (i.e. spaCy, NLTK, etc) is a plus
Experience with handling Big Data (Spark, HBase, Kafka, etc) is a plus
You are confident in expressing your point of view from a position of knowledge and experience. You are also receptive to feedback and open to revising your plans when appropriate
We think the knowledge acquired earning a degree Computer Science would be of great value in this position, but if you're smart and have the experience that backs up your abilities, for us, talent trumps degree every time
LOCATION
Plano, TX
JOB TYPE
Contract
(12 months)
POSTED DATE
07/24/2020",4.2,"MRoads
4.2","Plano, TX",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2011,Private Practice / Firm,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
380,Machine Learning Engineer,$68k-$122k (Glassdoor Est.),"Machine Learning Engineer

Are you interested in working in a dynamic environment that offers opportunities for professional growth and new responsibilities? If so, Deloitte & Touche LLP could be the place for you. At Deloitte, we are creating a world-class Artificial Intelligence and Machine Learning (AI/ML) Center of Excellence to enhance Deloitte’s existing services (Cyber Security, Fraud Detection, Risk Management, etc.) and empower our clients to gain exponential value from their data. Our focus is on bringing data, analytics, and technology together with our deep expertise in multiple industries to drive new product development and significant automation/efficiencies.

Work you’ll do

We are seeking to grow our team with brilliant and diverse contributors with technical ability. We are looking for machine learning experts that want to be part of a team that has an opportunity to make a significant impact. Opportunities to assist clients will span from genetics (new medicines development) to self-driving vehicles to capital markets modeling. This is an exciting role that will stretch your knowledge and curiosity, offering the opportunity to learn new skills and work within a global community.

The team

This is a hands-on position where you will be empowered to be creative, ambitious, and bold; to solve novel problems and have the potential to directly impact the lives of people around the world. We have impressive tool-kits and clients with world class data, and we are now looking for talented people to join our team.

Qualifications

Required:

Must be legally authorized to work in the United States without the need for employer sponsorship, now or at any time in the future
Influence machine learning strategy for a program/project; explore design options to assess efficiency and impact, develop approaches to improve robustness and rigor
Be a key contributor to the planning and direction of a project and effectively prioritize goals
Lead discussions at peer review and use quantitative skills to positively influence decision making
Effectively explain technical concepts at all levels in the organization, including senior leaders/stakeholders
Lead, or make major contributions to, improvements in methodology or initiatives to address capability gaps or increase efficiency
Represent Deloitte externally to advance our reputation as the AI/ML leader in the consulting industry
Identify opportunities to apply the latest advancements in Machine Learning and Artificial Intelligence to build, test, and validate predictive models
Create algorithms to extract information from large, multiparametric data sets
Deploy your algorithms to production to identify actionable insights from large databases
Compare results from various methodologies and recommend best techniques to stake holders
Develop and embed automated processes for predictive model validation, deployment, and implementation
Connect and collaborate with subject matter experts across multiple industries
Make impactful contributions to internal discussions on emerging machine learning methodologies
A degree in Engineering, Statistics, Data Science, Applied Mathematics, Computer Science, Physics, Computational Biology, Computational Chemistry or related quantitative field (Masters or PhD preferred for Senior Manager direct hires)
Expert understanding of a programming language such as Python.
Experience with at least one Deep Learning framework such as TensorFlow/Keras, or PyTorch
Demonstrated ability to write high-quality, production-ready code (readable, well-tested, with well-designed APIs)
Demonstrated ability to develop novel machine learning methods that go beyond putting together of existing code, and to apply problem-solving skills to complex issues
Excellent written and verbal communication skills
Ability to work autonomously and collaboratively as part of a team to both teach and learn every day
Continuously looking for opportunities to learn, build skills and share learning.

Preferred:

PhD or Master's degree
AI/ML publication in a peer-reviewed journal
Proficiency in Linux environment (including shell scripting), experience with database languages (e.g., SQL, No-SQL) and experience with version control practices and tools (Git, Perforce, etc.)
Familiarity with cloud computing services (AWS, GCP, or Azure)
Large-scale deep learning model training

How you’ll grow

At Deloitte, our professional development plan focuses on helping people at every level of their career to identify and use their strengths to do their best work every day. From entry-level employees to senior leaders, we believe there’s always room to learn. We offer opportunities to help sharpen skills in addition to hands-on experience in the global, fast-changing business world. From on-the-job learning experiences to formal development programs at Deloitte University, our professionals have a variety of opportunities to continue to grow throughout their career. Explore Deloitte University, The Leadership Center.

Benefits

At Deloitte, we know that great people make a great organization. We value our people and offer employees a broad range of benefits. Learn more about what working at Deloitte can mean for you.

Deloitte’s culture

Our positive and supportive culture encourages our people to do their best work every day. We celebrate individuals by recognizing their uniqueness and offering them the flexibility to make daily choices that can help them to be healthy, centered, confident, and aware. We offer well-being programs and are continuously looking for new ways to maintain a culture where our people excel and lead healthy, happy lives. Learn more about Life at Deloitte.

Corporate citizenship

Deloitte is led by a purpose: to make an impact that matters. This purpose defines who we are and extends to relationships with our clients, our people and our communities. We believe that business has the power to inspire and transform. We focus on education, giving, skill-based volunteerism, and leadership to help drive positive social impact in our communities. Learn more about Deloitte’s impact on the world.

Recruiter tips

We want job seekers exploring opportunities at Deloitte to feel prepared and confident. To help you with your interview, we suggest that you do your research: know some background about the organization and the business area you’re applying to. Check out recruiting tips from Deloitte professionals.",3.8,"Deloitte
3.8","Dallas, TX",-1,10000+ Employees,1850,Company - Private,Accounting,Accounting & Legal,$10+ billion (USD),-1
381,"Data Science Engineer, Recent Graduate",$93k-$164k (Glassdoor Est.),"We are looking for this rare combination of expertise in Machine Learning and passion for deploying to production reliable and efficient Machine Learning services at massive scale. As a member of our team, you will collaborate with researchers to invent, design and implement end-to-end reliable, scalable, efficient production services in Python, Java and Scala, using state-of-the-art big data and Machine Learning tools like Hadoop, Spark, Tensorflow, Scikit. Come and help us blow the boundaries of e-commerce through AI. PRIMARY JOB RESPONSIBILITIES Design, implement and deploy Machine Learning technologies into reliable and scalable services. Monitor and ensure life cycle maintenance of Machine Learning models and services. Estimate engineering effort, plan feature implementations, and rollout complex RESTful services. Push the bar to solve complex technical challenges of scale and performance. Must be able to independently design code and test major features, as well as work jointly with other team members to deliver complex changes. QUALIFICATIONS Must be currently enrolled in a full-time, degree-seeking program and in the process of obtaining a Bachelors, Masters or PhD degree in Computer Science, Statistics, Mathematics or a related field. Well versed in machine learning, information retrieval, applied statistics Expertise in Deep Learning. Experience with building Machine Learning models and working with libraries like Scikit, Tensorflow or FastText. Hands-on industrial experience with big data processing using Hadoop, Pig/Hive or similar. 2+ years of software design and development experience with languages such as Java, C++, Scala, Python. Agility to adapt to emerging challenges and execute under ambiguity. Familiarity with NoSQL database experience. Agile development experience is a plus. Self-motivated and fast learner. Excellent communication, presentation, interpersonal and analytical skills. Disclaimer: Please note that by applying to this role, you are agreeing to be considered for multiple positions. This is a general description of the qualifications and skills required for positions of this type of role. This website uses cookies to enhance your experience. By continuing to browse the site, you agree to our use of cookies View our privacy policy View our accessibility info eBay Inc. is an equal opportunity employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, national origin, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, veteran status, and disability, or other legally protected status. If you are unable to submit an application because of incompatible assistive technology or a disability, please contact us at talent@ebay.com. We will make every effort to respond to your request for disability assistance as soon as possible. For more information see: EEO is the Law Poster EEO is the Law Poster Supplement",3.8,"eBay Inc.
3.8","San Jose, CA",-1,10000+ Employees,1995,Company - Public,Internet,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),-1
382,Research Engineer,$76k-$134k (Glassdoor Est.),"We're looking for a select few uniquely excellent software engineers to join our world-class team. PDTers are creative, energetic, friendly, entrepreneurial, and collaborative. If you could walk around our office, you'd see that we're a focused, intent, and nimble company with none of the attitude and bureaucracy of a stereotypical Wall Street trading firm. Our engineers love to work on challenging and complicated problems, and in return, they have a chance to make a direct impact on our bottom line. For the right talent, there is fantastic growth potential.

At PDT, we recognize that certain research directions require both engineering and analytical know-how to execute. As such, we are looking for a select few individuals that have experience in both software engineering as well as experience in statistical modeling, mathematics, or a related field.

Expectations:
Collaborate with senior researchers and technologists to investigate novel research ideas, evaluate them with large-scale experiments on a HPC grid, and develop scientific libraries to share these findings and processes.
Over time independently originate, test, develop, and own research projects and processes.
Contribute to both our technology stack and research models across the continuous full research-to-technology stack.
Create and refine scientific library code while managing both deployment and adoption of research enabling technologies.
Why join us? PDT Partners has a 25+ year track record and a reputation for excellence. Our goal is to be the best quantitative investment manager in the world—measured by the quality of our products, not their size. PDT's very high employee-retention rate speaks for itself. Our people are intellectually extraordinary and our community is close-knit, down-to-earth, and diverse.

Requirements:
Exceptional programming skills
Ability to generate and execute on research ideas
Knowledge of trading and finance isn't required
Masters (or equivalent experience) in computer science, statistics, mathematics, or a related field
Preferred Qualifications:
PhD (or equivalent experience)
Strong publication record
Experience with C++
Experience with the Python scientific stack",4.4,"PDT Partners
4.4","New York, NY",-1,51 to 200 Employees,1993,Company - Private,Investment Banking & Asset Management,Finance,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
383,PLC Field Engineer I,$47k-$77k (Glassdoor Est.),"WHO WE ARE

We are a global company with our US headquarters right outside of Atlanta, GA. We specialize in dock-to-dock automation of the supply chain process for both B2B (Business to Business) and B2C (Business to Consumer.) With over 4,500 people in our group worldwide we are different than most other supply chain automation companies in that over 25% of our solutions are software-based. We also reinvest 7% of our revenues in R&D ensuring a strong and vibrant future! Come help us change the world! For more information, visit www.knapp.com.

Job Summary:

This position must ensure that all tasks and job duties are completed in time to facilitate a successful startup and an operational system at the Customer Site, on schedule.

Essential Tasks and Responsibilities:
Preparation of projects in the office
Creation of the system control PLC program
Installation, configuration, and commissioning of the system on-site
Conducting system component and system overall performance tests
Supporting the PLC development department if new products or stations are developed
Testing and function verification of electrical control cabinets
Verification and acceptance testing of pre-assembled stations and machines
Electrical installation and support, if requested or necessary
Troubleshooting of electrical issues on-site
Creating and correcting electrical schematics of the installation based on the final installation on-site
Training of Customer/On-site maintenance personnel
Training of new PLC Field Engineers in office and on-site
Supporting customer service (hotline) on-site
Coordinating daily job duties/tasks on-site with all involved teams of the project and customer
Technical Requirements
Basic knowledge of PLC programming control systems (S7 or Allen Bradley)
Using Siemens S7 or Totally Integrated Automation (TIA)
Capable of programming PLCs
Basic knowledge of electrical systems
Knowledge of computer systems and Windows
Other Duties and Responsibilities:
Motivation
Positive, constructive and confident attitude about the company and position (role model of the company)
Reliability and ability to work under pressure
Able to complete tasks in high quality and on time, also in stressful situations
Handle failures and challenges
Ability to focus on goals and stay on track
Travel and flexibility
Willing to travel often and work flexible hours based on the project (e.g. night shift or weekends)
Willingness to learn new processes
Ability to take criticism and use it in a constructive way
Ability to manage conflicts
Recognize and understand tension, to talk openly about it and to work together on a sustainable solution
Perception
Ability to recognize, troubleshoot and in the end resolve system failures and problems
Working Conditions and Environment:
Overtime, if required by work.
80% Travel required.
Professional office etiquette is required at all times.
Physical requirement: Sitting, stooping, bending, visual acuity, finger dexterity, walking, lifting up to 50 pounds.
We offer:
Premium Health Insurance
Dental Insurance
Paid Vacation & 9 Holidays
Retirement Plan
Flexible Spending Account
Life Insurance
Short & Long Term Disability
Employee Assistance Program
Company Events & outings",3.4,"Knapp
3.4","Kennesaw, GA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1952,Company - Private,Logistics & Supply Chain,Transportation & Logistics,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
384,Senior Software Engineer,$111k-$216k (Glassdoor Est.),"Are you a talented engineer and want to work on a mission-focused product? Ntrepid is seeking a Senior Software Engineer to join a team creating a new Intelligent Automation framework. This hands-on technical position will play a key role in the development, deployment, and scaling of Ntrepid’s next generation of software solutions. The successful candidate will also interact with other departments and stakeholders to architect creative solutions that provide a broad range of customers with new capabilities.
The Senior Software Engineer will play an active role in the development, deployment, and scaling of this product. This position requires strong problem-solving skills and a deep interest in learning the details of data modeling and automating remote interaction with physical devices and virtual machines.
This cutting-edge product will play a foundational role in Ntrepid’s next generation of solutions that support customer missions. The small but growing agile team offers new members the chance to impact the product’s direction with creative solutions to a wide range of problems.

Coordinate with data scientists and other engineers to iteratively adapt and integrate novel algorithms into the product
Create/train models and code that support AI automated routines
Translate data models and customer workflows into functional code
Implement data handling for object-oriented database stores
Develop service interfaces and use them to automate workflow logic
Effectively document system requirements and architecture and help implement engineering best practices

Required
U.S. Citizenship required
Ability to obtain/maintain security clearance
Full-stack development experience required
Software development experience using languages such as Python, Java, C++
Enterprise level development experience on projects with data modeling, user interfaces, and data synchronization
Experience with machine learning and neural networks
Demonstrated desire and ability to quickly learn new technologies.
Experience with creating unit and functional testing.
Proficiency in functional programming.
Experience creating and integrating RESTful APIs
System-level familiarity with Windows and Linux operating systems.
Preferred
Demonstrated expertise of Continuous Integration practices
Solid understanding of Machine Learning technology and practices
Background in implementing system security principles
Experience with Distributed In-Memory Data Grid computing
Experience using AWS services (commercial or GovCloud environments preferred)",3.9,"Ntrepid
3.9","Herndon, VA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2010,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
385,DataOps Field Engineer,$48k-$91k (Glassdoor Est.),"Company Description
Tamr is the enterprise-scale data unification company trusted by industry leaders like GE, Toyota, Thomson Reuters, and GSK. The company’s patented software platform uses machine learning supplemented with customers’ knowledge to unify and prepare data across myriad silos to deliver previously unavailable business-changing insights. With a co-founding team led by Andy Palmer (founding CEO of Vertica) and Mike Stonebraker (Turing Award winner) and backed by founding investors NEA and backed by founding investors NEA and GV, Tamr is transforming how companies get value from their data.

Job Description
Tamr field engineers are highly technical data scientists and engineers who understand all aspects of the business. We know how to pitch the product to anyone from software architects to business executives. Often we’re working on the most challenging problems in the enterprise and we have to dig deep to understand the business value and deliver technical solutions. As the company’s outward-facing, technical resource, the work of the whole group is varied. We build prototypes, direct product development, work with sales on accounts, implement pilot solutions, and deploy full production rollouts. Field engineers are expected to be highly efficient and resourceful when leading these projects.


Qualifications
We are looking for someone who loves to write code, and has a genuine interest in being customer-facing. We are building and selling a human-in-the-loop machine learning platform for the enterprise to help companies automatically unify and categorize their data to drive new analytic insight. We are looking for engineers interested in creating front line code to solve real customer problems, ranging from back-end data processing and machine learning, to front end presentation and dashboarding.


Challenges that make this job interesting:
The problem we’re solving is hard - enterprise data is messy and there is a lot of it. It’s our job to derive value from this data in a flexible and scalable way
Every customer is different - while there are similar use cases that we see repeatedly, every account presents new challenges and we need to be able to adapt quickly to each new situation
This job might be a good fit for you if:
You have strong data science and/or software engineering experience
You are excited about working for a startup and being a key contributor
You enjoy working with customers and have excellent interpersonal skills
You have machine learning knowledge/experience
Qualifications:
BS, MS or PhD degree in Computer Science, Physics, Mathematics or similarly quantitative/technical field
Polyglot programmer, with experience using technologies such as Python, Java, R, SQL
Willingness and ability to travel to client locations on occasion
Candidates for this position must be a U.S. Citizen. Please note if you have a security clearance (or if you have held one in the past).
Other Preferred Qualifications / Nice to Have:
Deep understanding of data integration and transformation patterns such as messaging, ETL
Hands-on experience with large distributed systems from an architecture and development perspective
Hands-on experience with traditional data warehouse technologies and BI or visualization tools
Machine learning knowledge/experience
Front end software development expertise. JS in particular
Experience building enterprise applications, including integration with COTS systems
Experience with any of the following technologies: Hadoop, Spark, ElasticSearch, Java, AWS
DevOps and/or cloud solutions deployment experience a plus
Advanced quantitative technical degree (MS or PhD) preferred
Additional Information

This position is available in Cambridge MA.

Tamr provides equal employment opportunities (EEO) to all employees and applicants for employment without regard to race, color, religion, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, national origin, age, disability, genetic information, marital status, amnesty, or status as a covered veteran in accordance with applicable federal, state and local laws.",4.3,"Tamr
4.3","Boston, MA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2013,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
386,Principal / Sr Principal Data Scientist (TS/SCI/Poly),$123k-$195k (Glassdoor Est.),"At the heart of Defining Possible is our commitment to missions. In rapidly changing global security environments, Northrop Grumman brings informed insights and software-secure technology to enable strategic planning. We're looking for innovators who can help us keep building on our wide portfolio of secure, affordable, integrated, and multi-domain systems and technologies that fuel those missions. By joining in our shared mission, we'll support yours of expanding your personal network and developing skills, whether you are new to the field or an industry thought-leader. At Northrop Grumman, you'll have the resources, support, and team to do some of the best work of your career.

Are you interested in expanding your career through experience and exposure, all while supporting a mission that seeks to ensure the security of our nation and its allies? If so, then Northrop Grumman is the place for you. As a leading global security company, we provide innovative systems, products and solutions to our customers worldwide. We are comprised of diverse professionals that bring different perspectives and ideas, understanding that the more experiences we bring to our work the more innovative we can be. As we continue to build our workforce, we look for people that exemplify our core values, leadership characteristics, and approach to innovation.

Northrop Grumman Mission Systems has an exciting opportunity for a Principal / Sr Principal Data Scientist who will be a member of a program's Data Science Team. Our ideal candidate will create data exploitation architectures/models/protocols, statistical reporting, and data analysis methodologies to identify trends in large data sets.

This position will be based in Chantilly, VA.

This position may be filled as a level 3 or level 4.

CIMS
NGMSCIMS

Qualifications:

Basic Qualifications:
Principal level 3: Bachelor's Degree and a minimum of 5 years of related experience or a Master's Degree and a minimum of 3 years of related experience. An extra 4 years of experience may be substituted in lieu of a degree.
Senior Principal level 4: Bachelor's Degree and a minimum of 9 years of related experience, a Master's Degree and a minimum of 7 years of related experience, or a PhD and a minimum of 5 years of related experience. An extra 4 years of experience may be substituted in lieu of a degree.
Active TS/SCI with Polygraph Clearance
Demonstrated experience in performing on data science projects in multiple domains, providing new capabilities to the organization and customers
Experience in two or more of the following: Python, Machine Learning, Natural Language Processing, Neural Networks, Apache Spark, Hadoop, R, C++, SQL Database/Coding, or visualization tools such as Tableau.
Experience with AWS or similar cloud provider
Demonstrated experience in solving problems with structured and unstructured data
Experienced in applying statistical and data visualization skills
Ability to perform complex tasks and participate in determining objectives of assignment. This includes planning schedules and working independently to achieve objectives.
Preferred Qualifications:
Proficient in applying technical standards, principles, theories, concepts and techniques of analyses containing many applications.
Experience developing solutions to address a national security issue or provide a competitive advantage for the organization.
Master's degree in mathematics, statistics, data science, data analytics, business analytics or a related field
Additional technical skills developing data science applications using languages/libraries such as TensorFlow, Keras, PyTorch, pandas, NumPy, Matlab, Paradigm or DataRobot desired.
Additional technical skills and/or research in areas like text or video processing, computer vision and/or graph analytics desired
Northrop Grumman is committed to hiring and retaining a diverse workforce. We are proud to be an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer, making decisions without regard to race, color, religion, creed, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, marital status, national origin, age, veteran status, disability, or any other protected class. For our complete EEO/AA and Pay Transparency statement, please visit www.northropgrumman.com/EEO. U.S. Citizenship is required for most positions.",3.9,"Northrop Grumman
3.9","Chantilly, VA",-1,10000+ Employees,1939,Company - Public,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$10+ billion (USD),-1
387,Data Scientist,$106k-$173k (Glassdoor Est.),"About Datadog:

We're on a mission to build the best platform in the world for engineers to understand and scale their systems, applications, and teams. We operate at high scale—trillions of data points per day—providing always-on alerting, metrics visualization, logs, and application tracing for tens of thousands of companies. Our engineering culture values pragmatism, honesty, and simplicity to solve hard problems the right way.

The opportunity:

You will have a fantastic team of data engineers to support you, a collaborative environment to encourage your work, and the best technologies for performing data science at high scale in your toolkit.

You will:

Present the latest academic research papers to your team.
Research and benchmark the latest algorithms that can be used for our particular use-cases.
Apply machine learning algorithms and statistical techniques to build new product features.
Deploy a new feature to production, instantly affecting customers with your work.
Mentor other data scientists on your team.
Explore and find meaning in extremely high volumes of data.
Investigate and fix a production issue from a service your team owns.

Requirements:

You have 2 + years professional experience
You are fluent with SQL / relational algebra.
You have mastered working with data in a language such as Python, R, or Julia.
You’ve done data science at high scale with tools like Hadoop and Spark.
You have backend programming experience in one or more languages.
You have significant experience applying machine learning to real business problems.
You want to work in a fast, high-growth startup environment and thrive on autonomy.
You care about code simplicity and performance.
You have a BS/MS/PhD in a scientific field or equivalent experience.
You can explain complex ideas and algorithms in understandable ways.

Bonus points:

You’ve written production data pipelines.
You’re familiar with time series analysis.",4.2,"DataDog
4.2","New York, NY",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2010,Company - Public,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
388,Staff Data Engineer,$103k-$184k (Glassdoor Est.),"Staff Data Engineer


More than 7 billion people depend on farms for healthy and affordable food. By 2050, the global population will reach 9.4 billion and farmers will need new ways to deliver on this demand. They'll be seeking options that are economically viable and that will help them remain environmentally sustainable. Granular's software meets this need, making farmers more efficient.

We're looking for a Staff Data Engineer. This role is integral to Granular's success and is a unique opportunity to join a mission focused, fast-paced, smart and fun team.

What You'll Get To Do:
Design, develop and deploy data pipelines and machine learning models at broad geographic scale, including crop yield models covering millions of acres of agricultural land in the United States.
Be a mentor within the data science team, especially when it comes to systems design and architecture.
Contribute to Granular's success by building machine learning systems for yield prediction, disease identification and other powerful data science features that help farmers run better businesses.
In addition to building new pipelines and features, you will be a mentor for the rest of the team, particularly regarding data pipeline architecture, code quality, maintainability, and automation. You will drive data pipeline design decisions, and help us build systems that are well-tested, scalable, and automatable.
Who You Will Do It With:


We are a team of over a dozen data scientists with backgrounds ranging across ecology, economics, history, earth systems, and engineering. What we have in common is a passion for data, for solving real-world problems, and for building tools that amaze our customers. We're a team that loves to learn.

Who You Are:
You are an experienced Python programmer with 3+ years of professional data engineering experience.
You are an experienced data engineer. In previous roles you have designed and developed data pipelines for ML, and have deployed and maintained them at scale. (Experience with either deep learning or gradient boosting is desireable but not required: you have either developed ML models yourself, or have worked alongside data scientists in your previous roles.)
Experience with spatial data (GIS) is a big plus but is not required.
Experience with AWS and/or Google Cloud is preferred. Experience with terraform, AWS Lambda, and Postgres/PostGIS are all a huge plus.
You are a phenomenal teammate! You have real-world experience with code review and mentoring other team members, and have worked closely with data scientists, data engineers and product managers in past roles.
You design and write maintainable code and data pipelines. You have experience with automation and testing, as well as with monitoring ML models that have been deployed to production.
Perks and Benefits:


Upward mobility. We are growing and need talent who can take on increasingly ambitious and rewarding roles
Generous Vacation
401k Matching Program
Employer sponsored Medical, Dental, and Vision
Vision, Dental and Dependent Care FSA
Family, Maternity and Paternity Leave
Learning Programs and Individual Development Support
Open floor plan and dog-friendly offices
Who We Are:


Granular is Farm Management Software (FMS) that is helping thousands of farmers to build stronger farms today and steward their lands for generations to come. Granular uniquely combines an industry-leading support team with the most recommended suite of easy-to-use powerful software to help farmers and their teams run all aspects of their farm business. From financials to agronomy to operations, farmers are now able to make decisions with greater confidence in an increasingly challenging environment.

Granular was founded in 2014 with the mission of helping farmers run more profitable and efficient business instead of maximizing bushels. Built as a collaboration between several of the most advanced family farms and top technology investors including Google Ventures, Granular is widely credited for launching the first modern, built in the cloud and mobile-centric FMS in 2014. In 2017, Corteva Agriscience acquired Granular to bring together the best technologists, scientists, and entrepreneurs from across the world with its global presence and deep resources to serve the needs of farmers through the transformative effects of digital technologies.

Today, our over 400 passionate employees are on a mission helping our customers solve their problems today and for food demands in the future by shaping agriculture through continuous innovations in farm productivity, profitability, and environmental sustainability.

Granular is San Francisco-based, with offices worldwide. Granular is an independent, wholly-owned subsidiary of Corteva Agriscience (NYSE:CTVA), a spin off of DowDuPont™. Learn more about our company and people at http://granular.ag/, Twitter, @GranularAg, and Instagram, @Granular_Ag, or facebook.com/GranularAgriculture/

We are an equal opportunity employer. We do not discriminate on the basis of race, religion, color, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, age, marital status, veteran status, or disability status. We will ensure that individuals with disabilities are provided reasonable accommodation to participate in the job application or interview process, to perform essential job functions, and to receive other benefits and privileges of employment. Please contact us to request an accommodation.",4.4,"Granular
4.4","San Francisco, CA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2014,Company - Public,IT Services,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
389,Applied Machine Learning - Software Engineer,$71k-$122k (Glassdoor Est.),"Responsibilities

This is a hybrid of system engineering and machine learning role:
Write server-side production code for applications that are robust and efficient
Develop machine learning algorithms, combining with rule-based optimization to deliver improvement in product metrics
Build recommendation and ranking algorithms for news articles
Develop internal analytics tools
Rapid prototyping
Requirements


Minimum Qualifications
2+ years of experience in designing and implementing machine learning algorithms, and applying them to real-world problems
Solid Machine Learning background and deep understanding of certain domain of machine learning techniques, especially in natural language processing, recommendation systems, computer visions
Strong software development skills with a proven record of shipping changes to production that improved product metrics with machine learning technologies
Good written and spoken communication skills can work across functional teams
Expert coding abilities in multiple programming languages (e.g. Java, C++, Python, Scala)
MS or BS in computer science, mathematics, physics, or other quantitative fields
Preferred Qualifications
Experience with cloud-based architecture (e.g. Amazon Web Services)
Strong interest in news media and our mission
Benefits
Equity included
100% medical, dental, and vision insurance coverage (60% coverage for dependents)
Monthly housing, commute, mobile phone, and gym allowances
401k matching program
Free lunch, snacks, drinks, etc.
Pet-friendly office
Powered by JazzHR",4.2,"IntelliPro Group Inc.
4.2","San Francisco, CA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,-1,Company - Private,-1,-1,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
390,Electronics Design Engineer,$59k-$105k (Glassdoor Est.),"Introduction

ASML US, including its affiliates and subsidiaries, bring together the most creative minds in science and technology to develop lithography machines that are key to producing faster, cheaper, more energy-efficient microchips. We design, develop, integrate, market and service these advanced machines, which enable our customers - the world’s leading chipmakers - to reduce the size and increase the functionality of their microchips, which in turn leads to smaller, more powerful consumer electronics. Our headquarters are in Veldhoven, Netherlands, and we have 18 office locations around the United States including main offices in Chandler, Arizona, San Jose and San Diego, California, Wilton, Connecticut, and Hillsboro, Oregon.

Job Mission

ASML is a world leader in the manufacture of advanced technology systems for the semiconductor industry.ASML’s corporate headquarters is in Veldhoven, the Netherlands. Manufacturing sites and research and development facilities are located in Connecticut, California and the Netherlands. Technology development centers and training facilities are located in the United States, Japan, Korea, the Netherlands, and Taiwan. Additionally, ASML provides optimal service to its customers via over 50 sales and service organizations in 16 countries. Founded in the Netherlands in 1984, the company is publicly traded on Euronext Amsterdam and NASDAQ under the symbol ASML.

This position requires access to controlled technology, as defined in the Export Administration Regulations (15 C.F.R. § 730, et seq.). Qualified candidates must be legally authorized to access such controlled technology prior to beginning work. Business demands may require ASML to proceed with applicants who are immediately eligible to access controlled technology.

Job Description

ASML brings together the most creative minds in science and technology to develop lithography machines that are key to producing faster, cheaper, more energy-efficient microchips. As an Electrical Engineer, you will be responsible for developing portions of the lithography system and/or associated tooling related to the electronics.

The Electrical Engineer provides expertise to deliver electronic and electrical designs for the entire development process.Conceptional design through detail design, prototypes through volume manufacture, initial integration through qualification. You will collaborate with a multidiscipline project team on the electrical infrastructure, perform engineering analysis, generate detail electronic designs, create engineering drawings/documents and partner with suppliers.

Education
BS Engineering with a major in Electrical Engineering or Electrical & Computer Engineering, or equivalent experience.
MS and/or PhD a plus.
Experience
3 – 5 years of Electrical Engineering for Electronic Development.
Specify & design all aspects of electronic development:
Analog, Digital and Programmable Logic Circuit Design.
Schematic Capture.
AC and DC Power Distribution systems.
Interconnect Cables and Harnessing.
Electronic Racks, Cabinets, Boxes and Control Consoles.
Printed Circuit Boards – PCB signal and power integrity.
Test & Troubleshoot electronic systems to Component level.
Testing Validation and Verification (V&V) of requirements.
Write technical documents, Specifications, Designs, Test Procedures, Test Reports.
Software/Tool Skills:
Electronic Design Automation – Mentor Graphics xDX/xPCB Designer, PSpice, OrCAD, PADs or similar.
MATLAB.
LabVIEW.
Personal skills
The position requires highly motivated, extremely organized and self-driven individuals.
Ownership mentality – desire to deliver top quality at right cost, right time.
Quality focus.
Good written and oral communications skills – ability to provide technical arguments to influence direction.
Can observe and respond to people and situations and interact with others encountered in the course of work.
Can learn and apply new information or skills.
Must be able to read and interpret data, information, and documents.
Strong customer focus and commitment to customer satisfaction through prioritization, quality, efficiency and professionalism.
Ability to complete assignments with attention to detail and high degree of accuracy.
Proven ability to perform effectively in a demanding environment with changing workloads and deadlines.
Result driven-demonstrate ownership and accountability.
Identifies bottlenecks and drives improvements.
Work independently or as part of a team and follow through on assignments with minimal supervision.
Demonstrate open, clear, concise and professional communication.
Ability to establish and maintain cooperative working relationships with manager, co-workers and customer.
Work according to a strict set of procedures within the provided timelines.
Other information

Role within Office
Responsibilities:

Routinely required to sit; walk; talk; hear; use hands to keyboard, finger, handle, and feel; stoop, kneel, crouch, twist, reach, and stretch. Occasionally required to move around the campus.
Occasionally lift and/or move up to 20 pounds.
May require travel dependent on business needs.
Specific vision abilities required by this job include close vision, color vision, peripheral vision, depth perception, and ability to adjust focus.

EOE AA M/F/Veteran/Disability",3.9,"ASML
3.9","Wilton, CT",-1,10000+ Employees,1984,Company - Public,Electrical & Electronic Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$5 to $10 billion (USD),-1
391,Principal Data Scientist,$101k-$157k (Glassdoor Est.),"Primary Responsibilities:
The Principal Data Scientist will play an analytical role researching, designing, implementing and deploying full-stack scalable machine learning solutions to support house call member engagements
Develop intelligent solutions to drive increase in HouseCalls penetration rate by using unstructured data like voice and text
Consolidate internal and external data to establish member journey line across different programs
Establish analytic machine learning models to increase member outbound reach experience and NPS scores, implement the solutions into applications or operation
Drive inbound scheduling through text mining in scripting and NLP
You’ll enjoy the flexibility to telecommute* from anywhere within the U.S. as you take on some tough challenges.

You’ll be rewarded and recognized for your performance in an environment that will challenge you and give you clear direction on what it takes to succeed in your role as well as provide development for other roles you may be interested in.

Required Qualifications:
Bachelor’s degree in Applied Mathematics, Statistics, Computer Sciences, Information Management, Actuarial Science or a related technical field; MS or PhD strongly preferred
Minimum 7 years’ experience in data analytics and machine learning modeling
Minimum 7 years’ experience working with large databases to create meaningful, usable data structures to extract information out of application transactional data
Minimum 7 years’ experience leading technical and non-technical resources in the area of Information Management, Data Strategy, Business Intelligence development, data mining and predictive analytics with machine learning/statistical modeling techniques
Minimum 3 years' experience in Python
Proven thought leadership skills are essential
Strong ability to communicate highly technical issues/results to a diverse audience both verbally and in written
Experience working for a large enterprise with fragmented data sources, lack of documentation, unstructured requirements and ambiguity
Experience working with business stakeholders and senior leaders in understanding data analytics and information needs, and executing on transformation of high-level, abstract data needs into meaningful data management solutions, information and analysis
Experience understanding and managing business data and information, and the ability to correlate business processes to data
Experience converting raw data into processed, actionable, insightful information is required
Strong execution mentality
Preferred Qualifications:
MS in Applied Mathematics, Physics, Computer Sciences, Information Management, Statistics, Actuarial Science or a related technical field
Minimum 3 years of Speech Recognition modeling and/or NLP preferred
Minimum 5 years’ experience in correlating business processes and front-end applications to back-end databases and systems

UnitedHealth Group is working to create the health care system of tomorrow.

Already Fortune 6, we are totally focused on innovation and change. We work a little harder. We aim a little higher. We expect more from ourselves and each other. And at the end of the day, we're doing a lot of good.

Through our family of businesses and a lot of inspired individuals, we're building a high-performance health care system that works better for more people in more ways than ever. Now we're looking to reinforce our team with people who are decisive, brilliant - and built for speed.

OptumCare is committed to creating an environment where physicians focus on what they do best: care for their patients. To do so, OptumCare provides administrative and business support services to both owned and affiliated medical practices which are part of OptumCare. Each medical practice part and their physician employees have complete authority with regards to all medical decision-making and patient care. OptumCare’s support services do not interfere with or control the practice of medicine by the medical practices or any of their physicians.
All Telecommuters will be required to adhere to UnitedHealth Group’s Telecommuter Policy
Diversity creates a healthier atmosphere: OptumCare is an Equal Employment Opportunity/Affirmative Action employers and all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, age, national origin, protected veteran status, disability status, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, marital status, genetic information, or any other characteristic protected by law.

OptumCare is a drug-free workplace. Candidates are required to pass a drug test before beginning employment.",3.4,"UnitedHealth Group
3.4","Eden Prairie, MN",-1,10000+ Employees,1977,Company - Public,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$10+ billion (USD),-1
392,Data Engineer - Machine Learning,$89k-$154k (Glassdoor Est.),"This position will be either in Boston/Kentucky

**U.S. Citizens and those authorized to work in the U.S are encouraged to apply. We are unable to sponsor at this time.**

Data Engineer - Machine Learning

Role: Data Engineer
Assignment: Humana – Digital Health & Analytics
Location: Louisville, KY (rates low to high: $68-$76) or Boston, MA (rates low to high: $87-$96)

Summary of Duties & Job Description
We are looking for a Data Engineer to work with our data science teams to collect, store, process, and analyze huge sets of data. The primary focus will be on choosing optimal solutions to use for these purposes, then maintaining, implementing, and monitoring them. You will also be responsible for integrating them with the architecture used across teams in our group.

Responsibilities
• Selecting and integrating any Big Data tools and frameworks required to provide requested capabilities.
• Implementing ETL process and data pipelines.
• Monitoring performance and advising any necessary infrastructure changes.
• Collaborating with Data Scientists to build Machine Learning systems and run experiments.

Requirements

Skills and Qualifications

• Strong algorithm and data structures knowledge.
• Knowledge of various databases (RDBMS, noSQL, HDFS, Cassandra, Redis).
• Experience building cloud data lakes and data warehouses is highly desirable.
• Experience with security and authentication in cloud platforms (Azure preferred).
• Bachelor’s Degree or above in a technical field (Computer Science preferred).
• 5+ years of experience in data engineering.
• Proficient in one or more programming languages (Python, Java, JavaScript, C#, etc.).
• Experience building stream-processing systems, using solutions such as Spark-Streaming or Flink.
• Familiar with Spark ecosystem (e.g. Databricks).
• Good knowledge of Big Data querying tools.
• Understanding of Data Catalog, Data Governance, Data Lineage.
• Knowledge of various ETL techniques and data pipelines.
• Knowledge of messaging systems, such as Kafka or RabbitMQ.
• Familiarity with Machine Learning, Deep Learning and Natural Language Processing. workflows and libraries (scikit-learn, Spark MLlib, TensorFlow/Keras/PyTorch).
• Running Machine Learning tests and experiments.

Benefits

Base Salary, Benefits: Global Health, Dental, Vision, AD&D Insurance, Vacation / PTO / Holiday pay plus matching 401K, Tuition & Travel Expense Reimbursement as needed

About us:

TA Digital is the only global boutique agency that delivers the “best of both worlds” to clients seeking to achieve organizational success through digital transformation. Unlike smaller, regional agencies that lack the ability to scale or large organizations that succumb to a quantity-over-quality approach, we offer resource diversity while also providing meticulous attention to the details that enable strategic success.

Over the past 20 years, TA Digital has positioned clients to achieve digital maturity by focusing on data, customer-centricity and exponential return on investment; by melding exceptional user experience and data-driven methodologies with artificial intelligence and machine learning, we enable digital transformations that intelligently build upon the strategies we set into motion. We are known as a global leader that assists marketing and technology executives in understanding the digital ecosystem while identifying cultural and operational gaps within their business - ultimately ushering organizations toward a more mature model and profitable digital landscape.

Recognized in 2013, 2014, 2015, and 2019 Inc. 5000 list as one of the most successful technology companies in the United States, TA Digital is pleased also to share high-level strategic partnerships with world class digital experience platform companies like Adobe, SAP and Salesforce and possess global partnerships with industry leaders such as Sitecore, Episerver, Elastic Path, BigCommerce, AWS, Azure and Coveo.

TA Digital has offices in US, Canada, UK and India. For more information, visit: www.tadigital.com

EOE & OFCCP Compliant regardless of: Minority / Female / Veteran / Disabled / Sexual Orientation / Gender Identity / National Origin",3.4,"TA Digital
3.4","Boston, MA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2000,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
393,"MTS 2, Software Engineer",$85k-$146k (Glassdoor Est.),"Looking for a company that inspires passion, courage and imagination, where you can be part of the team shaping the future of global commerce? Want to shape how millions of people buy, sell, connect, and share around the world? If you’re interested in joining a purpose-driven community that is dedicated to creating an ambitious and inclusive workplace, join eBay – a company you can be proud to be a part of.

We are looking for highly motivated and talented software engineer. As a member of the team, you'll build the exciting systems and services needed to fuel the next wave of Ebay's growth. You will collaborate with applied researchers, data engineers, product managers to implement end-to-end reliable, scalable, efficient production services in Python, Go, Java, Scala or similar languages.

The ideal candidate will have minimum 7 years experience in software development, strong engineering skills, and excellent communication skills.

Requirements:
Build high performance data platforms and services for knowledge graph and machine learning applications
Work with data scientists, engineers, and cross-functional teams to produce end-to-end production-ready solutions.
Drive and work on architecture design, execute and deliver development results

Requirements:
BS/MS/PhD in Computer Science/Engineering or related technical discipline
Experience with Postgres sql, Elastic search, Kafka streaming, KV stores are highly desirable
Hands on experience with Docker and Kubernetes
Experience with large data sets and related technologies, e.g., Hadoop and Spark
Contribution to the architecture and design (reliability and scaling) of production data platforms
Excellent understanding of computer science fundamentals, data structures, and algorithms. Strong programming skills in (two or more) Java, Scala, Python, Go.
Minimum 7+ years in software development
Agility to adapt to emerging challenges and execute under ambiguity
Strong communication skills.

Benefits:
Benefits are an essential part of your total compensation for the work you do every day. Whether you’re single, in a growing family, or nearing retirement, eBay offers a variety of comprehensive and competitive benefit programs to meet your needs. Including maternal & paternal leave, paid sabbatical, and plans to help ensure your financial security today and in the years ahead because we know feeling financially secure during your working years and through retirement is important.
Here at eBay, we love creating opportunities for others by connecting people from widely diverse backgrounds, perspectives, and geographies. So, being diverse and inclusive isn’t just something we strive for, it is who we are, and part of what we do each and every single day. We want to ensure that as an employee, you feel eBay is a place where, no matter who you are, you feel safe, included, and that you have the opportunity to bring your unique self to work.

To learn about eBay’s Diversity & Inclusion click here: https://www.ebayinc.com/our-company/diversity-inclusion/
This website uses cookies to enhance your experience. By continuing to browse the site, you agree to our use of cookies
View our privacy policy
View our accessibility info
eBay Inc. is an equal opportunity employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, national origin, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, veteran status, and disability, or other legally protected status. If you are unable to submit an application because of incompatible assistive technology or a disability, please contact us at talent@ebay.com. We will make every effort to respond to your request for disability assistance as soon as possible.
For more information see:
EEO is the Law Poster
EEO is the Law Poster Supplement

eBay Inc. is an equal opportunity employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, national origin, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, veteran status, and disability, or other legally protected status. If you are unable to submit an application because of incompatible assistive technology or a disability, please contact us at talent@ebay.com . We will make every effort to respond to your request for disability assistance as soon as possible.
For more information see: EEO is the Law Poster and EEO is the Law Poster Supplement

This website uses cookies to enhance your experience. By continuing to browse the site, you agree to our use of cookies
View our privacy policy and accessibility info",3.8,"eBay Inc.
3.8","Loma Mar, CA",-1,10000+ Employees,1995,Company - Public,Internet,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),-1
394,Semiconductor Equipment Engineer - Yield Star,$67k-$102k (Glassdoor Est.),"Introduction

ASML US, including its affiliates and subsidiaries, bring together the most creative minds in science and technology to develop lithography machines that are key to producing faster, cheaper, more energy-efficient microchips. We design, develop, integrate, market and service these advanced machines, which enable our customers - the world’s leading chipmakers - to reduce the size and increase the functionality of their microchips, which in turn leads to smaller, more powerful consumer electronics. Our headquarters are in Veldhoven, Netherlands, and we have 18 office locations around the United States including main offices in Chandler, Arizona, San Jose and San Diego, California, Wilton, Connecticut, and Hillsboro, Oregon.

Job Mission

ASML in Wilton CT is seeking an Equipment Engineer in theFC-104 and/or FC-121 YieldStar Sensor. Equipment Engineers are responsible for the serviceability and product availability performance aspects of New Product Introduction, and Existing Product performance upgrades and support. Your deliverables directly enable the ASML Customer Support organization to provide world class service to our customers by providing maintenance procedures, tools and spare part structures, diagnostics tools, system calibration and recovery sequences and knowledge transfer information to the global ASML CS organization. Support, consultancy, engineering, developing and analysis, and KPI reporting are all main activities of the Equipment Engineer. Delivering solutions and optimizing the use at customer sites is also part of Availability Equipment Engineering. Continuous development of your technical expertise and personal skills is essential.

This position requires access to controlled technology, as defined in the Export Administration Regulations (15 C.F.R. § 730, et seq.). Qualified candidates must be legally authorized to access such controlled technology prior to beginning work. Business demands may require ASML to proceed with applicants who are immediately eligible to access controlled technology.

Job Description
As an Industrial Availability Equipment Engineer your main focus is in the YieldStar Sensor Module.
You contribute to the product generation process by setting availability targets, maintainability targets for new designs and giving feedback to development projects based on field performance analysis experiences at ASML customer sites.
This involves all support for functionality, electrical, mechanical, mechatronic, software and sub-components of the YieldStar Sensor Module for new product introduction and/or existing products.
You input serviceability, accessibility, and drive optimized MTTR into the design.
You support the factory, field, & project team via material notification / issue resolution, parts usage analysis and resolution, tracking and reporting on field failures and issues.
Responsible for regular updating and extending own and local Field Service Engineer knowledge so most problems can be handled locally with available in depth product knowledge.
Initiate and contribute in providing material for technical service documentation and training in cooperation with authors and training developers.
Create and give presentations to transfer knowledge to Field Service Engineers.
Identify structural problems and possible improvements and address them in the ASML organization.
Typical business hours with travel international up to 10%.
Education

Bachelor degree in technical science (mechanics, mechatronics, physics, electronics, chemistry, process technology or optics) or equivalent experience.

Experience
1~5 years or more (co-op included) in an engineering or service environment.
Working experience or knowledge in Photo-litho tools as well as understanding the concept of CRAMS (cost, reliability, availability, manufacturability, serviceability) and COACH procedure is preferred.
Experience in a production environment with high tech products and complex production processes is an advantage.
A background in the application of vacuum technologies is desired for EUV.
Working knowledge of SAP, is a plus.
Analytic, abstract thinking, good communication skills, initiative, independent, planning and prioritizing, sharing knowledge, stress tolerance and teamwork.
Personal skills
Can observe and respond to people and situations and interact with others encountered in the course of work.
Can learn and apply new information or skills.
Must be able to read and interpret data, information, and documents.
Strong customer focus and commitment to customer satisfaction through prioritization, quality, efficiency and professionalism.
Ability to complete assignments with attention to detail and high degree of accuracy.
Proven ability to perform effectively in a demanding environment with changing workloads and deadlines.
Result driven-demonstrate ownership and accountability.
Identifies bottlenecks and drives improvements.
Work independently or as part of a team and follow through on assignments with minimal supervision.
Demonstrate open, clear, concise and professional communication.
Ability to establish and maintain cooperative working relationships with manager, co-workers and customer.
Work according to a strict set of procedures within the provided timelines.
Other information

Role within Office

Responsibilities:

Routinely required to sit; walk; talk; hear; use hands to keyboard, finger, handle, and feel; stoop, kneel, crouch, twist, reach, and stretch. Occasionally required to move around the campus.
Occasionally lift and/or move up to 20 pounds.
May require travel dependent on business needs.
Specific vision abilities required by this job include close vision, color vision, peripheral vision, depth perception, and ability to adjust focus.

EOE AA M/F/Veteran/Disability

Internal Reference: #LI-KG1",3.9,"ASML
3.9","Wilton, CT",-1,10000+ Employees,1984,Company - Public,Electrical & Electronic Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$5 to $10 billion (USD),-1
395,Machine Learning Engineer,$79k-$131k (Glassdoor Est.),"Job Description

The Machine Learning organization within Intel Architecture Graphics & Software group, has an opportunity for a Machine Learning Engineer. You must possess the below minimum qualifications to be initially considered for this position. Experience listed below, would be obtained through a combination of your schoolwork/ classes/ research and/or relevant previous job and/or internship experiences.

Qualifications

Must have a Master's degree in Electrical Engineering, Computer Engineering with at least 2+ years relevant experience OR PhD in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, Electrical Engineering, or any other related field.

You must also have 6+ months of work experience with the following:

Candidate must have expertise on End to End AI/ML workload and Architecture analysis on CPUs, GPUs and other accelerators.
Software development skills in C++, Python a must
At least one popular DL framework such as TensorFlow or Pytorch model development
Background in Analytics or Machine learning algorithms and libraries are also necessary to do detailed workload profiling and modeling
Must have at least one publication and appropriate level of contribution at a Graduate level in machine learning is a must.

Preferred Qualifications:

Background on Systems software and performance analyses of full system
*By applying to this posting your resume and profile will become visible to Intel Recruiters and will allow them to consider you for current and future job openings aligned with the skills and positions mentioned above.
Inside this Business Group

Intel Labs is the company's world-class, industry leading research organization, responsible for driving Intel's technology pipeline and creating new opportunities. The mission of Intel Labs is to deliver breakthrough technologies to fuel Intel's growth. This includes identifying and exploring compelling new technologies and high risk opportunities ahead of business unit investment and demonstrating first-to-market technologies and innovative new usages for computing technology. Intel Labs engages the leading thinkers in academia and industry in addition to partnering closely with Intel business units.

Other Locations
US, California, Santa Clara;

Posting Statement
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, religious creed, sex, national origin, ancestry, age, physical or mental disability, medical condition, genetic information, military and veteran status, marital status, pregnancy, gender, gender expression, gender identity, sexual orientation, or any other characteristic protected by local law, regulation, or ordinance.",4.1,"Intel
4.1","Hillsboro, OR",-1,10000+ Employees,1968,Company - Public,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),-1
396,Machine Learning Engineer/Data Engineer,$70k-$130k (Glassdoor Est.),"Adroit Resources Inc., (A Nisum Company) is a certified, minority-owned, dynamic Information Technology services company based out of California’s Silicon Valley. Our offerings range from IT staff augmentation to technology consulting. We work with large enterprise clients via their MSP Programs, with mid-sized companies and fast-growing startups to ramp up their hiring efforts to hire the best talent in the shortest time. Adroit works nationwide on IT and Non-IT positions in a number of verticals. We place qualified, experienced and vetted talent that is in high demand today.

Required Skills:
Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science or equivalent education/training
4- 5 years of Software development and testing experience,Machine Learning exp
3+ years of Working experience on tools like Hive, Spark, HBase, Sqoop, Impala, Kafka, Flume, Oozie, MapReduce, etc.
3+ years of programming experience in Scala, Java or Python



Desired Skills:
Working experience on large migration Projects is a big plus.
Development and Testing experience of Machine Learning Applications is a plus.


Adroit Resources Inc., is an Equal Opportunity Employer and we are proud of our ongoing efforts to foster diversity and inclusion in the workplace.",3.2,"Nisum
3.2","Sunnyvale, CA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2000,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
397,Data Scientist,-1,"The Data Scientist responsibilities include managing the supporting Virtual Health (VH) data analytics team, supporting the Navy Virtual Health (VH) Office and building analytics models in support of the BUMED VH Office goals and projects. The Data Scientist is responsible for modeling complex Institute problems, discovering Institute insights and identifying opportunities to advance Navy VH through the use of statistical, algorithmic, mining and visualization techniques. In addition to advanced analytic skills, this role is also proficient at integrating and preparing large, varied datasets, architecting specialized database and computing environments, and clearly communicating results. The Data Scientist works closely with clients, data stewards, project/program managers, and other stakeholders within the Navy VH Office to turn data into critical information and knowledge that can be used to make sound organizational decisions.

The Data Scientist will provide strategic direction to the analytics team based on an understanding of BUMED organizational structure, Navy telehealth goals and DHA data sources (i.e., M2, MDR, TRAC2ES, etc.). The role requires a combination of business focus, strong analytical and problem-solving skills, and programming knowledge to be able to quickly cycle hypothesis through the discovery phase of the project. They need to be creative thinkers and propose innovative ways to look at problems by using data mining approaches based on the data and information available. They will need to validate their findings using an experimental and iterative approach, with a clear focus on providing analysis to support data-driven decision-making for the Navy VH Office. The Data Scientist must have excellent written and communications skills to report back findings in a clear, structured manner.

Responsibilities:
Leverage available data sources to perform complex analytics in support of Navy VH Office goals, projects, and initiatives
Deep knowledge and experience with programming statistical software such as: SaS, R, Python, Tableau, etc.
Support the objectives and tasks of team of data analysts, including coaching on complex analytics, modeling, and visualization
Manage the development and maintenance of the Navy VH Office Tableau dashboard including measurement definition and analysis and identifying opportunities to advance Navy VH
Lead in the design, development, testing, implementation, and report creation in support of Navy telehealth office measurement strategies
Identify opportunities to advance Navy VH through statistical, algorithmic, mining and visualization techniques
Prepare and clearly communicate analysis results to various Navy VH stakeholders such that information can be leveraged for data-driven decision-making
Maintain knowledge and understanding of BUMED and Defense Health Agency (DHA) databases to leverage all available sources
Synthesize large, varied datasets to perform complex analysis and modeling
Ability to remotely coordinate with BUMED and DHA stakeholders to seek access and understanding of disparate data sources
Participate in the development of measurement methodologies in conjunction with Navy VH Office portfolio initiatives in order to define, analyze and report on project goals
Develop and maintain virtual health technical knowledgebase on approved platform (e.g., milSuite, SharePoint)
Requirements

Basic Requirements
At least 2-5 years of Health Care Analytic work, specifically Military Health System experience including M2 and MDR
At least 2 years of experience with SaS
At least 2-5 years of experience in complex statistical, algorithmic, mining and visualization of data
Excellent written and communications skills
Experience leading strategic analytic efforts and supporting team of data analysts
Ability to creatively problem solve and propose innovative ways to analyze and report findings
Meets or exceeds DOD 8570 requirements for IAM-I (i.e. Security + CE)
A strong understanding and demonstrated use of statistical software (e.g., R, Python, Tableau, STATA)
Strong background in a regulatory compliance framework- HIPAA, PII
Experience working with local and headquarters’ leadership to identify and implement Virtual Health priorities
Knowledge of SharePoint for presenting metrics and dashboard reporting
Strong critical thinking. Can distill customer needs through applicable BUMED and DHA databases
Ability to work with minimum of supervision and tracking. Works well both as team member and independently
Operates in matrix environment on multiple complex projects simultaneously
Education:
Bachelor’s degree and 5-12 years of experience in a related field
Travel and Worksite:
Must be capable to telework on Government furnished equipment to DHA/Navy standards with appropriate approvals.
Must be capable to support 100% telework in special situations.


Clearance:
Must be US Citizen with the ability to obtain an active security clearance (and/or) has held an active security clearance in the past
Benefits
Long Term Disability
Basic Life Insurance
Basic Accidental Death & Dismemberment Insurance
Direct Payroll Deposit
Leave Accrual
Holidays


Optional Benefits
Short Term Disability
Additional (Voluntary) Life Insurance
Additional (Voluntary) AD&D Insurance
401(k)
Medical Coverage
Dental Coverage
Vision Care Plan
Flexible Spending Account Plan
Online Training
AFLAC Supplementary Insurances
AAP/EEO Statement


Spinvi is an Equal Opportunity Employer. Spinvi does not discriminate on the basis of race, religion, color, sex, gender identity, sexual orientation, age, non-disqualifying physical or mental disability, national origin, veteran status or any other basis covered by appropriate law. All employment is decided on the basis of qualifications, merit, and business need.

Spinvi provides equal employment opportunities (EEO) to all employees and applicants for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, age, disability or genetics. In addition to federal law requirements, Spinvi complies with applicable state and local laws governing nondiscrimination in employment in every location in which the company has facilities. This policy applies to all terms and conditions of employment, including recruiting, hiring, placement, promotion, termination, layoff, recall, transfer, leaves of absence, compensation and training.

Spinvi expressly prohibits any form of workplace harassment based on race, color, religion, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, national origin, age, genetic information, disability, or veteran status. Improper interference with the ability of Spinvi’s employees to perform their job duties may result in discipline up to and including discharge.",4.9,"Spinvi
4.9","Falls Church, VA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
398,"Business Development Director, Artificial Intelligence and Machine Learning Programs",-1,"Business Development Director, Artificial Intelligence and Machine Learning Programs
Location


US - Regional

Employment type


Regular - Full Time

ID

1665

Apply Now

Summary
The Business Development Director, Artificial Intelligence and Machine Learning (AI/ML) Programs is responsible for the business development of prospective customers. This position is responsible for the direction of all AI/ML efforts as they relate to supporting existing business and capturing new business.

Position Responsibilities
Build trusted relationships across multiple customer organizations - at all levels - and facilitate the same for others within AeroVironment (AV)
Identify, create, and nurture and new business opportunities
Strengthen AV’s reputation across multiple customer organizations
Utilize applicable business processes and the company’s Customer Relationship Management (CRM) tool(s)
Create capture strategies with compelling win strategies for new business opportunities
Conduct market research in order to assess size and potential value of an opportunity
Conduct competitive assessments to understand the strengths and weaknesses of specific and potential AV solutions
Support monthly forecast reviews and the annual strategic planning process
Prioritize investment decisions for review
Identify funding sources, sales vehicles, influencers, and decision-makers of prospective customers
Communicate regularly with management and work closely with the Product Line Management (PLM) team in order to share customer technology needs, customer requirements, and competitive feedback
Qualify new leads and organize meetings to identify, analyze, and discuss customer requirements
Assist with the development of marketing collateral
Build partnerships with other corporate entities in order to pursue specific opportunities and enhance AV product offerings
Provide thoughtful and thorough analysis of subtle opportunities, situations, or data that is often overlooked by others
Other duties as assigned
Special Requirements

U.S. Citizenship required; Active Secret security clearance and ability to obtain a Top Secret security clearance, if required

Basic Qualifications (Required Skills & Experience)
Bachelor’s degree in Business Administration or relevant discipline; advanced degree is preferred
Minimum of 12 - 15 years of relevant Business Development experience
Demonstrated experience in developing multiple successful programs in AI, Autonomy, and/or ML for multiple U.S. DoD, U.S. government (USG), and international customer communities (OSD, DARPA, SOCOM, U.S. Marine Corps, U.S. Army, etc.)
Experience working with customers to develop program requirements
Experience working with technical teams to develop proposal approaches
Experience in identifying and negotiating with potential teaming partners
Experience writing proposals and winning contracts
Ability to communicate effectively (orally, in writing, and through presentations) with both technical and non-technical customers to convey AV’s key AI/ML/Autonomy key discriminators
Prior experience managing formal proposal and business gate processes
Demonstrated experience in developing programs related to small UAS and/or tactical missile systems is preferable
Position requires significant domestic and some international travel
Must have a valid driver’s license and clean DMV record
Other Qualifications and Desired Competencies
Broad expertise or unique knowledge/skills that contribute to the development of company objectives and goals
Working knowledge of typical contracts exercised by DoD customers
Strong Business Development acumen
Thorough understanding of USG acquisition and program planning processes
Demonstrated experience working with cross-functional teams
Strong communication, negotiation, strategic planning, and interpersonal skills
Computer skills to include proficiency in MS Office (Word, PowerPoint, Excel, Outlook)
Ability to excel in a fast-paced, deadline-driven environment in which small teams share a broad variety of duties
Strong initiative and personal drive to accomplish goals and meet individual and company objectives
A desire to take ownership and responsibility for current and past work products
Commitment to learning from mistakes and a drive to improve and enhance performance of oneself, others, and the company
A focus on teamwork and an interest in putting the success of the team above self
Physical Demands
Ability to work in an office environment
Ability to sit and stand for long periods; talk, hear, and use hands and fingers to operate a computer and telephone keyboard (constant)
ITAR Requirement:

This position requires the use of information which is subject to compliance with International Traffic Arms Regulations (ITAR). To conform to U.S. Government export regulations/ITAR, applicants must be a U.S. Citizen, lawful permanent resident of the U.S. (or, green card holder), protected individual as defined by 8 U.S.C. 1324b(a)(3). Applicants cannot be hired until they are qualified to have such access. Some positions due to U.S. Government contract requirements will require current U.S. Citizenship.

Benefits: AV offers an excellent benefits package including medical, dental vision, 401K with company matching, a 9/80 work schedule and a paid holiday shutdown. For more information about our company benefit offerings please visit: http://www.avinc.com/myavbenefits.

We also encourage you to review our company website at http://www.avinc.com to learn more about us.

Principals only need apply. NO agencies please.

Who We Are

Based in California, AeroVironment (AVAV) is a global leader in unmanned aircraft systems (UAS) and tactical missile systems. Founded in 1971 by celebrated physicist and engineer, Dr. Paul MacCready, we’ve been at the leading edge of technical innovation for more than 45 years. Be a part of the team that developed the world’s most widely used military drones and created the first submarine-launched reconnaissance drone, and has seven innovative vehicles that are part of the Smithsonian Institution’s permanent collection in Washington, DC.

Join us today in developing the next generation of small UAS and tactical missile systems that will deliver more actionable intelligence to our customers so they can proceed with certainty – and succeed.

What We Do

Building on a history of technological innovation, AeroVironment designs, develops, produces, and supports an advanced portfolio of unmanned aircraft systems (UAS) and tactical missile systems. Agencies of the U.S. Department of Defense and allied military services use the company’s hand-launched UAS to provide situational awareness to tactical operating units through real-time, airborne reconnaissance, surveillance, and target acquisition.

AeroVironment Incorporated is an equal opportunity employer, M/F/D/V and works in compliance with both federal and state laws. We are committed to the concept regarding Equal Employment opportunity. Qualified candidates will be considered for employment regardless of race, color, religion, age, sex, national origin, marital status, medical condition nor disability, genetics, veteran and all others that may appy.

To view our CCPA Privacy Policy click here: https://www.avinc.com/legal/ccpa-privacy-policy",4.1,"AeroVironment
4.1",United States,-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1971,Company - Public,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
399,Software Engineer - Machine Learning (Money Movement),$135k-$223k (Glassdoor Est.),"We believe that the way consumers and businesses work with their finances will drastically improve in the next few years. Our goal is to build the tools and infrastructure for developers to create this next generation of financial services applications. Today, thousands of companies such as Acorns, Stripe, and Venmo rely on Plaid to integrate with banks and the financial system. Plaid’s infrastructure handles millions of requests per day and thousands of bank integrations. We pride ourselves on maintaining an API to support the developers who depend on us and the millions of consumers who use their apps.

We're looking for a Machine Learning Engineer with experience applying machine learning and modeling techniques in the fraud space to join our Money Movement team. You will help build the infrastructure and models focused on fraud detection, drawing signal from large volumes of data. You will both be building systems as well as investigating and integrating new data sources to improve the performance of our models. Apply if you care about building large, scalable performant production systems that apply machine learning technology to impactful problems. We're looking for someone who is not only technically capable but also has strong creativity, values user empathy and has a clear track record of effective teamwork.

We're guided by our principles, including impact, growing together, embracing openness and positivity, inventing tomorrow; we’re looking for leaders who are motivated by those same principles.
What excites you
Build products with real impact: your work will touch tens of millions of end-users, the best applications in FinTech, and major U.S. financial institutions
Passionate about applying Machine Learning to real-world problems, especially financial fraud
Working on both the 0 to 1 stage and the 1 to 10 stage of problems
Digging through finance’s complex challenges—and reimagining the experience completely
Understand data at both the micro and macro levels -- finding examples from specific cases, and generalizing into broader patterns by converting into features and models
What excites us
5+ years of production experience, systems development, and distributed systems
2+ years of industry experience developing machine learning models
1+ years of industry experience with financial fraud detection and fraud models
Data investigation and data engineering skills, including data infrastructure tools and query languages such as SQL
Background in computer science, engineering, mathematics, engineering, economics, or a related field
We are an equal opportunity employer and value diversity at our company. We do not discriminate on the basis of race, religion, color, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, age, marital status, veteran status, or disability status.",4.7,"Plaid
4.7","San Francisco, CA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2012,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
